[cover]



GRUNDRISSE


Foundations of the Critique of Political Economy (Rough Draft)

Karl Marx


Available online at:
https://www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1857/grundrisse/index.htm


Contents

-   Note on the Text
-   Analytical Contents List
-   Introduction
-   The Chapter on Money
-   The Chapter on Capital
-   Bastiat and Carey
-   Editorial Notes

Note on the Text

Marx wrote this huge manuscript as part of his preparation for what
would become _A Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy_
(published in 1859) and _Capital_ (published 1867).

Soviet Marxologists released several never-before-seen Marx/Engels works
in the 1930s. Most were early works – like the _Economic and
Philosophical Manuscripts_ – but the _Grundrisse_ stood alone as issuing
forth from the most intense period of Marx’s decade-long, in-depth study
of economics. It is an extremely rich and thought-provoking work,
showing signs of humanism and the influence of Hegelian dialectic
method. Do note, though, Marx did not intend it for publication as is,
so it can be stylistically very rough in places.

The series of seven notebooks were rough-drafted by Marx, chiefly for
purposes of self-clarification, during the winter of 1857-8. The
manuscript became lost in circumstances still unknown and was first
effectively published, in the German original, in 1953. A limited
edition was published by Foreign Language Publishers in Moscow in two
volumes, 1939 and 1941 respectively, under the editorship of the
Marx-Engels-Lenin Institute, Moscow. The first volume contained the
introduction and the seven notebooks translated here. The second added
fragments from Marx’s 1851 notebooks of excerpts from Ricardo, the
fragment ‘Bastiat and Carey’ (also included in this translation), and
miscellaneous related material; also extensive annotations and sources.
A photo-offset reprint of the two volumes bound in one, minus
illustrations and facsimiles, was issued by Dietz Verlag, Berlin (E.),
in 1953, and is the basis of the present translation. It is referred to
hereafter as _Grundrisse_. Rosdolsky states that only three or four
copies of the 1939-41 edition ever reached ‘the western world’.

Analytical Contents List

[snip]


INTRODUCTION


Late August – Mid-September 1857

1. Production, Consumption, Distribution, Exchange (Circulation)

(1) PRODUCTION

_Independent Individuals. Eighteenth-century Ideas_

The object before us, to begin with, _material production_.

Individuals producing in society – hence socially determined individual
production – is, of course, the point of departure. The individual and
isolated hunter and fisherman, with whom Smith and Ricardo begin,
belongs among the unimaginative conceits of the eighteenth-century
Robinsonades, [1] which in no way express merely a reaction against
over-sophistication and a return to a misunderstood natural life, as
cultural historians imagine. As little as Rousseau’s _contrat social_,
which brings naturally independent, autonomous subjects into relation
and connection by contract, rests on such naturalism. This is the
semblance, the merely aesthetic semblance, of the Robinsonades, great
and small. It is, rather, the anticipation of ‘civil society’, in
preparation since the sixteenth century and making giant strides towards
maturity in the eighteenth. In this society of free competition, the
individual appears detached from the natural bonds etc. which in earlier
historical periods make him the accessory of a definite and limited
human conglomerate. Smith and Ricardo still stand with both feet on the
shoulders of the eighteenth-century prophets, in whose imaginations this
eighteenth-century individual – the product on one side of the
dissolution of the feudal forms of society, on the other side of the new
forces of production developed since the sixteenth century – appears as
an ideal, whose existence they project into the past. Not as a historic
result but as history’s point of departure. As the Natural Individual
appropriate to their notion of human nature, not arising historically,
but posited by nature. This illusion has been common to each new epoch
to this day. Steuart [2] avoided this simple-mindedness because as an
aristocrat and in antithesis to the eighteenth century, he had in some
respects a more historical footing.

The more deeply we go back into history, the more does the individual,
and hence also the producing individual, appear as dependent, as
belonging to a greater whole: in a still quite natural way in the family
and in the family expanded into the clan [_Stamm_]; then later in the
various forms of communal society arising out of the antitheses and
fusions of the clan. Only in the eighteenth century, in ‘civil society’,
do the various forms of social connectedness confront the individual as
a mere means towards his private purposes, as external necessity. But
the epoch which produces this standpoint, that of the isolated
individual, is also precisely that of the hitherto most developed social
(from this standpoint, general) relations. The human being is in the
most literal sense a ζῶον πολιτιχόν, [3] not merely a gregarious animal,
but an animal which can individuate itself only in the midst of society.
Production by an isolated individual outside society – a rare exception
which may well occur when a civilized person in whom the social forces
are already dynamically present is cast by accident into the wilderness
– is as much of an absurdity as is the development of language without
individuals living _together_ and talking to each other. There is no
point in dwelling on this any longer. The point could go entirely
unmentioned if this twaddle, which had sense and reason for the
eighteenth-century characters, had not been earnestly pulled back into
the centre of the most modern economics by Bastiat, [4] Carey, [5]
Proudhon etc. Of course it is a convenience for Proudhon et al. to be
able to give a historico-philosophic account of the source of an
economic relation, of whose historic origins he is ignorant, by
inventing the myth that Adam or Prometheus stumbled on the idea
ready-made, and then it was adopted, etc. Nothing is more dry and boring
than the fantasies of a _locus communis_. [6]

_Eternalization of historic relations of production. – Production and distribution in general. – Property_

Whenever we speak of production, then, what is meant is always
production at a definite stage of social development – production by
social individuals. It might seem, therefore, that in order to talk
about production at all we must either pursue the process of historic
development through its different phases, or declare beforehand that we
are dealing with a specific historic epoch such as e.g. modern bourgeois
production, which is indeed our particular theme. However, all epochs of
production have certain common traits, common characteristics.
_Production in general_ is an abstraction, but a rational abstraction in
so far as it really brings out and fixes the common element and thus
saves us repetition. Still, this _general_ category, this common element
sifted out by comparison, is itself segmented many times over and splits
into different determinations. Some determinations belong to all epochs,
others only to a few. [Some] determinations will be shared by the most
modern epoch and the most ancient. No production will be thinkable
without them; however even though the most developed languages have laws
and characteristics in common with the least developed, nevertheless,
just those things which determine their development, i.e. the elements
which are not general and common, must be separated out from the
determinations valid for production as such, so that in their unity –
which arises already from the identity of the subject, humanity, and of
the object, nature – their essential difference is not forgotten. The
whole profundity of those modern economists who demonstrate the eternity
and harmoniousness of the existing social relations lies in this
forgetting. For example. No production possible without an instrument of
production, even if this instrument is only the hand. No production
without stored-up, past labour, even if it is only the facility gathered
together and concentrated in the hand of the savage by repeated
practice. Capital is, among other things, also an instrument of
production, also objectified, past labour. Therefore capital is a
general, eternal relation of nature; that is, if I leave out just the
specific quality which alone makes ‘instrument of production’ and
‘stored-up labour’ into capital. The entire history of production
relations thus appears to Carey, for example, as a malicious forgery
perpetrated by governments.

If there is no production in general, then there is also no general
production. Production is always a _particular_ branch of production –
e.g. agriculture, cattle-raising, manufactures etc. – or it is a
_totality_. But political economy is not technology. The relation of the
general characteristics of production at a given stage of social
development to the particular forms of production to be developed
elsewhere (later). Lastly, production also is not only a particular
production. Rather, it is always a certain social body, a social
subject, which is active in a greater or sparser totality of branches of
production. Nor does the relationship between scientific presentation
and the real movement belong here yet. Production in general. Particular
branches of production. Totality of production.

It is the fashion to preface a work of economics with a general part –
and precisely this part figures under the title ‘production’ (see for
example J. St. Mill) [7] – treating of the _general preconditions_ of
all production. This general part consists or is alleged to consist of
(1) the conditions without which production is not possible. I.e. in
fact, to indicate nothing more than the essential moments of all
production. But, as we will see, this reduces itself in fact to a few
very simple characteristics, which are hammered out into flat
tautologies; (2) the conditions which promote production to a greater or
lesser degree, such as e.g. Adam Smith’s progressive and stagnant state
of society. While this is of value in his work as an insight, to elevate
it to scientific significance would require investigations into the
periodization of _degrees of productivity_ in the development of
individual peoples – an investigation which lies outside the proper
boundaries of the theme, but, in so far as it does belong there, must be
brought in as part of the development of competition, accumulation etc.
In the usual formulation, the answer amounts to the general statement
that an industrial people reaches the peak of its production at the
moment when it arrives at its historical peak generally. In fact. The
industrial peak of a people when its main concern is not yet gain, but
rather to gain. Thus the Yankees over the English. Or, also, that e.g.
certain races, locations, climates, natural conditions such as harbours,
soil fertility etc. are more advantageous to production than others.
This too amounts to the tautology that wealth is more easily created
where its elements are subjectively and objectively present to a greater
degree.

But none of all this is the economists’ real concern in this general
part. The aim is, rather, to present production – see e.g. Mill – as
distinct from distribution etc., as encased in eternal natural laws
independent of history, at which opportunity _bourgeois_ relations are
then quietly smuggled in as the inviolable natural laws on which society
in the abstract is founded. This is the more or less conscious purpose
of the whole proceeding. In distribution, by contrast, humanity has
allegedly permitted itself to be considerably more arbitrary. Quite
apart from this crude tearing-apart of production and distribution and
of their real relationship, it must be apparent from the outset that, no
matter how differently distribution may have been arranged in different
stages of social development, it must be possible here also, just as
with production, to single out common characteristics, and just as
possible to confound or to extinguish all historic differences under
_general human_ laws. For example, the slave, the serf and the wage
labourer all receive a quantity of food which makes it possible for them
to exist as slaves, as serfs, as wage labourers. The conqueror who lives
from tribute, or the official who lives from taxes, or the landed
proprietor and his rent, or the monk and his alms, or the Levite and his
tithe, all receive a quota of social production, which is determined by
other laws than that of the slave’s, etc. The two main points which all
economists cite under this rubric are: (1) property; (2) its protection
by courts, police, etc. To this a very short answer may be given:

to 1. All production is appropriation of nature on the part of an
individual within and through a specific form of society. In this sense
it is a tautology to say that property (appropriation) is a precondition
of production. But it is altogether ridiculous to leap from that to a
specific form of property, e.g. private property. (Which further and
equally presupposes an antithetical form, _non-property_.) History
rather shows common property (e.g. in India, among the Slavs, the early
Celts, etc.) to be the more [8] original form, a form which long
continues to play a significant role in the shape of communal property.
The question whether wealth develops better in this or another form of
property is still quite beside the point here. But that there can be no
production and hence no society where some form of property does not
exist is a tautology. An appropriation which does not make something
into property is a _contradictio in subjecto_.

to 2. Protection of acquisitions etc. When these trivialities are
reduced to their real content, they tell more than their preachers know.
Namely that every form of production creates its own legal relations,
form of government, etc. In bringing things which are organically
related into an accidental relation, into a merely reflective
connection, they display their crudity and lack of conceptual
understanding. All the bourgeois economists are aware of is that
production can be carried on better under the modern police than e.g. on
the principle of might makes right. They forget only that this principle
is also a legal relation, and that the right of the stronger prevails in
their ‘constitutional republics’ as well, only in another form.

When the social conditions corresponding to a specific stage of
production are only just arising, or when they are already dying out,
there are, naturally, disturbances in production, although to different
degrees and with different effects.

To summarize: There are characteristics which all stages of production
have in common, and which are established as general ones by the mind;
but the so-called _general preconditions_ of all production are nothing
more than these abstract moments with which no real historical stage of
production can be grasped.

(2) THE GENERAL RELATION OF PRODUCTION TO DISTRIBUTION, EXCHANGE, CONSUMPTION

Before going further in the analysis of production, it is necessary to
focus on the various categories which the economists line up next to it.

The obvious, trite notion: in production the members of society
appropriate (create, shape) the products of nature in accord with human
needs; distribution determines the proportion in which the individual
shares in the product; exchange delivers the particular products into
which the individual desires to convert the portion which distribution
has assigned to him; and finally, in consumption, the products become
objects of gratification, of individual appropriation. Production
creates the objects which correspond to the given needs; distribution
divides them up according to social laws; exchange further parcels out
the already divided shares in accord with individual needs; and finally,
in consumption, the product steps outside this social movement and
becomes a direct object and servant of individual need, and satisfies it
in being consumed. Thus production appears as the point of departure,
consumption as the conclusion, distribution and exchange as the middle,
which is however itself twofold, since distribution is determined by
society and exchange by individuals. The person objectifies himself in
production, the thing subjectifies itself in the person; [9] in
distribution, society mediates between production and consumption in the
form of general, dominant determinants; in exchange the two are mediated
by the chance characteristics of the individual.

Distribution determines the relation in which products fall to
individuals (the amount); exchange determines the production [10] in
which the individual demands the portion allotted to him by
distribution.

Thus production, distribution, exchange and consumption form a regular
syllogism; production is the generality, distribution and exchange the
particularity, and consumption the singularity in which the whole is
joined together. This is admittedly a coherence, but a shallow one.
Production is determined by general natural laws, distribution by social
accident, and the latter may therefore promote production to a greater
or lesser extent; exchange stands between the two as formal social
movement; and the concluding act, consumption, which is conceived not
only as a terminal point but also as an end-in-itself, actually belongs
outside economics except in so far as it reacts in turn upon the point
of departure and initiates the whole process anew.

The opponents of the political economists – whether inside or outside
its realm – who accuse them of barbarically tearing apart things which
belong together, stand either on the same ground as they, or beneath
them. Nothing is more common than the reproach that the political
economists view production too much as an end in itself, that
distribution is just as important. This accusation is based precisely on
the economic notion that the spheres of distribution and of production
are independent, autonomous neighbours. Or that these moments were not
grasped in their unity. As if this rupture had made its way not from
reality into the textbooks, but rather from the textbooks into reality,
and as if the task were the dialectic balancing of concepts, and not the
grasping of real relations!

[_Consumption and Production_]

(a₁) Production is also immediately consumption. Twofold consumption,
subjective and objective: the individual not only develops his abilities
in production, but also expends them, uses them up in the act of
production, just as natural procreation is a consumption of life forces.
Secondly: consumption of the means of production, which become worn out
through use, and are partly (e.g. in combustion) dissolved into their
elements again. Likewise, consumption of the raw material, which loses
its natural form and composition by being used up. The act of production
is therefore in all its moments also an act of consumption. But the
economists admit this. Production as directly identical with
consumption, and consumption as directly coincident with production, is
termed by them _productive consumption._ This identity of production and
consumption amounts to Spinoza’s thesis: _determinatio est negatio._
[11]

But this definition of productive consumption is advanced only for the
purpose of separating consumption as identical with production from
consumption proper, which is conceived rather as the destructive
antithesis to production. Let us therefore examine consumption proper.

Consumption is also immediately production, just as in nature the
consumption of the elements and chemical substances is the production of
the plant. It is clear that in taking in food, for example, which is a
form of consumption, the human being produces his own body. But this is
also true of every kind of consumption which in one way or another
produces human beings in some particular aspect. Consumptive production.
But, says economics, this production which is identical with consumption
is secondary, it is derived from the destruction of the prior product.
In the former, the producer objectified himself, in the latter, the
object he created personifies itself. Hence this consumptive production
– even though it is an immediate unity of production and consumption –
is essentially different from production proper. The immediate unity in
which production coincides with consumption and consumption with
production leaves their immediate duality intact.

Production, then, is also immediately consumption, consumption is also
immediately production. Each is immediately its opposite. But at the
same time a mediating movement takes place between the two. Production
mediates consumption; it creates the latter’s material; without it,
consumption would lack an object. But consumption also mediates
production, in that it alone creates for the products the subject for
whom they are products. The product only obtains its last finish in
consumption. A railway on which no trains run, hence which is not used
up, not consumed, is a railway only δυνάμει, [13] and not in reality.
Without production, no consumption; but also, without consumption, no
production; since production would then be purposeless. Consumption
produces production in a double way, (1) because a product becomes a
real product only by being consumed. For example, a garment becomes a
real garment only in the act of being worn; a house where no one lives
is in fact not a real house; thus the product, unlike a mere natural
object, proves itself to be, _becomes,_ a product only through
consumption. Only by decomposing the product does consumption give the
product the finishing touch; for the product is production not as [14]
objectified activity, but rather only as object for the active subject;
(2) because consumption creates the need for _new_ production, that is
it creates the ideal, internally impelling cause for production, which
is its presupposition. Consumption creates the motive for production; it
also creates the object which is active in production as its determinant
aim. If it is clear that production offers consumption its external
object, it is therefore equally clear that consumption _ideally posits_
the object of production as an internal image, as a need, as drive and
as purpose. It creates the objects of production in a still subjective
form. No production without a need. But consumption reproduces the need.

Production, for its part, correspondingly (1) furnishes the material and
the object for consumption. [15] Consumption without an object is not
consumption; therefore, in this respect, production creates, produces
consumption. (2) But the object is not the only thing which production
creates for consumption. Production also gives consumption its
specificity, its character, its finish. Just as consumption gave the
product its finish as product, so does production give finish to
consumption. _Firstly,_ the object is not an object in general, but a
specific object which must be consumed in a specific manner, to be
mediated in its turn by production itself. Hunger is hunger, but the
hunger gratified by cooked meat eaten with a knife and fork is a
different hunger from that which bolts down raw meat with the aid of
hand, nail and tooth. Production thus produces not only the object but
also the manner of consumption, not only objectively but also
subjectively. Production thus creates the consumer. (3) Production not
only supplies a material for the need, but it also supplies a need for
the material. As soon as consumption emerges from its initial state of
natural crudity and immediacy – and, if it remained at that stage, this
would be because production itself had been arrested there – it becomes
itself mediated as a drive by the object. The need which consumption
feels for the object is created by the perception of it. The object of
art – like every other product – creates a public which is sensitive to
art and enjoys beauty. Production thus not only creates an object for
the subject, but also a subject for the object. Thus production produces
consumption (1) by creating the material for it; (2) by determining the
manner of consumption; and (3) by creating the products, initially
posited by it as objects, in the form of a need felt by the consumer. It
thus produces the object of consumption, the manner of consumption and
the motive of consumption. Consumption likewise produces the producer’s
_inclination_ by beckoning to him as an aim-determining need.

The identities between consumption and production thus appear threefold:

 (1) _Immediate identity:_ Production is consumption, consumption is
production. Consumptive production. Productive consumption. The
political economists call both productive consumption. But then make a
further distinction. The first figures as reproduction, the second as
productive consumption. All investigations into the first concern
productive or unproductive labour; investigations into the second
concern productive or non-productive consumption.

(2) [In the sense] that one appears as a means for the other, is
mediated by the other: this is expressed as their mutual dependence; a
movement which relates them to one another, makes them appear
indispensable to one another, but still leaves them external to each
other. Production creates the material, as external object, for
consumption; consumption creates the need, as internal object, as aim,
for production. Without production no consumption; without consumption
no production. [This identity] figures in economics in many different
forms.

(3) Not only is production immediately consumption and consumption
immediately production, not only is production a means for consumption
and consumption the aim of production, i.e. each supplies the other with
its object (production supplying the external object of consumption,
consumption the conceived object of production); but also, each of them,
apart from being immediately the other, and apart from mediating the
other, in addition to this creates the other in completing itself, and
creates itself as the other. Consumption accomplishes the act of
production only in completing the product as product by dissolving it,
by consuming its independently material form, by raising the inclination
developed in the first act of production, through the need for
repetition, to its finished form; it is thus not only the concluding act
in which the product becomes product, but also that in which the
producer becomes producer. On the other side, production produces
consumption by creating the specific manner of consumption; and,
further, by creating the stimulus of consumption, the ability to
consume, as a need. This last identity, as determined under (3), [is]
frequently cited in economics in the relation of demand and supply, of
objects and needs, of socially created and natural needs.

Thereupon, nothing simpler for a Hegelian than to posit production and
consumption as identical. And this has been done not only by socialist
belletrists but by prosaic economists themselves, e.g. Say; [16] in the
form that when one looks at an entire people, its production is its
consumption. Or, indeed, at humanity in the abstract. Storch [17]
demonstrated Say’s error, namely that e.g. a people does not consume its
entire product, but also creates means of production, etc., fixed
capital, etc. To regard society as one single subject is, in addition,
to look at it wrongly; speculatively. With a single subject, production
and consumption appear as moments of a single act. The important thing
to emphasize here is only that, whether production and consumption are
viewed as the activity of one or of many individuals, they appear in any
case as moments of one process, in which production is the real point of
departure and hence also the predominant moment. Consumption as urgency,
as need, is itself an intrinsic moment of productive activity. But the
latter is the point of departure for realization and hence also its
predominant moment; it is the act through which the whole process again
runs its course. The individual produces an object and, by consuming it,
returns to himself, but returns as a productive and self-reproducing
individual. Consumption thus appears as a moment of production.

In society, however, the producer’s relation to the product, once the
latter is finished, is an external one, and its return to the subject
depends on his relations to other individuals. He does not come into
possession of it directly. Nor is its immediate appropriation his
purpose when he produces in society. _Distribution_ steps between the
producers and the products, hence between production and consumption, to
determine in accordance with social laws what the producer’s share will
be in the world of products.

Now, does distribution stand at the side of and outside production as an
autonomous sphere?

_Distribution and production_

(b₁) When one examines the usual works of economics, it is immediately
striking that everything in them is posited doubly. For example, ground
rent, wages, interest and profit figure under distribution, while land,
labour and capital figure under production as agents of production. In
the case of capital, now, it is evident from the outset that it is
posited doubly, (1) as agent of production, (2) as source of income, as
a determinant of specific forms of distribution. Interest and profit
thus also figure as such in production, in so far as they are forms in
which capital increases, grows, hence moments of its own production.
Interest and profit as forms of distribution presuppose capital as agent
of production. They are modes of distribution whose presupposition is
capital as agent of production. They are, likewise, modes of
reproduction of capital.

The category of wages, similarly, is the same as that which is examined
under a different heading as wage labour: the characteristic which
labour here possesses as an agent of production appears as a
characteristic of distribution. If labour were not specified as wage
labour, then the manner in which it shares in the products would not
appear as wages; as, for example, under slavery. Finally, to take at
once the most developed form of distribution, ground rent, by means of
which landed property shares in the product, presupposes large-scale
landed property (actually, large-scale agriculture) as agent of
production, and not merely land as such, just as wages do not merely
presuppose labour as such. The relations and modes of distribution thus
appear merely as the obverse of the agents of production. An individual
who participates in production in the form of wage labour shares in the
products, in the results of production, in the form of wages. The
structure [_Gliederung_] of distribution is completely determined by the
structure of production. Distribution is itself a product of production,
not only in its object, in that only the results of production can be
distributed, but also in its form, in that the specific kind of
participation in production determines the specific forms of
distribution, i.e. the pattern of participation in distribution. It is
altogether an illusion to posit land in production, ground rent in
distribution, etc.

Thus, economists such as Ricardo, who are the most frequently accused of
focusing on production alone, have defined distribution as the exclusive
object of economics, because they instinctively conceived the forms of
distribution as the most specific expression into which the agents of
production of a given society are cast.

To the single individual, of course, distribution appears as a social
law which determines his position within the system of production within
which he produces, and which therefore precedes production. The
individual comes into the world possessing neither capital nor land.
Social distribution assigns him at birth to wage labour. But this
situation of being assigned is itself a consequence of the existence of
capital and landed property as independent agents of production.

As regards whole societies, distribution seems to precede production and
to determine it in yet another respect, almost as if it were a
pre-economic fact. A conquering people divides the land among the
conquerors, thus imposes a certain distribution and form of property in
land, and thus determines production. Or it enslaves the conquered and
so makes slave labour the foundation of production. Or a people rises in
revolution and smashes the great landed estates into small parcels, and
hence, by this new distribution, gives production a new character. Or a
system of laws assigns property in land to certain families in
perpetuity, or distributes labour [as] a hereditary privilege and thus
confines it within certain castes. In all these cases, and they are all
historical, it seems that distribution is not structured and determined
by production, but rather the opposite, production by distribution.

In the shallowest conception, distribution appears as the distribution
of products, and hence as further removed from and quasi-independent of
production. But before distribution can be the distribution of products,
it is: (1) the distribution of the instruments of production, and (2),
which is a further specification of the same relation, the distribution
of the members of the society among the different kinds of production.
(Subsumption of the individuals under specific relations of production.)
The distribution of products is evidently only a result of this
distribution, which is comprised within the process of production itself
and determines the structure of production. To examine production while
disregarding this internal distribution within it is obviously an empty
abstraction; while conversely, the distribution of products follows by
itself from this distribution which forms an original moment of
production. Ricardo, whose concern was to grasp the specific social
structure of modern production, and who is the economist of production
_par excellence,_ declares for precisely that reason that _not_
production but distribution is the proper study of modern economics.
[18] This again shows the ineptitude of those economists who portray
production as an eternal truth while banishing history to the realm of
distribution.

The question of the relation between this production-determining
distribution, and production, belongs evidently within production
itself. If it is said that, since production must begin with a certain
distribution of the instruments of production, it follows that
distribution at least in this sense precedes and forms the
presupposition of production, then the reply must be that production
does indeed have its determinants and preconditions which form its
moments. At the very beginning these may appear as spontaneous, natural.
But by the process of production itself they are transformed from
natural into historic determinants, and if they appear to one epoch as
natural presuppositions of production, they were its historic product
for another. Within production itself they are constantly being changed.
The application of machinery, for example, changed the distribution of
instruments of production as well as of products. Modern large-scale
landed property is itself the product of modern commerce and of modern
industry, as well as of the application of the latter to agriculture.

The questions raised above all reduce themselves in the last instance to
the role played by general-historical relations in production, and their
relation to the movement of history generally. The question evidently
belongs within the treatment and investigation of production itself.

Still, in the trivial form in which they are raised above, they can be
dealt with equally briefly. In all cases of conquest, three things are
possible. The conquering people subjugates the conquered under its own
mode of production (e.g. the English in Ireland in this century, and
partly in India); or it leaves the old mode intact and contents itself
with a tribute (e.g. Turks and Romans); or a reciprocal interaction
takes place whereby something new, a synthesis, arises (the Germanic
conquests, in part). In all cases, the mode of production, whether that
of the conquering people, that of the conquered, or that emerging from
the fusion of both, is decisive for the new distribution which arises.
Although the latter appears as a presupposition of the new period of
production, it is thus itself in turn a product of production, not only
of historical production generally, but of the specific historic mode of
production.

The Mongols, with their devastations in Russia, e.g., were acting in
accordance with their production, cattle-raising, for which vast
uninhabited spaces are a chief precondition. The Germanic barbarians,
who lived in isolation on the land and for whom agriculture with
bondsmen was the traditional production, could impose these conditions
on the Roman provinces all the more easily as the concentration of
landed property which had taken place there had already entirely
overthrown the earlier agricultural relations.

It is a received opinion that in certain periods people lived from
pillage alone. But, for pillage to be possible, there must be some thing
to be pillaged, hence production. And the mode of pillage is itself in
turn determined by the mode of production. A stock-jobbing nation, for
example, cannot be pillaged in the same manner as a nation of cow-herds.

To steal a slave is to steal the instrument of production directly. But
then the production of the country for which the slave is stolen must be
structured to allow of slave labour, or (as in the southern part of
America etc.) a mode of production corresponding to the slave must be
created.

Laws may perpetuate an instrument of production, e.g. land, in certain
families. These laws achieve economic significance only when large-scale
landed property is in harmony with the society’s production, as e.g. in
England. In France, small-scale agriculture survived despite the great
landed estates, hence the latter were smashed by the revolution. But can
laws perpetuate the small-scale allotment? Despite these laws, ownership
is again becoming concentrated. The influence of laws in stabilizing
relations of distribution, and hence their effect on production,
requires to be determined in each specific instance.

(c₁) Exchange, Finally, and Circulation

_Exchange and production_

Circulation itself [is] merely a specific moment of exchange, or [it is]
also exchange regarded in its totality.

 In so far as _exchange_ is merely a moment mediating between production
with its production-determined distribution on one side and consumption
on the other, but in so far as the latter itself appears as a moment of
production, to that extent is exchange obviously also included as a
moment within the latter.

It is clear, firstly, that the exchange of activities and abilities
which takes place within production itself belongs directly to
production and essentially constitutes it. The same holds, secondly, for
the exchange of products, in so far as that exchange is the means of
finishing the product and making it fit for direct consumption. To that
extent, exchange is an act comprised within production itself. Thirdly,
the so-called exchange between dealers and dealers is by its very
organization entirely determined by production, as well as being itself
a producing activity. Exchange appears as independent of and indifferent
to production only in the final phase where the product is exchanged
directly for consumption. But (1) there is no exchange without division
of labour, whether the latter is spontaneous, natural, or already a
product of historic development; (2) private exchange presupposes
private production; (3) the intensity of exchange, as well as its
extension and its manner, are determined by the development and
structure of production. For example. Exchange between town and country;
exchange in the country, in the town etc. Exchange in all its moments
thus appears as either directly comprised in production or determined by
it.

The conclusion we reach is not that production, distribution, exchange
and consumption are identical, but that they all form the members of a
totality, distinctions within a unity. Production predominates not only
over itself, in the antithetical definition of production, but over the
other moments as well. The process always returns to production to begin
anew. That exchange and consumption cannot be predominant is
self-evident. Likewise, distribution as distribution of products; while
as distribution of the agents of production it is itself a moment of
production. A definite production thus determines a definite
consumption, distribution and exchange as well as _definite relations
between these different moments_. Admittedly, however, _in its one-sided
form,_ production is itself determined by the other moments. For example
if the market, i.e. the sphere of exchange, expands, then production
grows in quantity and the divisions between its different branches
become deeper. A change in distribution changes production, e.g.
concentration of capital, different distribution of the population
between town and country, etc. Finally, the needs of consumption
determine production. Mutual interaction takes place between the
different moments. This the case with every organic whole.

(3) THE METHOD OF POLITICAL ECONOMY

When we consider a given country politico-economically, we begin with
its population, its distribution among classes, town, country, the
coast, the different branches of production, export and import, annual
production and consumption, commodity prices etc.

It seems to be correct to begin with the real and the concrete, with the
real precondition, thus to begin, in economics, with e.g. the
population, which is the foundation and the subject of the entire social
act of production. However, on closer examination this proves false. The
population is an abstraction if I leave out, for example, the classes of
which it is composed. These classes in turn are an empty phrase if I am
not familiar with the elements on which they rest. E.g. wage labour,
capital, etc. These latter in turn presuppose exchange, division of
labour, prices, etc. For example, capital is nothing without wage
labour, without value, money, price etc. Thus, if I were to begin with
the population, this would be a chaotic conception [_Vorstellung_] of
the whole, and I would then, by means of further determination, move
analytically towards ever more simple concepts [_Begriff_], from the
imagined concrete towards ever thinner abstractions until I had arrived
at the simplest determinations. From there the journey would have to be
retraced until I had finally arrived at the population again, but this
time not as the chaotic conception of a whole, but as a rich totality of
many determinations and relations. The former is the path historically
followed by economics at the time of its origins. The economists of the
seventeenth century, e.g., always begin with the living whole, with
population, nation, state, several states, etc.; but they always
conclude by discovering through analysis a small number of determinant,
abstract, general relations such as division of labour, money, value,
etc. As soon as these individual moments had been more or less firmly
established and abstracted, there began the economic systems, which
ascended from the simple relations, such as labour, division of labour,
need, exchange value, to the level of the state, exchange between
nations and the world market. The latter is obviously the scientifically
correct method. The concrete is concrete because it is the concentration
of many determinations, hence unity of the diverse. It appears in the
process of thinking, therefore, as a process of concentration, as a
result, not as a point of departure, even though it is the point of
departure in reality and hence also the point of departure for
observation [_Anschauung_] and conception. Along the first path the full
conception was evaporated to yield an abstract determination; along the
second, the abstract determinations lead towards a reproduction of the
concrete by way of thought. In this way Hegel fell into the illusion of
conceiving the real as the product of thought concentrating itself,
probing its own depths, and unfolding itself out of itself, by itself,
whereas the method of rising from the abstract to the concrete is only
the way in which thought appropriates the concrete, reproduces it as the
concrete in the mind. But this is by no means the process by which the
concrete itself comes into being. For example, the simplest economic
category, say e.g. exchange value, presupposes population, moreover a
population producing in specific relations; as well as a certain kind of
family, or commune, or state, etc. It can never exist other than as an
abstract, one-sided relation within an already given, concrete, living
whole. As a category, by contrast, exchange value leads an antediluvian
existence. Therefore, to the kind of consciousness – and this is
characteristic of the philosophical consciousness – for which conceptual
thinking is the real human being, and for which the conceptual world as
such is thus the only reality, the movement of the categories appears as
the real act of production – which only, unfortunately, receives a jolt
from the outside – whose product is the world; and – but this is again a
tautology – this is correct in so far as the concrete totality is a
totality of thoughts, concrete in thought, in fact a product of thinking
and comprehending; but not in any way a product of the concept which
thinks and generates itself outside or above observation and conception;
a product, rather, of the working-up of observation and conception into
concepts. The totality as it appears in the head, as a totality of
thoughts, is a product of a thinking head, which appropriates the world
in the only way it can, a way different from the artistic, religious,
practical and mental appropriation of this world. The real subject
retains its autonomous existence outside the head just as before; namely
as long as the head’s conduct is merely speculative, merely theoretical.
Hence, in the theoretical method, too, the subject, society, must always
be kept in mind as the presupposition.

But do not these simpler categories also have an independent historical
or natural existence pre-dating the more concrete ones? That depends.
Hegel, for example, correctly begins the Philosophy of Right with
possession, this being the subject’s simplest juridical relation. But
there is no possession preceding the family or master-servant relations,
which are far more concrete relations. However, it would be correct to
say that there are families or clan groups which still merely _possess,_
but have no _property._ The simple category therefore appears in
relation to property as a relation of simple families or clan groups. In
the higher society it appears as the simpler relation of a developed
organization. But the concrete substratum of which possession is a
relation is always presupposed. One can imagine an individual savage as
possessing something. But in that case possession is not a juridical
relation. It is incorrect that possession develops historically into the
family. Possession, rather, always presupposes this ‘more concrete
juridical category.’ There would still always remain this much, however,
namely that the simple categories are the expressions of relations
within which the less developed concrete may have already realized
itself before having posited the more many-sided connection or relation
which is mentally expressed in the more concrete category; while the
more developed concrete preserves the same category as a subordinate
relation. Money may exist, and did exist historically, before capital
existed, before banks existed, before wage labour existed, etc. Thus in
this respect it may be said that the simpler category can express the
dominant relations of a less developed whole, or else those subordinate
relations of a more developed whole which already had a historic
existence before this whole developed in the direction expressed by a
more concrete category. To that extent the path of abstract thought,
rising from the simple to the combined, would correspond to the real
historical process.

It may be said on the other hand that there are very developed but
nevertheless historically less mature forms of society, in which the
highest forms of economy, e.g. cooperation, a developed division of
labour, etc., are found, even though there is no kind of money, e.g.
Peru. Among the Slav communities also, money and the exchange which
determines it play little or no role within the individual communities,
but only on their boundaries, in traffic with others; it is simply wrong
to place exchange at the centre of communal society as the original,
constituent element. It originally appears, rather, in the connection of
the different communities with one another, not in the relations between
the different members of a single community. Further, although money
everywhere plays a role from very early on, it is nevertheless a
predominant element, in antiquity, only within the confines of certain
one-sidedly developed nations, trading nations. And even in the most
advanced parts of the ancient world, among the Greeks and Romans, the
full development of money, which is presupposed in modern bourgeois
society, appears only in the period of their dissolution. This very
simple category, then, makes a historic appearance in its full intensity
only in the most developed conditions of society. By no means does it
wade its way through all economic relations. For example, in the Roman
Empire, at its highest point of development, the foundation remained
taxes and payments in kind. The money system actually completely
developed there only in the army. And it never took over the whole of
labour. Thus, although the simpler category may have existed
historically before the more concrete, it can achieve its full
(intensive and extensive) development precisely in a combined form of
society, while the more concrete category was more fully developed in a
less developed form of society.

Labour seems a quite simple category. The conception of labour in this
general form – as labour as such – is also immeasurably old.
Nevertheless, when it is economically conceived in this simplicity,
‘labour’ is as modern a category as are the relations which create this
simple abstraction. The Monetary System [19] for example, still locates
wealth altogether objectively, as an external thing, in money. Compared
with this standpoint, the commercial, or manufacture, system took a
great step forward by locating the source of wealth not in the object
but in a subjective activity – in commercial and manufacturing activity
– even though it still always conceives this activity within narrow
boundaries, as money-making. In contrast to this system, that of the
Physiocrats posits a certain kind of labour – agriculture – as the
creator of wealth, and the object itself no longer appears in a monetary
disguise, but as the product in general, as the general result of
labour. This product, as befits the narrowness of the activity, still
always remains a naturally determined product – the product of
agriculture, the product of the earth _par excellence._

It was an immense step forward for Adam Smith to throw out every
limiting specification of wealth-creating activity – not only
manufacturing, or commercial or agricultural labour, but one as well as
the others, labour in general. With the abstract universality of
wealth-creating activity we now have the universality of the object
defined as wealth, the product as such or again labour as such, but
labour as past, objectified labour. How difficult and great was this
transition may be seen from how Adam Smith himself from time to time
still falls back into the Physiocratic system. Now, it might seem that
all that had been achieved thereby was to discover the abstract
expression for the simplest and most ancient relation in which human
beings – in whatever form of society – play the role of producers. This
is correct in one respect. Not in another. Indifference towards any
specific kind of labour presupposes a very developed totality of real
kinds of labour, of which no single one is any longer predominant. As a
rule, the most general abstractions arise only in the midst of the
richest possible concrete development, where one thing appears as common
to many, to all. Then it ceases to be thinkable in a particular form
alone. On the other side, this abstraction of labour as such is not
merely the mental product of a concrete totality of labours.
Indifference towards specific labours corresponds to a form of society
in which individuals can with ease transfer from one labour to another,
and where the specific kind is a matter of chance for them, hence of
indifference. Not only the category, labour, but labour in reality has
here become the means of creating wealth in general, and has ceased to
be organically linked with particular individuals in any specific form.
Such a state of affairs is at its most developed in the most modern form
of existence of bourgeois society – in the United States. Here, then,
for the first time, the point of departure of modern economics, namely
the abstraction of the category ‘labour’, ‘labour as such’, labour pure
and simple, becomes true in practice. The simplest abstraction, then,
which modern economics places at the head of its discussions, and which
expresses an immeasurably ancient relation valid in all forms of
society, nevertheless achieves practical truth as an abstraction only as
a category of the most modern society. One could say that this
indifference towards particular kinds of labour, which is a historic
product in the United States, appears e.g. among the Russians as a
spontaneous inclination. But there is a devil of a difference between
barbarians who are fit by nature to be used for anything, and civilized
people who apply themselves to everything. And then in practice the
Russian indifference to the specific character of labour corresponds to
being embedded by tradition within a very specific kind of labour, from
which only external influences can jar them loose.

This example of labour shows strikingly how even the most abstract
categories, despite their validity – precisely because of their
abstractness – for all epochs, are nevertheless, in the specific
character of this abstraction, themselves likewise a product of historic
relations, and possess their full validity only for and within these
relations.

Bourgeois society is the most developed and the most complex historic
organization of production. The categories which express its relations,
the comprehension of its structure, thereby also allows insights into
the structure and the relations of production of all the vanished social
formations out of whose ruins and elements it built itself up, whose
partly still unconquered remnants are carried along within it, whose
mere nuances have developed explicit significance within it, etc. Human
anatomy contains a key to the anatomy of the ape. The intimations of
higher development among the subordinate animal species, however, can be
understood only after the higher development is already known. The
bourgeois economy thus supplies the key to the ancient, etc. But not at
all in the manner of those economists who smudge over all historical
differences and see bourgeois relations in all forms of society. One can
understand tribute, tithe, etc., if one is acquainted with ground rent.
But one must not identify them. Further, since bourgeois society is
itself only a contradictory form of development, relations derived from
earlier forms will often be found within it only in an entirely stunted
form, or even travestied. For example, communal property. Although it is
true, therefore, that the categories of bourgeois economics possess a
truth for all other forms of society, this is to be taken only with a
grain of salt. They can contain them in a developed, or stunted, or
caricatured form etc., but always with an essential difference. The
so-called historical presentation of development is founded, as a rule,
on the fact that the latest form regards the previous ones as steps
leading up to itself, and, since it is only rarely and only under quite
specific conditions able to criticize itself – leaving aside, of course,
the historical periods which appear to themselves as times of decadence
– it always conceives them one-sidedly. The Christian religion was able
to be of assistance in reaching an objective understanding of earlier
mythologies only when its own self-criticism had been accomplished to a
certain degree, so to speak, δυνάμει. [20] Likewise, bourgeois economics
arrived at an understanding of feudal, ancient, oriental economics only
after the self-criticism of bourgeois society had begun. In so far as
the bourgeois economy did not mythologically identify itself altogether
with the past, its critique of the previous economies, notably of
feudalism, with which it was still engaged in direct struggle, resembled
the critique which Christianity levelled against paganism, or also that
of Protestantism against Catholicism.

In the succession of the economic categories, as in any other
historical, social science, it must not be forgotten that their subject
– here, modern bourgeois society – is always what is given, in the head
as well as in reality, and that these categories therefore express the
forms of being, the characteristics of existence, and often only
individual sides of this specific society, this subject, and that
therefore this society by no means begins only at the point where one
can speak of it _as such;_ this holds _for science as well._ This is to
be kept in mind because it will shortly be decisive for the order and
sequence of the categories. For example, nothing seems more natural than
to begin with ground rent, with landed property, since this is bound up
with the earth, the source of all production and of all being, and with
the first form of production of all more or less settled societies –
agriculture. But nothing would be more erroneous. In all forms of
society there is one specific kind of production which predominates over
the rest, whose relations thus assign rank and influence to the others.
It is a general illumination which bathes all the other colours and
modifies their particularity. It is a particular ether which determines
the specific gravity of every being which has materialized within it.
For example, with pastoral peoples (mere hunting and fishing peoples lie
outside the point where real development begins). Certain forms of
tillage occur among them, sporadic ones. Landed property is determined
by this. It is held in common, and retains this form to a greater or
lesser degree according to the greater or lesser degree of attachment
displayed by these peoples to their tradition, e.g. the communal
property of the Slavs. Among peoples with a settled agriculture – this
settling already a great step – where this predominates, as in antiquity
and in the feudal order, even industry, together with its organization
and the forms of property corresponding to it, has a more or less
landed-proprietary character; is either completely dependent on it, as
among the earlier Romans, or, as in the Middle Ages, imitates, within
the city and its relations, the organization of the land. In the Middle
Ages, capital itself – apart from pure money-capital – in the form of
the traditional artisans’ tools etc., has this landed-proprietary
character. In bourgeois society it is the opposite. Agriculture more and
more becomes merely a branch of industry, and is entirely dominated by
capital. Ground rent likewise. In all forms where landed property rules,
the natural relation still predominant. In those where capital rules,
the social, historically created element. Ground rent cannot be
understood without capital. But capital can certainly be understood
without ground rent. Capital is the all-dominating economic power of
bourgeois society. It must form the starting-point as well as the
finishing-point, and must be dealt with before landed property. After
both have been examined in particular, their interrelation must be
examined.

It would therefore be infeasible and wrong to let the economic
categories follow one another in the same sequence as that in which they
were historically decisive. Their sequence is determined, rather, by
their relation to one another in modern bourgeois society, which is
precisely the opposite of that which seems to be their natural order or
which corresponds to historical development. The point is not the
historic position of the economic relations in the succession of
different forms of society. Even less is it their sequence ‘in the idea’
(Proudhon) [21] (a muddy notion of historic movement). Rather, their
order within modern bourgeois society.

The purity (abstract specificity) in which the trading peoples –
Phoenicians, Carthaginians – appear in the old world is determined
precisely by the predominance of the agricultural peoples. Capital, as
trading-capital or as money-capital, appears in this abstraction
precisely where capital is not yet the predominant element of societies.
Lombards, Jews take up the same position towards the agricultural
societies of the Middle Ages.

As a further example of the divergent positions which the same category
can occupy in different social stages: one of the latest forms of
bourgeois society, _joint-stock companies._ These also appear, however,
at its beginning, in the great, privileged monopoly trading companies.

The concept of national wealth creeps into the work of the economists of
the seventeenth century – continuing partly with those of the eighteenth
– in the form of the notion that wealth is created only to enrich the
state, and that its power is proportionate to this wealth. This was the
still unconsciously hypocritical form in which wealth and the production
of wealth proclaimed themselves as the purpose of modern states, and
regarded these states henceforth only as means for the production of
wealth.

The order obviously has to be (1) the general, abstract determinants
which obtain in more or less all forms of society, but in the
above-explained sense. (2) The categories which make up the inner
structure of bourgeois society and on which the fundamental classes
rest. Capital, wage labour, landed property. Their interrelation. Town
and country. The three great social classes. Exchange between them.
Circulation. Credit system (private). (3) Concentration of bourgeois
society in the form of the state. Viewed in relation to itself. The
‘unproductive’ classes. Taxes. State debt. Public credit. The
population. The colonies. Emigration. (4) The international relation of
production. International division of labour. International exchange.
Export and import. Rate of exchange. (5) The world market and crises.
[22]

(4) PRODUCTION. MEANS OF PRODUCTION AND RELATIONS OF PRODUCTION. RELATIONS OF PRODUCTION AND RELATIONS OF CIRCULATION. FORMS OF THE STATE AND FORMS OF CONSCIOUSNESS IN RELATION TO RELATIONS OF PRODUCTION AND CIRCULATION. LEGAL RELATIONS. FAMILY RELATIONS.

_Notabene_ in regard to points to be mentioned here and not to be
forgotten:

(1) _War_ developed earlier than peace; the way in which certain
economic relations such as wage labour, machinery etc. develop earlier,
owing to war and in the armies etc., than in the interior of bourgeois
society. The relation of productive force and relations of exchange also
especially vivid in the army.

(2) _Relation of previous ideal historiography to the real. Namely of
the so-called cultural histories,_ which are only histories of religions
and of states. (On that occasion something can also be said about the
various kinds of previous historiography. The so-called objective.
Subjective (moral among others). The philosophical.)

(3) _Secondary and tertiary_ matters; in general, _derivative,
inherited,_ not original relations of production. Influence here of
international relations.

(4) _Accusations about the materialism of this conception. Relation to
naturalistic materialism._

(5) _Dialectic of the concepts productive force (means of production)
and relation of production,_ a dialectic whose boundaries are to be
determined, and which does not suspend the real difference.

(6) _The uneven development of material production relative to e.g.
artistic development._ In general, the concept of progress not to be
conceived in the usual abstractness. Modern art etc. This disproportion
not as important or so difficult to grasp as within practical-social
relations themselves. E.g. the relation of education. Relation of the
_United States_ to Europe. But the really difficult point to discuss
here is how relations of production develop unevenly as legal relations.
Thus e.g. the relation of Roman private law (this less the case with
criminal and public law) to modern production.

(7) _This conception appears as necessary development._ But legitimation
of chance. How. (Of freedom also, among other things.) (Influence of
means of communication. World history has not always existed; history as
world history a result.)

 (8) _The point of departure obviously from the natural characteristic;_
subjectively and objectively. Tribes, races etc.

(1) In the case of the arts, it is well known that certain periods of
their flowering are out of all proportion to the general development of
society, hence also to the material foundation, the skeletal structure
as it were, of its organization. For example, the Greeks compared to the
moderns or also Shakespeare. It is even recognized that certain forms of
art, e.g. the epic, can no longer be produced in their world
epoch-making, classical stature as soon as the production of art, as
such, begins; that is, that certain significant forms within the realm
of the arts are possible only at an undeveloped stage of artistic
development. If this is the case with the relation between different
kinds of art within the realm of the arts, it is already less puzzling
that it is the case in the relation of the entire realm to the general
development of society. The difficulty consists only in the general
formulation of these contradictions. As soon as they have been
specified, they are already clarified.

Let us take e.g. the relation of Greek art and then of Shakespeare to
the present time. It is well known that Greek mythology is not only the
arsenal of Greek art but also its foundation. Is the view of nature and
of social relations on which the Greek imagination and hence Greek
[mythology] is based possible with self-acting mule spindles and
railways and locomotives and electrical telegraphs? What chance has
Vulcan against Roberts and Co., Jupiter against the lightning-rod and
Hermes against the Crédit Mobilier? All mythology overcomes and
dominates and shapes the forces of nature in the imagination and by the
imagination; it therefore vanishes with the advent of real mastery over
them. What becomes of Fama alongside Printing House Square? Greek art
presupposes Greek mythology, i.e. nature and the social forms already
reworked in an unconsciously artistic way by the popular imagination.
This is its material. Not any mythology whatever, i.e. not an
arbitrarily chosen unconsciously artistic reworking of nature (here
meaning everything objective, hence including society). Egyptian
mythology could never have been the foundation or the womb of Greek art.
But, in any case, a _mythology._ Hence, in no way a social development
which excludes all mythological, all mythologizing relations to nature;
which therefore demands of the artist an imagination not dependent on
mythology.

 From another side: is Achilles possible with powder and lead? Or the
_Iliad_ with the printing press, not to mention the printing machine? Do
not the song and the saga and the muse necessarily come to an end with
the printer’s bar, hence do not the necessary conditions of epic poetry
vanish?

But the difficulty lies not in understanding that the Greek arts and
epic are bound up with certain forms of social development. The
difficulty is that they still afford us artistic pleasure and that in a
certain respect they count as a norm and as an unattainable model.

A man cannot become a child again, or he becomes childish. But does he
not find joy in the child’s naïvité, and must he himself not strive to
reproduce its truth at a higher stage? Does not the true character of
each epoch come alive in the nature of its children? Why should not the
historic childhood of humanity, its most beautiful unfolding, as a stage
never to return, exercise an eternal charm? There are unruly children
and precocious children. Many of the old peoples belong in this
category. The Greeks were normal children. The charm of their art for us
is not in contradiction to the undeveloped stage of society on which it
grew. [It] is its result, rather, and is inextricably bound up, rather,
with the fact that the unripe social conditions under which it arose,
and could alone arise, can never return.

 


NOTEBOOK I

October 1857



THE CHAPTER ON MONEY


Alfred Darimon, _De la réforme des banques_, Paris, 1856. [1]

‘The root of the evil is the predominance which opinion obstinately
assigns to the role of the precious metals in circulation and exchange.’
(pp. 1, 2.) [2]

Begins with the measures which the Banque de France adopted in October
1855 to ‘stem the progressive diminution of its reserves.’ (p. 2.) Wants
to give us a statistical tableau of the condition of this bank during
the six months preceding its October measures. To this end, compares its
bullion assets during these three months and the _‘fluctuations du
portefeuille’_, i.e. the quantity of discounts extended by the bank
(commercial papers, _bills of exchange_ in its portfolio). The figure
which expresses the value of the securities held by the bank,
‘represents’, according to Darimon, ‘the greater or lesser need felt by
the public for its services, or, _which amounts to the same thing, the
requirements of circulation’._ (p. 2.) Amounts to the same thing? Not at
all. If the mass of bills presented for discount were identical with the
‘requirements of circulation’, of _monetary turnover_ in the proper
sense, then the turnover of banknotes would have to be determined by the
quantity of discounted bills of exchange. But this movement is on the
average not only not parallel, but often an inverse one. The quantity of
discounted bills and the fluctuations in this quantity express the
requirements of credit, whereas the quantity of money in circulation is
determined by quite different influences. In order to reach any
conclusions about circulation at all, Darimon would above all have had
to present a column showing the amount of notes in circulation next to
the column on bullion assets and the column on discounted bills. In
order to discuss the requirements of circulation, it did not require a
very great mental leap to look first of all at the fluctuations in
circulation proper. The omission of this necessary link in the equation
immediately betrays the bungling of the dilettante, and the intentional
muddling together of the requirements of credit with those of monetary
circulation – a confusion on which rests in fact the whole secret of
Proudhonist wisdom. (A mortality chart listing illnesses on one side and
deaths on the other, but forgetting births.) The two columns (see p. 3)
given by Darimon, i.e. the bank’s metallic assets from April to
September on the one side, the movement of its portfolio on the other,
express nothing but the tautological fact, which requires no display of
statistical illustration, that the bank’s portfolio filled up with bills
of exchange and its vaults emptied of metal in proportion as bills of
exchange were presented to it for the purpose of withdrawing metal. And
the table which Darimon offers to prove this tautology does not even
demonstrate it in a pure form. It shows, rather, that the metallic
assets of the bank declined by about 144 million between 12 April and 13
September 1855, while its portfolio holdings increased by about 101
million. The decline in bullion thus exceeded the rise in discounted
commercial papers by 43 million. The identity of both movements is
wrecked against this net imbalance at the end of six months. A more
detailed comparison of the figures shows us additional incongruities.

  _Metal in bank_              _Paper discounted by bank_
  ---------------------------- ----------------------------
  12 April – 432,614,799 fr.   12 April – 322,904,313
  10 May – 420,914,028         10 May – 310,744,925

In other words: between 12 April and 10 May, the metal assets decline by
11,700,769, while the amount of securities increases by 12,159,388; i.e.
the increase of securities exceeds the decline of metal by about half a
million (458,619 fr.). [3] The opposite finding, but on a far more
surprising scale, appears when we compare the months of May and June:

  _Metal in bank_         _Paper discounted by bank_
  ----------------------- ----------------------------
  10 May – 420,914,028    10 May – 310,744,925
  14 June – 407,769,813   14 June – 310,369,439

That is, between 10 May and 14 June the metal assets of the bank
declined by 13,144,225 fr. Did its securities increase to the same
degree? On the contrary, they fell during the same period by 375,486 fr.
Here, in other words, we no longer have a merely quantitative
disproportion between the decline on one side and the rise on the other.
Even the inverse relation of both movements has disappeared. An enormous
decline on one side is accompanied by a relatively weak decline on the
other.

  _Metal in bank_         _Paper discounted by bank_
  ----------------------- ----------------------------
  14 June – 407,769,813   14 June – 310,369,439
  12 July – 314,629,614   12 July – 381,699,256

Comparison of the months June and July shows a decline of metal assets
by 93,140,199 and an increase of securities by 71,329,817; i.e. the
decline in metal assets is 21,810,382 greater than the increase of the
portfolio.

  _Metal in bank_          _Paper discounted by bank_
  ------------------------ ----------------------------
  12 July – 314,629,614    12 July – 381,699,256
  9 August – 338,784,444   9 August – 458,689,605

Here we see an increase on both sides; metal assets by 24,154,830, and
on the portfolio side the much more significant 76,990,349.

  _Metal in bank_          [_Paper discounted by bank_]
  ------------------------ ------------------------------
  9 August – 338,784,444   9 August – 458,689,605
  13 Sept. – 288,645,333   [13 Sept.] – 431,390,562

The decline in metal assets of 50,139,111 fr. is here accompanied by a
decline in securities of 27,299,043 fr. (Despite the restrictive
measures adopted by the Banque de France, its reserves again declined by
24 million in December 1855.)

What’s sauce for the gander is sauce for the goose. The conclusions that
emerge from a sequential comparison of the six-month period have the
same claim to validity as those which emerge from Mr Darimon’s
comparison of the beginning of the series with its end. And what does
the comparison show? Conclusions which reciprocally devour each other.
Twice, the portfolio increases more rapidly than the metal assets
decrease (April-May, June-July). Twice the metal assets and the
portfolio both decline, but the former more rapidly than the latter (May
– June, August-September). Finally, during one period both metal assets
and the portfolio increase, but the latter more rapidly than the former.
Decrease on one side, increase on the other; decrease on both sides;
increase on both sides; in short, everything except a lawful regularity,
above all no inverse correlation, not even an interaction, since a
decline in portfolio cannot be the cause of a decline in metal assets,
and an increase in portfolio cannot be the cause of an increase in metal
assets. An inverse relation and an interaction are not even demonstrated
by the isolated comparison which Darimon sets up between the first and
last months. Since the increase in portfolio by 101 million does not
cover the decrease in metal assets, 144 million, then the possibility
remains open that there is no causal link whatever between the increase
on one side and the decrease on the other. Instead of providing a
solution, the statistical illustration threw up a quantity of
intersecting questions; instead of one puzzle, a bushelful. These
puzzles, it is true, would disappear the moment Mr Darimon presented
columns on circulation of banknotes and on deposits next to his columns
on metal assets and portfolio (discounted paper). An increase in
portfolio more rapid than a decrease in metal would then be explained by
a simultaneous increase in metallic deposits or by the fact that a
portion of the banknotes issued in exchange for discounted paper was not
converted into metal but remained instead in circulation, or, finally,
that the issued banknotes immediately returned in the form of deposits
or in repayment of due bills, without entering into circulation. A
decrease in metal assets accompanied by a lesser decrease in portfolio
could be explained by the withdrawal of deposits from the bank or the
presentation of banknotes for conversion into metal, thus adversely
affecting the bank’s discounts through the agency of the owners of the
withdrawn deposits or of the metallized notes. Finally, a lesser decline
in metal assets accompanied by a lesser decline in portfolio could be
explained on the same grounds (we entirely leave out of consideration
the possibility of an outflow of metal to replace silver currency inside
the country, since Darimon does not bring it into the field of his
observations). But a table whose columns would have explained one
another reciprocally in this manner would have proved what was not
supposed to be proved, namely that the fulfillment by the bank of
increasing commercial needs does not necessarily entail an increase in
the turnover of its notes, that the increase or decrease of this
turnover does not correspond to the increase or decrease of its metallic
assets, that the bank does not control the quantity of the means of
circulation, etc. – a lot of conclusions which did not fit in with Mr
Darimon’s intent. In his hasty effort to present in the most lurid
colours his preconceived opinion that the metal basis of the bank,
represented by its metallic assets, stands in contradiction to the
requirements of circulation, which, in his view, are represented by the
bank’s portfolio, he tears two columns of figures out of their necessary
context with the result that this isolation deprives the figures of all
meaning or, at the most, leads them to testify against him. We have
dwelt on this _fact_ in some detail in order to make clear with one
example what the entire worth of the statistical and positive
illustrations of the Proudhonists amounts to. Economic facts do not
furnish them with the test of their theories; rather, they furnish the
proof of their lack of mastery of the facts, in order to be able to play
with them. Their manner of playing with the facts shows, rather, the
genesis of their theoretical abstractions.

Let us pursue Darimon further.

When the Bank of France saw its metal assets diminished by 144 million
and its portfolio increased by 101 million, it adopted, on 4 and 18
October 1855, a set of measures to defend its vaults against its
portfolio. It raised its discount rate successively from 4 to 5 and from
5 to 6% and reduced the time of payment of bills presented for discount
from 90 to 75 days. In other words: it raised the terms on which it made
its metal available to commerce. What does this demonstrate? ‘That a
bank’, says Darimon, ‘organized on present principles, i.e. on the rule
of gold and silver, withdraws its services from the public precisely at
the moment when the public most needs them.’ Did Mr Darimon require his
figures to prove that supply increases the cost of its services to the
same degree as demand makes claims upon them (and exceeds them)? And do
not the gentlemen who represent the ‘public’ _vis-à-vis_ the bank follow
the same ‘agreeable customs of life’? The philanthropic grain merchants
who present their bills to the bank in order to receive notes, in order
to exchange the notes for the bank’s gold, in order to exchange the
bank’s gold for another country’s grain, in order to exchange the grain
of another country for the money of the French public – were they
perhaps motivated by the idea that, since the public then had the
greatest need of grain, it was therefore their duty to let them have
grain on easier terms, or did they not rather rush to the bank in order
to exploit the increase of grain prices, the misery of the public and
the disproportion between its supply and its demand? And the bank should
be made an exception to these general economic laws? _Quelle idée!_ But
perhaps the present organization of the banks has as its consequence
that gold must be piled up in great quantity so that the means of
purchase, which, in case of insufficient grain, could have the greatest
utility for the nation, should be condemned to lie fallow; in short, so
that capital, instead of passing through the necessary transformation of
production, becomes the unproductive and lazy basis of circulation. In
this case the problem would be, then, that the unproductive stock of
metal still stands above its necessary minimum within the present system
of bank organization, because hoarding of the gold and silver in
circulation has not yet been restricted to its economic limits. It is a
question of something more or something less, but on the same
foundation. But then the question would have been deflated from the
socialist heights down to the practical bourgeois plains where we find
it promenading among the majority of the English bourgeois opponents of
the Bank of England. What a come-down! Or is the issue not a greater or
lesser saving of metal by means of banknotes and other bank
arrangements, but a departure from the metal basis altogether? But then
the statistical fable is worthless again, as is its moral. If, for any
reason whatever, the bank must send precious metals to other countries
in case of need, then it must first accumulate them, and if the other
country is to accept these metals in exchange for its commodities, then
the predominance of the metals must first have been secured.

The causes of the precious metals’ flight from the bank, according to
Darimon, were crop failures and the consequent need to import grain from
abroad. He forgets the failure of the silk harvest and the need to
purchase it in vast quantities from China. Darimon further cites the
numerous great undertakings coinciding with the last months of the
industrial exhibition in Paris. Again he forgets the great speculations
and ventures abroad launched by the Crédit Mobilier and its rivals for
the purpose of showing, as Isaac Péreire [4] says, that French capital
is as distinguished among capitals by its cosmopolitan nature as is the
French language among languages. Plus the unproductive expenditures
entailed by the Crimean War: borrowings of 750 million. That is, on one
side, a great and unexpected collapse in two of the most important
branches of French production! On the other, an unusual employment of
French capital in foreign markets for undertakings which by no means
immediately paid their way and which in part will perhaps never cover
their costs of production! In order to balance the decrease of domestic
production by means of imports, on the one side, and the increase of
industrial undertakings abroad on the other side, what would have been
required were not symbols of circulation which facilitate the exchange
of equivalents, but these equivalents themselves; not money but capital.
The losses in French domestic production, in any case, were not an
equivalent for the employment of French capital abroad. Now suppose that
the Bank of France did not rest on a metallic base, and that other
countries were willing to accept the French currency or its capital in
any form, not only in the specific form of the precious metals. Would
the bank not have been equally forced to raise the terms of its
discounting precisely at the moment when its ‘public’ clamoured most
eagerly for its services? The notes with which it discounts the bills of
exchange of this public are at present nothing more than drafts on gold
and silver. In our hypothetical case, they would be drafts on the
nation’s stock of products and on its directly employable labour force:
the former is limited, the latter can be increased only within very
positive limits and in certain amounts of time. The printing press, on
the other hand, is inexhaustible and works like a stroke of magic. At
the same time, while the crop failures in grain and silk enormously
diminish the directly exchangeable wealth of the nation, the foreign
railway and mining enterprises freeze the same exchangeable wealth in a
form which creates no direct equivalent and therefore devours it, for
the moment, without replacement! Thus, the directly exchangeable wealth
of the nation (i.e. the wealth which can be circulated and is acceptable
abroad) absolutely diminished! On the other side, an unlimited increase
in bank drafts. Direct consequence: increase in the price of products,
raw materials and labour. On the other side, decrease in price of bank
drafts. The bank would not have increased the wealth of the nation
through a stroke of magic, but would merely have undertaken a very
ordinary operation to devalue its own paper. With this devaluation, a
sudden paralysis of production! But no, says the Proudhonist. Our new
organization of the banks would not be satisfied with the negative
accomplishment of abolishing the metal basis and leaving everything else
the way it was. It would also create entirely new conditions of
production and circulation, and hence its intervention would take place
under entirely new preconditions. Did not the introduction of our
present banks, in its day, revolutionize the conditions of production?
Would large-scale modern industry have become possible without this new
financial institution, without the concentration of credit which it
created, without the state revenues which it created in antithesis to
ground rent, without finance in antithesis to landed property, without
the moneyed interest in antithesis to the landed interest; without these
things could there have been stock companies etc., and the thousand
forms of circulating paper which are as much the preconditions as the
product of modern commerce and modern industry?

We have here reached the fundamental question, which is no longer
related to the point of departure. The general question would be this:
Can the existing relations of production and the relations of
distribution which correspond to them be revolutionized by a change in
the instrument of circulation, in the organization of circulation?
Further question: Can such a transformation of circulation be undertaken
without touching the existing relations of production and the social
relations which rest on them? If every such transformation of
circulation presupposes changes in other conditions of production and
social upheavals, there would naturally follow from this the collapse of
the doctrine which proposes tricks of circulation as a way of, on the
one hand, avoiding the violent character of these social changes, and,
on the other, of making these changes appear to be not a presupposition
but a gradual result of the transformations in circulation. An error in
this fundamental premise would suffice to prove that a similar
misunderstanding has occurred in relation to the inner connections
between the relations of production, of distribution and of circulation.
The above-mentioned historical case cannot of course decide the matter,
because modern credit institutions were as much an effect as a cause of
the concentration of capital, since they only form a moment of the
latter, and since concentration of wealth is accelerated by a scarcity
of circulation (as in ancient Rome) as much as by an increase in the
facility of circulation. It should further be examined, or rather it
would be part of the general question, whether the different civilized
forms of money – metallic, paper, credit money, labour money (the
last-named as the socialist form) – can accomplish what is demanded of
them without suspending the very relation of production which is
expressed in the category money, and whether it is not a
self-contradictory demand to wish to get around essential determinants
of a relation by means of formal modifications? Various forms of money
may correspond better to social production in various stages; one form
may remedy evils against which another is powerless; but none of them,
as long as they remain forms of money, and as long as money remains an
essential relation of production, is capable of overcoming the
contradictions inherent in the money relation, and can instead only hope
to reproduce these contradictions in one or another form. One form of
wage labour may correct the abuses of another, but no form of wage
labour can correct the abuse of wage labour itself. One lever may
overcome the inertia of an immobile object better than another. All of
them require inertia to act at all as levers. This general question
about the relation of circulation to the other relations of production
can naturally be raised only at the end. But, from the outset, it is
suspect that Proudhon and his associates never even raise the question
in its pure form, but merely engage in occasional declamations about it.
Whenever it is touched on, we shall pay close attention.

This much is evident right at the beginning of Darimon, namely that he
completely identifies _monetary turnover_ with _credit,_ which is
economically wrong. (The notion of _crédit gratuit,_ incidentally, is
only a hypocritical, philistine and anxiety-ridden form of the saying:
property is theft. Instead of the workers _taking_ the capitalists’
capital, the capitalists are supposed to be compelled to give it to
them.) This too we shall have to return to.

In the question under discussion now, Darimon got no further than the
point that banks, which deal in credit, like merchants who deal in
commodities or workers who deal in labour, sell at a higher price when
demand rises in relation to supply, i.e. they make their services more
difficult for the public to obtain at the very moment the public has the
greatest need for them. We saw that the bank has to act in this way
whether the notes it issues are convertible or inconvertible.

The behaviour of the Bank of France in October 1855 gave rise to an
‘immense clamour’ (p. 4) and to a ‘great debate’ between it and the
spokesmen of the public. Darimon summarizes, or pretends to summarize,
this debate. We will follow him here only occasionally, since his
synopsis displays the weak sides of both opponents, revealed in their
constant desultory irrelevances. Groping about in extrinsic arguments.
Each of the antagonists is at every moment dropping his weapon in order
to search for another. Neither gets to the point of striking any actual
blows, not only because they are constantly changing the weapons with
which they are supposed to hit each other, but also because they hardly
meet on one terrain before they take rapid flight to another.

(The discount rate in France had not been raised to 6% since 1806: for
50 years the time of payment for commercial bills of exchange had stood
firm at 90 days.)

The weakness of the bank’s defending arguments, as presented by Darimon,
and his own misconceptions, emerge for example from the following
passage in his fictitious dialogue:

Says the bank’s opponent: ‘By virtue of your monopoly you are the
dispenser and regulator of credit. When you take up an attitude of
severity, the discounters not only imitate you but they further
exaggerate your rigour … Your measures have brought business to a
standstill.’ (p. 5.)

The bank replies, and indeed ‘humbly’: ‘“What would you have me do?” the
bank humbly said … “To defend myself against the foreigner, I have to
defend myself against our citizens … Above all I must prevent the
outflow of the currency, without which I am nothing and can do
nothing.”’ (p. 5.)

The bank’s script is ridiculous. It is made to sidetrack the question,
to turn it into a rhetorical generality, in order to be able to answer
it with a rhetorical generality. In this dialogue the bank is made to
share Darimon’s illusion that its monopoly really allows it to regulate
credit. In fact the power of the bank begins only where the private
‘discounters’ stop, hence at a moment when its power is already
extraordinarily limited. Suppose that during easy conditions on the
money market, when everybody else is discounting at 2 1/2%, the bank
holds at 5%; instead of imitating it, the discounters will discount all
its business away before its very eyes. Nowhere is this more vividly
demonstrated than in the history of the Bank of England since the law of
1844, which made it into a real rival of the private bankers in the
business of discounting, etc. In order to secure for itself a share, and
a growing share, of the discount business during the periods of easiness
on the money market, the Bank of England was constantly forced to reduce
its rates not only to the level adopted by the private bankers but often
below it. Its ‘regulation of credit’ is thus to be taken with a grain of
salt; Darimon, however, makes his superstitious faith in its absolute
control of the money market and of credit into his point of departure.

Instead of analysing critically the determinants of the bank’s real
power over the money market, he immediately grabs on to the phrase that
cash is everything for the bank and that it has to prevent its outflow
from the country. A professor of the Collège de France (Chevalier) [5]
replies: ‘Gold and silver are commodities like any other … The only
purpose of the bank’s metallic reserves is to make purchases abroad in
moments of emergency.’ The bank rejoins: ‘Metallic money is not a
commodity like any other; it is an instrument of exchange, and by virtue
of this title it holds the privilege of prescribing laws for all the
other commodities.’ Now Darimon leaps between the combatants: ‘Thus the
privilege held by gold and silver, that of being the only authentic
instrument of circulation and exchange, is responsible not only for the
present crisis, but for the periodic commercial crises as well.’ In
order to control all the undesirable features of crises ‘it would be
enough that gold and silver were made commodities like any other, or,
precisely expressed, that all commodities were made instruments of
exchange on an equal footing (_au même titre_) with gold and silver;
that products were truly exchanged for products’. (pp. 5–7.)

Shallowness with which the disputed question is presented here. If the
bank issues drafts on money (notes) and promissory notes on capital
repayable in gold (or silver) (deposits), then it is self-evident that
it can watch and endure the decrease of its metal reserves only up to a
certain point without reacting. That has nothing to do with the theory
of metallic money. We will return to Darimon’s theory of crises later.

In the chapter “Short History of the Crises of Circulation”, Mr Darimon
omits the English crisis of 1809–11 and confines himself to noting the
appointment of the Bullion Committee in 1810; and for 1811 he again
leaves out the crisis itself (which began in 1809), and merely mentions
the adoption by the House of Commons of the resolution that ‘the
depreciation of notes relative to bullion stems not from a depreciation
of paper money but from an increase in the price of bullion’, together
with Ricardo’s pamphlet which maintains the opposite thesis, the
conclusion of which is supposed to read: ‘A currency is in its most
perfect state when it consists wholly of paper money.’ (pp. 22, 23.) [6]
The crises of 1809 and 1811 were important here because the bank at that
time issued inconvertible notes, meaning that the crises did not stem
from the convertibility of notes into gold (metal) and hence could not
be restrained by the abolition of convertibility. Like a nimble tailor,
Darimon skips over these facts which contradict his theory of crises. He
clutches on to Ricardo’s aphorism, which had nothing to do with the real
subject of discussion in the pamphlet, namely the depreciation of
banknotes. He is unaware that Ricardo’s theory of money is as completely
refuted as its false assumptions that the bank controls the quantity of
notes in circulation, and that the quantity of means of circulation
determines prices, whereas on the contrary prices determine the quantity
of means of circulation etc. In Ricardo’s time all detailed studies of
the phenomena of monetary circulation were still lacking. This by the
way.

Gold and silver are commodities like the others. Gold and silver are not
commodities like the others: as general instruments of exchange they are
the privileged commodities and degrade the other commodities by virtue
of this privilege. This is the last analysis to which Darimon reduces
the antagonism. His final judgement is: abolish the privilege of gold
and silver, degrade them to the rank of all other commodities. Then you
no longer have the specific evils of gold and silver money, or of notes
convertible into gold and silver. You abolish all evils. Or, better,
elevate all commodities to the monopoly position now held by gold and
silver. Let the pope remain, but make everybody pope. Abolish money by
making every commodity money and by equipping it with the specific
attributes of money. The question here arises whether this problem does
not already pronounce its own nonsensicality, and whether the
impossibility of the solution is not already contained in the premises
of the question. Frequently the only possible answer is a critique of
the question and the only solution is to negate the question. The real
question is: does not the bourgeois system of exchange itself
necessitate a specific instrument of exchange? Does it not necessarily
create a specific equivalent for all values? One form of this instrument
of exchange or of this equivalent may be handier, more fitting, may
entail fewer inconveniences than another. But the inconveniences which
arise from the existence of every specific instrument of exchange, of
any specific but general equivalent, must necessarily reproduce
themselves in every form, however differently. Darimon naturally skips
over this question with enthusiasm. Abolish money and don’t abolish
money! Abolish the exclusive privilege possessed by gold and silver in
virtue of their exclusive monetary role, but turn all commodities to
money, i.e. give them all together equally a quality which no longer
exists once its exclusiveness is gone.

The bullion drains do in fact bring to the surface a contradiction which
Darimon formulates superficially and distorts as well. It is evident
that gold and silver are not commodities like the others, and that
modern economics is horrified to see itself suddenly and temporarily
thrown back again and again to the prejudices of the Mercantile System.
The English economists attempt to overcome the difficulty by means of a
distinction. What is demanded in moments of such monetary crises, they
say, is not gold and silver as money, not gold and silver as coin, but
gold and silver as capital. They forget to add: yes, capital, but
capital in the specific form of gold and silver. Why else is there an
outflow of precisely these commodities, while most of the others
depreciate owing to lack of outflow, if capital were exportable in every
form?

Let us take specific examples: drain as a result of domestic harvest
failures in a chief food crop (e.g. grain), crop failure abroad and
hence increased prices in one of the main imported consumer goods (e.g.
tea); drain because of a crop failure in decisive industrial raw
materials (cotton, wool, silk, flax etc.); drain because of excessive
imports (caused by speculation, war etc.). The replacement of a sudden
or chronic shortage (grain, tea, cotton, flax, etc.) in the case of a
domestic crop failure deprives the nation doubly. A part of its invested
capital or labour is not reproduced – real loss of production. A part of
that capital which has been reproduced has to be shifted to fill this
gap; and this part, moreover, does not stand in a simple arithmetical
relation to the loss, because the deficient product rises and must rise
on the world market as a result of the decreased supply and the
increased demand. It is necessary to analyse precisely how such crises
would look if money were disregarded, and what determinants money
introduces into the given relations. (_Grain crop failures_ and _excess
imports_ the most important cases. The impact of war is self-evident,
since economically it is exactly the same as if the nation were to drop
a part of its capital into the ocean.)

_Case of a grain crop failure_: Seen in comparison to other nations, it
is clear that the nation’s capital (not only its real wealth) has
diminished, just as clear as that a peasant who burns his loaves and has
to buy bread at the baker’s is impoverished to the extent of the price
of his purchase. In reference to the domestic situation, the rise in
grain prices, as far as value enters into the question, seems to leave
everything as it was. Except for the fact that the lesser quantity of
grain multiplied by the increased price, in real crop failures, never =
the normal quantity multiplied by the lesser price. Suppose that the
entire English wheat crop were 1 quarter, and that this 1 quarter
fetched the same price as 30 million quarters previously. Then, leaving
aside the fact that it lacks the means to reproduce either life or
wheat, and if we postulate that the working day necessary to produce 1
quarter = A, then the nation would exchange A × 30 million working days
(cost of production) for 1 × A working days (product); the productive
force of its capital would have diminished by millions and the sum of
all values in the land would have diminished, since every working day
would have depreciated by a factor of 30 million. Every unit of capital
would then represent only 1/30,000,000 of its earlier value, of its
equivalent in production costs, even though in this given case the
nominal value of the nation’s capital would not have diminished (apart
from the depreciation of land and soil), since the decrease in value of
all other products would have been exactly compensated by the increase
in value of the 1 quarter of wheat. The increase in the wheat price by a
factor of A × 30 million would be the expression of an equivalent
depreciation of all other products. This distinction between domestic
and foreign, incidentally, is altogether illusory. The relation between
the nation which suffers a crop failure and another nation where the
former makes purchases is like that between every individual of the
nation and the farmer or grain merchant. The surplus sum which it must
expend in purchasing grain is a direct subtraction from its capital,
from its disposable means.

So as not to obscure the question with unessential influences, it must
be postulated that the nation has free trade in grain. Even if the
imported grain were as cheap as the domestically produced grain, the
nation would still be poorer to the amount of capital not reproduced by
the farmers. However, on the above assumption of free trade, the nation
always imports as much foreign grain as is possible at the normal price.
The increase of imports thus presupposes a rise in the price.

The rise in the grain price is = to the fall in the price of all other
commodities. The increased cost of production (represented by the price)
at which the quarter of wheat is obtained is = to the decreased
productivity of capital in all other forms. The surplus used to purchase
grain must correspond to a deficit in the purchase of all other products
and hence already a decline in their prices. With or without metallic
money, or money of any other kind, the nation would find itself in a
crisis not confined to grain, but extending to all other branches of
production, not only because their productivity would have positively
diminished and the price of their production depreciated as compared to
their value, which is determined by the normal cost of production, but
also because all contracts, obligations etc. rest on the average prices
of products. For example, _x_ bushels of grain have to be supplied to
service the state’s indebtedness, but the cost of producing these _x_
bushels has increased by a given factor. Quite apart from the role of
money the nation would thus find itself in a general crisis. If we
abstract not only from money but from exchange value as well, then
products would have depreciated and the nation’s productivity diminished
while all its economic relations are based on the average productivity
of its labour.

A crisis caused by a failure in the grain crop is therefore not at all
created by the drain of bullion, although it can be aggravated by
obstacles set up to impede this drain.

In any case, we cannot agree with Proudhon either when he says that the
crisis stems from the fact that the precious metals alone possess an
authentic value in contrast to the other commodities; for the rise in
the grain price first of all means only that more gold and silver have
to be given in exchange for a certain quantity of grain, i.e. that the
price of gold and silver has declined relative to the price of grain.
Thus gold and silver participate with all other commodities in the
depreciation relative to grain, and no privilege protects them from
this. The depreciation of gold and silver relative to grain is identical
with the rise of the grain price (not quite correct. The quarter of
grain rises from 50s. to 100s., i.e. by 100%, but cotton goods fall by
80. Silver has declined by 50 relative to grain; cotton goods (owing to
declining demand etc.) have declined by 80% relative to it. That is to
say, the prices of other commodities fall to a greater extent than those
of grain rise. But the opposite also occurs. For example in recent
years, when grain temporarily rose by 100%, it never entered the heads
of the industrial products to decline in the same proportion in which
gold had declined relative to grain. This circumstance does not
immediately affect the general thesis). Neither can it be said that gold
possesses a privilege because its quantity is precisely and
authentically defined in the coin form. One thaler (silver) remains
under all circumstances one thaler. But a bushel of wheat is also always
a bushel, and a yard of linen a yard.

The depreciation of most commodities (labour included) and the resultant
crisis, in the case of an important crop mishap, cannot therefore be
crudely ascribed to the export of gold, because depreciation and crisis
would equally take place if no gold whatever were exported and no grain
imported. The crisis reduces itself simply to the law of supply and
demand, which, as is known, acts far more sharply and energetically
within the sphere of primary needs – seen on a national scale – than in
all other spheres. Exports of gold are not the cause of the grain
crisis, but the grain crisis is the cause of gold exports.

Gold and silver in themselves can be said to intervene in the crisis and
to aggravate its symptoms in only two ways: (1) When the export of gold
is made more difficult by the metal reserve requirements to which the
banks are bound; when the measures which the banks therefore undertake
against the export of gold react disadvantageously on domestic
circulation; (2) When the export of gold becomes necessary because
foreign nations will accept capital only in the form of gold and not
otherwise.

Difficulty No. 2 can remain even if difficulty No. 1 is removed. The
Bank of England experienced this precisely during the period when it was
legally empowered to issue inconvertible notes. [7] These notes declined
in relation to gold bullion, but the mint price of gold likewise
declined in relation to its bullion price. In relation to the note, gold
had become a special kind of commodity. It can be said that the note
still remained dependent on gold only to the extent that it nominally
represented a certain quantity of gold for which it could not in fact be
exchanged. Gold remained its denomination, although it was no longer
legally exchangeable for this quantity of gold at the bank.

There can be hardly a doubt (?) (this is to be examined later and does
not directly belong with the subject under discussion) that as long as
paper money retains its denomination in gold (i.e. so long as a £5 note
for example is the paper representative of 5 sovereigns), the
convertibility of the note into gold remains its economic law, whether
this law also exists _politically_ or not. The Bank of England’s notes
continued during the years 1799–1819 to state that they represented the
value of a given quantity of gold. How can this assertion be put to the
test other than by the fact that the note indeed commands so-and-so-much
bullion? From the moment when bullion to the value of 5 sovereigns could
no longer be had for a £5 note, the note was depreciated even though it
was inconvertible. The equivalence of the note with an amount of gold
equal to its face-value immediately entered into contradiction with the
factual non-equivalence between banknotes and gold. The point in dispute
among the English who want to keep gold as the denomination of notes is
not in fact the convertibility of the note into gold – which is only the
practical equivalence of what the face of the note expresses
theoretically – but rather the question how this convertibility is to be
secured, whether through limits imposed by law on the bank or whether
the bank is to be left to its own devices. The advocates of the latter
course assert that this convertibility is achieved on the average by a
bank of issue which lends against bills of exchange and whose notes thus
have an assured reflux, and charge that their opponents despite
everything never achieved better than this average measure of security.
The latter is a fact. The average, by the way, is not to be despised,
and calculations on the basis of averages have to form the basis for
banks just as well as for all insurance companies etc. In this regard
the Scottish banks are above all, and rightly, held up as a model. The
strict bullionists say for their part that they take convertibility as a
serious matter, that the bank’s obligation to convert notes keeps the
notes convertible, that the necessity of this convertibility is given by
the denomination of the notes themselves, that this forms a barrier
against over-issue, and that their opponents are pseudo-defenders of
inconvertibility. Between these two sides, various shadings, a mass of
little ‘species’. [8] The defenders of inconvertibility, finally, the
determined anti-bullionists, are, without knowing it, just as much
pseudo-defenders of convertibility as their opponents are of
inconvertibility, because they retain the denomination of the note and
hence make the practical equation between a note of a given denomination
and a given quantity of gold the measure of their notes’ full value.
Prussia has paper money of forced currency. (A reflux is secured by the
obligation to pay a portion of taxes in paper.) These paper thalers are
not drafts on silver; no bank will legally convert them. They are not
issued by a commercial bank against bills of exchange but by the
government to meet its expenses. But their denomination is that of
silver. A paper thaler proclaims that it represents the same value as a
silver thaler. If confidence in the government were to be thoroughly
shaken, or if this paper money were issued in greater proportions than
required by circulation, then the paper thaler would in practice cease
to be equal to the silver thaler and would be depreciated because it had
fallen beneath the value proclaimed on its face. It would even
depreciate if neither of the above conditions obtained but if a special
need for silver, e.g. for exports, gave silver a privileged position
_vis-à-vis_ the paper thaler. Convertibility into gold and silver is
therefore the practical measure of the value of every paper currency
denominated in gold or silver, whether this paper is legally convertible
or not. Nominal value runs alongside its body as a mere shadow; whether
the two balance can be shown only by actual convertibility
(exchangeability). A fall of real value beneath nominal value is
depreciation. Convertibility is when the two really run alongside each
other and change places with each other. The convertibility of
inconvertible notes shows itself not in the bank’s stock of bullion but
in the everyday exchange between paper and the metal whose denomination
the paper carries. In practice, the convertibility of convertible notes
is already endangered when this is no longer confirmed by everyday
routine exchange in all parts of the country, but has to be established
specifically by large-scale operations on the part of the bank. In the
Scottish countryside paper money is even preferred to metal money.
Before 1845, when the English law of 1844 [9] was forced upon it,
Scotland naturally took part in all English social crises, and
experienced some crises to a higher degree because the clearing of the
land proceeded more ruthlessly there. Nevertheless, Scotland never
experienced a real monetary crisis (the fact that a few banks,
exceptions, collapsed because they had made careless loans is irrelevant
here); no depreciation of notes, no complaints and no inquiries into the
sufficiency or insufficiency of the currency in circulation etc.
Scotland is important here because it shows on the one hand how the
monetary system can be completely regulated on the present basis – all
the evils Darimon bewails can be abolished – without departing from the
present social basis; while at the same time its contradictions, its
antagonisms, the class contradiction etc. have reached an even higher
degree than in any other country in the world. It is characteristic that
both Darimon and the patron who introduces his book – Émile Girardin,
[10] who complements his practical swindles with theoretical utopianism
– do not find the antithesis of the monopoly banks of France and England
in Scotland, but rather look for it in the United States, where the
banking system, owing to the need to obtain a charter from the
individual State, is only nominally free, where the prevailing system is
not free competition among banks but a federation of monopoly banks. The
Scottish banking and monetary system was indeed the most perilous reef
for the illusions of the circulation artists. Gold or silver money
(except where coins of both kinds are legal tender) are not said to
depreciate no matter how often their value changes relative to other
commodities. Why not? Because they form their own denomination; because
their title is not a title to a value, i.e. they are not measured in a
third commodity, but merely express fractional parts of their own
substance, 1 sovereign = so much gold of a given weight. Gold is
therefore nominally undepreciable, not because it alone expresses _an
authentic value,_ but because as money it does _not_ express _value at
all,_ but merely expresses a given quantity of its own substance, merely
carries its own quantitative definition on its forehead. (To be examined
more closely later: whether this characteristic mark of gold and silver
money is in the last analysis an intrinsic property of all money.)
Deceived by this nominal undepreciability of metallic money, Darimon and
consorts see only the one aspect which surfaces during crises: the
appreciation of gold and silver in relation to nearly all other
commodities; they do not see the other side, the _depreciation_ of gold
and silver or of _money_ in relation to all other commodities (labour
perhaps, not always, excluded) in periods of so-called _prosperity,_
periods of a temporary general rise of prices. Since this depreciation
of metallic money (and of all kinds of money which rest on it) always
precedes its appreciation, they ought to have formulated the problem the
other way round: how to prevent the periodic depreciation of money (in
their language, to abolish the privileges of commodities in relation to
money). In this last formulation the problem would have reduced itself
to: how to overcome the rise and fall of prices. The way to do this:
abolish prices. And how? By doing away with exchange value. But this
problem arises: exchange corresponds to the bourgeois organization of
society. Hence one last problem: to revolutionize bourgeois society
economically. It would then have been self-evident from the outset that
the evil of bourgeois society is not to be remedied by ‘transforming’
the banks or by founding a rational ‘money system’.

Convertibility, therefore – legal or not – remains a requirement of
every kind of money whose title makes it a value-symbol, i.e. which
equates it as a quantity with a third commodity. The equation already
includes the antithesis, the possibility of nonequivalence;
convertibility includes its opposite, inconvertibility; appreciation
includes depreciation, δυνάμει, [11] as Aristotle would say. Suppose for
example that the sovereign were not only called a sovereign, which is a
mere honorific for the _x_th fraction of an ounce of gold (accounting
name), in the same way that a metre is the name for a certain length,
but were called, say, _x hours of labour time._ 1/_x_ ounce of gold is
in fact nothing more than 1/_x_ hours of labour time materialized,
objectified. But gold is labour time accumulated in the past, labour
time defined. Its title would make a given quantity of labour as such
into its standard. The pound of gold would have to be convertible into
_x_ hours of labour time, would have to be able to purchase it at any
given moment: as soon as it could buy a greater or a lesser amount, it
would be appreciated or depreciated; in the latter case its
convertibility would have ceased. What determines value is not the
amount of labour time incorporated in products, but rather the amount of
labour time necessary at a given moment. Take the pound of gold itself:
let it be the product of 20 hours’ labour time. Suppose that for some
reason it later requires only 10 hours to produce a pound of gold. The
pound of gold whose title advises that it = 20 hours’ labour time would
now merely = 10 hours’ labour time, since 20 hours’ labour time = 2
pounds of gold. 10 hours of labour are in practice exchanged for 1 pound
of gold; hence 1 pound of gold cannot any longer be exchanged for 20
hours of labour time. Gold money with the plebeian title _x hours of
labour_ would be exposed to greater fluctuations than any other sort of
money and particularly more than the present gold money, because gold
cannot rise or fall in relation to gold (it is equal to itself), while
the labour time accumulated in a given quantity of gold, in contrast,
must constantly rise or fall in relation to present, living labour time.
In order to maintain its convertibility, the productivity of labour time
would have to be kept stationary. Moreover, in view of the general
economic law that the costs of production constantly decline, that
living labour becomes constantly more productive, hence that the labour
time objectified in products constantly depreciates, the inevitable fate
of this golden labour money would be constant depreciation. In order to
control this evil, it might be said that the title of labour time should
go not to gold but, as Weitling proposed, with Englishmen ahead of him
and French after, Proudhon & Co. among them, to paper money, to a mere
symbol of value. The labour time incorporated in the paper itself would
then have as little relevance as the paper value of banknotes. The
former would be merely the representation of hours of labour, as the
latter is of gold or silver. If the hour of labour became more
productive, then the chit of paper which represents it would rise in
buying power, and vice versa, exactly as a £5 note at present buys more
or less depending on whether the relative value of gold in comparison to
other commodities rises or falls. According to the same law which would
subject golden labour money to a constant depreciation, paper labour
money would enjoy a constant appreciation. And that is precisely what we
are after; the worker would reap the joys of the rising productivity of
his labour, instead of creating proportionately more alien wealth and
devaluing himself as at present. Thus the socialists. But,
unfortunately, there arise some small scruples. First of all: if we once
presuppose money, even if it is only time-chits, then we must also
presuppose the accumulation of this money, as well as contracts,
obligations, fixed burdens etc., which are entered into in the form of
this money. The accumulated chits would constantly appreciate together
with the newly issued ones, and thus on the one hand the rising
productivity of labour would go to the benefit of non-workers, and on
the other hand the previously contracted burdens would keep step with
the rising yield of labour. The rise and fall in the value of gold or
silver would be quite irrelevant if the world could be started afresh at
each new moment and if, hence, previous obligations to pay a certain
quantity of gold did not survive the fluctuations in the value of gold.
The same holds, here, with the time-chit and hourly productivity.

The point to be examined here is the convertibility of the time-chit. We
reach the same goal if we make a detour. Although it is still too early,
a few observations can be made about the delusions on which the
time-chit rests, which allow us an insight into the depths of the secret
which links Proudhon’s theory of circulation with his general theory –
his theory of the determination of value. We find the same link e.g. in
Bray [12] and Gray. [13] Whatever basis in truth it may happen to have
will be examined later [14] (but first, incidentally: seen only as
drafts on gold, banknotes should not be issued in amounts exceeding the
quantity of gold which they pretend to replace, or they depreciate.
Three drafts of £15 which I issue to three different creditors on the
same £15 in gold are in fact only drafts on £15 / 3 = £5 each. Each of
these notes would have depreciated to 33 1/3 per cent from the outset.)

The _value_ (the real exchange value) of all commodities (labour
included) is determined by their cost of production, in other words by
the labour time required to produce them. Their _price_ is this exchange
value of theirs, expressed in money. The replacement of metal money (and
of paper or fiat money denominated in metal money) by labour money
denominated in labour time would therefore equate the _real value_
(exchange value) of commodities with their _nominal value, price, money
value._ Equation of _real value and nominal value, of value and price._
But such is by no means the case. The value of commodities as determined
by labour time is only their _average value._ This average appears as an
external abstraction if it is calculated out as the average figure of an
epoch, e.g. 1 lb. of coffee = 1s. if the average price of coffee is
taken over 25 years; but it is very real if it is at the same time
recognized as the driving force and the moving principle of the
oscillations which commodity prices run through during a given epoch.
This reality is not merely of theoretical importance: it forms the basis
of mercantile speculation, whose calculus of probabilities depends both
on the median price averages which figure as the centre of oscillation,
and on the average peaks and average troughs of oscillation above or
below this centre. The _market value_ is always different, is always
below or above this average value of a commodity. Market value equates
itself with real value by means of its constant oscillations, never by
means of an equation with real value as if the latter were a third
party, but rather by means of constant non-equation of itself (as Hegel
would say, not by way of abstract identity, but by constant negation of
the negation, i.e. of itself as negation of real value). [15] In my
pamphlet against Proudhon I showed that real value itself –
independently of its rule over the oscillations of the market price
(seen apart from its role as the _law_ of these oscillations) – in turn
negates itself and constantly posits the real value of commodities in
contradiction with its own character, that it constantly depreciates or
appreciates the real value of already produced commodities; this is not
the place to discuss it in greater detail. [16] _Price_ therefore is
distinguished from _value_ not only as the nominal from the real; not
only by way of the denomination in gold and silver, but because the
latter appears as the law of the motions which the former runs through.
But the two are constantly different and never balance out, or balance
only coincidentally and exceptionally. The price of a commodity
constantly stands above or below the value of the commodity, and the
value of the commodity itself exists only in this up-and-down movement
of commodity prices. Supply and demand constantly determine the prices
of commodities; never balance, or only coincidentally; but the cost of
production, for its part, determines the oscillations of supply and
demand. The gold or silver in which the price of a commodity, its market
value, is expressed is itself a certain quantity of accumulated labour,
a certain measure of materialized labour time. On the assumption that
the production costs of a commodity and the production costs of gold and
silver remain constant, the rise or fall of its market price means
nothing more than that a commodity, = _x_ labour time, constantly
commands > or < _x_ labour time on the market, that it stands above or
beneath its average value as determined by labour time. The first basic
illusion of the time-chitters consists in this, that by annulling the
_nominal difference_ between real value and market value, between
exchange value and price – that is, by expressing value in units of
labour time itself instead of in a given objectification of labour time,
say gold and silver – that in so doing they also remove the real
difference and contradiction between price and value. Given this
illusory assumption it is self-evident that the mere introduction of the
time-chit does away with all crises, all faults of bourgeois production.
The money price of commodities = their real value; demand = supply;
production = consumption; money is simultaneously abolished and
preserved; the labour time of which the commodity is the product, which
is materialized in the commodity, would need only to be measured in
order to create a corresponding mirror-image in the form of a
value-symbol, money, time-chits. In this way every commodity would be
directly transformed into money; and gold and silver, for their part,
would be demoted to the rank of all other commodities.

It is not necessary to elaborate that the contradiction between exchange
value and price – the average price and the prices of which it is the
average – that the difference between magnitudes and average magnitudes
is not overcome merely by suppressing the _difference in name,_ e.g. by
saying, instead of: 1 lb. bread costs 8d., 1 lb. bread = 1/_x_ hours of
labour. Inversely, if 8d. = 1/_x_ hours of labour, and if the labour
time which is materialized in one pound of bread is greater or less than
1/_x_ hours of labour, then, because the measure of value would be at
the same time the element in which the price is expressed, the
difference between price and value, which is hidden in the gold price or
silver price, would never be glaringly visible. An infinite equation
would result. 1/_x_ hours of labour (as contained in 8d. or represented
by a chit) > < than 1/_x_ hours of labour (as contained in the pound of
bread).

The time-chit, representing _average labour time,_ would never
correspond to or be convertible into _actual labour time;_ i.e. the
amount of labour time objectified in a commodity would never command a
quantity of labour time equal to itself, and vice versa, but would
command, rather, either more or less, just as at present every
oscillation of market values expresses itself in a rise or fall of the
gold or silver prices of commodities.

The constant depreciation of commodities – over longer periods – in
relation to time-chits, which we mentioned earlier, arises out of the
law of the rising productivity of labour time, out of the disturbances
within relative value itself which are created by its own inherent
principle, namely labour time. This inconvertibility of the time-chits
which we are now discussing is nothing more than another expression for
the inconvertibility between real value and market value, between
exchange value and price. In contrast to all other commodities, the
time-chit would represent an ideal labour time which would be exchanged
sometimes against more and sometimes against less of the actual variety,
and which would achieve a separate existence of its own in the
time-chit, an existence corresponding to this non-equivalence. The
general equivalent, medium of circulation and measure of commodities
would again confront the commodities in an individual form, following
its own laws, alienated, i.e. equipped with all the properties of money
as it exists at present but unable to perform the same services. The
medium with which commodities – these objectified quantities of labour
time – are compared would not be a third commodity but would be rather
their own measure of value, labour time itself; as a result, the
confusion would reach a new height altogether. Commodity A, the
objectification of 3 hours’ labour time, is = 2 labour-hour-chits;
commodity B, the objectification, similarly, of 3 hours’ labour, is = 4
labour-hour-chits. This contradiction is in practice expressed in money
prices, but in a veiled form. The difference between price and value,
between the commodity measured by the labour time whose product it is,
and the product of the labour time against which it is exchanged, this
difference calls for a third commodity to act as a measure in which the
real exchange value of commodities is expressed. _Because price is not
equal to value, therefore the value-determining element – labour time –
cannot be the element in which prices are expressed, because labour time
would then have to express itself simultaneously as the determining and
the non-determining element, as the equivalent and non-equivalent of
itself._ Because labour time as the measure of value exists only as an
ideal, it cannot serve as the matter of price-comparisons. (Here at the
same time it becomes clear how and why the value relation obtains a
separate material existence in the form of money. This to be developed
further.) The difference between price and value calls for values to be
measured as prices on a different standard from their own. Price as
distinct from value is necessarily money price. It can here be seen that
the nominal difference between price and value is conditioned by their
real difference.

Commodity A = 1s. (i.e. = 1/_x_ silver); commodity B = 2s. (i.e. 2/_x_
silver). Hence commodity B = double the value of commodity A. The value
relation between A and B is expressed by means of the proportion in
which they are exchanged for a quantity of a third commodity, namely
silver; they are not exchanged for a value-relation.

Every commodity (product or instrument of production) is = the
objectification of a given amount of labour time. Their value, the
relation in which they are exchanged against other commodities, or other
commodities against them, is = to the quantity of labour time realized
in them. If a commodity e.g. = 1 hour of labour time, then it exchanges
with all other commodities which are the product of 1 hour of labour
time. (This whole reasoning on the presupposition that exchange value =
market value; real value = price.) The value of the commodity is
different from the commodity itself. The commodity is a value (exchange
value) only within exchange (real or imagined); value is not only the
exchangeability of the commodity in general, but its specific
exchangeability. Value is at the same time the exponent of the relation
in which the commodity is exchanged with other commodities, as well as
the exponent of the relation in which it has already been exchanged with
other commodities (materialized labour time) in production; it is their
quantitatively determined exchangeability. Two commodities, e.g. a yard
of cotton and a measure of oil, considered as cotton and as oil, are
different by nature, have different properties, are measured by
different measures, are incommensurable. Considered as values, all
commodities are qualitatively equal and differ only quantitatively,
hence can be measured against each other and substituted for one another
(are mutually exchangeable, mutually convertible) in certain
quantitative relations. Value is their social relation, their economic
quality. A book which possesses a certain value and a loaf of bread
possessing the same value are exchanged for one another, are the same
value but in a different material. As a value, a commodity is an
equivalent for all other commodities in a given relation. As a value,
the commodity is an equivalent; as an equivalent, all its natural
properties are extinguished; it no longer takes up a special,
qualitative relationship towards the other commodities; but is rather
the general measure as well as the general representative, the general
medium of exchange of all other commodities. As value, it is _money._
But because the commodity, or rather the product or the instrument of
production, is different from its value, its existence as value is
different from its existence as product. Its property of being a value
not only can but must achieve an existence different from its natural
one. Why? Because commodities as values are different from one another
only quantitatively; therefore each commodity must be qualitatively
different from its own value. Its value must therefore have an existence
which is qualitatively distinguishable from it, and in actual exchange
this separability must become a real separation, because the natural
distinctness of commodities must come into contradiction with their
economic equivalence, and because both can exist together only if the
commodity achieves a double existence, not only a natural but also a
purely economic existence, in which latter it is a mere symbol, a cipher
for a relation of production, a mere symbol for its own value. As a
value, every commodity is equally divisible; in its natural existence
this is not the case. As a value it remains the same no matter how many
metamorphoses and forms of existence it goes through; in reality,
commodities are exchanged only because they are not the same and
correspond to different systems of needs. As a value, the commodity is
general; as a real commodity it is particular. As a value it is always
exchangeable; in real exchange it is exchangeable only if it fulfills
particular conditions. As a value, the measure of its exchangeability is
determined by itself; exchange value expresses precisely the relation in
which it replaces other commodities; in real exchange it is exchangeable
only in quantities which are linked with its natural properties and
which correspond to the needs of the participants in exchange. (In
short, all properties which may be cited as the special qualities of
money are properties of the commodity as exchange value, of the product
as value as distinct from the value as product.) (The exchange value of
a commodity, as a separate form of existence accompanying the commodity
itself, is _money_; the form in which all commodities equate, compare,
measure themselves; into which all commodities dissolve themselves; that
which dissolves itself into all commodities; the universal equivalent.)
Every moment, in calculating, accounting etc., that we transform
commodities into value symbols, we fix them as mere exchange values,
making abstraction from the matter they are composed of and all their
natural qualities. On paper, in the head, this metamorphosis proceeds by
means of mere abstraction; but in the real exchange process a real
_mediation_ is required, a means to accomplish this abstraction. In its
natural existence, with its natural properties, in natural identity with
itself, the commodity is neither constantly exchangeable nor
exchangeable against _every other commodity;_ this it is only as
something different from itself, something distinct from itself, as
exchange value. We must first transpose the commodity into itself as
exchange value in order then to be able to compare this exchange value
with other exchange values and to exchange it. In the crudest barter,
when two commodities are exchanged for one another, each is first
equated with a symbol which expresses their exchange value, e.g. among
certain Negroes on the West African coast, = _x_ bars. One commodity is
= 1 bar; the other = 2 bars. They are exchanged in this relation. The
commodities are first transformed into bars in the head and in speech
before they are exchanged for one another. They are appraised before
being exchanged, and in order to appraise them they must be brought into
a given numerical relation to one another. In order to bring them into
such a numerical relation, in order to make them commensurable, they
must obtain the same denomination (unit). (The bar has a merely
imaginary existence, just as, in general, a relation can obtain a
particular embodiment and become individualized only by means of
abstraction.) In order to cover the excess of one value over another in
exchange, in order to liquidate the balance, the crudest barter, just as
with international trade today, requires payment in money.

Products (or activities) are exchanged only as commodities; commodities
in exchange exist only as values; only as values are they comparable. In
order to determine what amount of bread I need in order to exchange it
for a yard of linen, I first equate the yard of linen with its exchange
value, i.e. = 1/_x_ hours of labour time. Similarly, I equate the pound
of bread with its exchange value, = 1/_x_ or 2/_x_ hours of labour time.
I equate each of the commodities with a third; i.e. not with themselves.
This third, which differs from them both, exists initially only in the
head, as a conception, since it expresses a relation; just as, in
general, relations can be established as existing only by being
_thought,_ as distinct from the subjects which are in these relations
with each other. In becoming an exchange value, a product (or activity)
is not only transformed into a definite quantitative relation, a
relative number – that is, a number which expresses the quantity of
other commodities which equal it, which are its equivalent, or the
relation in which it is their equivalent – but it must also at the same
time be transformed qualitatively, be transposed into another element,
so that both commodities become magnitudes of the same kind, of the same
unit, i.e. commensurable. The commodity first has to be transposed into
labour time, into something qualitatively different from itself
(qualitatively different (1) because it is not labour time as labour
time, but materialized labour time; labour time not in the form of
motion, but at rest; not in the form of the process, but of the result;
(2) because it is not the objectification of labour time in general,
which exists only as a conception (it is only a conception of labour
separated from its quality, subject merely to quantitative variations),
but rather the specific result of a specific, of a naturally specified,
kind of labour which differs qualitatively from other kinds), in order
then to be compared as a specific amount of labour time, as a certain
magnitude of labour, with other amounts of labour time, other magnitudes
of labour. For the purpose of merely making a comparison – an appraisal
of products – of determining their value ideally, it suffices to make
this transformation in the head (a transformation in which the product
exists merely as the expression of quantitative relations of
production). This abstraction will do for comparing commodities; but in
actual exchange this abstraction in turn must be objectified, must be
symbolized, realized in a symbol. This necessity enters into force for
the following reasons: (1) As we have already said, both the commodities
to be exchanged are transformed in the head into common relations of
magnitude, into exchange values, and are thus reciprocally compared. But
if they are then to be exchanged in reality, their natural properties
enter into contradiction with their character as exchange values and as
mere denominated numbers. They are not divisible at will etc. (2) In the
real exchange process, particular commodities are always exchanged
against particular commodities, and the exchangeability of commodities,
as well as the relation in which they are exchangeable, depends on
conditions of place and time, etc. But the transformation of the
commodity into exchange value does not equate it to any other particular
commodity, but expresses it as equivalent, expresses its exchangeability
relation, _vis-à-vis_ all other commodities. This comparison, which the
head accomplishes in one stroke, can be achieved in reality only in a
delimited sphere determined by needs, and only in successive steps. (For
example, I exchange an income of 100 thalers as my needs would have it
one after another against a whole range of commodities whose sum = the
exchange value of 100 thalers.) Thus, in order to realize the commodity
as exchange value in one stroke, and in order to give it the general
influence of an exchange value, it is not enough to exchange it for one
particular commodity. It must be exchanged against a third thing which
is not in turn itself a particular commodity, but is the symbol of the
commodity as commodity, of the commodity’s exchange value itself; _which
thus represents, say, labour time as such,_ say a piece of paper or of
leather, which represents a fractional part of labour time. (Such a
symbol presupposes general recognition; it can only be a social symbol;
it expresses, indeed, nothing more than a social relation.) This symbol
represents the fractional parts of labour time; it represents exchange
value in such fractional parts as are capable of expressing all
relations between exchange values by means of simple arithmetical
combination; this symbol, this material sign of exchange value, is a
product of exchange itself, and not the execution of an idea conceived
_a priori._ (In fact the commodity which is required as medium of
exchange becomes transformed into money, into a symbol, only little by
little; as soon as this has happened, it can in turn be replaced by a
symbol of itself. It then becomes the conscious sign of exchange value.)

 The process, then, is simply this: The product becomes a commodity,
_i.e. a mere moment of exchange._ The commodity is transformed into
exchange value. In order to equate it with itself as an exchange value,
it is exchanged for a symbol which represents it as exchange value as
such. As such a symbolized exchange value, it can then in turn be
exchanged in definite relations for every other commodity. Because the
product becomes a commodity, and the commodity becomes an exchange
value, it obtains, at first only in the head, a double existence. This
doubling in the idea proceeds (and must proceed) to the point where the
commodity appears double in real exchange: as a natural product on one
side, as exchange value on the other. I.e. the commodity’s exchange
value obtains a material existence separate from the commodity.

The definition of a product as exchange value thus necessarily implies
that exchange value obtains a separate existence, in isolation from the
product. The exchange value which is separated from commodities and
exists alongside them as itself a commodity, this is – _money._ In the
form of _money_ all properties of the commodity as exchange value appear
as an object distinct from it, as a form of social existence separated
from the natural existence of the commodity. (This to be further shown
by enumerating the usual properties of money.) (The material in which
this symbol is expressed is by no means a matter of indifference, even
though it manifests itself in many different historical forms. In the
development of society, not only the symbol but likewise the material
corresponding to the symbol are worked out – a material from which
society later tries to disentangle itself; if a symbol is not to be
arbitrary, certain conditions are demanded of the material in which it
is represented. The symbols for words, for example the alphabet etc.,
have an analogous history.) Thus, the exchange value of a product
creates money alongside the product. Now, just as it is impossible to
suspend the complications and contradictions which arise from the
existence of money alongside the particular commodities merely by
altering the form of money (although difficulties characteristic of a
lower form of money may be avoided by moving to a higher form), so also
is it impossible to abolish money itself as long as exchange value
remains the social form of products. It is necessary to see this clearly
in order to avoid setting impossible tasks, and in order to know the
limits within which monetary reforms and transformations of circulation
are able to give a new shape to the relations of production and to the
social relations which rest on the latter.

The properties of money as (1) measure of commodity exchange; (2) medium
of exchange; (3) representative of commodities (hence object of
contracts); (4) general commodity alongside the particular commodities,
all simply follow from its character as exchange value separated from
commodities themselves and objectified. (By virtue of its property as
the general commodity in relation to all others, as the embodiment of
the exchange value of the other commodities, money at the same time
becomes the realized and always realizable form of capital; the form of
capital’s appearance which is always valid – a property which emerges in
bullion drains; hence capital appears in history initially only in the
money form; this explains, finally, the link between money and the rate
of interest, and its influence on the latter.)

To the degree that production is shaped in such a way that every
producer becomes dependent on the exchange value of his commodity, i.e.
as the product increasingly becomes an exchange value in reality, and
exchange value becomes the immediate object of production – to the same
degree must _money relations_ develop, together with the contradictions
immanent in the _money relation,_ in the relation of the product to
itself as money. The need for exchange and for the transformation of the
product into a pure exchange value progresses in step with the division
of labour, i.e. with the increasingly social character of production.
But as the latter grows, so grows the power of _money,_ i.e. the
exchange relation establishes itself as a power external to and
independent of the producers. What originally appeared as a means to
promote production becomes a relation alien to the producers. As the
producers become more dependent on exchange, exchange appears to become
more independent of them, and the gap between the product as product and
the product as exchange value appears to widen. Money does not create
these antitheses and contradictions; it is, rather, the development of
these contradictions and antitheses which creates the seemingly
transcendental power of money. (To be further developed, the influence
of the transformation of all relations into money relations: taxes in
kind into money taxes, rent in kind into money rent, military service
into mercenary troops, all personal services in general into money
services, of patriarchal, slave, serf and guild labour into pure wage
labour.)

The product becomes a commodity; the commodity becomes exchange value;
the exchange value of the commodity is its immanent money-property;
this, its money-property, separates itself from it in the form of money,
and achieves a general social existence separated from all particular
commodities and their natural mode of existence; the relation of the
product to itself as exchange value becomes its relation to money,
existing alongside it; or, becomes the relation of all products to
money, external to them all. Just as the real exchange of products
creates their exchange value, so does their exchange value create money.

The next question to confront us is this: are there not contradictions,
inherent in this relation itself, which are wrapped up in the existence
of money alongside commodities?

_Firstly:_ The simple fact that the commodity exists doubly, in one
aspect as a specific product whose natural form of existence ideally
contains (latently contains) its exchange value, and in the other aspect
as manifest exchange value (money), in which all connection with the
natural form of the product is stripped away again – this double,
_differentiated_ existence must develop into a _difference_, and the
difference into _antithesis_ and _contradiction._ The same contradiction
between the particular nature of the commodity as product and its
general nature as exchange value, which created the necessity of
positing it doubly, as this particular commodity on one side and as
money on the other – this contradiction between the commodity’s
particular natural qualities and its general social qualities contains
from the beginning the possibility that these two separated forms in
which the commodity exists are not convertible into one another. The
exchangeability of the commodity exists as a thing beside it, as money,
as something different from the commodity, something no longer directly
identical with it. As soon as money has become an external thing
alongside the commodity, the exchangeability of the commodity for money
becomes bound up with external conditions which may or may not be
present; it is abandoned to the mercy of external conditions. The
commodity is demanded in exchange because of its natural properties,
because of the needs for which it is the desired object. Money, by
contrast, is demanded only because of its exchange value, as exchange
value. Hence, whether or not the commodity is transposable into money,
whether or not it can be exchanged for money, whether its exchange value
can be posited for it – this depends on circumstances which initially
have nothing to do with it as exchange value and are independent of
that. The transposability of the commodity depends on the natural
properties of the product; that of money coincides with its existence as
symbolized exchange value. There thus arises the possibility that the
commodity, in its specific form as product, can no longer be exchanged
for, equated with, its general form as money.

By existing outside the commodity as money, the exchangeability of the
commodity has become something different from and alien to the
commodity, with which it first has to be brought into equation, to which
it is therefore at the beginning unequal; while the equation itself
becomes dependent on external conditions, hence a matter of chance.

_Secondly:_ Just as the exchange value of the commodity leads a double
existence, as the particular commodity and as money, so does the act of
exchange split into two mutually independent acts: exchange of
commodities for money, exchange of money for commodities; purchase and
sale. Since these have now achieved a spatially and temporally separate
and mutually indifferent form of existence, their immediate identity
ceases. They may correspond or not; they may balance or not; they may
enter into disproportion with one another. They will of course always
attempt to equalize one another; but in the place of the earlier
immediate equality there now stands the constant movement of
equalization, which evidently presupposes constant non-equivalence. It
is now entirely possible that consonance may be reached only by passing
through the most extreme dissonance.

_Thirdly:_ With the separation of purchase and sale, with the splitting
of exchange into two spatially and temporally independent acts, there
further emerges another, new relation.

Just as exchange itself splits apart into two mutually independent acts,
so does the overall movement of exchange itself become separate from the
exchangers, the producers of commodities. Exchange for the sake of
exchange separates off from exchange for the sake of commodities. A
mercantile estate [17] steps between the producers; an estate which only
buys in order to sell and only sells so as to buy again, and whose aim
in this operation is not the possession of commodities as products but
merely the obtaining of exchange values as such, of money. (A mercantile
estate can take shape even with mere barter. But since only the overflow
of production on both sides is at its disposal, its influence on
production, and its importance as a whole, remain completely secondary.)
The rise of exchange (commerce) as an independent function torn away
from the exchangers corresponds to the rise of exchange value as an
independent entity, as money, torn away from products. Exchange value
was the measure of commodity exchange; but its aim was the direct
possession of the exchanged commodity, its consumption (regardless of
whether this consumption consists of serving to satisfy needs directly,
i.e. serving as product, or of serving in turn as a tool of production).
The purpose of commerce is not consumption, directly, but the gaining of
money, of exchange values. This doubling of exchange – exchange for the
sake of consumption and exchange for exchange – gives rise to a new
disproportion. In his exchange, the merchant is guided merely by the
difference between the purchase and sale of commodities; but the
consumer who buys a commodity must replace its exchange value once and
for all. Circulation, i.e. exchange within the mercantile estate, and
the point at which circulation ends, i.e. exchange between the
mercantile estate and the consumers – as much as they must ultimately
condition one another – are determined by quite different laws and
motives, and can enter into the most acute contradiction with one
another. The possibility of commercial crises is already contained in
this separation. But since production works directly for commerce and
only indirectly for consumption, it must not only create but also and
equally be seized by this incongruency between commerce and exchange for
consumption. (The relations of demand and supply become entirely
inverted.) (The money business then in turn separates from commerce
proper.)

_Aphorisms._ (All commodities are perishable money; money is the
imperishable commodity. With the development of the division of labour,
the immediate product ceases to be a medium of exchange. The need arises
for a general medium of exchange, i.e. a medium of exchange independent
of the specific production of each individual. Money implies the
separation between the value of things and their substance. Money is
originally the representative of all values; in practice this situation
is inverted, and all real products and labours become the
representatives of money. In direct barter, every article cannot be
exchanged for every other; a specific activity can be exchanged only for
certain specific products. Money can overcome the difficulties inherent
in barter only by generalizing them, making them universal. It is
absolutely necessary that forcibly separated elements which essentially
belong together manifest themselves by way of forcible eruption as the
_separation_ of things which belong together in essence. The unity is
brought about _by force._ As soon as the antagonistic split leads to
eruptions, the economists point to the _essential unity_ and abstract
from the alienation. Their apologetic wisdom consists in forgetting
their own definitions at every decisive moment. The product as direct
medium of exchange is (1) still directly bound to its natural quality,
hence limited in every way by the latter; it can, for example,
deteriorate etc.; (2) connected with the immediate need which another
may have or not have at the time, or which he may have for his own
product. When the product becomes subordinated to labour and labour to
exchange, then a moment enters in which both are separated from their
owner. Whether, after this separation, they return to him again in
another shape becomes a matter of _chance_. When money enters into
exchange, I am forced to exchange my product for exchange value in
general or for the general capacity to exchange, hence my product
becomes dependent on the state of general commerce and is torn out of
its local, natural and individual boundaries. For exactly that reason it
can cease to be a product.)

 

_Fourthly:_ Just as exchange value, in the form of money, takes its
place as the _general commodity_ alongside all particular commodities,
so does exchange value as money therefore at the same time take its
place as a _particular commodity_ (since it has a particular existence)
alongside all other commodities. An incongruency arises not only because
money, which exists only in exchange, confronts the particular
exchangeability of commodities as their general exchangeability, and
directly extinguishes it, while, nevertheless, the two are supposed to
be always convertible into one another; but also because money comes
into contradiction with itself and with its characteristic by virtue of
being itself a _particular_ commodity (even if only a symbol) and of
being subject, therefore, to particular conditions of exchange in its
exchange with other commodities, conditions which contradict its general
unconditional exchangeability. (Not to speak of money as fixed in the
substance of a particular product, etc.) Besides its existence in the
commodity, exchange value achieved an existence of its own in money, was
separated from its substance exactly because the natural characteristic
of this substance contradicted its general characteristic as exchange
value. Every commodity is equal (and comparable) to every other as
exchange value (_qualitatively_: each now merely represents a
_quantitative_ plus or minus of exchange value). For that reason, this
equality, this unity of the commodity is distinct from its natural
differentiation; and appears in money therefore as their common element
as well as a third thing which confronts them both. But on one side,
exchange value naturally remains at the same time an inherent quality of
commodities while it simultaneously exists outside them; on the other
side, when money no longer exists as a property of commodities, as a
common element within them, but as an individual entity apart from them,
then money itself becomes a _particular_ commodity alongside the other
commodities. (Determinable by demand and supply; splits into different
kinds of money, etc.) It becomes a commodity like other commodities, and
at the same time it is not a commodity like other commodities. Despite
its general character it is one exchangeable entity among other
exchangeable entities. It is not only the general exchange value, but at
the same time a particular exchange value alongside other particular
exchange values. Here a new source of contradictions which make
themselves felt in practice. (The particular nature of money emerges
again in the separation of the money business from commerce proper.)

We see, then, how it is an inherent property of money to fulfil its
purposes by simultaneously negating them; to achieve independence from
commodities; to be a means which becomes an end; to realize the exchange
value of commodities by separating them from it; to facilitate exchange
by splitting it; to overcome the difficulties of the direct exchange of
commodities by generalizing them; to make exchange independent of the
producers in the same measure as the producers become dependent on
exchange.

(It will be necessary later, before this question is dropped, to correct
the idealist manner of the presentation, which makes it seem as if it
were merely a matter of conceptual determinations and of the dialectic
of these concepts. Above all in the case of the phrase: product (or
activity) becomes commodity; commodity, exchange value; exchange value,
money.)

(_Economist._ 24 January 1857. The following passage to be borne in mind
on the subject of banks:

‘So far as the mercantile classes share, which they now do very
generally, in the profits of banks – and may to a still greater extent
by the wider diffusion of joint-stock banks, the abolition of all
corporate privileges, and the extension of perfect freedom to the
business of banking – they have been enriched by the increased rates of
money. In truth, the mercantile classes by the extent of their deposits,
are virtually their own bankers; and so far as that is the case, the
rate of discount must be to them of little importance. All banking and
other reserves must of course be the results of continual industry, and
of savings laid by out of profits; and consequently, taking the
mercantile and industrious classes as a whole, they must be their own
bankers, and it requires only that the principles of free trade should
be extended to all businesses, to equalize or naturalize for them the
advantages and disadvantages of all the fluctuations in the money
market.’)

All contradictions of the _monetary system_ and of the exchange of
products under the monetary system are the development of the relation
of products as _exchange values,_ of their definition as _exchange
value_ or as _value_ pure and simple.

(_Morning Star._ 12 February 1857. ‘The pressure of money during last
year, and the high rate of discount which was adopted in consequence,
has been very beneficial to the profit account of the Bank of France.
Its dividend has gone on increasing: 118 fr. in 1852, 154 fr. in 1853,
194 fr. in 1854, 200 fr. in 1855, 272 fr. in 1856.’)

Also to be noted, the following passage: The English silver coins issued
at a price higher than the value of the silver they contain. A pound
silver of an intrinsic value of 60–62s. (£3 on an average in gold) was
coined into 66s. The Mint pays the ‘market price of the day, from 5s. to
5s. 2d. the ounce, and issues at the rate of 5s. 6d. the ounce. There
are two reasons which prevent any practical inconvenience resulting from
this arrangement:’ (_of silver tokens_, not of intrinsic value) ‘first,
the coin can only be procured at the Mint, and at that price; as home
circulation, then, it cannot be depreciated, and it cannot be sent
abroad because it circulates here for more than its intrinsic value; and
secondly, as it is a legal tender only up to 40s., it never interferes
with the gold coins, nor affects their value.’ Gives France the advice
to do the same: to issue subordinate coins of silver tokens, not of
intrinsic value, and limit[ing] the amount to which they should be a
legal tender. But at the same time: in fixing the quality of the coin,
to take a larger margin between the intrinsic and the nominal value than
we have in England, because the increasing value of silver in relation
to gold may very probably, before long, rise up to our present Mint
price, when we may be obliged again to alter it. Our silver coin is now
little more than 5% below the intrinsic value: a short time since it was
10%. (_Economist_. 24 January 1857.)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Now, it might be thought that the issue of time-chits overcomes all
these difficulties. (The existence of the time-chit naturally already
presupposes conditions which are not directly given in the examination
of the relations of exchange value and money, and which can and do exist
without the time-chit: public credit, bank etc.; but all this not to be
touched on further here, since the time-chit men of course regard it as
the ultimate product of the ‘series’, which, even if it corresponds most
to the ‘pure’ concept of money, ‘appears’ last in reality.) To begin
with: If the preconditions under which the price of commodities = their
exchange value are fulfilled and given; balance of demand and supply;
balance of production and consumption; and what this amounts to in the
last analysis, _proportionate production_ (the so-called relations of
distribution are themselves relations of production), then the money
question becomes entirely secondary, in particular the question whether
the tickets should be blue or green, paper or tin, or whatever other
form social accounting should take. In that case it is totally
meaningless to keep up the pretence that an investigation is being made
of the real relations of money.

The bank (any bank) issues the time-chits. [18] A commodity, A = the
exchange value _x_, i.e. = _x_ hours of labour time, is exchanged for a
quantity of money representing _x_ labour time. The bank would at the
same time have to purchase the commodity, i.e. exchange it for its
representative in monetary form, just as e.g. the Bank of England today
has to give notes for gold. The commodity, the substantial and therefore
accidental existence of exchange value, is exchanged for the symbolic
existence of exchange value as exchange value. There is then no
difficulty in transposing it from the form of the commodity into the
form of money. The labour time contained in it only needs to be
authentically verified (which, by the way, is not as easy as assaying
the purity and weight of gold and silver) and thereby immediately
creates its _counter-value_, its monetary existence. No matter how we
may turn and twist the matter, in the last instance it amounts to this:
the bank which issues the time-chits buys commodities at their costs of
production, buys all commodities, and moreover this purchase costs the
bank nothing more than the production of snippets of paper, and the bank
gives the seller, in place of the exchange value which he possesses in a
definite and substantial form, the symbolic exchange value of the
commodity, in other words a draft on all other commodities to the amount
of the same exchange value. Exchange value as such can of course exist
only symbolically, although in order for it to be employed as a thing
and not merely as a formal notion, this symbol must possess an objective
existence; it is not merely an ideal notion, but is actually presented
to the mind in an objective mode. (A measure can be held in the hand;
exchange value measures, but it exchanges only when the measure passes
from one hand to the other.) So the bank gives money for the commodity;
money which is an exact draft on the exchange value of the commodity,
i.e. of all commodities of the same value; the bank buys. The bank is
the general buyer, the buyer of not only this or that commodity, but all
commodities. For its purpose is to bring about the transposition of
every commodity into its symbolic existence as exchange value. But if it
is the general buyer, then it also has to be the general seller; not
only the dock where all wares are deposited, not only the general
warehouse, but also the owner of the commodities, in the same sense as
every merchant. I have exchanged my commodity A for the time-chit B,
which represents the commodity’s exchange value; but I have done this
only so that I can then further metamorphose this B into any real
commodity C, D, E etc., as it suits me. Now, can this money circulate
outside the bank? Can it take any other route than that between the
owner of the chit and the bank? How is the convertibility of this chit
secured? Only two cases are possible. Either all owners of commodities
(be these products or labour) desire to sell their commodities at their
exchange value, or some want to and some do not. If they all want to
sell at their exchange value, then they will not await the chance
arrival or non-arrival of a buyer, but go immediately to the bank,
unload their commodities on to it, and obtain their exchange value
symbol, money, for them: they redeem them for its money. In this case
the bank is simultaneously the general buyer and the general seller in
one person. Or the opposite takes place. In this case, the bank chit is
mere paper which claims to be the generally recognized symbol of
exchange value, but has in fact no value. For this symbol has to have
the property of not merely representing, but _being,_ exchange value in
actual exchange. In the latter case the bank chit would not be money, or
it would be money only by convention between the bank and its clients,
but not on the open market. It would be the same as a meal ticket good
for a dozen meals which I obtain from a restaurant, or a theatre pass
good for a dozen evenings, both of which represent money, but only in
this particular restaurant or this particular theatre. The bank chit
would have ceased to meet the qualifications of money, since it would
not circulate among the general public, but only between the bank and
its clients. We thus have to drop the latter supposition.

The bank would thus be the general buyer and seller. Instead of notes it
could also issue cheques, and instead of that it could also keep simple
bank accounts. Depending on the sum of commodity values which X had
deposited with the bank, X would have that sum in the form of other
commodities to his credit. A second attribute of the bank would be
necessary: it would need the power to establish the exchange value of
all commodities, i.e. the labour time materialized in them, in an
authentic manner. But its functions could not end there. It would have
to determine the labour time in which commodities could be produced,
with the average means of production available in a given industry, i.e.
the time in which they would have to be produced. But that also would
not be sufficient. It would not only have to determine the time in which
a certain quantity of products had to be produced, and place the
producers in conditions which made their labour equally productive (i.e.
it would have to balance and to arrange the distribution of the means of
labour), but it would also have to determine the amounts of labour time
to be employed in the different branches of production. The latter would
be necessary because, in order to realize exchange value and make the
bank’s currency really convertible, social production in general would
have to be stabilized and arranged so that the needs of the partners in
exchange were always satisfied. Nor is this all. The biggest exchange
process is not that between commodities, but that between commodities
and labour. (More on this presently.) The workers would not be selling
their labour to the bank, but they would receive the exchange value for
the entire product of their labour, etc. Precisely seen, then, the bank
would be not only the general buyer and seller, but also the general
producer. In fact either it would be a despotic ruler of production and
trustee of distribution, or it would indeed be nothing more than a board
which keeps the books and accounts for a society producing in common.
The common ownership of the means of production is presupposed, etc.,
etc. The Saint-Simonians made their bank into the papacy of production.

The dissolution of all products and activities into exchange values
presupposes the dissolution of all fixed personal (historic) relations
of dependence in production, as well as the all-sided dependence of the
producers on one another. Each individual’s production is dependent on
the production of all others; and the transformation of his product into
the necessaries of his own life is [similarly] dependent on the
consumption of all others. Prices are old; exchange also; but the
increasing determination of the former by costs of production, as well
as the increasing dominance of the latter over all relations of
production, only develop fully, and continue to develop ever more
completely, in bourgeois society, the society of free competition. What
Adam Smith, in the true eighteenth-century manner, puts in the
prehistoric period, the period preceding history, is rather a product of
history.

This reciprocal dependence is expressed in the constant necessity for
exchange, and in exchange value as the all-sided mediation. The
economists express this as follows: Each pursues his private interest
and only his private interest; and thereby serves the private interests
of all, the general interest, without willing or knowing it. The real
point is not that each individual’s pursuit of his private interest
promotes the totality of private interests, the general interest. One
could just as well deduce from this abstract phrase that each individual
reciprocally blocks the assertion of the others’ interests, so that,
instead of a general affirmation, this war of all against all produces a
general negation. The point is rather that private interest is itself
already a socially determined interest, which can be achieved only
within the conditions laid down by society and with the means provided
by society; hence it is bound to the reproduction of these conditions
and means. It is the interest of private persons; but its content, as
well as the form and means of its realization, is given by social
conditions independent of all.

The reciprocal and all-sided dependence of individuals who are
indifferent to one another forms their social connection. This social
bond is expressed in _exchange value_, by means of which alone each
individual’s own activity or his product becomes an activity and a
product for him; he must produce a general product – _exchange value_,
or, the latter isolated for itself and individualized, _money._ On the
other side, the power which each individual exercises over the activity
of others or over social wealth exists in him as the owner of _exchange
values_, of _money_. The individual carries his social power, as well as
his bond with society, in his pocket. Activity, regardless of its
individual manifestation, and the product of activity, regardless of its
particular make-up, are always _exchange value_, and exchange value is a
generality, in which all individuality and peculiarity are negated and
extinguished. This indeed is a condition very different from that in
which the individual or the individual member of a family or clan
(later, community) directly and naturally reproduces himself, or in
which his productive activity and his share in production are bound to a
specific form of labour and of product, which determine his relation to
others in just that specific way.

The social character of activity, as well as the social form of the
product, and the share of individuals in production here appear as
something alien and objective, confronting the individuals, not as their
relation to one another, but as their subordination to relations which
subsist independently of them and which arise out of collisions between
mutually indifferent individuals. The general exchange of activities and
products, which has become a vital condition for each individual – their
mutual interconnection – here appears as something alien to them,
autonomous, as a thing. In exchange value, the social connection between
persons is transformed into a social relation between things; personal
capacity into objective wealth. The less social power the medium of
exchange possesses (and at this stage it is still closely bound to the
nature of the direct product of labour and the direct needs of the
partners in exchange) the greater must be the power of the community
which binds the individuals together, the patriarchal relation, the
community of antiquity, feudalism and the guild system. (See my Notebook
XII, 34 B.) [19] Each individual possesses social power in the form of a
thing. Rob the thing of this social power and you must give it to
persons to exercise over persons. Relations of personal dependence
(entirely spontaneous at the outset) are the first social forms, in
which human productive capacity develops only to a slight extent and at
isolated points. Personal independence founded on _objective
[sachlicher]_ dependence is the second great form, in which a system of
general social metabolism, of universal relations, of all-round needs
and universal capacities is formed for the first time. Free
individuality, based on the universal development of individuals and on
their subordination of their communal, social productivity as their
social wealth, is the third stage. The second stage creates the
conditions for the third. Patriarchal as well as ancient conditions
(feudal, also) thus disintegrate with the development of commerce, of
luxury, of _money_, of _exchange value,_ while modern society arises and
grows in the same measure.

Exchange and division of labour reciprocally condition one another.
Since everyone works for himself but his product is nothing for him,
each must of course exchange, not only in order to take part in the
general productive capacity but also in order to transform his own
product into his own subsistence. (See my ‘Remarks on Economics’, p. V
(13,20).) [20] Exchange, when mediated by exchange value and money,
presupposes the all-round dependence of the producers on one another,
together with the total isolation of their private interests from one
another, as well as a division of social labour whose unity and mutual
complementarity exist in the form of a natural relation, as it were,
external to the individuals and independent of them. The pressure of
general demand and supply on one another mediates the connection of
mutually indifferent persons.

The very necessity of first transforming individual products or
activities into _exchange value,_ into _money,_ so that they obtain and
demonstrate their social _power_ in this _objective [sachlichen]_ form,
proves two things: (1) That individuals now produce only for society and
in society; (2) that production is not _directly_ social, is not ‘the
offspring of association’, which distributes labour internally.
Individuals are subsumed under social production; social production
exists outside them as their fate; but social production is not subsumed
under individuals, manageable by them as their common wealth. There can
therefore be nothing more erroneous and absurd than to postulate the
control by the united individuals of their total production, on the
basis of _exchange value_, of _money,_ as was done above in the case of
the time-chit bank. The _private exchange_ of all products of labour,
all activities and all wealth stands in antithesis not only to a
distribution based on a natural or political super- and subordination of
individuals to one another (to which _exchange_ proper only runs
parallel or, by and large, does not so much take a grip on the life of
entire communities as, rather, insert itself between different
communities; it by no means exercises general domination over all
relations of production and distribution) (regardless of the character
of this super- and subordination: patriarchal, ancient or feudal) but
also to free exchange among individuals who are associated on the basis
of common appropriation and control of the means of production. (The
latter form of association is not arbitrary; it presupposes the
development of material and cultural conditions which are not to be
examined any further at this point.) Just as the division of labour
creates agglomeration, combination, cooperation, the antithesis of
private interests, class interests, competition, concentration of
capital, monopoly, stock companies – so many antithetical forms of the
unity which itself brings the antithesis to the fore – so does private
exchange create world trade, private independence creates complete
dependence on the so-called world market, and the fragmented acts of
exchange create a banking and credit system whose books, at least keep a
record of the balance between debit and credit in private exchange.
Although the private interests within each nation divide it into as many
nations as it has ‘full-grown individuals’, and although the interests
of exporters and of importers are antithetical here, etc, etc., national
trade does obtain the _semblance_ of existence in the form of the rate
of exchange. Nobody will take this as a ground for believing that a
_reform of the money market_ can abolish the _foundations_ of internal
or external private trade. But within bourgeois society, the society
that rests on _exchange value,_ there arise relations of circulation as
well as of production which are so many mines to explode it. (A mass of
antithetical forms of the social unity, whose antithetical character can
never be abolished through quiet metamorphosis. On the other hand, if we
did not find concealed in society as it is the material conditions of
production and the corresponding relations of exchange prerequisite for
a classless society, then all attempts to explode it would be quixotic.)

 We have seen that, although exchange value is = to the relative labour
time materialized in products, money, for its part, is = to the exchange
value of commodities, separated from their substance; and that in this
exchange value or money relation are contained the contradictions
between commodities and their exchange value, between commodities as
exchange values and money. We saw that a bank which directly creates the
mirror image of the commodity in the form of labour-money is a utopia.
Thus, although money owes its existence only to the tendency of exchange
value to separate itself from the substance of commodities and to take
on a pure form, nevertheless commodities cannot be directly transformed
into money; i.e. the authentic certificate of the amount of labour time
realized in the commodity cannot serve the commodity as its price in the
world of exchange values. How is this?

(In one of the forms of money – in so far as it is _medium_ of exchange
(not _measure_ of exchange value) – it is clear to the economists that
the existence of money presupposes the objectification
[_Versachlichung_] of the social bond; in so far, that is, as money
appears in the form of _collateral_ which one individual must leave with
another in order to obtain a commodity from him. Here the economists
themselves say that people place in a thing (money) the faith which they
do not place in each other. But why do they have faith in the thing?
Obviously only because that thing is an _objectified relation_ between
persons; because it is objectified exchange value, and exchange value is
nothing more than a mutual relation between people’s productive
activities. Every other collateral may serve the holder directly in that
function: money serves him only as the ‘dead pledge of society’, [21]
but it serves as such only because of its social (symbolic) property;
and it can have a social property only because individuals have
alienated their own social relationship from themselves so that it takes
the form of a thing.)

In the _lists of current prices,_ where all values are measured in
money, it seems as though this independence from persons of the social
character of things is, by the activity of commerce, on this basis of
alienation where the relations of production and distribution stand
opposed to the individual, to all individuals, at the same time
subordinated to the individual again. Since, ‘if you please’, the
autonomization of the world market (in which the activity of each
individual is included), increases with the development of monetary
relations (exchange value) and vice versa, since the general bond and
all-round interdependence in production and consumption increase
together with the independence and indifference of the consumers and
producers to one another; since this contradiction leads to crises,
etc., hence, together with the development of this alienation, and on
the same basis, efforts are made to overcome it: institutions emerge
whereby each individual can acquire information about the activity of
all others and attempt to adjust his own accordingly, e.g. lists of
current prices, rates of exchange, interconnections between those active
in commerce through the mails, telegraphs etc. (the means of
communication of course grow at the same time). (This means that,
although the total supply and demand are independent of the actions of
each individual, everyone attempts to inform himself about them, and
this knowledge then reacts back in practice on the total supply and
demand. Although on the given standpoint, alienation is not overcome by
these means, nevertheless relations and connections are introduced
thereby which include the possibility of suspending the old standpoint.)
(The possibility of general statistics, etc.) (This is to be developed,
incidentally, under the categories _‘Prices, Demand and Supply’_. To be
further noted here only that a comprehensive view over the whole of
commerce and production in so far as lists of current prices in fact
provide it, furnishes indeed the best proof of the way in which their
own exchange and their own production confront individuals as an
_objective_ relation which is _independent_ of them. In the case of the
_world market,_ the _connection of the individual_ with all, but at the
same time also the _independence of this connection from the
individual,_ have developed to such a high level that the formation of
the world market already at the same time contains the conditions for
going beyond it.) _Comparison_ in place of real communality and
generality.

(It has been said and may be said that this is precisely the beauty and
the greatness of it: this spontaneous interconnection, this material and
mental metabolism which is independent of the knowing and willing of
individuals, and which presupposes their reciprocal independence and
indifference. And, certainly, this objective connection is preferable to
the lack of any connection, or to a merely local connection resting on
blood ties, or on primeval, natural or master-servant relations. Equally
certain is it that individuals cannot gain mastery over their own social
interconnections before they have created them. But it is an insipid
notion to conceive of this merely _objective bond_ as a spontaneous,
natural attribute inherent in individuals and inseparable from their
nature (in antithesis to their conscious knowing and willing). This bond
is their product. It is a historic product. It belongs to a specific
phase of their development. The alien and independent character in which
it presently exists _vis-à-vis_ individuals proves only that the latter
are still engaged in the creation of the conditions of their social
life, and that they have not yet begun, on the basis of these
conditions, to live it. It is the bond natural to individuals within
specific and limited relations of production. Universally developed
individuals, whose social relations, as their own communal
[_gemeinschaftlich_] relations, are hence also subordinated to their own
communal control, are no product of nature, but of history. The degree
and the universality of the development of wealth where _this_
individuality becomes possible supposes production on the basis of
exchange values as a prior condition, whose universality produces not
only the alienation of the individual from himself and from others, but
also the universality and the comprehensiveness of his relations and
capacities. In earlier stages of development the single individual seems
to be developed more fully, because he has not yet worked out his
relationships in their fullness, or erected them as independent social
powers and relations opposite himself. It is as ridiculous to yearn for
a return to that original fullness [22] as it is to believe that with
this complete emptiness history has come to a standstill. The bourgeois
viewpoint has never advanced beyond this antithesis between itself and
this romantic viewpoint, and therefore the latter will accompany it as
legitimate antithesis up to its blessed end.)

(The relation of the individual to science may be taken as an example
here.)

(To compare money with blood – the term circulation gave occasion for
this – is about as correct as Menenius Agrippa’s comparison between the
patricians and the stomach.) [23] (To compare money with language is not
less erroneous. Language does not transform ideas, so that the
peculiarity of ideas is dissolved and their social character runs
alongside them as a separate entity, like prices alongside commodities.
Ideas do not exist separately from language. Ideas which have first to
be translated out of their mother tongue into a foreign language in
order to circulate, in order to become exchangeable, offer a somewhat
better analogy; but the analogy then lies not in language, but in the
foreignness of language.)

(The exchangeability of all products, activities and relations with a
third, _objective_ entity which can be re-exchanged for everything
_without distinction_ – that is, the development of exchange values (and
of money relations) is identical with universal venality, corruption.
Universal prostitution appears as a necessary phase in the development
of the social character of personal talents, capacities, abilities,
activities. More politely expressed: the universal relation of utility
and use. The equation of the incompatible, as Shakespeare nicely defined
money. [24] Greed as such impossible without money; all other kinds of
accumulation and of mania for accumulation appear as primitive,
restricted by needs on the one hand and by the restricted nature of
products on the other (_sacra auri fames_ [25]).)

(The development of the money system obviously presupposes other, prior
developments.)

When we look at social relations which create an undeveloped system of
exchange, of exchange values and of money, or which correspond to an
undeveloped degree of these, then it is clear from the outset that the
individuals in such a society, although their relations appear to be
more personal, enter into connection with one another only as
individuals imprisoned within a certain definition, as feudal lord and
vassal, landlord and serf, etc., or as members of a caste etc. or as
members of an estate etc. In the money relation, in the developed system
of exchange (and this semblance seduces the democrats), the ties of
personal dependence, of distinctions of blood, education, etc, are in
fact exploded, ripped up (at least, personal ties all appear as
_personal_ relations); and individuals _seem_ independent (this is an
independence which is at bottom merely an illusion and it is more
correctly called indifference), free to collide with one another and to
engage in exchange within this freedom; but they appear thus only for
someone who abstracts from the _conditions_, the _conditions of
existence_ within which these individuals enter into contact (and these
conditions, in turn, are independent of the individuals and, although
created by society, appear as if they were _natural conditions,_ not
controllable by individuals). The definedness of individuals, which in
the former case appears as a personal restriction of the individual by
another, appears in the latter case as developed into an objective
restriction of the individual by relations independent of him and
sufficient unto themselves. (Since the single individual cannot strip
away his personal definition, but may very well overcome and master
external relations, his freedom _seems_ to be greater in case 2. A
closer examination of these external relations, these conditions, shows,
however, that it is impossible for the individuals of a class etc. to
overcome them _en masse_ without destroying them. A particular
individual may by chance get on top of these relations, but the mass of
those under their rule cannot, since their mere existence expresses
subordination, the necessary subordination of the mass of individuals.)
These external relations are very far from being an abolition of
‘relations of dependence’; they are rather the dissolution of these
relations into a general form; they are merely the elaboration and
emergence of the general _foundation_ of the relations of personal
dependence. Here also individuals come into connection with one another
only in determined ways. These _objective_ dependency relations also
appear, in antithesis to those of _personal_ dependence (the objective
dependency relation is nothing more than social relations which have
become independent and now enter into opposition to the seemingly
independent individuals; i.e. the reciprocal relations of production
separated from and autonomous of individuals) in such a way that
individuals are now ruled by _abstractions,_ whereas earlier they
depended on one another. The abstraction, or idea, however, is nothing
more than the theoretical expression of those material relations which
are their lord and master. Relations can be expressed, of course, only
in ideas, and thus philosophers have determined the reign of ideas to be
the peculiarity of the new age, and have identified the creation of free
individuality with the overthrow of this reign. This error was all the
more easily committed, from the ideological stand-point, as this reign
exercised by the relations (this objective dependency, which,
incidentally, turns into certain definite relations of personal
dependency, but stripped of all illusions) appears within the
consciousness of individuals as the reign of ideas, and because the
belief in the permanence of these ideas, i.e. of these objective
relations of dependency, is of course consolidated, nourished and
inculcated by the ruling classes by all means available.

(As regards the illusion of the ‘purely personal relations’ in feudal
times, etc., it is of course not to be forgotten for a moment (1) that
these relations, in a certain phase, also took on an objective character
within their own sphere, as for example the development of landed
proprietorship out of purely military relations of subordination; but
(2) the objective relation on which they founder has still a limited,
primitive character and therefore _seems_ personal, while, in the modern
world, personal relations flow purely out of relations of production and
exchange.)

The product becomes a commodity. The commodity becomes exchange value.
The exchange value of the commodity acquires an existence of its own
alongside the commodity; i.e. the commodity in the form in which (1) it
is exchangeable with all other commodities, (2) it has hence become a
commodity in general, and its natural specificity is extinguished, and
(3) the measure of its exchangeability (i.e. the given relation within
which it is equivalent to other commodities) has been determined – this
commodity is the commodity as money, and, to be precise, not as money in
general, but as a _certain definite sum of money,_ for, in order to
represent exchange value in all its variety, money has to be countable,
quantitatively divisible.

Money – the common form into which all commodities as exchange values
are transformed, i.e. the universal commodity – must itself exist as a
_particular_ commodity alongside the others, since what is required is
not only that they can be measured against it in the head, but that they
can be changed and exchanged for it in the actual exchange process. The
contradiction which thereby enters, to be developed elsewhere. Money
does not arise by convention, any more than the state does. It arises
out of exchange, and arises naturally out of exchange; it is a product
of the same. At the beginning, that commodity will serve as money – i.e.
it will be exchanged not for the purpose of satisfying a need, not for
consumption, but in order to be re-exchanged for other commodities –
which is most frequently exchanged and circulated as an object of
consumption, and which is therefore most certain to be exchangeable
again for other commodities, i.e. which represents within the given
social organization wealth ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν, [26] which is the object of the
most general demand and supply, and which possesses a particular use
value. Thus salt, hides, cattle, slaves. In practice such a commodity
corresponds more closely to itself as exchange value than do other
commodities (a pity that the difference between _denrée_ and
_marchandise_ cannot be neatly reproduced in German). It is the
particular usefulness of the commodity whether as a particular object of
consumption (hides), or as a direct instrument of production (slaves),
which stamps it as money in these cases. In the course of further
development precisely the opposite will occur, i.e. that commodity which
has the least utility as an object of consumption or instrument of
production will best serve the needs of _exchange as such._ In the
former case, the commodity becomes money because of its particular use
value; in the latter case it acquires its particular use value from its
serviceability as money. The precious metals last, they do not alter,
they can be divided and then combined together again, they can be
transported relatively easily owing to the compression of great exchange
value in little space – for all these reasons they are especially
suitable in the latter stage. At the same time, they form the natural
transition from the first form of money. At somewhat higher levels of
production and exchange, the instrument of production takes _precedence_
over products; and the _metals_ (prior to that, stones) are the first
and most indispensable instruments of production. Both are still
combined in the case of _copper,_ which played so large a role as money
in antiquity; here is the particular use value as an instrument of
production together with other attributes which do not flow out of the
use value of the commodity but correspond to its function as exchange
value (including medium of exchange). The _precious_ metals then split
off from the remainder by virtue of being inoxidizable, of standard
quality etc., and they correspond better, then, to the higher stage, in
that their direct utility for consumption and production recedes while,
because of their rarity, they better represent value purely based on
exchange. From the outset they represent superfluity, the form in which
wealth originates. Also, metals preferably exchanged for metals rather
than for other commodities.

The first form of money corresponds to a low stage of exchange and of
barter, in which money still appears more in its quality of _measure_
rather than as a real _instrument of exchange._ At this stage, the
measure can still be purely imaginary (although the bar in use among
Negroes includes iron) (sea shells etc., however, correspond more to the
series of which gold and silver form the culmination).

From the fact that the commodity develops into general exchange value,
it follows that exchange value becomes a specific commodity: it can do
so only because a specific commodity obtains the privilege of
representing, symbolizing, the exchange value of all other commodities,
i.e. of becoming _money_. It arises from the essence of exchange value
itself that a specific commodity appears as the money-subject, despite
the monetary properties possessed by every commodity. In the course of
development, the exchange value of money can again exist separately from
its matter, its substance, as in the case of paper money, without
therefore giving up the privilege of this specific commodity, because
the separated form of existence of exchange value must necessarily
continue to take its denomination from the specific commodity.

It is because the commodity is exchange value that it is exchangeable
for money, is posited = to money. The proportion of its equivalence with
money, i.e. the specificity of its exchange value, is _presupposed_
before its transposition into money. The proportion in which a
particular commodity is exchanged for money, i.e. the quantity of money
into which a given quantity of a commodity is transposable, is
determined by the amount of labour time objectified in the commodity.
The commodity is an exchange value because it is the realization of a
_specific_ amount of labour time; money not only measures the amount of
labour time which the commodity represents, but also contains its
general, conceptually adequate, exchangeable form. Money is the physical
medium into which exchange values are dipped, and in which they obtain
the form corresponding to their general character. Adam Smith says that
labour (labour time) is the original money with which all commodities
are purchased. [27] As regards the act of production, this always
remains true (as well as in the determination of relative values). In
production, every commodity is continuously exchanged for labour time.
The necessity of a money other than labour time arises precisely because
the quantity of labour time must not be expressed in its immediate,
particular product, but in a mediated, general product; in its
particular product, as a product equal to and convertible into all other
products of an equal labour time; of the labour time not in a particular
commodity, but in all commodities at once, and hence in a particular
commodity which represents all the others. Labour time cannot directly
be money (a demand which is the same, in other words, as demanding that
every commodity should simply be its own money), precisely because in
fact labour time always exists only in the form of particular
commodities (as an object): being a general object, it can exist only
symbolically, and hence only as a particular commodity which plays the
role of money. Labour time does not exist in the form of a general
object of exchange which is independent of and separate (in isolation)
from the particular natural characteristics of commodities. But it would
have to exist in that form if it were directly to fulfil the demands
placed on money. The objectification of the general, social character of
labour (and hence of the labour time contained in exchange value) is
precisely what makes the product of labour time into exchange value;
this is what gives the commodity the attributes of money, which however,
in turn imply the existence of an independent and external
money-subject.

A particular expenditure of labour time becomes objectified in a
definite particular commodity with particular properties and a
particular relationship to needs; but, in the form of exchange value,
labour time is required to become objectified in a commodity which
expresses no more than its quota or quantity, which is indifferent to
its own natural properties, and which can therefore be metamorphosed
into – i.e. exchanged for – every other commodity which objectifies the
same labour time. The object should have this character of generality,
which contradicts its natural particularity. This contradiction can be
overcome only by objectifying it: i.e. by positing the commodity in a
double form, first in its natural, immediate form, then in its mediated
form, as money. The latter is possible only because a particular
commodity becomes, as it were, the general substance of exchange values,
or because the exchange values of commodities become identified with a
particular commodity different from all others. That is, because the
commodity first has to be exchanged for this general commodity, this
symbolic general product or general objectification of labour time,
before it can function as exchange value and be exchanged for,
metamorphosed into, any other commodities at will and regardless of
their material properties. Money is labour time in the form of a general
object, or the objectification of general labour time, labour time as a
_general commodity_. Thus, it may seem a very simple matter that labour
time should be able to serve directly as money (i.e. be able to furnish
the element in which exchange values are realized as such), because it
regulates exchange values and indeed is not only the inherent measure of
exchange values but their substance as well (for, as exchange values,
commodities have no other substance, no natural attributes). However,
this appearance of simplicity is deceptive. The truth is that the
exchange-value relation – of commodities as mutually equal and
equivalent objectifications of labour time – comprises contradictions
which find their objective expression in a _money which is distinct
from_ labour time.

In Adam Smith this contradiction still appears as a set of parallels.
Along with the particular product of labour (labour time as a particular
object), the worker also has to produce a quantity of the general
commodity (of labour time as general object). The two determinants of
exchange value appear to Smith as existing externally, _alongside_ one
another. The interior of the commodity as a whole does not yet appear as
having been seized and penetrated by contradiction. This corresponds to
the stage of production which Smith found in existence at that time, in
which the worker still directly owned a portion of his subsistence in
the form of the product; where neither his entire activity nor his
entire product had become dependent on exchange; i.e. where subsistence
agriculture (or something similar, as Steuart calls it) [28] still
predominated to a great extent, together with patriarchal industry (hand
weaving, domestic spinning, linked closely with agriculture). Still it
was only the excess which was exchanged within a large area of the
nation. Exchange value and determination by labour time not yet fully
developed on a national scale.

(_Incidental remark:_ It is less true of gold and silver than of any
other commodities that their consumption can grow only in inverse
proportion to their costs of production. Their consumption grows,
rather, in proportion with the growth of general wealth, since their use
specifically represents wealth, excess, luxury, because they themselves
_represent_ wealth in general. Apart from their use as money, silver and
gold are consumed more in proportion as wealth in general increases.
When, therefore, their supply suddenly increases, even if their costs of
production or their value does not proportionately decrease, they find a
rapidly expanding market which retards their depreciation. A number of
problems which appear inexplicable to the economists – who generally
make consumption of gold and silver dependent solely on the decrease in
their costs of production – in regard to the _California-Australia
case,_ [29] where they go around in circles, are thereby clarified. This
is precisely linked with their property as money, as representation of
wealth.)

(The contrast between gold and silver, as eternal commodities, and the
others, which are not, is to be found in Petty, [30] but is already
present in Xenophon, _On Revenues,_ in reference to marble and silver.
‘οὐ μόνον δὲ ϰρατεῖ τοῖς ἐπ᾽ ἐνιαυτὸν ϑάλλουσί τε ϰαὶ γηράσϰουσιν, ἀλλὰ
ϰαὶ ἀίδια ἀγαϑὰ ἔχει ἡ χώρα. πέφυϰε μὲν γὰρ λίϑος ἐν αὐτῆ ᾄφθονος, etc.
(namely marble) ἔστι δὲ ϰαὶ γῆ, ἣ σπειρομὲνη μὲν οὐ φέρει ϰαρπόν,
ὀρυττομένη δὲ πολλαπλασίους τρέφει ἢ ἐι σῖτον ἒφεφε.’) [31] (Important
to note that exchange between different tribes or peoples – and this,
not private exchange, is its first form – begins when an uncivilized
tribe sells (or is cheated out of) an excess product which is not the
product of its labour, but the natural product of the ground and of the
area which it occupies.)

(Develop the ordinary economic contradictions arising from the fact that
money has to be symbolized in a particular commodity, and then develop
those that arise from this commodity itself (gold, etc.) This No. II.
[32] Then determine the relation between the quantity of gold and silver
and commodity prices, and whether the exchange takes place in reality or
only in the mind, since all commodities have to be exchanged for money
in order to be determined as _prices_. This No. III. [33] It is clear
that, merely _measured_ in gold or silver, the quantity of these metals
has no influence on the prices of commodities; the difficulty enters
with actual exchange, where the metals actually serve as instruments of
exchange; the relations of demand and supply etc. But it is obviously as
a measure that its value as an instrument of circulation is affected.)

 Labour time itself exists as such only subjectively, only in the form
of activity. In so far as it is exchangeable (itself a commodity) as
such, it is defined and differentiated not only quantitatively but also
qualitatively, and is by no means general, self-equivalent labour time;
rather, labour time as subject corresponds as little to the general
labour time which determines exchange values as the particular
commodities and products correspond to it as object.

A. Smith’s thesis, that the worker has to produce a general commodity
alongside his particular commodity, in other words that he has to give a
part of his products the form of money, more generally that he has to
convert into money all that part of his commodity which is to serve not
as use value for himself but as exchange value – this statement means,
subjectively expressed, nothing more than that the worker’s particular
labour time cannot be directly exchanged for every other particular
labour time, but rather that this, its general exchangeability, has
first to be mediated, that it has first to take on an objective form, a
form different from itself, in order to attain this general
exchangeability.

The labour of the individual looked at in the act of production itself,
is the money with which he directly buys the product, the object of his
particular activity; but it is a _particular_ money, which buys
precisely only this _specific_ product. In order to be _general money_
directly, it would have to be not a _particular,_ but _general_ labour
from the outset; i.e. it would have to be _posited_ from the outset as a
link in _general production._ But on this presupposition it would not be
exchange which gave labour its general character; but rather its
presupposed communal character would determine the distribution of
products. The communal character of production would make the product
into a communal, general product from the outset. The exchange which
originally takes place in production – which would not be an exchange of
exchange values but of activities, determined by communal needs and
communal purposes – would from the outset include the participation of
the individual in the communal world of products. On the basis of
exchange values, labour is _posited_ as general only through _exchange_.
But on this foundation it would be _posited_ as such before exchange;
i.e. the exchange of products would in no way be the _medium_ by which
the participation of the individual in general production is mediated.
Mediation must, of course, take place. In the first case, which proceeds
from the independent production of individuals – no matter how much
these independent productions determine and modify each other _post
festum_ through their interrelations – mediation takes place through the
exchange of commodities, through exchange value and through money; all
these are expressions of one and the same relation. In the second case,
the _presupposition is itself mediated;_ i.e. a communal production,
communality, is presupposed as the basis of production. The labour of
the individual is posited from the outset as social labour. Thus,
whatever the particular material form of the product he creates or helps
to create, what he has bought with his labour is not a specific and
particular product, but rather a specific share of the communal
production. He therefore has no particular product to exchange. His
product is _not an exchange value._ The product does not first have to
be transposed into a particular form in order to attain a general
character for the individual. Instead of a division of labour, such as
is necessarily created with the exchange of exchange values, there would
take place an organization of labour whose consequence would be the
participation of the individual in communal consumption. In the first
case the social character of production is _posited_ only _post festum_
with the elevation of products to exchange values and the exchange of
these exchange values. In the second case the _social character of
production_ is presupposed, and participation in the world of products,
in consumption, is not mediated by the exchange of mutually independent
labours or products of labour. It is mediated, rather, by the social
conditions of production within which the individual is active. Those
who want to make the labour of the individual directly into _money_
(i.e. his product as well), into _realized exchange value,_ want
therefore to determine that labour _directly_ as general labour, i.e. to
negate precisely the conditions under which it must be made into money
and exchange values, and under which it depends on private exchange.
This demand can be satisfied only under conditions where it can no
longer be raised. Labour on the basis of exchange values presupposes,
precisely, that neither the labour of the individual nor his product are
_directly_ general; that the product attains this form only by passing
through an _objective mediation_ by means of a form of _money_ distinct
from itself.

On the basis of communal production, the determination of time remains,
of course, essential. The less time the society requires to produce
wheat, cattle etc., the more time it wins for other production, material
or mental. Just as in the case of an individual, the multiplicity of its
development, its enjoyment and its activity depends on economization of
time. Economy of time, to this all economy ultimately reduces itself.
Society likewise has to distribute its time in a purposeful way, in
order to achieve a production adequate to its overall needs; just as the
individual has to distribute his time correctly in order to achieve
knowledge in proper proportions or in order to satisfy the various
demands on his activity. Thus, economy of time, along with the planned
distribution of labour time among the various branches of production,
remains the first economic law on the basis of communal production. It
becomes law, there, to an even higher degree. However, this is
essentially different from a measurement of exchange values (labour or
products) by labour time. The labour of individuals in the same _branch
of work,_ and the various kinds of work, are different from one another
not only quantitatively but also qualitatively. What does a solely
_quantitative_ difference between things presuppose? The identity of
their _qualities._ Hence, the quantitative measure of labours
presupposes the equivalence, the identity of their quality.

(Strabo, Book XI. On the Albanians of the Caucasus: ‘ϰαὶ οἱ ἄνθρωνοι
ϰάλλει ϰαὶ μεγέθει διαφέροντες, άπλοῖ δὲ ϰαὶ οὐ ϰαπηλιϰοί · οὐδἐ γὰρ
νομίσματι τὰ πολλὰ ϰρῶνται, οὐδὲ ἀριθμὸν ἴσασι μείζω τῶν ἑϰατόν, ἀλλὰ
φορτίοις τὰς ἀμοιβὰς ποιοῦνται.’ It says there further: ‘ἄπειροι δ ̓εἰσὶ
ϰαὶ μέτρων τῶν ἐπ ̓ ἀϰριβὲς ϰαὶ σταθμῶν.’) [34]

Money appears as _measure_ (in Homer, e.g. oxen) earlier than as _medium
of exchange,_ because in barter each commodity is still its own medium
of exchange. But it cannot be its own measure or its own standard of
comparison.

(2) [35] This much proceeds from what has been developed so far: A
particular product (commodity) (material) must become the subject of
money, which exists as the attribute of every exchange value. The
subject in which this symbol is represented is not a matter of
indifference, since the demands placed on the representing subject are
contained in the conditions – conceptual determinations, characteristic
relations – of that which is to be represented. The study of the
precious metals as subjects of the money relations, as incarnations of
the latter, is therefore by no means a matter lying outside the realm of
political economy, as Proudhon believes, any more than the physical
composition of paint, and of marble, lie outside the realm of painting
and sculpture. The attributes possessed by the commodity as exchange
value, attributes for which its natural qualities are not adequate,
express the demands made upon those commodities which ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν [36]
are the material of money. These demands, at the level to which we have
up to now confined ourselves, are most completely satisfied by the
precious metals. Metals as such [enjoy] preference over other
commodities as instruments of production, and among the metals the one
which is first found in its physical fullness and purity – gold; then
copper, then silver and iron. The precious metals take preference over
others in realizing _metal,_ as Hegel would say. [37]

The precious metals uniform in their physical qualities, so that equal
quantities of them should be so far identical as to present no ground
for preferring this one to the others. Not the case, for example, with
equal numbers of cattle and equal quantities of grain.

(a) Gold and silver in relation to the other metals

The other metals oxidize when exposed to air; the precious metals
(mercury, silver, gold, platinum) are unaffected by the air.

_Aurum_ (Au). Specific gravity = 19.5; melting point: 1,200° C,
‘Glittering gold is the most magnificent of all metals, and was
therefore referred to in antiquity as the sun or the king of metals.
Widely distributed, never in great quantities, and is hence also more
precious than the other metals. Found generally in pure metallic state,
partly in larger pieces, partly in the form of smaller granules fused
with other minerals. As the latter decompose, there arises gold-bearing
sand, carried by many rivers, from which gold, owing to its greater
specific gravity, can be washed out. Enormous malleability of gold; one
grain can be drawn to make a 500-foot long wire, and can be hammered
into leaves barely 1/200,000 of an inch thick. Gold resists all acids,
only chlorine in a free state dissolves it (_aqua regia,_ a mixture of
nitric and hydrochloric acids). To gild.’

 _Argentum_ (Ag). Specific gravity = 10. Melting point = 1,000° C.
Bright appearance; the friendliest of metals, very white and malleable;
can be beautifully worked up and drawn in very thin wires. Silver found
as unalloyed solid; frequently also combined with lead in silvery lead
ores.

So much for _chemical_ properties of gold and silver. (Divisibility and
fusibility, uniformity of pure gold and silver etc. well known.)

_Mineralogical:_

_Gold._ It is surely noteworthy that the more precious the metals are,
the more isolated is their occurrence; they are found separately from
the more commonly prevalent bodies, they are higher natures far from the
common herd. Thus we find gold, as a rule, in unalloyed metallic state,
as a crystal in various die-shaped forms, or in the greatest variety of
shapes; irregular pieces and nuggets, sand and dust, in which form it is
found fused into many kinds of stone, e.g. granite: and it finds its way
into the sand of rivers and the gravel of floodlands as a result of the
disintegration of this stone. Since the specific gravity of gold in this
state goes up to 19.4, even the tiniest pieces can be extracted by
stirring gold-bearing sand in water. The heavier, metallic elements
settle first and can thus, as the saying goes, be washed out. Most
frequently found in the company of gold is silver, and one encounters
natural combinations of both metals, containing from 0.16 to 38.7 per
cent silver; which naturally entails differences in colour and weight.

_Silver._ With the great variety of its minerals, appears as one of the
more prevalent metals, both as unalloyed metal and combined with other
metals or with arsenic and sulphur. (Silver chloride, silver bromide,
carbonic silver oxide, bismuth-silver ore, Sternbergite, polybasite,
etc.)

The chief _chemical_ properties are: _all precious metals:_ do not
oxidize on contact with air; of gold (and platinum): are not dissolved
by acids, except in chlorine. Do not oxidize, thus remain pure, free of
rust; they present themselves as that which they are. Resistance to
oxygen – _imperishability_ (so highly lauded by the gold and silver
fanatics of antiquity).

_Physical properties: Specific gravity,_ i.e. a great deal of weight in
a small space, especially important for means of circulation. Gold 19.5,
silver 10. _Brilliance._ Gleam of gold, whiteness of silver,
magnificence, _malleability;_ hence so serviceable for jewellery,
ornamentation, and for the addition of splendour to other objects. The
_white_ shade of silver (which reflects all light rays in their original
composition); red-yellow of gold (which absorbs all colours of a mixed
beam and reflects back only the red). _Difficult to melt._

_Geological properties:_ Found (gold especially) as an unalloyed solid,
separate from other bodies; isolated, individualized. Individual
presentation, independent of the elemental.

About the two other precious metals: (1) _Platinum_ lacks the colour:
grey on grey (soot of metals); too rare; unknown in antiquity;
discovered only after the discovery of America; also discovered in the
Urals in the nineteenth century; soluble only in chlorine; always solid;
specific gravity = 21; the strongest fire does not melt it; more of
scientific value. (2) _Mercury:_ found in liquid form; evaporates;
vapours poisonous; can be combined with other liquids (amalgams).
(Specific gravity = 13.5, boiling point = 360° C.) Thus neither
platinum, nor much less mercury, are suitable as money.

One of the _geological_ properties is common to all the precious metals:
_rarity._ Rarity (apart from supply and demand) is an element of value
only in so far as its opposite, the non-rare as such, the negation of
rarity, the elemental, has no value because it does not appear as the
result of production. In the original definition of value, that which is
most independent of conscious, voluntary production is the most
valuable, assuming the existence of demand. Common pebbles have no
value, relatively speaking, because they are to be had _without
production_ (even if the latter consists only of searching). For
something to become an object of exchange, to have exchange value, it
must not be available to everyone without the mediation of exchange; it
must not appear in such an elemental form as to be common property. To
this extent, rarity is an element of exchange value and hence this
property of the precious metal is of importance, even apart from its
further relation to supply and demand.

When we look at the advantages of the metals as such as instruments of
production, then gold has to its credit that it is at bottom the _first
metal to be discovered as metal._ For a double reason. _First,_ because
more than the others, it presents itself in nature as the most metallic,
the most distinct and distinguishable metal; _second,_ because in its
preparation nature has done the work otherwise left to artifice, and for
its first discovery only rough labour is necessary, but neither science
nor developed instruments of production.

 ‘Certain it is that gold must take its place as _the earliest metal
known_, and in the first record of man’s progress it is indicated as a
standard of man’s position’ (because in the form of excess, the first
form in which wealth appears. The first form of value is _use value,_
the everyday quality that expresses the relation of the individual to
nature; the second, exchange value ALONGSIDE use value, its command over
other people’s use values, its social connectedness: exchange value is
itself originally a value for use on Sundays only, going beyond
immediate physical necessity.)

_Very early discovery of gold by man:_ ’Gold differs remarkably from the
other metals, with a very few exceptions, in the fact that it is found
in nature in its metallic state. Iron and copper, tin, lead and silver
are ordinarily discovered in chemical combinations with oxygen, sulphur,
arsenic, or carbon; and the few exceptional occurrences of these metals
in an uncombined, or, as it was formerly called, virgin state, are to be
cited rather as mineralogical curiosities than as common productions.
Gold is, however, always found native or metallic … Therefore, as a
metallic mass, curious by its yellow colour, it would attract the eye of
the most uneducated man, whereas the other substances likely to lie in
his path would offer no features of attraction to his scarcely awakened
powers of observation. Again gold, from the circumstance of its having
been formed in those rocks which are most exposed to atmospheric action,
is found in the _débris_ of the mountains. By the disintegrating
influences of the atmosphere, of changes of temperature, of the action
of water, and particularly by the effects of ice, fragments of rock are
continually broken off. These are borne by floods into the valleys and
rolled into pebbles by the constant action of flowing water. Amongst
these, pebbles, or particles, of gold are discovered. The summer heats,
by drying up the waters, rendered those beds which had formed river
channels and the courses of winter torrents paths for the journeys of
migratory man; and here we can imagine the early discovery of gold.’

‘Gold most frequently occurs pure, or, at all events, so nearly so that
its metallic nature can be at once recognized, in rivers as well as in
quartz veins.’

‘The specific gravity of quartz, and of most other heavy compact rocks
is about 2 1/2, whilst the specific gravity of gold is 18 or 19. Gold,
therefore, is somewhere about seven times as heavy as any rock or stone
with which it is likely to be associated. A current of water accordingly
having sufficient strength to bear along sand or pebbles of quartz or
any other rock, might not be able to move the fragments of gold
associated with them. Moving water, therefore, has done for the
auriferous rocks formerly, just what the miner would do now, break it,
namely, up, into fragments, sweep away the lighter particles, and leave
the gold behind it. Rivers are, indeed, great natural _cradles,_
sweeping off all the lighter and finer particles at once, the heavier
ones either sticking against natural impediments, or being left whenever
the current slackens its force or velocity.’ (See _Gold (Lectures on)._
London, 1852.) (pp. 12 and 13.) [38]

‘In all probability, from tradition and early history, the _discovery of
gold in the sand and gravel of streams would appear to have been the
first step in the recognition of metals,_ and in almost all, perhaps in
all, the countries of Europe, Africa and Asia, greater or smaller
quantities of gold have from very early times been washed by simple
contrivances from auriferous deposits. Occasionally, the success of
gold-streams has been great enough to produce a pulse of excitement
which has vibrated for a while through a district, but has been hushed
down again. In 760 the poor people turned out in numbers to wash gold
from the river sands south of Prague, and three men were able in the day
to extract a mark (1/2 lb.) of gold; and so great was the consequent
rush to the “diggings” that in the next year the country was visited by
famine. We read of a recurrence of similar events several times within
the next few centuries, although here, as elsewhere, the general
attraction to surface-spread riches has subsided into regular and
systematic mining.’

‘Two classes of deposits in which gold is found, the _lodes or veins,_
which intersect the solid rock in a direction more or less perpendicular
to the horizon; and the _drift beds_ or _‘streams’_, in which the gold
mingled with gravel, sand, or clay, has been deposited by the mechanical
action of water, upon the surface of those rocks, which are penetrated
to unknown depths by the lodes. To the former class belongs more
specially the art of _mining_; to the latter the simple operations of
_digging_. Gold mining, properly so called, is, like other mining, an
art requiring the employment of capital, and of a skill only to be
acquired by years of experience. There is no art practised by civilized
men which requires for its full development the application of so many
sciences and collateral arts. But although so essential to the miner,
scarcely any of these are necessary to the gold-washer or streamer, who
must trust chiefly to the strength of his arm, or the buoyancy of his
health. The apparatus which he employs must necessarily be simple, so as
to be conveyed from place to place, to be easily repaired if injured,
and not to require any of those niceties of manipulation which would
cause him to lose time in the acquiring of small quantities.’

Difference between the drift-deposits of gold, best exemplified at the
present day in Siberia, California and Australia; and the fine sands
annually brought down by rivers, some of which are also found to contain
gold in workable quantities. The latter are of course found literally at
the surface, the former may be met with under a cover of from 1 to 70
feet in thickness, consisting of soil, peat, sand, gravel, etc. The
modes of working the two must be identical in principle. For the
stream-worker nature has pulled down the highest, proudest and richest
parts of the lodes, and so triturated and washed up the materials, that
the streamer has the heaviest part of the work already done for him:
whilst the miner, who attacks the poorer, but more lasting, deep-going
lodes, must aid himself with all the resources of the nicest art.

Gold has justly been considered the noblest of metals from various
physical and chemical properties. It is unchangeable in air and does not
rust. (Its unchangeability consists precisely in its resistance against
the oxygen in the atmosphere.) Of a bright reddish yellow colour when in
a coherent state, and very dense. Highly malleable. Requires a strong
heat to melt it. Specific gravity.

Thus three modes of its production: (1) In the river sand. Simple
finding on the surface. _Washing_. (2) In river beds and floodlands.
_Digging._ (3) _Mining._ Its production requires, hence, no development
of the productive forces. Nature does most of the work in that regard.

(The _roots_ of the words for gold, silver etc. (see Grimm); [39] here
we find a number of general concepts of _brilliance,_ soon to be
transferred to the words, proximate to _colour_. Silver white; gold
yellow; brass and gold, brass and iron exchange names. Among the Germans
bronze in use before iron. Direct affinity between _aes_ (bronze) and
_aurum_ (gold).)

Copper (_brass, bronze:_ tin and copper) and gold in use before silver
and iron.

‘Gold in use long before silver, because it is found pure or only
lightly admixed with silver; obtained by simple washing. Silver is found
in general in veins threaded through the hardest rocks in primitive
terrain: its extraction requires complicated labour and machines. In
southern America, veins of gold are not exploited, only gold in the form
of dust and nuggets in alluvial terrain. In Herodotus’s time, similarly.
The most ancient monuments of Greece, Asia, Northern Europe and the New
World prove that the use of gold for utensils and for ornamentation is
possible in a semi-barbarian condition; while the use of silver for the
same purposes by itself already denotes a fairly advanced state of
society. See Dureau de la Malle, Notebook. (2.) [40]

Copper as main instrument of war and peace (ibid. 2) (as _money_ in
Italy ibid.).

(b) Fluctuations in the value-relation between the different metals

If the use of metals as the substance of money, as well as their
comparative uses, their earlier or later appearance, are to be examined
at all, then it is necessary to look also at the _fluctuations in their
relative value_. (Letronne, Böckh, Jacob.) [41] (That part of the
question which is linked to the question of the mass of circulating
metals as such, and its relation to prices, is to be looked at later, as
a historical appendix to the chapter on the relation between money and
prices.)

The successive fluctuations between gold, silver and copper in various
epochs had to depend first of all on the nature of the sites where they
are found, and on their greater or lesser purity. Then, on political
changes, such as the invasion of Asia and of a part of Africa by the
Persians and the Macedonians; later the conquest of parts of three
continents by the Romans (_orbis Romanus,_ etc.). Dependent, therefore,
on their relative purity and their location.

The value relation between the different metals can be determined
without recourse to prices – by means of the simple _quantitative_ ratio
in which one exchanges for the other. We can employ this form, in
general, when we are comparing only a few commodities which have the
same measure; e.g. so many quarters of rye, barley, oats for so many
quarters of wheat. This method employed in barter, where little of
anything is exchanged and where even fewer commodities enter the
traffic, and where, hence, no money is required.

Among an _Arab_ people neighbouring on Sabaea, according to Strabo, pure
gold was so abundant that 10 lb. of it were given for 1 lb. of iron, and
2 lb. were given for 1 lb. silver. A wealth of gold in the Bactrian
region (Bactara, etc., in short, Turkestan) and in the part of Asia
situated between the Paropamisus (Hindu-kush) and the Imaus (Mustagh
Mountains), i.e. in the _Desertum arenosum auro abondans_ [42](Desert of
Cobi): according to Dureau de la Malle it is probable, therefore, that
from the fifteenth to the sixth century B.C. the ratio of gold to silver
was 6:1 or 8:1, the same which existed in China and Japan until the
beginning of the nineteenth century; Herodotus puts it at 13:1 for
Persia under Darius Hystaspes. According to the code of Manou, written
between 1300 and 600 B.C., gold to silver = 2 1/2:1. Silver mines must
nearly always be established in primitive terrain; that is where the
deposits lie, and only lesser veins are found in easier ground. Instead
of in alluvial sand and gravel, silver is ordinarily embedded in the
most compact and hard rocks, such as quartz, etc. This metal is more
common in regions which are cold, either from latitude or from
elevation, while gold generally frequents warm countries. In contrast to
gold, silver is only very rarely found in a pure state (usually combined
with arsenic or sulphur) (muriatic acid, nitric saltpetre). As far as
the quantity of deposits is concerned (prior to the discovery of
Australia and California), Humboldt in 1811 estimates the proportion of
gold to silver in America at 1:46, and in Europe (including Asiatic
Russia) at 1:40. The mineralogists of the Académie des Sciences estimate
in our time (1842) that the ratio is 1:52; despite that, the lb. of gold
is only worth 15 lb. of silver; thus their value relation = 15:1.

_Copper._ Specific gravity = 8.9. Beautiful dawn-red colour; fairly
hard; requires very high temperatures to melt. Not infrequently
encountered pure; frequently combined with oxygen or sulphur. Deposits
found in primordial, ancient terrain. However, found more frequently
close to the surface, at no great depth, agglomerated in masses of pure
metal, sometimes of a considerable weight. Used in peace and war before
iron. (Gold relates to silver as the substance of money in the same way
as copper to iron as instrument of labour in historical development.)
Circulates in great quantity in Italy under the Romans during the first
to the fifth centuries. One can determine _a priori_ a people’s degree
of civilization if one knows no more than the metal, gold, copper,
silver or iron, which it uses for weapons, tools or ornamentation.
Hesiod, in his poem on agriculture: ‘χαλϰῷ δ ̓ειργάζοντο μέλας δ ̓οὐϰ ἔσϰε
σίδηρος’. [43]

Lucretius: ‘_Et prior aeris erat quam ferri cognitus usus._’ [44] Jacob
cites ancient copper mines in Nubia and Siberia (see Dureau I, 58);
Herodotus says that the Massagetians had only bronze, but no iron. To
judge by the collection known as the Oxford Marbles, iron unknown before
1431 B.C. In Homer, iron rare; however, very common use of bronze (an
alloy of copper, zinc and tin) which Greek and Roman society used for a
very long period, even for the fabrication of axes and razors. Italy
fairly wealthy in native copper; thus copper money formed, if not the
only currency, at least the normal currency, the monetary unit of
central Italy, up to 247 B.C. The Greek colonies in southern Italy
received silver directly from Greece and Asia, or via Tyre and Carthage;
and used it for money starting in the fifth and sixth centuries. The
Romans, it seems, possessed silver money prior to the expulsion of the
Kings, but, Pliny says, _‘interdictum id vetere consulto patrum, Italiae
parci_ ‘ (i.e. the silver mines) _‘jubentium’_, [45] They feared the
consequences of a convenient means of circulation – opulence, increase
of slaves, accumulation, concentration of land ownership. Among the
Etruscans, too, copper money before gold.

Garnier is wrong when he says (see Notebook III, p. 28), ‘The material
destined for accumulation was naturally sought for and selected from the
realm of the minerals.’ [46] On the contrary, accumulation began after
metal money was found (whether as money proper or only as preferred
medium of exchange by weight). This point to be discussed especially in
regard to gold. Reitemeier is right (see Notebook III, p. 34): ‘Gold,
silver and copper were used by the ancients as implements for hacking
and breaking, despite their relative softness, before the advent of iron
and before they were used as money.” [47] (Improvement of implements
when men learned to temper copper and thus make it hard enough to defy
solid rock. A very much hardened copper was used to make the chisels and
hammers used for mastering rock. Finally, iron was discovered.) Jacob
says: ‘In patriarchal times’ (see Notebook IV, p. 3), ‘when the metals
used for making weapons, such as (1) brass and (2) iron, were rare and
enormously expensive compared with the common food and clothing then
used, then, although coined money made of the precious metals was still
unknown, yet gold and silver had acquired the faculty of being more
easily and conveniently exchanged for the other metals than corn and
cattle.’ [48]

‘Besides, in order to obtain the pure or nearly pure gold found in the
immense alluvial lands situated between the Hindu-kush chains and the
Himalaya, only a simple washing operation was required. In those times
the population in these countries of Asia was abundant, and hence labour
was cheap. Silver was relatively more expensive owing to the (technical)
difficulties of obtaining it. The opposite tendency set in in Asia and
in Greece after the death of Alexander. The gold-bearing sands became
exhausted; the price of slaves and of manpower rose; and, since
mechanics and geometry had made immense progress from Euclid to
Archimedes, it was possible to exploit with profit the rich veins of
silver mined in Asia, in Thrace and in Spain; and, silver being 52 times
more abundant than gold, the value ratio between them necessarily
changed, so that the _livre_ of gold, which at the time of Xenophon, 350
B.C., was exchanged for 10 _livres_ of silver, came to be worth 18
_livres_ of the latter metal in the year A.D. 422. [49] Thus, it rose
from 10:1 to 18:1.

At the end of the fifth century A.D. an extraordinary diminution in the
quantity of precious metals; a halt in mining. In the Middle Ages up to
the end of the fifteenth century a relatively significant portion of
money in gold coins. (The diminution affected, most of all, silver,
which had previously circulated most widely.) Ratio in the fifteenth
century = 10:1, in the eighteenth century 14:1 on the continent, in
England = 15:1. In most of Asia, silver more as a commodity in trade;
especially in China, where copper money (Tehen, a composition of copper,
zinc and lead) coin of the realm; in China, gold (and silver) by weight
as a commodity to balance foreign trade.

Large fluctuations in Rome between the value of copper and silver (in
coins). Up to Servius, metal in bullion form, _aes rude,_ for trade. The
monetary unit, the copper _as_ = 1 pound of copper. In the time of
Servius, silver to copper = 279:1; until the beginning of the Punic war
= 400:1 ; during the First Punic War = 140:1; Second Punic War = 112:1.

Gold very expensive in Rome at first, whereas silver from Carthage (and
Spain); gold used only in ingots until 547. Gold to silver in trade =
13.71:1, in coins = 17.4:1, under Caesar = 12:1 (at the outbreak of the
civil war, after the plunder of the _aerarium_ [50] by Caesar, only
8:1); under Honorius and Arcadius (397) fixed at = 14.4:1; under
Honorius and Theodosius the Younger (422)= 18:1. First silver coin in
Rome minted 485; first gold coin: 547. As soon as, after the Second
Punic War, the _as_ was reduced to 1 ounce, it became small change; the
_sesterce_ (silver) the monetary unit, and all large payments made in
silver. (In everyday commerce copper (later iron) remained the chief
metal. Under the Emperors of the Orient and Occident, the _solidus
(aureus),_ i.e. gold, was the monetary standard.)

Thus, in antiquity, taking the average:

_First: Relative increase in value of silver as compared with gold._
Apart from special phenomena (Arabs) where gold cheaper than silver and
still cheaper than iron, in Asia from the fifteenth to the sixth
centuries B.C., gold to silver = 6:1 or 8:1 (the latter ratio in China
and Japan until the beginning of the nineteenth century). In the Manou
Code itself = 2 1/2:1. This lower ratio arises from the same causes
which promote the discovery of gold as the first metal. Gold in those
days chiefly from Asia and Egypt. This period corresponds to that of
_copper_ money in Italian history. In general, copper as main instrument
of peace and war corresponds to the pre-eminence of gold among the
precious metals. Even in Xenophon’s time, gold to silver = 10:1.

_Secondly:_ after the death of Alexander, relative rise in the value of
gold compared to silver, with the exhaustion of the gold-bearing sand,
progress in technology and civilization; and hence establishment of
silver mines; now the influence of the quantitatively greater prevalence
of silver over gold in the earth’s crust. But especially the
Carthaginians, the exploitation of Spain, which necessarily had to
revolutionize the relation of silver to gold in somewhat the same way as
the discovery of American silver at the end of the fifteenth century.
Ratio in Caesar’s time = 17:1; later 14: 1; finally, after A.D. 422 =
18: l. (The decline of gold under Caesar for accidental reasons.) The
decline of silver relative to gold corresponds to iron being the chief
instrument of production in war and peace. While in the first period,
influx of gold from the East, in the second, influx of silver from the
cooler West.

_Thirdly in the Middle Ages_: Again the ratio as in the time of
Xenophon, 10:1. (In some places = 12:1?)

_Fourthly, after the discovery of America_: Again about the ratio as in
the time of Honorius and Arcadius (397); 14 to 15:1. Although since
about 1815–44 an increase in the production of gold, gold was at a
premium (e.g. in France). It is probable that the discovery of
California and Australia

_fifthly,_ will reintroduce the ratio of the Roman Imperium, 18: 1, if
not greater. The relative depreciation of silver due to progress in the
production of precious metals, in antiquity as well as after, [proceeds]
from East to West, until California and Australia reverse this. In the
short run, great fluctuations; but when one looks at the main
differences, these repeat themselves in a remarkable fashion.

In antiquity, copper three or four times as expensive as today.
(Garnier.)

(c) Now to be examined, the sources of gold and silver and their connection with historical development.

(d) _Money as coin._ Briefly the historical aspect of coins. Depreciation and appreciation, etc.

_Circulation,_ or the _turnover of money,_ corresponds to an opposite
_circulation, or turnover, of commodities._ A commodity possessed by A
passes into the hands of B, while B’s money passes into the hands of A,
etc. The circulation of money, like that of commodities, begins at an
infinity of different points, and to an infinity of different points it
returns. Departures from a single centre to the different points on the
periphery and the return from all points of the periphery to a single
centre do not take place in the circulatory process at the stage here
being examined, i.e. its _direct_ stage; they belong, rather, in a
circulatory system _mediated_ by a banking system. This first,
spontaneous and natural circulation does consist, however, of a mass of
turnovers. Circulation proper, nevertheless, begins only where gold and
silver cease to be commodities; between countries which export precious
metals and those which import them, no circulation in this sense takes
place, but mere simple exchange, since gold and silver function here not
as money but as commodities. Where money plays the role of mediating the
exchange of commodities (that means here their circulation) and is hence
a means of exchange, it is an _instrument of circulation, a vehicle of
circulation;_ but wherever, in this process, it is itself circulated,
where it changes hands along its own lines of motion, there it itself
has a _circulation, monetary circulation, monetary turnover._ The aim is
to find out to what extent this circulation is determined by particular
laws. This much is clear from the outset: if money is a vehicle of
circulation for the commodity, then the commodity is likewise a vehicle
for the circulation of money. If money circulates commodities, then
commodities circulate money. The circulation of commodities and the
circulation of money thus determine one another. As regards monetary
turnover, three things merit attention: (1) the form of the movement
itself; the line which it describes (its concept); (2) the quantity of
money circulating; (3) the rate at which it completes its motion, its
velocity of circulation. This can happen only in connection with the
circulation of commodities. This much is clear from the outset, that
there are moments in the circulation of commodities which are entirely
independent of the circulation of money, and which either directly
determine the latter, or which are determined along with monetary
circulation by a third factor, as in the case of, e.g., the velocity.
The overall character of the mode of production will determine them
both, and will determine the circulation of commodities more directly.
The mass of persons engaged in exchange (population): their distribution
between the town and the country; the absolute quantity of commodities,
of products and agencies of production; the relative mass of commodities
which enter into circulation; the development of the means of
communication and transport, in the double sense of determining not only
the sphere of those who are in exchange, in contact, but also the speed
with which the raw material reaches the producer and the product the
consumer; finally the development of industry, which concentrates
different branches of production, e.g. spinning, weaving, dyeing, etc.,
and hence makes superfluous a series of intermediate exchanges. The
circulation of commodities is the original precondition of the
circulation of money. To what extent the latter then reacts back on the
circulation of commodities remains to be seen.

The first task is firmly to establish the _general concept of
circulation or of turnover._

But first let us note that what is circulated by money is exchange
value, hence _prices._ Hence, as regards the circulation of commodities,
it is not only their mass but, equally, their prices which must be
considered. A large quantity of commodities at a low exchange value
(price) obviously requires less money for its circulation than a smaller
quantity at double the price. Thus, actually, the concept of price has
to be developed _before_ that of circulation. Circulation is the
positing of prices, it is the process in which commodities are
transformed into prices: their realization as prices. Money has a dual
character: it is (1) _measure_, or element in which the commodity is
realized as exchange value, and (2) _means of exchange,_ instrument of
circulation, and in each of these aspects it acts in quite opposite
directions. Money only circulates commodities which have already been
_ideally_ transformed into money, not only in the head of the individual
but in the conception held by society (directly, the conception held by
the participants in the process of buying and selling). This ideal
transformation into money is by no means determined by the same laws as
the real transformation. Their interrelation is to be examined.

(a) An essential characteristic of circulation is that it circulates
exchange values (products or labour), and, in particular, exchange
values in the form of _prices_. Thus, not every form of commodity
exchange, e.g. barter, payment in kind, feudal services, etc.,
constitutes circulation. To get circulation, two things are required
above all: _Firstly_: the precondition that commodities are prices;
_Secondly_: not isolated acts of exchange, but a circle of exchange, a
totality of the same, in constant flux, proceeding more or less over the
entire surface of society; a system of acts of exchange. The commodity
is specified as an exchange value. As an exchange value, it functions in
a given proportion (relative to the labour time contained in it) as
equivalent for all other values (commodities); but it does not directly
correspond to this, its function. As an exchange value it differs from
itself as a natural, material thing. A mediation is required to posit it
as an exchange value. Money presents the exchange value of the commodity
to the commodity as something different from itself. The commodity which
is posited as money is, at the outset, the commodity as pure exchange
value, or, the commodity as pure exchange value is money. But at the
same time, money now exists outside and alongside the commodity; its
exchange value, the exchange value of all commodities, has achieved an
existence independent of the commodity, an existence based in an
autonomous material of its own, in a particular commodity. The exchange
value of the commodity expresses the totality of the quantitative
relations in which all other commodities can be exchanged for it,
determined by the unequal quantities of the same which can be produced
in the same labour time. Money then exists as the exchange value of all
commodities alongside and outside them. It is the universal material
into which they must be dipped, in which they become gilded and
silver-plated, in order to win their independent existence as exchange
values. They must be translated into money, expressed in money. Money
becomes the general denomination of exchange values, of commodities as
exchange values. Exchange value expressed as money, i.e. equated with
money, is _price_. After money has been posited as independent in
relation to exchange values, then the exchange values are posited in
their particularity in relation to their subject, money. But every
exchange value is a particular quantity; a quantitatively specific
exchange value. As such, it is = a particular quantity of money. This
particularity is given, in the general law, by the amount of labour time
contained in a given exchange value. Thus an exchange value which is the
product of, say, one day is expressed in a quantity of gold or silver
which = one day of labour time, which is the product of one day of
labour. The general measure of exchange values now becomes the measure
which exists between each exchange value and the money to which it is
_equated_. (Gold and silver are determined, in the first place, by their
cost of production in the country of production. ‘In the mining
countries all prices ultimately depend on the costs of production of the
precious metals; … the remuneration paid to the miner, … affords the
scale, on which the remuneration of all other producers is calculated.
The gold value and silver value of all commodities exempt from monopoly
depends in a country without mines on the gold and silver which can be
obtained by exporting the result of a given quantity of labour, the
current rate of profit, and, in each individual case, the amount of
wages, which have been paid, and the time for which they have been
advanced.’ (Senior.) [51] In other words: on the quantity of gold and
silver which is directly or indirectly obtained from the mining
countries in exchange for a given quantity of labour (exportable
products). Money is in the first instance that which expresses the
relation of equality between all exchange values: in money, they all
have the same name.)

_Exchange value, posited in the character of money, is price._ Exchange
value is expressed in price as a specific quantity of money. Money as
price shows first of all the _identity_ of all exchange values;
secondly, it shows the unit of which they all contain a given number, so
that the equation with money expresses the quantitative specificity of
exchange values, their quantitative relation to one another. Money is
here posited, thus, as the _measure_ of exchange values; and prices as
exchange values measured in money. The fact that money is the measure of
prices, and hence that exchange values are compared with one another on
this standard, is an aspect of the situation which is self-evident. But
what is more important for the analysis is that _in price, exchange
value is compared with money._ After money has been posited as
independent exchange value, separated from commodities, then the
individual commodity, the particular exchange value, is again _equated_
to money, i.e. it is posited as equal to a given quantity of money,
expressed as money, translated into money. By being equated to money,
they again become related to one another as they were, conceptually, as
exchange values: they balance and equate themselves with one another in
given proportions. The particular exchange value, the commodity, becomes
expressed as, subsumed under, posited in the character of the
independent exchange value, of money. How this happens (i.e. how the
quantitative relation between the quantitatively defined exchange value
and a given quantity of money is found), above. But, since money has an
independent existence apart from commodities, the price of the commodity
appears as an _external_ relation of exchange values or commodities to
money; the commodity _is not price,_ in the way in which its social
substance stamped it as exchange value; this quality is not
_immediately_ coextensive with it; but is mediated by the commodity’s
comparison with money; the commodity _is_ exchange value, but it _has_ a
price. Exchange value was in immediate identity with it, it was its
immediate quality, from which it just as immediately split, so that on
one side we found the commodity, on the other (as money) its exchange
value; but now, as _price_, the commodity relates to money on one side
as something existing outside itself, and secondly, it is _ideally_
posited as money itself, since money has a reality different from it.
The price is a property of the commodity, a quality in which it is
_presented_ as money. It is no longer an immediate but a reflected
quality of it. Alongside real money, there now exists the commodity as
ideally posited money.

This next characteristic, a characteristic of money _as measure_ as well
as of the commodity as _price,_ is most easily shown by means of the
distinction between _real money_ and _accounting money._ As measure,
money always serves as accounting money, and, as price, the commodity is
always transformed only ideally into money.

‘The appraisal of the commodity by the seller, the offer made by the
buyer, the calculations, obligations, rents, inventories, etc., in
short, everything which leads up to and precedes the material act of
payment, must be expressed in accounting money. Real money intervenes
only in order to realize payments and to balance (liquidate) the
accounts. If I must pay 24 _livres_ 12 _sous_, then accounting money
presents 24 units of one sort and 12 of another, while in reality I
shall pay in the form of two material pieces: a gold coin worth 24
_livres_ and a silver coin worth 12 _sous_. The total mass of real money
has necessary limits in the requirements of circulation. Accounting
money is an ideal measure, which has no limits other than those of the
imagination. Employed to _express every sort of wealth if considered
from the aspect of its exchange value alone;_ thus, national wealth, the
income of the state and of individuals; the accounting values,
regardless of the form in which these values may exist, regulated in one
and the same form; so that there is not a single article in the mass of
consumable objects which is not several times transformed into money by
the mind, while, compared to this mass, the total sum of effective money
is, at the most = 1:10.’ (Garnier.) [52] (This last ratio is poor. 1:
many millions is more correct. But this entirely unmeasurable.)

Thus, just as originally money expressed exchange value, so does the
commodity as price, as ideally posited, mentally realized exchange
value, now express a sum of money: money in a definite proportion. As
prices, all commodities in their different forms are representatives of
money, whereas earlier it was money, as the independent form of exchange
value, which was the representative of all commodities. After money is
posited as a commodity in reality, the commodity is posited as money in
the mind.

It is clear so far, then, that in this ideal transformation of
commodities into money, or in the positing of commodities as _prices_,
the quantity of really available money is altogether a matter of
indifference, for two reasons: _Firstly_: the ideal transformation of
commodities into money is _prima facie_ independent of and unrestricted
by the mass of real money. Not a single piece of money is required in
this process, just as little as a measuring rod (say, a yardstick)
really needs to be employed before, for example, the ideal quantity of
yards can be expressed. If, for example, the entire national wealth of
England is appraised in terms of money, i.e. expressed as a price,
everyone knows that there is not enough money in the world to realize
this price. Money is needed here only as a category, as a mental
relation. _Secondly_: because money functions as a unit, that is, the
commodity is expressed in such a way that it contains a definite sum of
equal parts of money, is measured by it, it follows that the measure
between both [is] the general measure of exchange values – costs of
production or labour time. Thus if 1/3 of an ounce of gold is the
product of 1 working day, and the commodity _x_ is the product of 3
working days, then the commodity _x_ = 1 oz. or £3 17s. 4d. With the
measurement of money and of the commodity, the original measure of
exchange values enters again. Instead of being expressed in 3 working
days, the commodity is expressed in the quantity of gold or silver which
is the product of 3 working days. The quantity of really available money
obviously has no bearing on this proportion.

(_Error by James Mill_: overlooks that their cost of production and not
their quantity determines the value of the precious metals, as well as
the prices of commodities measured in metallic value.) [53]

(‘Commodities in exchange are their own reciprocal measure … But this
process would require as many reference points as there are commodities
in circulation. If a commodity were exchanged only for one, and not for
two commodities, then it would not serve as term of comparison … Hence
the necessity of a common term of comparison … This term can be purely
ideal … The determination of measure is fundamental, more important than
that of wages … In the trade between Russia and China silver is used to
evaluate all commodities, but nevertheless this commerce is done by
means of barter.’ (Storch.) [54] ‘The operation of measuring with money
is similar to the employment of weights in the comparison of material
quantities. The same name for the two units whose function is to count
the weight as well as the value of each thing. _Measures of weight and
measures of value the same names._ An _étalon_ of invariable weight was
easily found. In the case of money, the question was again the _value_
of a pound of silver, which = its cost of production.’ (Sismondi.) [55]
Not only the same names. Gold and silver were originally measured by
weight. Thus, the _as_ = 1 pound of copper among the Romans.)

‘Sheep and oxen, not gold and silver, _money_ in Homer and Hesiod, as
measure of value. Barter on the Trojan battlefield.’ (Jacob.)
(Similarly, _slaves_ in the Middle Ages. ibid.) [56]

Money can be posited in the character of measure and in that of the
general element of exchange values, without being realized in its
further qualities; hence also before it has taken on the form of metal
money. In simple barter. However, presupposed in that case that little
exchange of any kind takes place; that commodities are not developed as
exchange values and hence not as _prices_. (‘A common standard in the
price of anything presupposes its frequent and familiar alienation. This
not the case in simple states of society. In non-industrial countries
many things without definite price … Sale alone can determine prices,
and frequent sale alone can fix a standard. The frequent sale of
articles of first necessity depends on the relation between town and
country’ etc.) [57]

A developed determination of prices presupposes that the individual does
not directly produce his means of subsistence, but that his direct
product is an _exchange value,_ and hence must first be mediated by a
social process, in order to become the _means of life_ for the
individual. Between the full development of this foundation of
industrial society and the patriarchal condition, many intermediate
stages, endless nuances. This much appears from (a). If the cost of
production of the precious metals rises, then all commodity prices fall;
if the cost of production of the precious metals falls, then all
commodity prices rise. This is the general law, which, as we shall see,
is modified in particular cases.

(b) If exchange values are _ideally_ transformed into money by means of
prices, then, in the act of exchange, in purchase and sale, they are
_really_ transformed into money, exchanged for money, in order then to
be again exchanged as money for a commodity. A particular exchange value
must first be exchanged for exchange value in general before it can then
be in turn exchanged for particulars. The commodity is realized as an
exchange value only through this mediating movement, in which money
plays the part of middleman. Money thus circulates in the opposite
direction from commodities. It appears as the middleman in commodity
exchange, as the medium of exchange. It is the wheel of circulation, the
instrument of circulation for the turnover of commodities; but, as such,
it also has a circulation of its own – _monetary turnover, monetary
circulation._ The price of the commodity is realized only when it is
exchanged for real money, or in its real exchange for money.

This is what emerges from the foregoing. Commodities are really
exchanged for money, transformed into real money, after they have been
ideally transformed into money beforehand – i.e. have obtained the
_attribute of price_ as _prices. Prices,_ therefore, are the
_precondition_ of monetary circulation, regardless of how much their
realization appears to be a result of the latter. The circumstances
which make the _prices_ of commodities rise above or fall below their
average value because their exchange value does so are to be developed
in the section on exchange value, and precede the process of the actual
_realization_ of the prices of commodities through money; they thus
appear, at first, as completely independent of it. The relations of
numbers to one another obviously remain the same when I change them into
decimal fractions. This is only giving them _another name._ In order
really to circulate commodities, what is required is _instruments of
transport,_ and transport cannot be performed by money. If I have bought
1,000 lb. of iron for the amount of £_x,_ then the ownership of the iron
has passed into my hand. My £_x_ have done their duty as means of
exchange and have circulated, along with the title of ownership. The
seller, inversely, has realized the price of iron, iron as exchange
value. But in order then to bring the iron from him to me, money itself
is useless; that requires wagons, horses, roads, etc. The real
circulation of commodities through time and space is not accomplished by
money. Money only realizes their _price_ and thereby transfers the title
to the commodity into the hands of the buyer, to him who has proffered
means of exchange. What money circulates is not commodities but their
titles of ownership; and what is realized in the opposite direction in
this circulation, whether by purchase or sale, is again not the
commodities, but their prices. The quantity of money which is, then,
required for circulation is determined initially by the level of the
prices of the commodities thrown into circulation. The sum total of
these prices, however, is determined _firstly_: by the prices of the
individual commodities; _secondly_: by the quantity of commodities at
given prices which enter into circulation. For example, in order to
circulate a quarter of wheat at 60s., twice as many s. are required as
would be to circulate it at 30s. And if 5,000 of these quarters at 60s.
are to be circulated, then 300,000 s. are required, while in order to
circulate 200 such quarters only 12,000s. are needed. Thus, the amount
of money required is dependent on the level of commodity prices and on
the quantity of commodities at specified prices.

_Thirdly,_ however, the quantity of money required for circulation
depends not only on the sum total of prices to be realized, but on the
rapidity with which money circulates, completes the task of this
realization. If 1 thaler in one hour makes 10 purchases at 1 thaler
each, if it is exchanged 10 times, then it performs quite the same task
that 10 thalers would do if they made only 1 purchase per hour. Velocity
is the negative moment; it substitutes for quantity; by its means, a
single coin is multiplied.

The circumstances which determine the mass of commodity prices to be
realized, on the one hand, and the velocity of circulation of money, on
the other hand, are to be examined later. This much is clear, that
prices are not high or low because much or little money circulates, but
that much or little money circulates because prices are high or low;
and, further, that the velocity of the circulating money does not depend
on its quantity, but that the quantity of the circulating medium depends
on its velocity (heavy payments are not counted but weighed; through
this the time necessary is shortened).

Still, as already mentioned, the circulation of money does not begin
from a single centre, nor does it return to a single centre from all
points of the periphery (as with the _banks of issue_ and partly with
state issues); but from an infinite number of points, and returns to an
infinite number (this return itself, and the time required to achieve
it, a matter of chance). The velocity of the circulating medium can
therefore substitute for the quantity of the circulating medium only up
to a certain point. (Manufacturers and farmers pay, for example, the
worker; he pays the grocer, etc.; from there the money returns to the
manufacturers and farmers.) The same quantity of money can effectuate a
series of payments only _successively,_ regardless of the speed. But a
certain mass of payments must be made _simultaneously._ Circulation
takes its point of departure at one and the same time from many points.
A definite quantity of money is therefore necessary for circulation, a
sum which will always be engaged in circulation, and which is determined
by the sum total which starts from the simultaneous points of departure
in circulation, and by the velocity with which it runs its course
(returns). No matter how many ebbs and floods this quantity of the
circulating medium is exposed to, an average level nevertheless comes
into existence; since the permanent changes are always very gradual,
take place only over longer periods, and are constantly paralysed by a
mass of secondary circumstances, as we shall see.

(To (a). _‘Measure,_ used as attribute of money, means _indicator of
value’_ … Ridiculous, that ‘prices must fall, because commodities are
judged as being worth so many ounces of gold, and the amount of gold is
diminished in this country … The efficiency of gold as an indicator of
value is unaffected by its quantity being greater or smaller in any
particular country. If the employment of banking expedients were to
succeed in reducing the paper and metal circulation in this country by
half, the relative value of money and commodities would remain the
same.’ Example of Peru in the sixteenth century and transmission from
France to England. Hubbard, VIII, 45.) [58] (‘On the African coast
neither gold nor silver the measure of value; instead of them, an ideal
standard, an imaginary _bar._’) (Jacob, V, 15.) [59]

In its quality of being a measure, money is indifferent to its quantity,
or, the existing quantity of money makes no difference. Its quantity is
measured in its quality as medium of exchange, as instrument of
circulation. Whether these two qualities of money can enter into
contradiction with one another – to be looked at later.

(The concept of _forced, involuntary circulation_ (see Steuart) [60]
does not belong here yet.)

To have _circulation,_ what is essential is that exchange appear as a
process, a fluid whole of purchases and sales. Its first presupposition
is the circulation of commodities themselves, as a natural, many-sided
circulation of those commodities. The precondition of commodity
circulation is that they be produced as _exchange values,_ not as
_immediate use values,_ but as mediated through exchange value.
Appropriation through and by means of divestiture [_Entäusserung_] and
alienation [_Veräusserung_] is the fundamental condition. Circulation as
the realization of exchange values implies: (1) that my product is a
product only in so far as it is for others; hence suspended singularity,
generality; (2) that it is a product for me only in so far as it has
been alienated, become for others; (3) that it is for the other only in
so far as he himself alienates his product; which already implies (4)
that production is not an end in itself for me, but a means. Circulation
is the movement in which the general alienation appears as general
appropriation and general appropriation as general alienation. As much,
then, as the whole of this movement appears as a social process, and as
much as the individual moments of this movement arise from the conscious
will and particular purposes of individuals, so much does the totality
of the process appear as an objective interrelation, which arises
spontaneously from nature; arising, it is true, from the mutual
influence of conscious individuals on one another, but neither located
in their consciousness, nor subsumed under them as a whole. Their own
collisions with one another produce an alien social power standing above
them, produce their mutual interaction as a process and power
independent of them. Circulation, because a totality of the social
process, is also the first form in which the social relation appears as
something independent of the individuals, but not only as, say, in a
coin or in exchange value, but extending to the whole of the social
movement itself. The social relation of individuals to one another as a
power over the individuals which has become autonomous, whether
conceived as a natural force, as chance or in whatever other form, is a
necessary result of the fact that the point of departure is not the free
social individual. Circulation as the first totality among the economic
categories is well suited to bring this to light.

At first sight, circulation appears as a _simply infinite_ process. [61]
The commodity is exchanged for money, money is exchanged for the
commodity, and this is repeated endlessly. This constant renewal of the
same process does indeed form an important moment of circulation. But,
viewed more precisely, it reveals other phenomena as well; the phenomena
of completion, or, the return of the point of departure into itself. The
commodity is exchanged for money; money is exchanged for the commodity.
In this way, commodity is exchanged for commodity, except that this
exchange is a mediated one. The purchaser becomes a seller again and the
seller becomes purchaser again. In this way, each is posited in the
double and the antithetical aspect, and hence in the living unity of
both aspects. It is entirely wrong, therefore, to do as the economists
do, namely, as soon as the contradictions in the monetary system emerge
into view, to focus only on the end results without the process which
mediates them; only on the unity without the distinction, the
affirmation without the negation. The commodity is exchanged in
circulation for a commodity: at the same time, and equally, it is not
exchanged for a commodity, in as much as it is exchanged for money. The
acts of purchase and sale, in other words, appear as two mutually
indifferent acts, separated in time and place. When it is said that he
who sells also buys in as much as he buys money, and that he who buys
also sells in as much as he sells money, then it is precisely the
distinction which is overlooked, the specific distinction between
commodity and money. After the economists have most splendidly shown
that barter, in which both acts coincide, does not suffice for a more
developed form of society and mode of production, they then suddenly
look at the kind of barter which is mediated by money as if it were not
so mediated, and overlook the _specific_ character of this transaction.
After they have shown us that money is necessary in addition to and
distinct from commodities, they assert all at once that there is no
distinction between money and commodities. They take refuge in this
abstraction because in the real development of money there are
contradictions which are unpleasant for the apologetics of bourgeois
common sense, and must hence be covered up. In so far as purchase and
sale, the two essential moments of circulation, are indifferent to one
another and separated in place and time, they by no means need to
coincide. Their indifference can develop into the fortification and
apparent independence of the one against the other. But in so far as
they are both essential moments of a single whole, there must come a
moment when the independent form is violently broken and when the inner
unity is established externally through a violent explosion. Thus
already in the quality of money as a medium, in the splitting of
exchange into two acts, there lies the germ of crises, or at least their
possibility, which cannot be realized, except where the fundamental
preconditions of classically developed, conceptually adequate
circulation are present.

It has further been seen that, in circulation, money only realizes
prices. The price appears at first as an ideal aspect of the commodity;
but the sum of money exchanged for a commodity is its realized price,
its real price. The price appears therefore as _external to_ and
_independent of_ the commodity, as well as existing in it ideally. If
the commodity cannot be realized in money, it ceases to be capable of
circulating, and its price becomes merely imaginary; just as originally
the product which has become transformed into exchange value, if it is
not really exchanged, ceases to be a product. (The rise and fall of
prices not the question here.) From viewpoint (a) _price_ appeared as an
_aspect of the commodity;_ but from (b) _money_ appears as _the price
outside the commodity._ The commodity requires not simply demand, but
demand which can pay in money. Thus, if its price cannot be realized, if
it cannot be transformed into money, the commodity appears as _devalued,
depriced._ The exchange value expressed in its price must be sacrificed
as soon as this specific transformation into money is necessary. Hence
the complaints by Boisguillebert, [62] e.g. that money is the hangman of
all things, the moloch to whom everything must be sacrificed, the despot
of commodities. In the period of the rising absolute monarchy with its
transformation of all taxes into money taxes, money indeed appears as
the moloch to whom real wealth is sacrificed. Thus it appears also in
every monetary panic. From having been a servant of commerce, says
Boisguillebert, money became its despot. [63] But, in fact, already the
determination of prices in themselves contains what is counterposed to
money in exchange; that money no longer represents the commodity, but
the commodity, money. Lamentations about commerce in money as
illegitimate commerce are to be found among several writers, who form
the transition from the feudal to the modern period; the same later
among socialists.

(α) The further the division of labour develops, the more does the
product cease to be a medium of exchange. The necessity of a general
medium of exchange arises, a medium independent of the specific
production of each and every one. When production is oriented towards
immediate subsistence, not _every_ article can be exchanged for _every_
other one, and a specific activity can be exchanged only for _specific_
products. The more specialized, manifold and interdependent the products
become, the greater the necessity for a general medium of exchange. At
the beginning, the product of labour, or labour itself, is the general
medium of exchange. But this ceases more and more to be general medium
of exchange as it becomes more specialized. A fairly developed division
of labour presupposes that the needs of each person have become very
many-sided and his product has become very one-sided. The _need for
exchange_ and the _unmediated medium of exchange_ develop in inverse
proportion. Hence the necessity for a _general medium of exchange,_
where the specific product and the specific labour must be exchanged for
_exchangeability._ The exchange value of a thing is nothing other than
the quantitatively specific expression of its capacity for serving as
_medium of exchange._ In money the _medium of exchange_ becomes a thing,
or, the exchange value of the thing achieves an independent existence
apart from the thing. Since the commodity is a medium of exchange of
limited potency compared with money, it can cease to be a medium of
exchange as against money.

(β) The splitting of exchange into purchase and sale makes it possible
for me to buy without selling (stockpiling of commodities) or to sell
without buying (accumulation of money). It makes speculation possible.
It turns exchange into a special business; i.e. it founds the _merchant
estate._ [64] This separation of the two elements has made possible a
mass of transactions in between the definitive exchange of commodities,
and it enables a mass of persons to exploit this divorce. It has made
possible a mass of _pseudo-transactions._ Sometimes it becomes evident
that what appeared to be an essentially divided act is in reality an
essentially unified one; then again, sometimes, that what was thought to
be an essentially unified act is in reality essentially divided. At
moments when purchasing and selling assert themselves as essentially
different acts, a general depreciation of all commodities takes place.
At moments where it turns out that money is only a medium of exchange, a
depreciation of money comes about. General fall or rise of prices.

_Money provides the possibility of an absolute division of labour,_
because of independence of labour from its specific product, from the
immediate use value of its product for it. The general rise of prices in
times of speculation cannot be ascribed to a general rise in its
_exchange value_ or its _cost of production_; for if the _exchange value
or the cost of production_ of gold were to rise in step with that of all
other commodities, then their exchange values expressed in money, i.e.
their _prices,_ would remain the same. Nor can it be ascribed to a
decline in the production price of gold. (Credit is not yet on the
agenda here.) But since money is not only a general commodity, but
_also_ a particular, and since, as a particular, it comes under the laws
of supply and demand, it follows that the general demand for particular
commodities as against money must bring it down.

We see that it is in the nature of money to solve the contradictions of
direct barter as well as of exchange value only by positing them as
general contradictions. Whether or not a _particular medium of exchange_
was exchanged for another particular was a matter of coincidence; now,
however, the commodity must be exchanged for the _general medium of
exchange,_ against which its particularity stands in a still greater
contradiction. In order to secure the exchangeability of the commodity,
exchangeability itself is set up in opposition to it as an independent
commodity. (It was a means, becomes an end.) The question was, whether a
particular commodity encounters another particular one. But money
suspends the act of exchange itself in two mutually indifferent acts.

(Before the questions regarding circulation, its strength, weakness,
etc., and notably the disputed point regarding the quantity of money in
circulation and prices, are further developed, money should be looked at
from the point of view of its third characteristic. [65])

One moment of circulation is that the commodity exchanges itself through
money for another commodity. But there is, equally, the other moment,
not only that commodity exchanges for money and money for commodity, but
equally that money exchanges for commodity and commodity for money;
hence that money is mediated with itself by the commodity, and appears
as the unity which joins itself with itself in its circular course. Then
it appears no longer as the medium, but as the aim of circulation (as
e.g. with the merchant estate) (in commerce generally). If circulation
is looked at not as a constant alternation, but as a series of circular
motions which it describes within itself, then this circular path
appears as a double one: Commodity–Money–Money–Commodity; and in the
other direction Money–Commodity–Commodity–Money; i.e. if I sell in order
to buy, then I can also buy in order to sell. In the former case money
only a means to obtain the commodity, and the commodity the aim; in the
second case the commodity only a means to obtain money, and money the
aim. This is the simple result when the moments of circulation are
brought together. Looking at it as mere circulation, the point at which
I intervene in order to declare it the point of departure has to be a
matter of indifference.

Now, a specific distinction does enter between a commodity in
circulation and money in circulation. The commodity is thrown out of
circulation at a certain point and fulfils its definitive function only
when it is definitively withdrawn from circulation, consumed, whether in
the act of production or in consumption proper. The function of money,
by contrast, is to remain in circulation as its vehicle, to resume its
circular course always anew like a _perpetuum mobile._

Nevertheless, this second function is also a part of circulation,
equally with the first. Now one can say: to exchange commodity for
commodity makes sense, since commodities, although they are equivalent
as prices, are qualitatively different, and their exchange ultimately
satisfies qualitatively different needs. By contrast, exchanging money
for money makes no sense, unless, that is, a quantitative difference
arises, less money is exchanged for more, sold at a higher price than
purchased, and with the category of profit we have as yet nothing to do.
The circle Money–Commodity–Commodity–Money, which we drew from the
analysis of circulation, would then appear to be merely an arbitrary and
senseless abstraction, roughly as if one wanted to describe the life
cycle as Death–Life–Death; although even in the latter case it could not
be denied that the constant decomposition of what has been
individualized back into the elemental is just as much a moment of the
process of nature as the constant individualization of the elemental.
Similarly in the act of circulation, the constant monetarization of
commodities, just as much as the constant transformation of money into
commodities. In the real process of buying in order to sell, admittedly,
the motive is the profit made thereby, and the ultimate aim is to
exchange less money, by way of the commodity, for more money, since
there is no qualitative difference (here we disregard special kinds of
metal money as well as special kinds of coins) between money and money.
All that given, it cannot be denied that the operation may come to grief
and that hence the exchange of money for money without quantitative
difference frequently takes place in reality and, hence, can take place.
But before this process, on which commerce rests and which therefore,
owing to its extension, forms a chief phenomenon of circulation, is
possible at all, the circular path Money–Commodity–Commodity–Money must
be recognized as a particular form of circulation. This form is
specifically different from that in which money appears as a mere medium
of exchange for commodities; as the middle term; as a minor premise of
the syllogism. Along with its quantitative aspect, visible in commerce,
it must be separated out in its purely qualitative form, in its specific
movement. _Secondly_: it already implies that money functions neither
only as measure, nor only as medium of exchange, nor only as both; but
has yet a third quality. It appears here _firstly_ as an end in itself,
whose sole realization is served by commodity trade and exchange.
_Secondly,_ since the cycle concludes with it at that point, it steps
_outside_ it, just as the commodity, having been exchanged for its
equivalent through money, is thrown out of circulation. It is very true
that money, in so far as it serves only as an agent of circulation,
constantly remains enclosed in its cycle. But it appears here, also,
that it is still something more than this instrument of circulation,
that it also has an independent existence outside circulation, and that
in this new character it can be withdrawn from circulation just as the
commodity must constantly be definitively withdrawn. We must then
observe money in its third quality, in which both of the former are
included, i.e. that of serving as measure as well as the general medium
of exchange and hence the realization of commodity prices.

 

(c) Money as material representative of wealth (accumulation of money; before that, money as the general material of contracts, etc.)

It is in the nature of circulation that every point appears
simultaneously as a starting-point and as a conclusion, and, more
precisely, that it appears to be the one in so far as it appears to be
the other. The specific form M–C–C–M therefore just as correct as the
other, which appears the more original, C–M–M–C. The difficulty is that
the other commodity is qualitatively different; not so the other money.
It can differ only quantitatively. – Regarded as _measure_ the material
substance of money is essential, although its availability and even more
its quantity, the _amount_ of the portion of gold or silver which serves
as _unit_, are entirely irrelevant for it in this quality, and it is
employed in general only as an imaginary, non-existent unit. In this
quality it is needed as a unit and not as an amount. If I say a pound of
cotton is worth 8d., then I am saying that 1 pound of cotton = 1/116 oz.
of gold (the ounce at £3 17s. 7d.) (931d.). This expresses at the same
time its particularity as exchange value as against all other
commodities, as equivalent of all other commodities, which contain the
ounce of gold this or that many times, since they are all in the same
way compared to the ounce of gold. This original relation of the pound
of cotton with gold, by means of which the quantity of gold contained in
an ounce of cotton is determined, is fixed by the quantity of labour
time realized in one and the other, the real common substance of
exchange values. This is to be presupposed from the chapter dealing with
exchange value as such. The difficulty of finding this equation is not
as great as it may appear. For example, labour which directly produces
gold directly reveals a certain quantity of gold to be the product of,
say, one working day. Competition equates the other working days with
that one, _modificandis modificatis._ Directly or indirectly. In a word,
in the direct production of gold, a definite quantity of gold directly
appears as product and hence as the value, the equivalent, of a definite
amount of labour time. One has therefore only to determine the amount of
labour time realized in the various commodities, and to equate them to
the labour time which directly produces gold, in order to state how much
gold is contained in a given commodity. The determination of all
commodities as prices – as measured exchange values – is a process which
takes place only gradually, which presupposes frequent exchange and
hence frequent comparison of commodities as exchange values; but as soon
as the existence of commodities as prices has become a precondition – a
precondition which is itself a product of the social process, a result
of the process of social production – then the determination of new
prices appears simple, since the elements of production cost are
themselves already present in the form of prices, and are hence simply
to be added. (_Frequent alienation, sale, frequent sale,_ Steuart. [66]
Rather, all this must have continuity so that prices achieve a certain
regularity.) However, the point we wanted to get at here is this: in so
far as gold is to be established as the unit of measurement, the
relation of gold to commodities is determined by barter, direct,
unmediated exchange; like the relation of all other commodities to one
another. With barter, however, the product is exchange value only _in
itself_; it is its first phenomenal form; but the product is not yet
posited as exchange value. Firstly, this character does not yet dominate
production as a whole, but concerns only its superfluity and is hence
itself more or less _superfluous_ (like exchange itself); an accidental
enlargement of the sphere of satisfactions, enjoyments (relations to new
objects). It therefore takes place at only a few points (originally at
the borders of the natural communities, in their contact with
strangers), is restricted to a narrow sphere, and forms something which
passes production by, is auxiliary to it; dies out just as much by
chance as it arises. The form of barter in which the overflow of one’s
own production is exchanged by chance for that of others’ is only the
_first occurrence_ of the product as exchange value in general, and is
determined by accidental needs, whims, etc. But if it should happen to
continue, to become a continuing act which contains within itself the
means of its renewal, then little by little, from the outside and
likewise by chance, regulation of reciprocal exchange arises by means of
regulation of reciprocal production, and the costs of production, which
ultimately resolve into labour time, would thus become the measure of
exchange. This shows how exchange comes about, and the exchange value of
the commodity. But the circumstances under which a relation occurs for
the first time by no means show us that relation either in its purity or
in its totality. A product posited as exchange value is in its essence
no longer a simple thing; it is posited in a quality differing from its
natural quality; it is posited as a _relation,_ more precisely as a
relation in general, not to one commodity but to every commodity, to
every possible product. It expresses, therefore, a general relation; the
product which relates to itself as the realization of a _specific
quantity_ of labour in general, of social labour time, and is therefore
the equivalent of every other product in the proportion expressed in its
exchange value. Exchange value presupposes social labour as the
substance of all products, quite apart from their natural make-up.
Nothing can express a relation without relating to one particular thing,
and there can be no general relation unless it relates to a general
thing. Since labour is motion, time is its natural measure. Barter in
its crudest form presupposes labour as substance and labour time as
measure of commodities; this then emerges as soon as it becomes
regularized, continuous, as soon as it contains within itself the
reciprocal requirements for its renewal. – A commodity is _exchange
value_ only if it is expressed in another, i.e. as a relation. A bushel
of wheat is worth so many bushels of rye; in this case wheat is exchange
value in as much as it is expressed in rye, and rye is exchange value in
as much as it is expressed in wheat. If each of the two is related only
to itself, it is not exchange value. Now, in the relation in which money
appears as measure, it itself is not expressed as a relation, not as
exchange value, but as a natural quantity of a certain material, a
natural weight- fraction of gold or silver. In general, the commodity in
which the exchange value of another is expressed, is never expressed as
exchange value, never as relation, but rather as a definite quantity of
its natural make-up. If 1 bushel of wheat is worth 3 bushels of rye,
then only the bushel of wheat is expressed as a value, not the bushel of
rye. Of course, the other is also posited _in itself_; the 1 bushel of
rye is then = 1/3 bushel of wheat; but this is not _posited,_ but merely
a second relation, which is admittedly directly present in the first. If
one commodity is expressed in another, then it is posited as a relation,
and the other as simple quantity of a certain material. 3 bushels of rye
are in themselves no value; rather, rye filling up a certain volume,
measured by a standard of volume. The same is true of money as measure,
as the unit in which the exchange values of other commodities are
measured. It is a specific weight of the natural substance by which it
is represented, gold, silver, etc. If 1 bushel of wheat has the price of
77s. 7d., then it is expressed as something else, to which it is equal,
as 1 ounce of gold; as relation, as exchange value. But 1 ounce of gold
is in itself no exchange value; it is not expressed as exchange value;
but as a specific quantity of itself, of its natural substance, gold. If
1 bushel of wheat has the price of 77s. 7d. or of 1 ounce of gold, then
this can be a greater or lesser value, since 1 ounce of gold will rise
or fall in relation to the quantity of labour required for its
production. But for the determination of its price as such, this is
irrelevant; for its price of 77s. 7d. exactly expresses the relation in
which it is equivalent to all other commodities, in which it can buy
them. The specificity of price determination, whether the bushel is 77
or 1,780s., is a different matter altogether from the determination of
price as such, i.e. the positing of wheat as price. It has a price,
regardless of whether it costs 100 or 1s. The price expresses its
exchange value only in a unit common to all commodities; presupposes
therefore that this exchange value is already regulated by other
relations. To be sure, the fact that 1 bushel of wheat has the price of
1 ounce of gold – since gold and wheat as natural objects have no
relation with one another, are _as such_ not a measure for one another,
are _irrelevant_ to one another – this fact is found out by bringing the
ounce of gold itself into relation with the amount of labour time
necessary for its production, and thus bringing both wheat and gold in
relation to a third entity, labour, and equating them through this
relation; by comparing them both, therefore, as exchange values. But
this shows us only how the price of wheat is found, the quantity of gold
to which it is equal. In this relation itself, where gold appears as the
price of wheat, it is itself not in turn posited as a relation, as
exchange value, but as a certain quantity of a natural material. In
exchange value, commodities (products) are posited as relations to their
social substance, to labour; but as prices, they are expressed as
quantities of other products of various natural make-ups. Now, it can
admittedly be said that the price of money is also posited as 1 bushel
of wheat, 3 bushels of rye and all the other quantities of different
commodities, whose price is 1 ounce of gold. But then, in order to
express the price of money, the whole sphere of commodities would have
to be listed, each in the quantity which equals 1 ounce of gold. Money
would then have as many prices as there are commodities whose price it
itself expresses. The chief quality of price, _unity,_ would disappear.
No commodity expresses the price of money, because none expresses its
relation to all other commodities, its general exchange value. But it is
the specific characteristic of price that exchange value must be
expressed in its generality and at the same time in a specific
commodity. But even this is irrelevant. In so far as money appears as a
material in which the price of all commodities is expressed and
measured, to that extent is money itself posited as a particular amount
of gold, silver, etc., in short, of its natural matter; a simple amount
of a certain material, not itself as exchange value, as relation. In the
same way, every commodity which expresses the price of another is itself
not _posited_ as exchange value, but as a simple amount of itself. In
its quality as unit of exchange value, as their measure, their common
point of comparison, money is essentially a natural material, gold,
silver; since, as the price of the commodity, it is not an exchange
value, not a relation, but a certain weight of gold, silver; e.g. a
pound with its subdivisions, and thus money appears originally as pound,
_aes grave._ This is precisely what distinguishes price from exchange
value, and we have seen that exchange value necessarily drives towards
price formation. Hence the nonsensicality of those who want to make
labour time as such into money, i.e. who want to posit and then not
posit the distinction between price and exchange value. Money as
measure, as element of price determination, as measuring unit of
exchange values thus presents the following phenomena: (1) it is
required only as an imagined unit once the exchange value of an ounce of
gold compared to any one commodity has been determined; its actual
presence is superfluous, along with, even more so, its available
quantity: as an indicator (an indicator of value) the amount in which it
exists in a country is irrelevant; required only as accounting unit; (2)
while it thus only needs to be posited ideally, and, indeed, in the form
of the price of a commodity is only ideally posited _in_ it; at the same
time, as a simple amount of the natural substance in which it is
represented, as a given weight of gold, silver, etc. which is accepted
as unit, it also yields the point of comparison, the unit, the measure.
Exchange values (commodities) are transformed by the mind into certain
weights of gold or silver, and are ideally posited as being = to this
imagined quantity of gold etc.; as expressing it.

But when we now go over to the second quality of money, money as medium
of exchange and realizer of prices, then we have found that in this case
it must be present in a certain _quantity_; that the given weight of
gold and silver which has been posited as a unit is required in a given
quantity in order to be adequate to this function. If the sum of prices
to be realized, which depends on the price of a particular commodity
multiplied by its quantity, is given on one side, and the velocity of
monetary circulation on the other, then a certain quantity of the
circulating medium is required. When we now examine the original form
more closely, the direct form in which circulation presents itself,
C–M–M–C, then we see that money appears here as a pure medium of
exchange. The commodity is exchanged for a commodity, and money appears
merely as the medium of this exchange. The price of the first commodity
is realized with money, in order to realize the price of the second
commodity with the money, and thus to obtain it in exchange for the
first. After the price of the first commodity is realized, the aim of
the person who now has its price in money is not to obtain the price of
the second commodity, but rather to pay its price in order to obtain the
commodity. At bottom, therefore, money served him to exchange the first
commodity for the second. As mere medium of exchange, money has no other
purpose. The man who has sold his commodity and got money wants to buy
another commodity, and the man from whom he buys it needs the money in
order to buy another commodity etc. Now, in this function, as pure
medium of circulation, the specific role of money consists only of this
circulation, which it brings about owing to the fact that its quantity,
its amount, was fixed beforehand. The number of times in which it is
itself contained in the commodities as a unit is determined beforehand
by their prices, and as medium of circulation it appears merely as a
multiple of this predetermined unit. In so far as it realizes the price
of commodities, the commodity is exchanged for its real equivalent in
gold and silver; its exchange value is really exchanged for another
commodity, money; but in so far as this process takes place only in
order to transform this money back into a commodity, i.e. in order to
exchange the first commodity for the second, then money appears only
fleetingly, or, its substance consists only in this constant appearance
as disappearance, as this vehicle of mediation. Money as medium of
circulation is _only_ medium of circulation. The only attribute which is
essential to it in order to serve in this capacity is the attribute of
quantity, of amount, in which it circulates. (Since the amount is
co-determined by the velocity, the latter does not require special
mention here.) In so far as it realizes the price, its material
existence as gold and silver is essential; but in so far as this
realization is only fleeting and destined to suspend itself, this is
_irrelevant_. It is only a _semblance_, as if the point were to exchange
the commodity for gold or silver as particular commodities: a semblance
which disappears as soon as the process is ended, as soon as gold and
silver have again been exchanged for a commodity, and the commodity,
hence, exchanged for another. The character of gold and silver as mere
media of circulation, or the character of the medium of circulation as
gold and silver is therefore irrelevant to their make-up as particular
natural commodities. Suppose the total price of circulating commodities
= 1,200 thalers. Their measure is then 1 thaler = _x_ weight of silver.
Now let 100 thalers be necessary to circulate these commodities in 6
hours; i.e. every thaler pays the price of 100 thalers in 6 hours. Now,
what is essential is that 100 thalers be present, the amount of 100 of
the metallic unit which measures the sum total of commodity prices; 100
of these units. That these units consist of silver is irrelevant to the
process itself. This is already visible in the fact that a single thaler
represents in the cycle of circulation a mass of silver 100 times
greater than is contained in it in reality, even though in each
particular transaction it only represents the silver weight of 1 thaler.
In circulation as a whole, the 1 thaler thus represents 100 thalers, a
weight of silver a hundred times greater than it really contains. It is
in truth only a _symbol_ for the weight of silver contained in 100
thalers. It realizes a price which is 100 times greater than it realizes
in reality as a quantity of silver. Let the pound sterling be = 1/3
ounce of gold (it is not as much as that). In so far as the price of a
commodity at £1 is paid, i.e. its price of £1 is realized, it is
exchanged for £1, to that extent it is of decisive importance that the
£1 really contain 1/3 ounce of gold. If it were a counterfeit £, alloyed
with non-precious metals, a £ only in appearance, then indeed the price
of the commodity would not be realized; in order to realize it, it would
have to be paid for in as great a quantity of the non-precious metal as
equals 1/3 of an ounce of gold. Looking at this moment of circulation in
isolation, it is thus essential that the unit of money should really
represent a given quantity of gold or silver. But when we take
circulation as a totality, as a self-enclosed process, C–M–M–C, then the
matter stands differently. In the first case the realization of price
would be only apparent: in reality only a _part_ of its price would be
realized. The price posited in it ideally would not be posited in
reality. The commodity which is ideally equated to a given weight of
gold would in actual exchange not bring in as much gold as that. But if
a fake £ were to circulate in the place of a real one, it would render
absolutely the same service in circulation as a whole as if it were
genuine. If a commodity, A, with the price of £1, is exchanged for 1
fake £, and if this fake pound is again exchanged for commodity B, price
£1, then the fake pound has done absolutely the same service as if it
had been genuine. The genuine pound is, therefore, in this process,
nothing more than a _symbol_, in so far as the moment in which it
realizes prices is left out, and we look only at the totality of the
process, in which it serves only as medium of exchange and in which the
realization of prices is only a _semblance,_ a fleeting mediation. Here
the gold pound serves only to allow commodity A to be exchanged for
commodity B, both having the same price. The real realization of the
price of commodity A is, here, the commodity B, and the real realization
of the price of B is the commodity A or C or D, which amounts to the
same as far as the form of the relation is concerned, for which the
particular content of the commodity is entirely irrelevant. Commodities
with identical prices are exchanged. Instead of exchanging commodity A
directly for commodity B, the price of commodity A is exchanged for the
price of commodity B and the price of commodity B for commodity A. Money
thus represents to the commodity only the latter’s price. Commodities
are exchanged for one another at their prices. The price of the
commodity expresses about it, ideally, that it is an amount of a certain
natural unit (weight units) of gold or silver, of the material in which
money is embodied. In the form of money, or its realized price, the
commodity now confronts a real amount of this unit. But in so far as the
realization of the price is not the final act, and the point is not to
possess the price of commodities as price, but as the price of another
commodity, to that extent the material of money is irrelevant, e.g. gold
and silver. Money becomes a subject as instrument of circulation, as
medium of exchange, and the natural material in which it presents itself
appears as an accident whose significance disappears in the act of
exchange itself; because it is not in this material that the commodity
exchanged for money is supposed to be realized, but rather in the
material of another commodity. For now, apart from the moments that, in
circulation, (1) money realizes prices, (2) money circulates titles of
ownership; we have (3), additionally, that by means of it something
takes place which could not happen otherwise, namely that the exchange
value of the commodity is expressed in every other commodity. If 1 yard
of linen costs 2s. and 1 lb. of sugar 1s., then the yard of linen is
realized, by means of the 2s., in 2 lb. of sugar, while the sugar is
converted into the material of its exchange value, into the material in
which its exchange value is realized. As a mere medium of circulation,
in its role in the constant flow of the circulatory process, money is
neither the measure of prices, because it is already posited as such in
the prices themselves; nor is it the means for the realization of
prices, for it exists as such in one single moment of circulation, but
disappears as such in the totality of its moments; but is, rather, the
mere _representative_ of the price in relation to all other commodities,
and serves only as a means to the end that all commodities are to be
exchanged at equivalent prices. It is exchanged for one commodity
because it is the general representative of its exchange value; and, as
such, as the _representative_ of every other commodity of equal exchange
value, it is the general representative; and that is, as such, what it
is in circulation itself. It _represents_ the price of the one commodity
as against all other commodities, or the price of all commodities as
against the one commodity. In this relation it is not only the
_representative_ of commodity prices, but the _symbol_ of itself; i.e.
in the act of circulation itself, its material, gold and silver, is
irrelevant. It _is_ the price; it is a given quantity of gold or silver;
but in so far as this reality of the price is here only fleeting, a
reality destined constantly to disappear, to be suspended, not to count
as a definitive realization, but always only as an intermediate,
mediating realization; in so far as the point here is not the
realization of the price at all, but rather the realization of the
exchange value of one particular commodity in the material of another
commodity, to that extent its own material is irrelevant; it is
ephemeral as a realization of the price, since this itself disappears;
it exists, therefore, in so far as it remains in this constant movement,
only as a representative of exchange value, which becomes real only if
the real exchange value constantly steps into the place of its
representative, constantly changes places with it, constantly exchanges
itself for it. Hence, in this process, its reality is not that it is the
price, but that it _represents_ it, is its representative – the
materially present representative of the price, thus of itself, and, as
such, of the exchange value of commodities. As medium of exchange, it
realizes the prices of commodities only in order to posit the exchange
value of the one commodity in the other, as its unit; i.e. in order to
realize its exchange value in the other commodity; i.e. to posit the
other commodity as the material of its exchange value.

Only within circulation, then, is it such a material symbol; taken out
of circulation, it again becomes a realized price; but within the
process, as we have seen, the quantity, the amount of these material
symbols of the monetary unit is the essential attribute. Hence, while
the material substance of money, its material substratum of a given
quantity of gold or silver, is irrelevant within circulation, where
money appears as something existing in opposition to commodities, and
where, by contrast, its amount is the essential aspect, since it is
there only a _symbol_ for a given amount of this unit; in its role as
measure, however, where it was introduced only ideally, its material
substratum was essential, but its quantity and even its existence as
such were irrelevant. From this it follows that money as gold and
silver, in so far as _only_ its role as means of exchange and
circulation is concerned, can be replaced by any other _symbol_ which
expresses a given quantity of its unit, and that in this way symbolic
money can replace the real, because material money as mere medium of
exchange is itself symbolic.

It is these contradictory functions of money, as measure, as realization
of prices and as mere medium of exchange, which explain the otherwise
inexplicable phenomenon that the _debasement_ of metallic money, of
gold, silver, through admixture of inferior metals, causes a
depreciation of money and a rise in prices; because in this case the
measure of prices [is] no longer the cost of production of the ounce of
gold, say, but rather of an ounce consisting of 2/3 copper etc. (The
debasement of the coinage, in so far as it consists merely of falsifying
or changing the names of the fractional weight units of the precious
metal, e.g. if the eighth part of an ounce were to be called a
sovereign, makes absolutely no difference in the measure and changes
only its name. If, earlier, 1/4 of the ounce was called 1 sovereign, and
now it is 1/8, then the price of 1 sovereign now expresses merely 1/8 of
an ounce of gold; thus (about) 2 sovereigns are necessary to express the
same price which was earlier expressed by 1 sovereign); or in the case
of a mere falsification of the name of the fractional parts of the
precious metal, the measure remains the same, but the fractional part
[is] expressed in twice as many francs etc. as before; on the other
hand, if the substratum of money, gold, silver, is entirely suspended
and replaced by paper bearing the symbol of given quantities of real
money, in the quantity required by circulation, then the paper
circulates at the full gold and silver value. In the first case, because
the medium of circulation is at the same time the material of money as
measure, and the material in which prices are definitively realized; in
the second case, because money only in its role as medium of
circulation.

Example of the clumsy confusion between the contradictory functions of
money: ‘Price is exactly determined by the quantity of money there is to
buy it with. All the commodities in the world can fetch no more than all
the money in the world.’ First, the determination of prices has nothing
to do with actual sale; money, in sale, serves only as measure.
Secondly, all commodities (in circulation) can fetch a thousand times
more money as is in the world, if every piece of money were to circulate
a thousand times. (The passage is quoted from the _London Weekly
Dispatch,_ 8 November 1857.)

Since the total sum of prices to be realized in circulation changes with
the prices of the commodities and with the quantity of them thrown into
circulation; and since, on the other side, the velocity of the medium of
circulation is determined by circumstances independent of itself, it
follows from this that the quantity of media of circulation must be
capable of changing, or expanding and contracting – _contraction and
expansion of circulation._

In its role as mere medium of circulation, it can be said about money
that it ceases to be a commodity (_particular_ commodity), when its
material is irrelevant and it meets only the needs of circulation
itself, and no other direct need: gold and silver cease to be
commodities as soon as they circulate as money. It can be said about it,
on the other hand, that it is now _merely_ a commodity (_general_
commodity), the commodity in its pure form, indifferent to its natural
particularity and hence indifferent to all direct needs, without natural
relation to a particular need as such. The followers of the Monetary
System, even partly of the protectionist system (see e.g. Ferrier, p.
2), [67] have clung only to the first aspect, while the modern
economists cling to the second; e.g. Say, who says that money should be
treated like a ‘particular’ commodity, a commodity like any other. [68]
As medium of exchange, money appears in the role of necessary mediator
between production and consumption. In the developed money system, one
produces only in order to exchange, or, one produces only by exchanging.
Strike out money, and one would thereby either be thrown back to a lower
stage of production (corresponding to that of auxiliary barter), or one
would proceed to a higher stage, in which exchange value would no longer
be the principal aspect of the commodity, because social labour, whose
representative it is, would no longer appear merely as socially mediated
private labour.

The question whether money as medium of exchange is productive or not
productive is solved just as easily. According to Adam Smith, money not
productive. [69] Of course, Ferrier says e.g.: ‘It creates values,
because they would not exist without it.’ One has to look not only at
‘its _value_ as metal, but equally its _property_ as money’. A. Smith is
correct, in so far as it is not the instrument of any particular branch
of production; Ferrier is right too because it is an essential aspect of
the mode of production resting on exchange value that product and agency
of production should be posited in the character of money, and because
this characteristic presupposes a money distinct from products; and
because the money relation is itself a relation of production if
production is looked at in its totality.

When C–M–M–C is dissected into its two moments, although the _prices_ of
the commodities are presupposed (and this makes the major difference),
circulation splits into two acts of direct barter.

C–M: the exchange value of the commodity is expressed in another
particular commodity, in the material of money, like that of money in
the commodity; similarly with M–C. To this extent, A. Smith is right
when he says that money as medium of exchange is only a more complicated
kind of barter. But when we look at the whole of the process, and not at
both as equivalent acts, realization of the commodity in money and of
money in the commodity, then A. Smith’s opponents are correct when they
say that he misunderstood the nature of money and that monetary
circulation suppresses barter; that money serves only to balance the
accounts of the ‘arithmetical division’ arising from the division of
labour. These ‘arithmetical figures’ no more need to be of gold and
silver than do the measures of length. (See Solly, p. 20.) [70]

Commodities change from being _marchandises_ to being _denrées_, they
enter consumption; money as medium of circulation does not; at no point
does it cease to be commodity, _as long as_ it remains within the role
of medium of circulation.

We now pass on to the third function of money; which initially results
from the second form of circulation:

M–C–C–M; in which money appears not only as _medium,_ nor as _measure,_
but as end-in-itself, and hence steps outside circulation just like a
particular commodity which ceases to circulate for the time being and
changes from _marchandise_ to _denrée._

But first it must be noted that, once the quality of money as an
intrinsic relation of production generally founded on exchange value is
presupposed, it is possible to demonstrate that in some particular cases
it does service as an instrument of production. ‘The utility of gold and
silver rests on this, that they replace labour.’ (Lauderdale, p. 11.)
[71] Without money, a mass of swaps would be necessary before one
obtained the desired article in exchange. Furthermore, in each
particular exchange one would have to undertake an investigation into
the relative value of commodities. Money spares us the first task in its
role as instrument of exchange (instrument of commerce); the second
task, as measure of value and representative of all commodities (idem,
loc. cit.). The opposite assertion, that money is not productive,
amounts only to saying that, apart from the functions in which it is
productive, as measure, instrument of circulation and representative of
value, it is _unproductive_; that its quantity is productive only in so
far as it is necessary to fulfil these preconditions. That it becomes
not only _unproductive_, but _faux frais de production_, the moment when
more of it is employed than necessary for its productive aspect – this
is a truth which holds for every other instrument of production or
exchange; for the machine as well as the means of transportation. But if
by this it is meant that money exchanges only real wealth which already
exists, then this is false, since labour, as well, is exchanged for it
and bought with it, i.e. productive activity itself, _potential_ wealth.

The _third attribute_ of money, in its complete development, presupposes
the first two and constitutes their unity. Money, then, has an
independent existence outside circulation; it has stepped outside it. As
a _particular_ commodity it can be transformed out of its form of money
into that of luxury articles, gold and silver jewellery (as long as
craftsmanship is still very simple, as e.g. in the old English period, a
constant transformation of silver money into plate and vice versa. See
Taylor) [72] ; or, as money, it can be _accumulated_ to form a
_treasure_. When money in its independent existence is derived from
circulation, it appears in itself as a result of circulation; by way of
circulation, it closes the circle with itself. This aspect already
latently contains its quality as _capital_. It is negated only as medium
of exchange. Still, since it can be historically posited as measure
before it appears as medium of exchange, and can appear as medium of
exchange before it is posited as measure – in the latter case it would
exist merely as preferred _commodity_ – it can therefore also appear
historically in the third function before it is posited in the two prior
ones. But gold and silver can be accumulated _as money_ only if they are
already present in one of the other two roles, and it can appear in a
developed form of the third role only if the two earlier ones are
already developed. Otherwise, accumulating it is nothing more than the
accumulation of gold and silver, not of money.

(As an especially interesting example, go into the _accumulation of
copper money_ in the earlier periods of the Roman republic.)

Since money as _universal material representative of wealth_ emerges
from circulation, and is as such itself a _product of circulation_, both
of exchange at a higher potentiality, and a _particular_ form of
exchange, it stands therefore in the third function, as well, in
connection with circulation; it stands independent of circulation, but
this independence is only its own process. It derives from it just as it
returns to it again. Cut off from all relation to it, it would not be
money, but merely a simple natural object, gold or silver. In this
character it is just as much its precondition as its result. Its
independence is not the end of all relatedness to circulation, but
rather a _negative_ relation to it. This comes from its independence as
a result of M–C–C–M. In the case of money as _capital,_ money itself is
posited (1) as precondition of circulation as well as its result; (2) as
having independence only in the form of a negative relation, but always
a relation to circulation; (3) as itself an _instrument of production,_
since circulation no longer appears in its primitive simplicity, as
quantitative exchange, but as a process of production, as a real
metabolism. And thus money is itself stamped as a particular moment of
this process of production. Production is not only concerned with simple
determination of prices, i.e. with translation of the exchange values of
commodities into a common unit, but with the creation of exchange
values, hence also with the creation of the _particularity_ of prices.
Not merely with positing the form, but also the content. Therefore,
while in simple circulation, money appears generally as productive,
since circulation in general is itself a moment of the system of
production, nevertheless this quality still only exists _for us,_ and is
not yet _posited_ in money. (4) As capital, money thus also appears
posited as a relation to itself mediated by circulation – in the
_relation_ of _interest and capital._ But here we are not as yet
concerned with these aspects; rather, we have to look simply at money in
the third role, in the form in which it emerged as something
_independent_ from circulation, more properly, from both its earlier
aspects.

(‘An increase of money only an increase in the _means of counting._’
Sismondi. [73] This correct only in so far as defined as mere medium of
exchange. In the other property it is also an increase in the _means of
paying._)

‘Commerce separated the shadow from the body, and introduced the
possibility of owning them separately.’ (Sismondi.) [74] Thus, money is
now exchange value become independent (it never puts in more than a
fleeting appearance as such, as _medium of exchange_) in its general
form. It possesses, it is true, a particular body or substance, gold and
silver, and precisely this gives it its independence; for what only
exists as an aspect or relation of something else is not independent. On
the other side, with this bodily independence, as gold and silver, it
represents not only the exchange value of one commodity as against
another, but rather exchange value as against all commodities; and
although it possesses a substance of its own, it appears at the same
time, in its particular existence as gold and silver, as the general
exchange value of all commodities. On one side, it is possessed as their
exchange value; they stand on the other side as only so many particular
substances of exchange value, so that it can either transform itself
into every one of these substances through exchange, or it can remain
indifferent to them, aloof from their particularity and peculiarity.
They are therefore merely accidental existences. It is the _‘précis de
toutes les choses’,_ [75] in which their particular character is erased;
it is general wealth in the form of a concise compendium, as opposed to
its diffusion and fragmentation in the world of commodities. While
wealth in the form of the particular commodity appears as one of the
moments of the same, or the commodity as one of the moments of wealth;
in the form of gold and silver general wealth itself appears as
concentrated in a particular substance. Every particular commodity, in
so far as it is exchange value, has a price, expresses a certain
quantity of money in a merely imperfect form, since it has to be thrown
into circulation in order to be realized, and since it remains a matter
of chance, due to its particularity, whether or not it is realized.
However, in so far as it is realized not as price, but in its natural
property, it is a moment of wealth by way of its relation to a
particular need which it satisfies; and, in this relation, [it]
expresses (1) only the wealth of uses [_Gebrauchsreichtum_], (2) only a
quite particular facet of this wealth. Money, by contrast, apart from
its particular usefulness as a valuable commodity, is (1) the realized
price; (2) satisfies every need, in so far as it can be exchanged for
the desired object of every need, regardless of any particularity. The
commodity possesses this property only through the mediation of money.
Money possesses it directly in relation to all commodities, hence in
relation to the whole world of wealth, to wealth as such. With money,
general wealth is not only a form, but at the same time the content
itself. The concept of wealth, so to speak, is realized,
_individualized_ in a particular object.


NOTEBOOK II

c. November 1857



THE CHAPTER ON MONEY (CONTINUATION)


(_Superfluity, accumulation_)

In the particular commodity, in so far as it is a price, wealth is
posited only as an ideal form, not yet realized; and in so far as it has
a particular use value, it represents merely a quite singular facet of
wealth. In money, by contrast, the price is realized; and its substance
is wealth itself considered in its totality in abstraction from its
particular modes of existence. Exchange value forms the substance of
money, and exchange value is wealth. Money is therefore, on another
side, also the embodied form of wealth, in contrast to all the
substances of which wealth consists. Thus, while on one side the form
and the content of wealth are identical in money, considered for itself,
on the other side, in contrast to all the other commodities, money is
the general form of wealth, while the totality of these particularities
form its substance. Thus, in the first role, money is wealth itself; in
the other, it is the _general material representative of wealth._ This
totality exists in money itself as the comprehensive representation of
commodities. Thus, wealth (exchange value as totality as well as
abstraction) exists, individualized as such, to the exclusion of all
other commodities, as a singular, tangible object, in gold and silver.
Money is therefore the god among commodities.

Since it is an individuated, tangible object, money may be randomly
searched for, found, stolen, discovered; and thus general wealth may be
tangibly brought into the possession of a particular individual. From
its servile role, in which it appears as mere medium of circulation it
suddenly changes into the lord and god of the world of commodities. It
represents the divine existence of commodities, while they represent its
earthly form. Before it is replaced by exchange value, every form of
natural wealth presupposes an essential relation between the individual
and the objects, in which the individual in one of his aspects
objectifies [_vergegenständlicht_] himself in the thing, so that his
possession of the thing appears at the same time as a certain
development of his individuality: wealth in sheep, the development of
the individual as shepherd, wealth in grain his development as
agriculturist, etc. _Money, however, as the individual_ of general
wealth, as something emerging from circulation and representing a
general quality, as a _merely social result,_ does not at all presuppose
an individual relation to its owner; possession of it is not the
development of any particular essential aspect of his individuality; but
rather possession of what lacks individuality, since this social
[relation] exists at the same time as a sensuous, external object which
can be mechanically seized, and lost in the same manner. Its relation to
the individual thus appears as a purely accidental one; while this
relation to a thing having no connection with his individuality gives
him, at the same time, by virtue of the thing’s character, a general
power over society, over the whole world of gratifications, labours,
etc. It is exactly as if, for example, the chance discovery of a stone
gave me mastery over all the sciences, regardless of my individuality.
The possession of money places me in exactly the same relationship
towards wealth (social) as the philosophers’ stone would towards the
sciences.

Money is therefore not only _an_ object, but is _the_ object of greed
[_Bereicherungssucht_]. It is essentially _auri sacra fames._ [1] Greed
as such, as a particular form of the drive, i.e. as distinct from the
craving for a particular kind of wealth, e.g. for clothes, weapons,
jewels, women, wine etc., is possible only when general wealth, wealth
as such, has become individualized in a particular thing, i.e. as soon
as money is posited in its third quality. Money is therefore not only
the object but also the fountainhead of greed. The mania for possessions
is possible without money; but greed itself is the product of a definite
social development, not _natural,_ as opposed to _historical._ Hence the
wailing of the ancients about money as the source of all evil. Hedonism
[_Genusssucht_] in its general form and miserliness [_Geiz_] are the two
particular forms of monetary greed. Hedonism in the abstract presupposes
an object which possesses all pleasures in potentiality. Abstract
hedonism realizes that function of money in which it is the _material
representative of wealth_; miserliness, in so far as it is only the
general form of wealth as against its particular substances, the
commodities. In order to maintain it as such, it must sacrifice all
relationship to the objects of particular needs, must abstain, in order
to satisfy the need of greed for money as such. Monetary greed, or mania
for wealth, necessarily brings with it the decline and fall of the
ancient communities [_Gemeinwesen_]. Hence it is the antithesis to them.
It is itself the community [_Gemeinwesen_], [2] and can tolerate none
other standing above it. But this presupposes the full development of
exchange values, hence a corresponding organization of society. In
antiquity, exchange value was not the _nexus rerum;_ it appears as such
only among the mercantile peoples, who had, however, no more than a
carrying trade and did not, themselves, produce. At least this was the
case with the Phoenicians, Carthaginians, etc. But this is a peripheral
matter. They could live just as well in the interstices of the ancient
world, as the Jews in Poland or in the Middle Ages. Rather, this world
itself was the precondition for such trading peoples. That is why they
fall apart every time they come into serious conflict with the ancient
communities. Only with the Romans, Greeks etc. does money appear
unhampered in both of its first two functions, as measure and as medium
of circulation, and not very far developed in either. But as soon as
either their trade etc. develops, or, as in the case of the Romans,
conquest brings them money in vast quantities – in short, suddenly, and
at a certain stage of their economic development, money necessarily
appears in its third role, and the further it develops in that role, the
more the decay of their community advances. In order to function
productively, money in its third role, as we have seen, must be not only
the precondition but equally the result of circulation, and, as its
precondition, also a moment of it, something posited by it. Among the
Romans, who amassed money by stealing it from the whole world, this was
not the case. It is inherent in the simple character of money itself
that it can exist as a developed moment of production only where and
when _wage labour_ exists; that in this case, far from subverting the
social formation, it is rather a condition for its development and a
driving-wheel for the development of all forces of production, material
and mental. A particular individual may even today come into money by
chance, and the possession of this money can undermine him just as it
undermined the communities of antiquity. But the dissolution of this
individual within modern society is in itself only the enrichment of the
productive section of society. The owner of money, in the ancient sense,
is dissolved by the industrial process, which he serves whether he wants
and knows it or not. It is a dissolution which affects only his person.
_As material representative of general wealth,_ as _individualized
exchange value,_ money must be the _direct_ object, aim and product of
general labour, the labour of all individuals. Labour must directly
produce exchange value, i.e. money. It must therefore be _wage labour._
Greed, as the urge of all, in so far as everyone wants to make money, is
only created by general wealth. Only in this way can the general mania
for money become the wellspring of general, self-reproducing wealth.
When labour is wage labour, and its direct aim is money, then general
wealth is _posited_ as its aim and object. (_In this regard, talk about
the context of the military system of antiquity when it became a
mercenary system._) Money as aim here becomes the means of general
industriousness. General wealth is produced in order to seize hold of
its representative. In this way the real sources of wealth are opened
up. When the aim of labour is not a particular product standing in a
particular relation to the particular needs of the individual, but
money, wealth in its general form, then, firstly the individual’s
industriousness knows no bounds; it is indifferent to its particularity,
and takes on every form which serves the purpose; it is ingenious in the
creation of new objects for a social need, etc. It is clear, therefore,
that when wage labour is the foundation, money does not have a
dissolving effect, but acts productively; whereas the ancient community
as such is already in contradiction with wage labour as the general
foundation. General industriousness is possible only where every act of
labour produces general wealth, not a particular form of it; where
therefore the individual’s reward, too, is money. Otherwise, only
particular forms of industry are possible. Exchange value as direct
product of labour is money as direct product of labour. Direct labour
which produces exchange value as such is therefore wage labour. Where
money is not itself the community [_Gemeinwesen_], it must dissolve the
community. In antiquity, one could buy labour, a slave, directly; but
the slave could not buy money with his labour. The increase of money
could make slaves more expensive, but could not make their labour more
productive. _Negro slavery_ – a purely industrial slavery – which is,
besides, incompatible with the development of bourgeois society and
disappears with it, _presupposes_ wage labour, and if other, free states
with wage labour did not exist alongside it, if, instead, the Negro
states were isolated, then all social conditions there would immediately
turn into pre-civilized forms.

 Money as individualized exchange value and hence as wealth incarnate
was what the alchemists sought; it figures in this role within the
Monetary (Mercantilist) System. The period which precedes the
development of modern industrial society opens with general greed for
money on the part of individuals as well as of states. The real
development of the sources of wealth takes place as it were behind their
backs, as a means of gaining possession of the representatives of
wealth. Wherever it does not arise out of circulation – as in Spain –
but has to be discovered physically, the nation is impoverished, whereas
the nations which have to work in order to get it from the Spaniards
develop the sources of wealth and really become rich. This is why the
search for and discovery of gold in new continents, countries, plays so
great a role in the history of revaluation, because by its means
colonization is improvised and made to flourish as if in a hothouse. The
hunt for gold in all countries leads to its discovery; to the formation
of new states; initially to the spread of commodities, which produce new
needs, and draw distant continents into the metabolism of circulation,
i.e. exchange. Thus, in this respect, as the general representative of
wealth and as individualized exchange value, it was doubly a means for
expanding the universality of wealth, and for drawing the dimensions of
exchange over the whole world; for creating the true _generality_
[_Allgemeinheit_] of exchange value in substance and in extension. But
it is inherent in the attribute in which it here becomes developed that
the illusion about its nature, i.e. the fixed insistence on one of its
aspects, in the abstract, and the blindness towards the contradictions
contained within it, gives it a really magical significance behind the
backs of individuals. In fact, it is because of this self-contradictory
and hence illusory aspect, because of this abstraction, that it becomes
such an enormous instrument in the real development of the forces of
social production.

It is the elementary precondition of bourgeois society that labour
should directly produce exchange value, i.e. money; and, similarly, that
money should directly purchase labour, and therefore the labourer, but
only in so far as he alienates [_veräussert_] his activity in the
exchange. _Wage labour_ on one side, _capital_ on the other, are
therefore only other forms of developed exchange value and of money (as
the incarnation of exchange value). Money thereby directly and
simultaneously becomes the _real community_ [_Gemeinwesen_], since it is
the general substance of survival for all, and at the same time the
social product of all. But as we have seen, in money the community
[_Gemeinwesen_] is at the same time a mere abstraction, a mere external,
accidental thing for the individual, and at the same time merely a means
for his satisfaction as an isolated individual. The community of
antiquity presupposes a quite different relation to, and on the part of,
the individual. The development of money in its third role therefore
smashes this community. All production is an objectification
[_Vergegenständlichung_] of the individual. In money (exchange value),
however, the individual is not objectified in his natural quality, but
in a social quality (relation) which is, at the same time, external to
him.

Money _posited_ in the form of the medium of circulation is _coin_
[_Münze_]. As coin, it has lost its use value as such; its use value is
identical with its quality as medium of circulation. For example, it has
to be melted down before it can serve as money as such. It has to be
demonetized. That is why the coin is also only a _symbol_ whose material
is irrelevant. But, as coin, it also loses its universal character, and
adopts a national, local one. It decomposes into coin of different
kinds, according to the material of which it consists, gold, copper,
silver, etc. It acquires a political title, and talks, as it were, a
different language in different countries. Finally, within a single
country it acquires different denominations, etc. Money in its third
quality, as something which _autonomously_ arises out of and stands
against circulation, therefore still negates its character as coin. It
reappears as gold and silver, whether it is melted down or whether it is
valued only according to its gold and silver weight-content. It also
loses its national character again, and serves as medium of exchange
between the nations, as universal medium of exchange, no longer as a
symbol, but rather as a definite amount of gold and silver. In the most
developed international system of exchange, therefore, gold and silver
reappear in exactly the same form in which they already played a role in
primitive barter. Gold and silver, like exchange itself originally,
appear, as already noted, not within the sphere of a social community,
but where it ends, on its boundary; on the few points of its contact
with alien communities. Gold (or silver) now appears posited as the
_commodity_ as such, the universal commodity, which obtains its
character as commodity in all places. Only in this way is it the
material representative of _general_ wealth. In the Mercantilist System,
therefore, gold and silver count as the measure of the power of the
different communities. ‘As soon as the precious metals become objects of
commerce, an universal equivalent for everything, they also become the
measure of power between nations. Hence the Mercantilist System.’
(Steuart.) [3] No matter how much the modern economists imagine
themselves beyond Mercantilism, in periods of general crisis gold and
silver still appear in precisely this role, in 1857 as much as in 1600.
In this character, gold and silver play an important role in the
creation of the world market. Thus the circulation of American silver
from the West to the East; the metallic band between America and Europe
on one side, with Asia on the other side, since the beginning of the
modern epoch. With the original communities this trade in gold and
silver was only a peripheral concern, connected with excess production,
like exchange as a whole. But in developed trade it is posited as a
moment essentially interconnected with production etc. as a whole. It no
longer appears for the purpose of exchanging the excess production but
to balance it out as part of the total process of international
commodity exchange. It is coin, now, only as _world coin._ But, as such,
its formal character as medium of circulation is essentially irrelevant,
while its material is everything. As a form, in this function, gold and
silver remain the universally acceptable _commodity,_ the commodity as
such.

(In this first section, where exchange values, money, prices are looked
at, commodities always appear as already present. The determination of
forms is simple. We know that they express aspects of social production,
but the latter itself is the precondition. However, they are _not
posited_ in this character [of being aspects of social production]. And
thus, in fact, the first exchange appears as exchange of the superfluous
only, and it does not seize hold of and determine the whole of
production. It is the _available_ overflow of an overall production
which lies outside the world of exchange values. This still presents
itself even on the surface of developed society as the directly
available world of commodities. But by itself, it points beyond itself
towards the economic relations which are posited as _relations of
production._ The internal structure of production therefore forms the
second section; the concentration of the whole in the state the third;
the international relation the fourth; the world market the conclusion,
in which production is posited as a totality together with all its
moments, but within which, at the same time, all contradictions come
into play. The world market then, again, forms the presupposition of the
whole as well as its substratum. Crises are then the general intimation
which points beyond the presupposition, and the urge which drives
towards the adoption of a new historic form.) ‘The quantity of goods and
the quantity of money may remain the same, and price may rise or fall
notwithstanding’ (namely through greater expenditure, e.g. by the
moneyed capitalists, landowners, state officials etc. Malthus, X, 43).
[4]

Money, as we have seen, in the form in which it independently steps
outside of and against circulation, is the negation (negative unity) of
its character as medium of circulation and measure. * We have developed,
so far:

* In so far as money is a medium of circulation, ‘the quantity of it
which circulates can never be employed individually; it must always
circulate’. (Storch.) The individual can employ money only by divesting
himself of it, by positing it as _being for others,_ in its social
function. This, as Storch correctly remarks, is a reason why the
material of money ‘should not be indispensable to human existence’, in
the manner of such things as hides, salt, etc., which serve for money
among some peoples. For the quantity that is in circulation is lost to
consumption. Hence, firstly, metals [enjoy] preference over other
commodities as money, and secondly, the precious metals preference over
those which useful as instruments of production. It is characteristic of
the economists that Storch expresses this thusly: the material of money
should should ‘have direct value but on the basis of an _artificial
need_‘. Artificial need is what the economist calls, firstly, the needs
which arise out of the _social_ existence of the individual; secondly,
those which do not flow from its naked existence as a natural object.
This shows the inner, desperate poverty which forms the basis of
bourgeois wealth and of its science.

_Firstly._ Money is the negation of the medium of circulation as such,
of the _coin._ But it also contains the latter at the same time as an
aspect, negatively, since it can always be transformed into coin;
positively, as _world coin,_ but, as such, its formal character is
irrelevant, and it is essentially a commodity as such, the omnipresent
commodity, not determined by location. This indifference is expressed in
a double way: _Firstly because_ it is now money only as gold and as
silver, not as _symbol,_ not in the form of the coin. For that reason
the _face_ which the state impresses on money as coin has no value; only
its metal content has value. Even in domestic commerce it has a merely
temporary, local value, ‘because it is no more useful to him who owns it
than to him who owns the commodity to be bought’. The more domestic
commerce is conditioned on all sides by foreign commerce, the more,
therefore, does the value of this face vanish: it does not exist in
private exchange, but appears only as tax. _Then:_ in their capacity as
_general_ commodity, as world coin, the return of gold and silver to
their point of departure, and, more generally, circulation as such, are
not necessary. _Example:_ Asia and Europe. Hence the wailings of the
upholders of the Monetary System, that money disappears among the
heathen without flowing back again. (See Misselden about 1600.) [5] The
more external circulation is conditioned and enveloped by internal, the
more does the world coin as such come into circulation (rotation). This
higher stage is yet no concern of ours and is not contained in the
simple relation which we are considering here.

_Secondly_: Money is the negation of itself as mere realization of the
prices of commodities, where the particular commodity always remains
what is essential. It becomes, rather, the price realized in itself and,
as such, the _material representative of wealth_ as well as the _general
form of wealth_ in relation to all commodities, as merely particular
substances of it; but

_Thirdly:_ Money is also negated in the aspect in which it is merely the
_measure_ of exchange values. As the general form of wealth and as its
material representative, it is no longer the ideal measure of other
things, of exchange values. For it is itself the adequate [_adäquat_]
reality of exchange value, and this it is in its metallic being. Here
the character of measure has to be posited in it. It is its own unit;
and the measure of its value, the measure of itself as wealth, as
exchange value, is the quantity of itself which it represents. The
multiple of an amount of itself which serves as unit. As measure, its
amount was irrelevant; as medium of circulation, its materiality, the
matter of the unit, was irrelevant: as money in this third role, the
amount of itself as of a definite quantity of material is essential. If
its quality as general wealth is given, then there is no difference
within it, other than the quantitative. It represents a greater or
lesser amount of general wealth according to whether its given unit is
possessed in a greater or lesser quantity. If it is general wealth, then
one is the richer the more of it one possesses, and the only important
process, for the individual as well as the nation, is to pile it up
[_Anhäufen_]. In keeping with this role, it was seen as that which steps
outside circulation. Now this withdrawing of money from circulation, and
_storing it up,_ appears as the essential object [_Gegenstand_] of the
drive to wealth and as the essential process of becoming wealthy. In
gold and silver, I possess general wealth in its tangible form, and the
more of it I pile up, the more general wealth do I appropriate. If gold
and silver represent general wealth, then, as specific quantities, they
represent it only to a degree which is definite, but which is capable of
indefinite expansion. This accumulation [6] of gold and silver, which
presents itself as their repeated withdrawal from circulation, is at the
same time the act of bringing general wealth into safety and away from
circulation, in which it is constantly lost in exchange for some
particular wealth which ultimately disappears in consumption.

Among all the peoples of antiquity, the piling-up of gold and silver
appears at first as a priestly and royal privilege, since the god and
king of commodities pertains only to gods and kings. Only they deserve
to possess wealth as such. This accumulation, then, occurs on one side
merely to display overabundance, i.e. wealth as an extraordinary thing,
for use on Sundays only; to provide gifts for temples and their gods; to
finance public works of art; finally as _security_ in case of extreme
necessity, to buy arms etc. Later in antiquity, this accumulation
becomes political. The _state treasury_, as reserve fund, and the temple
are the original banks in which this holy of holies is preserved.
Heaping-up and accumulating attain their ultimate development in the
modern banks, but here with a further-developed character. On the other
side, among private individuals, accumulation takes place for the
purpose of bringing wealth into safety from the caprices of the external
world in a tangible form in which it can be _buried_ etc., in short, in
which it enters into a wholly _secret_ relation to the individual. This,
still on a large historical scale, in Asia. Repeats itself in every
panic, war etc. in bourgeois society, which then falls back into
barbaric conditions. Like the accumulation of gold etc. as ornament and
ostentation among semi-barbarians. But a very large and constantly
growing part of it withdrawn from circulation as an object of luxury in
the most developed bourgeois society. (See Jacob etc.) [7] As
representative of general wealth, it is precisely its retention without
abandoning it to circulation and employing it for particular needs,
which is proof of the wealth of individuals; and to the degree that
money develops in its various roles, i.e. that wealth as such becomes
the general measure of the worth of individuals, [there develops] the
drive to display it, hence the display of gold and silver as
representatives of wealth; in the same way, Herr v. Rothschild displays
as his proper emblem, I think, two banknotes of £100,000 each, mounted
in a frame. The barbarian display of gold etc. is only a more naïve form
of this modern one, since it takes place with less regard to gold as
money. Here still the simple _glitter_. There a premeditated point. The
point being that it is _not_ used as money; here the form antithetical
to circulation is what is important.

The accumulation of all other commodities is less ancient than that of
gold and silver: (1) because of their perishability. Metals as such
represent the enduring, relative to the other commodities; they are also
accumulated by preference because of their greater rarity and their
exceptional character as the instruments of production _par excellence._
The precious metals, because not oxidized by the air, are again more
durable than the other metals. What other commodities lose is their
form; but this form is what gives them their exchange value, while their
use value consists in overcoming this form, in consuming it. With money,
on the other hand, its substance, its materiality, is itself its form,
in which it represents wealth. If money appears as the general commodity
in all places, so also does it in all times. It maintains itself as
wealth at all times. Its specific durability. It is the treasure which
neither rust nor moths eat up. All commodities are only transitory
money; money is the permanent commodity. Money is the omnipresent
commodity; the commodity is only local money. But accumulation is
essentially a process which takes place in time. In this connection,
Petty says:

‘The great and ultimate effect of trade is not wealth as such, but
preferably an overabundance of silver, gold and jewels, which are not
_perishable,_ nor as _fickle_ as other commodities, but are wealth in
all times and all places. A superfluity of wine, grain, poultry, meat
etc. is wealth, but _hic et nunc_ … Therefore the production of those
commodities and the effects of that trade which endow a land with gold
and silver are advantageous above others.’ (p. 3.) ‘If taxes take money
from one who eats or drinks it up, and give it to one who employs it in
improving the land, in fisheries, in the working of mines, in
manufactures or even in clothing, then for the community there is always
an advantage; for even clothes are not as perishable as meals; if in the
furnishing of houses, even more; in the building of houses yet more; in
the improvement of land, working of mines, fisheries, more again; the
most of all, when employed so as to bring gold and silver into the
country, for these things alone _do not pass away_, but are prized at
all times and in all places as wealth.’ (p. 5.) [8] Thus a writer of the
seventeenth century. One sees how the piling-up of gold and silver
gained its true stimulus with the conception of it as the material
representative and general form of wealth. The cult of money has its
asceticism, its self-denial, its self-sacrifice – economy and frugality,
contempt for mundane, temporal and fleeting pleasures; the chase after
the _eternal_ treasure. Hence the connection between English Puritanism,
or also Dutch Protestantism, and money-making. A writer of the beginning
of the seventeenth century (Misselden) expresses the matter quite
unselfconsciously as follows:

‘The natural material of commerce is the commodity, the artificial is
money. Although money by nature and in time comes after the commodity,
it has become, in present custom, the most important thing.’ He compares
this to the two sons of old Jacob: Jacob placed his right hand on the
younger and his left on the older son. (p. 24.) ‘We consume among us too
great an excess of wines from Spain, France, the Rhine, the Levant, the
Islands: raisins from Spain, currants from the Levant, cambrics from
Hainault and the Netherlands, the silkenware of Italy, the sugar and
tobacco of the West Indies, the spices of East India; all this is not
necessary for us, but is paid for in _hard_ money … If less of the
foreign and more of the domestic product were sold, then the difference
would have to come to us in the form of gold and silver, as treasure.’
(loc. cit.) [9] The modern economists naturally make merry at the
expense of this sort of notion in the general section of books on
economics. But when one considers the anxiety involved in the doctrine
of money in particular, and the feverish fear with which, in practice,
the inflow and outflow of gold and silver are watched in times of
crisis, then it is evident that the aspect of money which the followers
of the Monetary and Mercantilist System conceived in an artless
one-sidedness is still to be taken seriously, not only in the mind, but
as a real economic category.

The antithesis between the real needs of production and this supremacy
of money is presented most forcibly in Boisguillebert. (See the striking
passages in my Notebook.) [10]

(2) The accumulation of other commodities, their perishability apart,
essentially different in two ways from the accumulation of gold and
silver, which are here identical with money. First, the accumulation of
other commodities does not have the character of accumulating wealth in
general, but of accumulating particular wealth, and it is therefore
itself a particular act of production; here simple accumulation will not
do. To accumulate grain requires special stores etc. Accumulating sheep
does not make one into a shepherd; to accumulate slaves or land requires
relations of domination and subordination etc. All this, then, requires
acts and relations distinct from simple accumulation, from increase of
wealth as such. On the other hand, in order then to realize the
accumulated commodity in the form of general wealth, to appropriate
wealth in all its particular forms, I have to engage in trade with the
particular commodity I have accumulated, I have to be a grain merchant,
cattle merchant, etc. Money as the _general_ representative of wealth
absolves me of this.

The accumulation of gold and silver, of money, is the first historic
appearance of the gathering-together of capital and the first great
means thereto; but, as such, it is not yet accumulation of capital. For
that, the re-entry of what has been accumulated into circulation would
itself have to be posited as the moment and the means of accumulation.

Money in its final, completed character now appears in all directions as
a contradiction, a contradiction which dissolves itself, drives towards
its own dissolution. As the _general form of wealth,_ the whole world of
real riches stands opposite it. It is their pure abstraction – hence,
fixated as such, a mere conceit. Where wealth as such seems to appear in
an entirely material, tangible form, its existence is only in my head,
it is a pure fantasy. Midas. On the other side, as _material
representative of general wealth,_ it is realized only by being thrown
back into circulation, to disappear in exchange for the singular,
particular modes of wealth. It remains in circulation, as medium of
circulation; but for the accumulating individual, it is lost, and this
disappearance is the only possible way to secure it as wealth. To
dissolve the things accumulated in individual gratifications is to
realize them. The money may then be again stored up by other
individuals, but then the same process begins anew. I can really posit
its being for myself only by giving it up as mere being for others. If I
want to cling to it, it evaporates in my hand to become a mere phantom
of real wealth. Further: [the notion that] to accumulate it is to
increase it, [since] its own quantity is the measure of its value, turns
out again to be false. If the other riches do not [also] accumulate,
then it loses its value in the measure in which it is accumulated. What
appears as its increase is in fact its decrease. Its independence is a
mere semblance; its independence of circulation exists only in view of
circulation, exists as dependence on it. It pretends to be the general
commodity, but because of its natural particularity it is again a
particular commodity, whose value depends both on demand and supply, and
on variations in its specific costs of production. And since it is
incarnated in gold and silver, it becomes one-sided in every real form;
so that when the one appears as money, the other appears as particular
commodity, and vice versa, and in this way each appears in both aspects.
As absolutely secure wealth, entirely independent of my individuality,
it is at the same time, because it is something completely external to
me, the absolutely insecure, which can be separated from me by any
accident. Similarly, it has entirely contradictory qualities as measure,
as medium of circulation, and as money as such. Finally, in the
last-mentioned character, it also contradicts itself because it must
represent value as such; but represents in fact only a constant amount
of fluctuating value. It therefore suspends itself as _completed_
exchange value.

As mere measure it already contains its own negation as medium of
circulation; as medium of circulation and measure, as money. To negate
it in the last quality is therefore at the same time to negate it in the
two earlier ones. If negated as the mere _general form of wealth_, it
must then realize itself in the particular substances of real wealth;
but in the process of proving itself really to be the _material
representative_ of the totality of wealth, it must at the same time
preserve itself as the general form. Its very entry into circulation
must be a moment of its staying at home [_Beisichbleiben_], and its
staying at home must be an entry into circulation. That is to say that
as realized exchange value it must be simultaneously posited as the
process in which exchange value is realized. This is at the same time
the negation of itself as a purely objective form, as a form of wealth
external and accidental to individuals. It must appear, rather, as the
production of wealth; and wealth must appear as the result of the mutual
relations among individuals in production. Exchange value is now
characterized, therefore, no longer simply as a thing for which
circulation is only an external movement, or which appears individually
in a particular material: [but rather] as relation to itself through the
process of circulation. On the other side, circulation itself is no
longer [qualified] merely as the simple process of exchanging
commodities for money and money for commodities, merely as the mediating
movement by which the prices of the various commodities are realized,
are equated as exchange values, with both [commodities and money]
appearing as external to circulation: the presupposed exchange value,
the ultimate withdrawal of the commodity into consumption, hence the
destruction of exchange value, on one side, and the withdrawal of the
money, its achievement of independence _vis-à-vis_ its substance, which
is again another form of its destruction [on the other]. [Rather,]
exchange value itself, and now no longer exchange value in general, but
measured exchange value, has to appear as a presupposition posited by
circulation itself, and, as posited by it, its presupposition. The
process of circulation must also and equally appear as the process of
the production of exchange values. It is thus, on one side, the
regression of exchange value into labour, on the other side, that of
money into exchange value, which is now posited, however, in a more
profound character. With circulation, the determined price is
presupposed, and circulation as money posits it only formally. The
_determinateness_ of exchange value itself, or the measure of price,
must now itself appear as an act of circulation. Posited in this way,
exchange value is _capital_, and circulation is posited at the same time
as an act of production.

_To be brought forward_: In circulation, as it appears as money
circulation, the simultaneity of both poles of exchange is always
presupposed. But a difference of time may appear between the existence
of the commodities to be exchanged. It may lie in the nature of
reciprocal services that a service is performed today, but the service
required in return can be performed only after a year etc. ‘In the
majority of contracts,’ says Senior, ‘only one of the contracting
parties has the thing available and lends it; and if exchange is to take
place, one party has to cede it immediately on the condition of
receiving the equivalent only in a later period. Since, however, the
value of all things changes in a given space of time, the means of
payment employed is that thing whose value varies least, and which
maintains a given average capacity to buy things for the longest time.
Thus money becomes _the expression or the representative_ of value.’
[11] According to this there would be no connection at all between the
latter quality of money and the former. But this is wrong. Only when
money is posited as the autonomous representative of value do contracts
cease to be valued e.g. in quantities of grain or in services to be
performed. (The latter was current e.g. in feudalism.) It is merely a
notion held by Mr Senior that money has a ‘longer average capacity’ to
maintain its value. The fact is that it is employed as the general
material of contracts (_general commodity of contracts,_ says Bailey)
[12] because it is the _general commodity,_ the _representative of
general wealth_ (says Storch), [13] because it is _exchange value become
independent._ Money has to be already very developed in its two earlier
functions before it can appear generally in this role. Now it turns out
in fact that, although the quantity of money remains uniformly the same,
its value changes: that, in general, as a specific amount, it is subject
to the mutability of all values. Here its nature as a particular
commodity comes to the fore against its general character. To money as
measure, this change is irrelevant, for ‘in a changing medium, two
different relations to the same thing can always be expressed, just as
well as in a constant medium’. [14] As medium of circulation it is also
irrelevant, since its quantity as such is set by the measure. But as
_money_ in the form in which it appears in contracts, this is essential,
just as, in general, its contradictions come to the fore in this role.

In separate sections, to be brought forward:

(1) _Money as coin._ This very summarily about coinage. (2) Historically
the sources of gold and silver. Discoveries etc. The history of their
production. (3) Causes of the variations in the value of the precious
metals and hence of metallic money; effects of this variation on
industry and the different classes. (4) _Above all:_ quantity of
circulation in relation to rise and fall of prices. (Sixteenth century.
Nineteenth century.) Along the way, to be seen also how it is affected
as measure by rising quantity etc. (5) About circulation: velocity,
necessary amount, effect of circulation; more, less developed etc. (6)
Solvent effect of money.

(_This to be brought forward._) (Herein the specific economic
investigations.)

(The specific gravity of gold and silver, to contain much weight in a
relatively small volume, as compared with other metals, repeats itself
in the world of values so that it contains much value (labour time) in
relatively small volume. The labour time, exchange value realized in it,
is the specific weight of the commodity. This makes the precious metals
particularly suited for service in circulation (since one can carry a
significant amount of value in the pocket) and for accumulation, since
one can secure and stockpile a great amount of value in a small space.
Gold does not turn into something else in the process, like iron, lead
etc. Remains what it is.)

‘If Spain had never owned the mines of Mexico and Peru, it would never
have had need of the grain of Poland.’ (Ravenstone.) [15]

_‘Illi unum consilium habent et virtutem et potestatem suam bestiae
tradent … Et ne quis posset emere aut vendere, nisi qui habet
characterem aut nomen bestiae, aut numerum nominis ejus.’_ (_Apocalypse.
Vulgate._) [16] ‘The correlative quantities of commodities which are
given for one another, constitute the price of the commodity.’ (Storch.)
‘Price is the degree of exchangeable value.’ (loc cit.) [17]

As we have seen, in simple circulation as such (exchange value in its
movement), the action of the individuals on one another is, in its
content, only a reciprocal, self-interested satisfaction of their needs;
in its form, [it is] exchange among equals (equivalents). Property, too,
is still posited here only as the appropriation of the product of labour
by labour, and of the product of alien labour by one’s own labour, in so
far as the product of one’s own labour is bought by alien labour.
Property in alien labour is mediated by the equivalent of one’s own
labour. This form of property – quite like freedom and equality – is
posited in this simple relation. In the further development of exchange
value this will be transformed, and it will ultimately be shown that
private property in the product of one’s own labour is identical with
the separation of labour and property, so that labour will create alien
property and property will command alien labour.

 



THE CHAPTER ON CAPITAL ^([18])


‘From the beginnings of civilization, men have fixed the exchange value
of the products of their labour not by comparison with the _products
offered in exchange,_ but by comparison with a product they preferred.’
(Ganilh, 13,9.) [19]

_Simple exchange._ Relations between exchangers. _Harmonies of equality, freedom, etc. (Bastiat, Proudhon)_

The special difficulty in grasping money in its fully developed
character as money – a difficulty which political economy attempts to
evade by forgetting now one, now another aspect, and by appealing to one
aspect when confronted with another – is that a social relation, a
definite relation between individuals, here appears as a metal, a stone,
as a purely physical, external thing which can be found, as such, in
nature, and which is indistinguishable in form from its natural
existence. Gold and silver, in and of themselves, are not money. Nature
does not produce money, any more than it produces a rate of exchange or
a banker. In Peru and Mexico gold and silver did not serve as money,
although it does appear here as jewellery, and there is a developed
system of production. To be money is not a natural attribute of gold and
silver, and is therefore quite unknown to the physicist, chemist etc. as
such. But money is directly gold and silver. Regarded as a measure,
money still predominates in its formal quality; even more so as coin,
where this appears externally on its face impression; but in its third
aspect, i.e. in its perfection, where to be measure and coinage appear
as functions of money alone, there all formal character has vanished, or
directly coincides with its metallic existence. It is not at all
apparent on its face that its character of being money is merely the
result of social processes; it _is_ money. This is all the more
difficult since its immediate use value for the living individual stands
in no relation whatever to this role, and because, in general, the
memory of use value, distinct from exchange value, has become entirely
extinguished in this incarnation of pure exchange value. Thus the
fundamental contradiction contained in exchange value, and in the social
mode of production corresponding to it, here emerges in all its purity.
We have already criticized the attempts made to overcome this
contradiction by depriving money of its metallic form, by positing it
outwardly, as well, as something _posited_ by society, as the expression
of a social relation, whose ultimate form would be that of labour-money.
It must by now have become entirely clear that this is a piece of
foolishness as long as exchange value is retained as the basis, and
that, moreover, the illusion that metallic money allegedly falsifies
exchange arises out of total ignorance of its nature. It is equally
clear, on the other side, that to the degree to which opposition against
the ruling relations of production grows, and these latter themselves
push ever more forcibly to cast off their old skin – to that degree,
polemics are directed against metallic money or money in general, as the
most striking, most contradictory and hardest phenomenon which is
presented by the system in a palpable form. One or another kind of
artful tinkering with money is then supposed to overcome the
contradictions of which money is merely the perceptible appearance.
Equally clear that some revolutionary operations can be performed with
money, in so far as an attack on it seems to leave everything else as it
was, and only to rectify it. Then one strikes a blow at the sack,
intending the donkey. However, as long as the donkey does not feel the
blows on the sack, one hits in fact only the sack and not the donkey. As
soon as he feels it, one strikes the donkey and not the sack. As long as
these operations are directed against money as such, they are merely an
attack on consequences whose causes remain unaffected; i.e. disturbance
of the productive process, whose solid basis then also has the power, by
means of a more or less violent reaction, to define and to dominate
these as mere passing _disturbances_.

On the other hand, it is in the character of the money relation – as far
as it is developed in its purity to this point, and without regard to
more highly developed relations of production – that all inherent
contradictions of bourgeois society appear extinguished in money
relations as conceived in a simple form; and bourgeois democracy even
more than the bourgeois economists takes refuge in this aspect (the
latter are at least consistent enough to regress to even simpler aspects
of exchange value and exchange) in order to construct apologetics for
the existing economic relations. Indeed, in so far as the commodity or
labour is conceived of only as exchange value, and the relation in which
the various commodities are brought into connection with one another is
conceived as the exchange of these exchange values with one another, as
their equation, then the individuals, the subjects between whom this
process goes on, are simply and only conceived of as exchangers. As far
as the formal character is concerned, there is absolutely no distinction
between them, and this is the economic character, the aspect in which
they stand towards one another in the exchange relation; it is the
indicator of their social function or social relation towards one
another. Each of the subjects is an exchanger; i.e. each has the same
social relation towards the other that the other has towards him. As
subjects of exchange, their relation is therefore that of equality. It
is impossible to find any trace of distinction, not to speak of
contradiction, between them; not even a difference. Furthermore, the
commodities which they exchange are, as exchange values, equivalent, or
at least count as such (the most that could happen would be a subjective
error in the reciprocal appraisal of values, and if one individual, say,
cheated the other, this would _happen not because of the nature of the
social function in which they confront one another,_ for this is _the
same_, in this they are _equal_; but only because of natural cleverness,
persuasiveness etc., in short only the purely individual superiority of
one individual over another. The difference would be one of natural
origin, irrelevant to the nature of the relation as such, and it may be
said in anticipation of further development, the difference is even
lessened and robbed of its original force by competition etc.). As
regards the pure form, the economic side of this relation – the content,
outside this form, here still falls entirely outside economics, or is
posited as a natural content distinct from the economic, a content about
which it may be said that it is still entirely separated from the
economic relation because it still directly coincides with it – then
only three moments emerge as formally distinct: the subjects of the
relation, _the exchangers_ (posited in the same character); the objects
of their exchange, exchange values, _equivalents_, which not only are
equal but are expressly supposed to be equal, and are posited as equal;
and finally the act of exchange itself, the mediation by which the
subjects are posited as exchangers, equals, and their objects as
equivalents, equal. The equivalents are the objectification
[_Vergegenständlichung_] of one subject for another; i.e. they
themselves are of equal worth, and assert themselves in the act of
exchange as equally worthy, and at the same time as mutually
indifferent. The subjects in exchange exist for one another only through
these equivalents, as of equal worth, and prove themselves to be such
through the exchange of the objectivity in which the one exists for the
other. Since they only exist for one another in exchange in this way, as
equally worthy persons, possessors of equivalent things, who thereby
prove their equivalence, they are, as equals, at the same time also
indifferent to one another; whatever other individual distinction there
may be does not concern them; they are indifferent to all their other
individual peculiarities. Now, as regards the content outside the act of
exchange (an act which constitutes the positing as well as the proving
of the exchange values and of the subjects as exchangers), this content,
which falls outside the specifically economic form, can only be: (1) The
natural particularity of the commodity being exchanged. (2) The
particular natural need of the exchangers, or, both together, the
different use values of the commodities being exchanged. The content of
the exchange, which lies altogether outside its economic character, far
from endangering the social equality of individuals, rather makes their
natural difference into the basis of their social equality. If
individual A had the same need as individual B, and if both had realized
their labour in the same object, then no relation whatever would be
present between them; considering only their production, they would not
be different individuals at all. Both have the need to breathe; for both
the air exists as atmosphere; this brings them into no social contact;
as breathing individuals they relate to one another only as natural
bodies, not as persons. Only the differences between their needs and
between their production gives rise to exchange and to their social
equation in exchange; these natural differences are therefore the
precondition of their social equality in the act of exchange, and of
this relation in general, in which they relate to one another as
productive. Regarded from the standpoint of the natural difference
between them, individual A exists as the owner of a use value for B, and
B as owner of a use value for A. In this respect, their natural
difference again puts them reciprocally into the relation of equality.
In this respect, however, they are not indifferent to one another, but
integrate with one another, have need of one another; so that individual
B, as objectified in the commodity, is a need of individual A, and vice
versa; so that they stand not only in an equal, but also in a social,
relation to one another. This is not all. The fact that this need on the
part of one can be satisfied by the product of the other, and vice
versa, and that the one is capable of producing the object of the need
of the other, and that each confronts the other as owner of the object
of the other’s need, this proves that each of them reaches beyond his
own particular need etc., as a _human being_, and that they relate to
one another as human beings; that their common species-being
[_Gattungswesen_] is acknowledged by all. It does not happen elsewhere –
that elephants produce for tigers, or animals for other animals. For
example. A hive of bees comprises at bottom only one bee, and they all
produce the same thing. Further. In so far as these natural differences
among individuals and among their commodities (products, labour etc. are
not as yet different here, but exist only in the form of commodities,
or, as Mr Bastiat prefers, following Say, _services_ [20]; Bastiat
fancies that, by reducing the economic character of exchange value to
its natural content, commodity or service, and thereby showing himself
incapable of grasping the economic relation of exchange value as such,
he has progressed a great step beyond the classical economists of the
English school, who are capable of grasping the relations of production
in their specificity, as such, in their pure form) form the motive for
the integration of these individuals, for their social interrelation as
exchangers, in which they are _stipulated_ for each other as, and
_prove_ themselves to be, equals, there enters, in addition to the
quality of equality, that of _freedom_. Although individual A feels a
need for the commodity of individual B, he does not appropriate it by
force, nor vice versa, but rather they recognize one another
reciprocally as proprietors, as persons whose will penetrates their
commodities. Accordingly, the juridical moment of the Person enters
here, as well as that of freedom, in so far as it is contained in the
former. No one seizes hold of another’s property by force. Each divests
himself of his property voluntarily. But this is not all: individual A
serves the need of individual B by means of the commodity _a_ only in so
far as and because individual B serves the need of individual A by means
of the commodity _b_, and vice versa. Each serves the other in order to
serve himself; each makes use of the other, reciprocally, as his means.
Now both things are contained in the consciousness of the two
individuals: (1) that each arrives at his end only in so far as he
serves the other as means; (2) that each becomes means for the other
(being for another) [_Sein für andres_] only as end in himself (being
for self) [Sein für sich] [21]; (3) that the reciprocity in which each
is at the same time means and end, and attains his end only in so far as
he becomes a means, and becomes a means only in so far as he posits
himself as end, that each thus posits himself as being for another, in
so far as he is being for self, and the other as being for him, in so
far as he is being for himself – that this reciprocity is a necessary
fact, presupposed as natural precondition of exchange, but that, as
such, it is irrelevant to each of the two subjects in exchange, and that
this reciprocity interests him only in so far as it satisfies his
interest to the exclusion of, without reference to, that of the other.
That is, the common interest which appears as the motive of the act as a
whole is recognized as a fact by both sides; but, as such, it is not the
motive, but rather proceeds, as it were, behind the back of these
self-reflected particular interests, behind the back of one individual’s
interest in opposition to that of the other. In this last respect, the
individual can at most have the consoling awareness that the
satisfaction of his antithetical individual interest is precisely the
realization of the suspended antithesis, of the social, general
interest. Out of the act of exchange itself, the individual, each one of
them, is reflected in himself as its exclusive and dominant
(determinant) subject. With that, then, the complete freedom of the
individual is posited: voluntary transaction; no force on either side;
positing of the self as means, or as serving, only as means, in order to
posit the self as end in itself, as dominant and primary
[_übergreifend_]; finally, the self-seeking interest which brings
nothing of a higher order to realization; the other is also recognized
and acknowledged as one who likewise realizes his self-seeking interest,
so that both know that the common interest exists only in the duality,
many-sidedness, and autonomous development of the exchanges between
self-seeking interests. The general interest is precisely the generality
of self-seeking interests. Therefore, when the economic form, exchange,
posits the all-sided equality of its subjects, then the content, the
individual as well as the objective material which drives towards the
exchange, is _freedom_. Equality and freedom are thus not only respected
in exchange based on exchange values but, also, the exchange of exchange
values is the productive, real basis of all _equality_ and _freedom._ As
pure ideas they are merely the idealized expressions of this basis; as
developed in juridical, political, social relations, they are merely
this basis to a higher power. And so it has been in history. Equality
and freedom as developed to this extent are exactly the opposite of the
freedom and equality in the world of antiquity, where developed exchange
value was not their basis, but where, rather, the development of that
basis destroyed them. Equality and freedom presuppose relations of
production as yet unrealized in the ancient world and in the Middle
Ages. Direct forced labour is the foundation of the ancient world; the
community rests on this as its foundation; labour itself as a
‘privilege’, as still particularized, not yet generally producing
exchange values, is the basis of the world of the Middle Ages. Labour is
neither forced labour; nor, as in the second case, does it take place
with respect to a common, higher unit (the guild).

Now, it is admittedly correct that the [relation between those] engaged
in exchange, in so far as their motives are concerned, i.e. as regards
natural motives falling outside the economic process, does also rest on
a certain compulsion; but this is, on one side, itself only the other’s
indifference to my need as such, to my natural individuality, hence his
equality with me and his freedom, which are at the same time the
precondition of my own; on the other side, if I am determined, forced,
by my needs, it is only my own nature, this totality of needs and
drives, which exerts a force upon me; it is nothing alien (or, my
_interest_ posited in a general, reflected form). But it is, after all,
precisely in this way that I exercise compulsion ever the other and
drive him into the exchange system.

In Roman law, the _servus_ is therefore correctly defined as one who may
not enter into exchange for the purpose of acquiring anything for
himself (see the _Institutes_). [22] It is, consequently, equally clear
that although this legal system corresponds to a social state in which
exchange was by no means developed, nevertheless, in so far as it was
developed in a limited sphere, it was able to develop the _attributes of
the juridical person, precisely of the individual engaged in exchange_,
and thus anticipate (in its basic aspects) the legal relations of
industrial society, and in particular the right which rising bourgeois
society had necessarily to assert against medieval society. But the
development of this right itself coincides completely with the
dissolution of the Roman community.

Since money is only the realization of exchange value, and since the
system of exchange values has realized itself only in a developed money
system, or inversely, the money system can indeed only be the
realization of this system of freedom and equality. As measure, money
only gives the equivalent its specific expression, makes it into an
equivalent in form, as well. A distinction of form does, it is true,
arise within circulation: the two exchangers appear in the different
roles of buyer and seller; exchange value appears once in its general
form, in the form of money, then again in its particular form, in the
natural commodity, now with a price; but, first of all, these forms
alternate; circulation itself creates not a disequation, but only an
equation, a suspension of the merely negated difference. The inequality
is only a purely formal one. Finally, even equality now posits itself
tangibly, in money as medium of circulation, where it appears now in one
hand, now in another, and is indifferent to this appearance. Each
appears towards the other as an owner of money, and, as regards the
process of exchange, as money itself. Thus indifference and equal
worthiness are expressly contained in the form of the thing. The
particular natural difference which was contained in the commodity is
extinguished, and constantly becomes extinguished by circulation. A
worker who buys commodities for 3s. appears to the seller in the same
function, in the same equality – in the form of 3s. – as the king who
does the same. All distinction between them is extinguished. The seller
_qua_ seller appears only as owner of a commodity of the price of 3s.,
so that both are completely equal; only that the 3s. exist here in the
form of silver, there again in the form of sugar, etc. In the third form
of money, a distinguishing quality might seem to enter between the
subjects of the process. But in so far as money here appears as the
material, as the general commodity of contracts, all distinction between
the contracting parties is, rather, extinguished. In so far as money,
the general form of wealth, becomes the object of accumulation, the
subject here appears to withdraw it from circulation only to the extent
that he does not withdraw commodities of an equal price from
circulation. Thus, if one individual accumulates and the other does not,
then none does it at the expense of the other. One enjoys real wealth,
the other takes possession of wealth in its general form. If one grows
impoverished and the other grows wealthier, then this is of their own
free will and does not in any way arise from the economic relation, the
economic connection as such, in which they are placed in relation to one
another. Even inheritance and similar legal relations, which perpetuate
such inequalities, do not prejudice this natural freedom and equality.
If individual A’s relation is not in contradiction to this system
originally, then such a contradiction can surely not arise from the fact
that individual B steps into the place of individual A, thus
perpetuating him. This is, rather, the perpetuation of the social
relation beyond one man’s natural lifespan: its reinforcement against
the chance influences of nature, whose effects as such would in fact be
a suspension of individual freedom. Moreover, since the individual in
this relation is merely the individuation of money, therefore he is, as
such, just as immortal as money, and his representation by heirs is the
logical extension of this role.

If this way of conceiving the matter is not advanced in its historic
context, but is instead raised as a refutation of the more developed
economic relations in which individuals relate to one another no longer
merely as exchangers or as buyers and sellers, but in specific
relations, no longer all of the same character; then it is the same as
if it were asserted that there is no difference, to say nothing of
antithesis and contradiction, between natural bodies, because all of
them, when looked at from e.g. the point of view of their weight, have
weight, and are therefore equal; or are equal because all of them occupy
three dimensions. Exchange value itself is here similarly seized upon in
its simple character, as the antithesis to its more developed,
contradictory forms. In the course of science, it is just these abstract
attributes which appear as the earliest and sparsest; they appear in
part historically in this fashion, too; the more developed as the more
recent. In present bourgeois society as a whole, this positing of prices
and their circulation etc. appears as the surface process, beneath
which, however, in the depths, entirely different processes go on, in
which this apparent individual equality and liberty disappear. It is
forgotten, on one side, that the _presupposition_ of exchange value, as
the objective basis of the whole of the system of production, already in
itself implies compulsion over the individual, since his immediate
product is not a product for him, but only _becomes_ such in the social
process, and since it _must_ take on this general but nevertheless
external form; and that the individual has an existence only as a
producer of exchange value, hence that the whole negation of his natural
existence is already implied; that he is therefore entirely determined
by society; that this further presupposes a division of labour etc., in
which the individual is already posited in relations other than that of
mere _exchanger_, etc. That therefore this presupposition by no means
arises either out of the individual’s will or out of the immediate
nature of the individual, but that it is, rather, _historical_, and
posits the individual as already _determined_ by society. It is
forgotten, on the other side, that these higher forms, in which
exchange, or the relations of production which realize themselves in it,
are now posited, do not by any means stand still in this simple form
where the highest distinction which occurs is a formal and hence
irrelevant one. What is overlooked, finally, is that already the simple
forms of exchange value and of money latently contain the opposition
between labour and capital etc. Thus, what all this wisdom comes down to
is the attempt to stick fast at the simplest economic relations, which,
conceived by themselves, are pure abstractions; but these relations are,
in reality, mediated by the deepest antithesis, and represent only one
side, in which the full expression of the antitheses is obscured.

What this reveals, on the other side, is the foolishness of those
socialists (namely the French, who want to depict socialism as the
realization of the ideals of _bourgeois_ society articulated by the
French revolution) who demonstrate that exchange and exchange value etc.
are _originally_ (in time) or _essentially_ (in their adequate form) a
system of universal freedom and equality, but that they have been
perverted by money, capital, etc. [23] Or, also, that history has so far
failed in every attempt to implement them in their true manner, but that
they have now, like Proudhon, discovered e.g. the real Jacob, and intend
now to supply the genuine history of these relations in place of the
fake. The proper reply to them is: that exchange value or, more
precisely, the money system is in fact the system of equality and
freedom, and that the disturbances which they encounter in the further
development of the system are disturbances inherent in it, are merely
the realization of _equality and freedom_, which prove to be inequality
and unfreedom. It is just as pious as it is stupid to wish that exchange
value would not develop into capital, nor labour which produces exchange
value into wage labour. What divides these gentlemen from the bourgeois
apologists is, on one side, their sensitivity to the contradictions
included in the system; on the other, the utopian inability to grasp the
necessary difference between the real and the ideal form of bourgeois
society, which is the cause of their desire to undertake the superfluous
business of realizing the ideal expression again, which is in fact only
the inverted projection [_Lichtbild_] of this reality. And now, indeed,
in opposition to these socialists there is the stale argumentation of
the degenerate economics of most recent times (whose classical
representative as regards insipidness, affectation of dialectics, puffy
arrogance, effete, complacent platitudinousness and complete inability
to grasp historic processes is _Frederick Bastiat_, because the
American, Carey, at least brings out the specific American relations as
against the European), _which demonstrates_ that economic relations
everywhere express _the same_ simple determinants, and hence that they
everywhere express the equality and freedom of the simple exchange of
exchange values; this point entirely reduces itself to an infantile
abstraction. For example, the relation between capital and interest is
reduced to the exchange of exchange values. Thus, after first taking
from the empirical world the fact that exchange value exists not only in
this simple form but also in the essentially different form of capital,
capital is then in turn reduced again to the simple concept of exchange
value; and interest, which, to crown all, expresses a specific relation
of capital as such, is similarly torn out of this specificity and
equated with exchange value; the whole relation in its specific
character is reduced to an abstraction and everything reduced to the
undeveloped relation of commodity exchange. In so far as I abstract from
what distinguishes a concrete from its abstract, it is of course the
abstract, and does not differ from it at all. _According to this, all
economic categories are only so many names for what is always the same
relation, and this crude inability to grasp the real distinctions is
then supposed to represent pure common sense as such. The ‘economic
harmonies’ of Mr Bastiat amount_ au fond _to the assertion that there
exists only one single economic relation which takes on different names,
or that any differences which occur, occur_ _only in name_. The
reduction is not even formally scientific to the minimal extent that
everything is reduced to a real economic relation by dropping the
difference that development makes; rather, sometimes one and sometimes
another side is dropped in order to bring out now one, now another side
of the identity. For example, the wage for labour is payment for a
service done by one individual for another. (The economic form as such
is dropped here, as noted above.) Profit is also payment for a service
done by one individual for another. Hence wages and profit are
identical, and it is, in the first place, an error of language to call
one payment wages, the other profit. But let us now look at profit and
interest. With profit, the payment of the service is exposed to chance
fluctuations; with interest, it is fixed. Thus, since, with wages,
payment is relatively speaking exposed to chance fluctuations, while
with profit, in contrast to labour, it is fixed, it follows that the
relation between interest and profit is the same as that between wages
and profit, which, as we have seen, is the exchange of equivalents for
one another. The opponents [24] then take this twaddle (which goes back
from the economic relations where the contradiction is expressed to
those where it is only latent and obscured) literally, and demonstrate
that e.g. with capital and interest there is not a simple exchange,
since capital is not replaced by an equivalent, but that the owner of
capital, rather, having consumed the equivalent 20 times over in the
form of interest, still has it in the form of capital and can exchange
it for 20 more equivalents. Hence the unedifying debate in which one
side asserts that there is no difference between developed and
undeveloped exchange value, and the other asserts that there is,
unfortunately, a difference, but, by rights, there ought not to be.

_Capital_. Sum of values. – _Landed property and capital. – Capital comes from circulation. Content exchange value. – Merchant capital, money capital, and money interest. – Circulation presupposes another process. Motion between presupposed extremes_

_Money as capital_ is an aspect of money which goes beyond its simple
character as money. It can be regarded as a higher realization; as it
can be said that man is a developed ape. However, in this way the lower
form is posited as the primary subject, over the higher. In any case,
_money as capital_ is distinct from _money as money_. The new aspect is
to be developed. On the other hand, _capital as money_ seems to be a
regression of capital to a lower form. But it is only the positing of
capital in a particular form which already existed prior to it, as
non-capital, and which makes up one of its presuppositions. Money recurs
in all later relations; but then it does not function as mere money. If,
as here, the initial task is to follow it up to its totality as
money-market, then the rest of the development is presupposed and has to
be brought in occasionally. Thus we give here the general character of
capital before we proceed to its particularity as money.

If I state, like for example Say, that capital is a _sum of values_,
[25] then I state nothing more than that _capital = exchange value_.
Every sum of values is an exchange value, and every exchange value is a
sum of values. I cannot get from exchange value to capital by means of
mere addition. In the pure accumulation of money, as we have seen, the
relation of capitalizing [_Kapitalisieren_] is not yet posited.

In so-called retail trade, in the daily traffic of bourgeois life as it
proceeds directly between producers and consumers, in petty commerce,
where the aim on one side is to exchange the commodity for money and on
the other to exchange money for commodity, for the satisfaction of
individual needs – in this movement, which proceeds on the surface of
the bourgeois world, there and there alone does the motion of exchange
values, their circulation, proceed in its pure form. A worker who buys a
loaf of bread and a millionaire who does the same appear in this act
only as simple buyers, just as, in respect to them, the grocer appears
only as seller. All other aspects are here extinguished. The _content_
of these purchases, like their _extent_, here appears as completely
irrelevant compared with the formal aspect.

As in the theory the concept of value precedes that of capital, but
requires for its pure development a mode of production founded on
capital, so the same thing takes place in practice. The economists
therefore necessarily sometimes consider capital as the creator of
values, as their source, while at other times they presuppose values for
the formation of capital, and portray it as itself only a sum of values
in a particular function. The existence of value in its purity and
generality presupposes a mode of production in which the individual
product has ceased to exist for the producer in general and even more
for the individual worker, and where nothing exists unless it is
realized through circulation. For the person who creates an
infinitesimal part of a yard of cotton, the fact that this is value,
exchange value, is not a formal matter. If he had not created an
exchange value, money, he would have created nothing at all. This
determination of value, then, presupposes a given historic stage of the
mode of social production and is itself something given with that mode,
hence a historic relation.

At the same time, individual moments of value-determination develop in
earlier stages of the historic process of social production and appear
as its result.

Hence, within the system of bourgeois society, capital follows
immediately after money. _In history, other systems come before_, and
they form the material basis of a less complete development of value.
Just as exchange value here plays only an accompanying role to use
value, it is not capital but the relation of landed property which
appears as its real basis. Modern landed property, on the other hand,
cannot be understood at all, because it cannot exist, without capital as
its presupposition, and it indeed appears historically as a
transformation of the preceding historic shape of landed property by
capital so as to correspond to capital. It is, therefore, precisely in
the development of landed property that the gradual victory and
formation of capital can be studied, which is why Ricardo, the economist
of the modern age, with great historical insight, examined the relations
of capital, wage labour and ground rent within the sphere of landed
property, so as to establish their specific form. The relation between
the industrial capitalist and the proprietor of land appears to be a
relation lying outside that of landed property. But, as a relation
between the modern farmer and the landowner, it appears posited as an
immanent relation of landed property itself; and the [latter], [26] as
now existing merely in its relation to capital. The history of landed
property, which would demonstrate the gradual transformation of the
feudal landlord into the landowner, of the hereditary, semi-tributary
and often unfree tenant for life into the modern farmer, and of the
resident serfs, bondsmen and villeins who belonged to the property into
agricultural day-labourers, would indeed be the history of the formation
of modern capital. It would include within it the connection with urban
capital, trade, etc. But we are dealing here with developed bourgeois
society, which is already moving on its own foundation.

Capital comes initially from circulation, and, moreover, its point of
departure is money. We have seen that money which enters into
circulation and at the same time returns from it to itself is the last
requirement, in which money suspends itself. It is at the same time the
first concept of capital, and the first form in which it appears. Money
has negated itself as something which merely dissolves in circulation;
but it has also equally negated itself as something which takes up an
independent attitude towards circulation. This negation, as a single
whole, in its positive aspects, contains the first elements of capital.
Money is the first form in which capital as such appears. M–C–C–M; that
money is exchanged for commodity and the commodity for money; _this
movement of buying in order to sell, which makes up the formal aspect of
commerce, of capital as merchant capital,_ is found in the earliest
conditions of economic development; it is the first movement in which
exchange value as such forms the content – is not only the form but also
its own content. This motion can take place within peoples, or between
peoples for whose production exchange value has by no means yet become
the presupposition. The movement only seizes upon the surplus of their
directly useful production, and proceeds only on its margin. Like the
Jews within old Polish society or within medieval society in general,
entire trading peoples, as in antiquity (and, later on, the Lombards),
can take up this position between peoples whose mode of production is
not yet determined by exchange value as the fundamental presupposition.
Commercial capital is only circulating capital, and circulating capital
is the first form of capital; in which it has _as yet by no means become
the foundation of production._ A more developed form is _money capital_
and _money interest_, usury, whose independent appearance belongs in the
same way to an earlier stage. Finally, the form C–M–M–C, in which money
and circulation in general appear as mere means for the _circulating
commodity_, which for its part again steps outside circulation and
directly satisfies a need, this is itself the presupposition of that
original appearance of merchant capital. The presuppositions appear
distributed among different peoples; or, within society, commercial
capital as such appears only as determined by this purely
consumption-directed circulation. On the other side, the _circulating
commodity_, the commodity which realizes itself only by taking on the
form of another commodity, which steps outside circulation and serves
immediate needs, is similarly [the] [27] first form of capital, which is
essentially _commodity capital_.

On the other side it is equally clear that the simple movement of
exchange values, such as is present in pure circulation, can never
realize capital. It can lead to the withdrawal and stockpiling of money,
but as soon as money steps back into circulation, it dissolves itself in
a series of exchange processes with commodities which are consumed,
hence it is lost as soon as its purchasing power is exhausted.
Similarly, the commodity which has exchanged itself for another
commodity through the medium of money steps outside circulation in order
to be consumed, destroyed. But if it is given independence from
circulation, as money, it then merely represents the non-substantial
general form of wealth. Since equivalents are exchanged for one another,
the form of wealth which is fixed as money disappears as soon as it is
exchanged for the commodity; and the use value present in the commodity,
as soon as it is exchanged for money. All that can happen in the simple
act of exchange is that each can be lost in its role for the other as
soon as it realizes itself in it. None can maintain itself in its role
by going over into the other. For this reason the sophistry of the
bourgeois economists, who embellish capital by reducing it in argument
to pure exchange, has been countered by its inversion, the equally
sophistical, but, in relation to them, legitimate demand that capital be
_really_ reduced to pure exchange, whereby it would disappear as a power
and be destroyed, whether in the form of money or of the commodity. *

* Just as exchange value, i.e. all relations of commodities as exchange
values, appears in money to be a thing, so do all aspects of the
activity which creates exchange values, labour, appear in _capital_.

The repetition of the process from either of the points, money or
commodity, is not posited within the conditions of exchange itself. The
act can be repeated only until it is completed, i.e. until the amount of
the exchange value is exchanged away. It cannot ignite itself anew
through its own resources. _Circulation therefore does not carry within
itself the principle of self-renewal. The moments of the latter are
presupposed to it_, not posited by it. Commodities constantly have to be
thrown into it anew from the outside, like fuel into a fire. Otherwise
it flickers out in indifference. It would die out with money, as the
indifferent result which, in so far as it no longer stood in any
connection with commodities, prices or circulation, would have ceased to
be money, to express a relation of production; only its metallic
existence would be left over, while its economic existence would be
destroyed. Circulation, therefore, which appears as that which is
immediately present on the surface of bourgeois society, exists only in
so far as it is constantly mediated. Looked at in itself, it is the
mediation of presupposed extremes. But it does not posit these extremes.
Thus, it has to be mediated not only in each of its moments, but as a
whole of mediation, as a total process itself. Its immediate being is
therefore pure semblance. _It is the phenomenon of a process taking
place behind it._ It is now negated in every one of its moments: as a
commodity – as money – and as a relation of the two, as simple exchange
and circulation of both. While, originally, the act of social production
appeared as the positing of exchange values and this, in its later
development, as circulation – as completely developed reciprocal
movement of exchange values – now, circulation itself returns back into
the activity which posits or produces exchange values. It returns into
it as into its ground. [28] It is commodities (whether in their
particular form, or in the general form of money) which form the
presupposition of circulation; they are the realization of a definite
labour time and, as such, values; their presupposition, therefore, is
both the production of commodities by labour and their production as
exchange values. This is their point of departure, and through its own
motion it goes back into exchange-value-creating production as its
result. We have therefore reached the point of departure again,
_production_ which posits, creates exchange values; but this time,
_production which presupposes circulation as a developed moment_ and
which appears as a constant process, which posits circulation and
constantly returns from it into itself in order to posit it anew. The
movement which creates exchange value thus appears here in a much more
complex form, since it is no longer only the movement of presupposed
exchange values, or the movement which posits them formally as prices,
but which creates, brings them forth at the same time as
presuppositions. Production itself is here no longer present in advance
of its products, i.e. presupposed; it rather appears as simultaneously
bringing forth these results; but it does not bring them forth, as in
the first stage, as merely leading into circulation, but as
simultaneously presupposing circulation, the developed process of
circulation. (Circulation consists at bottom only of the formal process
of positing exchange value, sometimes in the role of the commodity, at
other times in the role of money.)

_Transition from circulation to capitalist production. – Capital objectified labour etc. – Sum of values for production of values_

This movement appears in different forms, not only historically, as
leading towards value-producing labour, but also within the system of
bourgeois production itself, i.e. production for exchange value. With
semi-barbarian or completely barbarian peoples, there is at first
interposition by trading peoples, or else tribes whose production is
different by nature enter into contact and exchange their superfluous
products. The former case is a more classical form. Let us therefore
dwell on it. The exchange of the overflow is a traffic which posits
exchange and exchange value. But it extends only to the overflow and
plays an accessory role to production itself. But if the trading peoples
who solicit exchange appear repeatedly (the Lombards, Normans etc. play
this role towards nearly all European peoples), and if an ongoing
commerce develops, although the producing people still engages only in
so-called _passive_ trade, since the impulse for the activity of
positing exchange values comes from the outside and not from the inner
structure of its production, then the surplus of production must no
longer be something accidental, occasionally present, but must be
constantly repeated; and in this way domestic production itself takes on
a tendency towards circulation, towards the positing of exchange values.
At first the effect is of a more physical kind. The sphere of needs is
expanded; the aim is the satisfaction of the new needs, and hence
greater regularity and an increase of production. The organization of
domestic production itself is already modified by circulation and
exchange value; but it has not yet been completely invaded by them,
either over the surface or in depth. This is what is called the
_civilizing influence_ of external trade. The degree to which the
movement towards the establishment of exchange value then attacks the
whole of production depends partly on the intensity of this external
influence, and partly on the degree of development attained by the
elements of domestic production – division of labour etc. In England,
for example, the import of Netherlands commodities in the sixteenth
century and at the beginning of the seventeenth century gave to the
surplus of wool which England had to provide in exchange, an essential,
decisive role. In order then to produce more wool, cultivated land was
transformed into sheep-walks, the system of small tenant-farmers was
broken up etc., clearing of estates took place etc. Agriculture thus
lost the character of labour for use value, and the exchange of its
overflow lost the character of relative indifference in respect to the
inner construction of production. At certain points, agriculture itself
became purely determined by circulation, transformed into production for
exchange value. Not only was the mode of production altered thereby, but
also all the old relations of population and of production, the economic
relations which corresponded to it, were dissolved. Thus, here was a
circulation which presupposed a production in which only the overflow
was created as exchange value; but it turned into a production which
took place only in connection with circulation, a production which
posited exchange values as its exclusive content.

On the other hand, in modern production, where exchange value and
developed circulation are presupposed, it is prices which determine
production on one side, and production which determines prices on the
other.

When it is said that capital ‘is accumulated (realized) labour
(properly, _objectified_ [_vergegenständlichte_] labour), which serves
as the means for new labour (production)’, [29] then this refers to the
simple material of capital, without regard to the formal character
without which it is not capital. This means nothing more than that
capital is – an instrument of production, for, in the broadest sense,
every object, including those furnished purely by nature, e.g. a stone,
must first be appropriated by some sort of activity before it can
function as an instrument, as means of production. According to this,
capital would have existed in all forms of society, and is something
altogether unhistorical. Hence every limb of the body is capital, since
each of them not only has to be developed through activity, labour, but
also nourished, reproduced, in order to be active as an organ. The arm,
and especially the hand, are then capital. Capital would be only a new
name for a thing as old as the human race, since every form of labour,
including the least developed, hunting, fishing, etc., presupposes that
the product of prior labour is used as means for direct, living labour.
A further characteristic contained in the above definition is that the
material stuff of products is entirely abstracted away, and that
antecedent labour itself is regarded as its only content (matter); in
the same way, abstraction is made from the particular, special purpose
for which the making of this product is in its turn intended to serve as
means, and merely production in general is posited as purpose. All these
things only seemed a work of abstraction, which is equally valid in all
social conditions and which merely leads the analysis further and
formulates it more abstractly (generally) than is the usual custom. If,
then, the specific form of capital is abstracted away, and only the
content is emphasized, _as which it is a necessary moment of all labour,
then of course nothing is easier than to demonstrate that capital is a
necessary condition for all human production._ The proof of this
proceeds precisely by abstraction from the specific aspects which make
it the moment of a specifically developed _historic_ stage of human
production. The catch is that if all capital is objectified labour which
serves as means for new production, it is not the case that all
objectified labour which serves as means for new production is capital.
_Capital is conceived as a thing, not as a relation._

If it is said on the other hand that capital is a sum of values used for
the production of values, then this means: capital is self-reproducing
exchange value. But, formally, exchange value reproduces itself even in
simple circulation. This explanation, it is true, does contain the form
wherein exchange value is the point of departure, but the connection
with the content (which, with capital, is not, as in the case of simple
exchange value, _irrelevant_) is dropped. If it is said that capital is
exchange value which produces profit, or at least has the intention of
producing a profit, then capital is already presupposed in its
explanation, for profit is a specific relation of capital to itself.
Capital is not a simple relation, but a _process_, in whose various
moments it is always capital. This process therefore to be developed.
Already in _accumulated_ labour, something has sneaked in, because, in
its essential characteristic, it should be merely _objectified_ labour,
in which, however, a certain amount of labour is accumulated. But
accumulated labour already comprises a quantity of objects in which
labour is realized.

‘At the beginning everyone was content, since exchange extended only to
objects which had no value for each exchanger: no significance was
assigned to objects other than those which were without value for each
exchanger; no significance was assigned to them, and each was satisfied
to receive a useful thing in exchange for a thing without utility. But
after the division of labour had made everyone into a merchant and
society into a commercial society, no one wanted to give up his products
except in return for their equivalents; it thus became necessary, in
order to determine this equivalent, to know the _value_ of the thing
received.’ (Ganilh, 12, b.) [30] This means in other words that exchange
did not stand still with the formal positing of exchange values, but
necessarily advanced towards the subjection of production itself to
exchange value.

(1) Circulation, and exchange value deriving from circulation, the presupposition of capital

To develop the concept of capital it is necessary to begin not with
labour but with value, and, precisely, with exchange value in an already
developed movement of circulation. It is just as impossible to make the
transition directly from labour to capital as it is to go from the
different human races directly to the banker, or from nature to the
steam engine. We have seen that in money, as such, exchange value has
already obtained a form independent of circulation, but only a negative,
transitory or, when fixated, an illusory form. It exists only in
connection with circulation and as the possibility of entering into it;
but it loses this character as soon as it realizes itself, and falls
back on its two earlier roles, as measure of exchange value and as
medium of exchange. As soon as money is posited as an exchange value
which not only becomes independent of circulation, but which also
maintains itself through it, then it is no longer money, for this as
such does not go beyond the negative aspect, but is _capital_. That
money is the first form in which exchange value proceeds to the
character of capital, and that, hence, the first _form_ in which capital
_appears_ is confused with capital itself, or is regarded as sole
adequate form of capital – this is a historic fact which, far from
contradicting our development, rather confirms it. The first quality of
capital is, then, this: that exchange value deriving from circulation
and presupposing circulation preserves itself within it and by means of
it; does not lose itself by entering into it; that circulation is not
the movement of its disappearance, but rather the movement of its real
self-positing [_Sichsetzen_] as exchange value, its self-realization as
exchange value. [31] It cannot be said that exchange value as such is
realized in simple circulation. It is always realized only in the moment
of its disappearance. If the commodity is exchanged via money for
another commodity, then its value-character disappears in the moment in
which it realizes itself, and it steps outside the relation, becomes
irrelevant to it, merely the direct object of a need. If money is
exchanged for a commodity, then even the disappearance of the form of
exchange is posited; the form is posited as a merely formal mediation
for the purpose of gaining possession of the natural material of the
commodity. If a commodity is exchanged for money, then the form of
exchange value, exchange value posited as exchange value, money,
persists only as long as it stays outside exchange, withdraws from it,
is hence a purely illusory realization, purely ideal in this form, in
which the independence of exchange value leads a tangible existence. If,
finally, money is exchanged for money – the fourth form in which
circulation can be analysed, but at bottom only the third form expressed
in the form of exchange – then not even a formal difference appears
between the things distinguished; a distinction without a difference;
not only does exchange value disappear, but also the formal movement of
its disappearance. At bottom, these four specific forms of simple
circulation are reducible to two, which, it is true, coincide in
themselves; the distinction consists in the different placing of the
emphasis, the accent; which of the two moments – money and commodity –
forms the point of departure. Namely, money for the commodity: i.e. the
exchange value of the commodity disappears in favour of its material
content (substance); or commodity for money, i.e. its content
(substance) disappears in favour of its form as exchange value. In the
first case, the form of exchange value is extinguished; in the second,
its substance; in both, therefore, its realization is its disappearance.
Only with _capital_ is exchange value posited as exchange value in such
a way that it preserves itself in circulation; i.e. it neither becomes
substanceless, nor constantly realizes itself in other substances or a
totality of them; nor loses its specific form, but rather preserves its
identity with itself in each of the different substances. It therefore
always remains money and always commodity. It is in every moment both of
the moments which disappear into one another in circulation. But it is
this only because it itself is a constantly self-renewing circular
course of exchanges. In this relation, too, its circulation is distinct
from that of simple exchange values as such. Simple circulation is in
fact circulation only from the standpoint of the observer, or _in
itself_, not posited as such. It is not always the same exchange value –
precisely because its substance is a particular commodity – which first
becomes money and then a commodity again; rather, it is always different
commodities, different exchange values which confront money.
Circulation, the circular path, consists merely of the simple repetition
or alternation of the role of commodity and money, and not of the
identity of the real point of departure and the point of return.
Therefore, in characterizing simple circulation as such, where money
alone is the persistent moment, the term mere _money circulation, money
turnover_ has been applied.

‘Capital values are self-perpetuating.’ (Say, 14.) [32] ‘Capital –
permanent’ (‘self-multiplying’ does not belong here as yet) ‘value which
no longer decayed; this value tears itself loose from the commodity
which created it; like a metaphysical, insubstantial quality, it always
remained in the possession of the same _cultivateur_’ (here irrelevant;
say _owner_) ‘for whom it cloaked itself in different forms.’ (Sismondi,
VI.) [33]

The immortality which money strove to achieve by setting itself
negatively against circulation, by withdrawing from it, is achieved by
capital, which preserves itself precisely by abandoning itself to
circulation. Capital, as exchange value existing prior to circulation,
or as presupposing and preserving itself in circulation, not only is in
every moment ideally both of the two moments contained in simple
circulation, but alternately takes the form of the one and of the other,
though no longer merely by passing out of the one into the other, as in
simple circulation, but rather by being in each of these roles at the
same time a relation to its opposite, i.e. containing it ideally within
itself. Capital becomes commodity and money alternately; but (1) _it is
itself the alternation of both these roles_; (2) it becomes commodity;
but not this or the other commodity, rather a _totality of commodities_.
It is not indifferent to the substance, but to the particular form;
appears in this respect as a constant metamorphosis of this substance;
in so far as it is then posited as a particular content of exchange
value, this particularity itself is a totality of particularity; hence
indifferent not to particularity as such, but to the single or
individuated particularity. The identity, the form of generality
[_Allgemeinheit_], which it obtains is that of being exchange value and,
as such, money. It is still therefore posited as money, in fact it
exchanges itself as commodity for money. But posited as money, i.e. as
this contradictory form of the generality of exchange value, there is
posited in it at the same time that it must not, as in simple exchange,
lose this generality, but must rather lose the attribute antithetical to
generality, or adopt it only fleetingly; therefore it exchanges itself
again for the commodity, but as a commodity which itself, in its
particularity, expresses the generality of exchange value, and hence
constantly changes its particular form.

If we speak here of capital, this is still merely a word. The only
aspect in which capital is here posited as distinct from direct exchange
value and from money is _that of exchange value which preserves and
perpetuates itself in and through circulation._ We have so far examined
only one side, that of its self-preservation in and through circulation.
The other equally important side is that exchange value is
_presupposed_, but no longer as simple exchange value, such as it exists
as a merely ideal quality of the commodity before it enters into
circulation, or as, rather, a merely intended quality, since it becomes
exchange value only for a vanishing moment in circulation; nor as
exchange value as it exists as a moment in circulation, as money; it
exists here, rather, as money, as objectified exchange value, but with
the addition of the relation just described. What distinguishes the
second from the first is that it (1) exists in the form of objectivity;
(2) arises out of circulation, hence presupposes it, but at the same
time proceeds from itself as presupposition of circulation.

There are two sides in which the result of simple circulation can be
expressed:

_The simply negative_: The commodities thrown into circulation have
achieved their purpose; they are exchanged for one another; each becomes
an object of a need and is consumed. With that, circulation comes to an
end. Nothing remains other than money as simple residue. As such a
residue, however, it has ceased to be money, loses its characteristic
form. It collapses into its material, which is left over as the
inorganic ashes of the process as a whole.

_The positively negative_: Money is negated not as objectified,
independent exchange value – not only as vanishing in circulation – but
rather the _antithetical_ independence, the merely abstract generality
in which it has firmly settled, is negated; but

_thirdly_: Exchange value as the presupposition and simultaneously the
result of circulation, just as it is assumed as having emerged from
circulation, must emerge from it again. If this happens in a merely
formal manner, it would simply become money again; if it emerges as a
real commodity, as in simple circulation, then it would become a simple
object of need, consumed as such, and again lose its quality as form.
For this emergence to become real, it must likewise become the object of
a need and, as such, be consumed, but it must be consumed by labour, and
thereby reproduce itself anew.

Differently expressed: Exchange value, as regards its content, was
originally an objectified amount of labour or labour time; as such it
passed through circulation, in its objectification, until it became
money, tangible money. It must now again posit the point of departure of
circulation, which lay outside circulation, was presupposed to it, and
for which circulation appeared as an external, penetrating and
internally transforming movement; this point was labour; but [it must do
so] now no longer as a simple equivalent or as a simple objectification
of labour, but rather as objectified exchange value, now become
independent, which yields itself to labour, becomes its material, only
so as to renew itself and to begin circulating again by itself. And with
that it is no longer a simple positing of equivalents, a preservation of
its identity, as in circulation; but rather _multiplication_ of itself.
Exchange value posits itself as exchange value only by realizing itself;
i.e. increasing its value. _Money_ (as returned to itself from
circulation), _as capital, has lost its rigidity, and from a tangible
thing has become a process._ But at the same time, labour has changed
its relation to its objectivity; it, too, has returned to itself. But
the nature of the return is this, that the labour objectified in the
exchange value posits living labour as a means of reproducing it,
whereas, originally, exchange value appeared merely as a product of
labour.

Exchange value emerging from circulation, a presupposition of circulation, preserving and multiplying itself in it by means of labour

<[34] I. (1) General concept of capital. – (2) Particularity of capital:
circulating capital, fixed capital. (Capital as the necessaries of life,
as raw material, as instrument of labour.) (3) Capital as money. II. (1)
_Quantity of capital. Accumulation._ (2) _Capital measured by itself.
Profit. Interest. Value of capital_: i.e. capital as distinct from
itself as interest and profit. (3) _The circulation of capitals._ (α)
Exchange of capital and capital. Exchange of capital with revenue.
Capital and _prices_. (β) _Competition of capitals_. (γ) _Concentration
of capitals._ III. Capital as credit. IV. Capital as share capital. V.
_Capital as money market_. VI. Capital as source of wealth. The
capitalist. After capital, landed property would be dealt with. After
that, wage labour. All three presupposed, the _movement of prices_, as
circulation now defined in its inner totality. On the other side, the
three classes, as production posited in its three basic forms and
presuppositions of circulation. Then the _state_. (State and bourgeois
society. – Taxes, or the existence of the unproductive classes. – The
state debt. – Population. – The state externally: colonies. External
trade. Rate of exchange. Money as international coin. – Finally the
world market. Encroachment of bourgeois society over the state. Crises.
Dissolution of the mode of production and form of society based on
exchange value. Real positing of individual labour as social and vice
versa.)>

_Product and capital. Value and capital. Proudhon_

(Nothing is more erroneous than the manner in which economists as well
as socialists regard _society_ in relation to economic conditions.
Proudhon, for example, replies to Bastiat by saying (XVI, 29): ‘_For
society_, the difference between capital and product does not exist.
This difference is entirely _subjective_, and related to individuals.’
[35] Thus he calls subjective precisely what is social; and he calls
society a subjective abstraction. The difference between product and
capital is exactly this, that the product expresses, as capital, a
particular relation belonging to a historic form of society. This
so-called contemplation from the standpoint of society means nothing
more than the overlooking of the _differences_ which express the _social
relation_ (relation of bourgeois society). Society does not consist of
individuals, but expresses the sum of interrelations, the relations
within which these individuals stand. As if someone were to say: Seen
from the perspective of society, there are no slaves and no citizens:
both are human beings. Rather, they are that outside society. To be a
slave, to be a citizen, are social characteristics, relations between
human beings A and B. Human being A, as such, is not a slave. He is a
slave in and through society. What Mr Proudhon here says about capital
and product means, for him, that from the viewpoint of society there is
no difference between capitalists and workers; a difference which exists
precisely only from the standpoint of society.)

(For Proudhon in his polemic against Bastiat, ‘_Gratuité du crédit_’,
everything comes down to his own wish to reduce the exchange between
capital and labour to the simple exchange of commodities as exchange
values, to the moments of simple circulation, i.e. he abstracts from
just the specific difference on which everything depends. He says: ‘At a
given moment, every product becomes capital, because everything which is
consumed is at a given moment consumed reproductively.’ This very false,
but never mind. ‘What is it that makes the motion of the product
suddenly transform itself into that of capital? It is the _idea of
value_. That means that the product, in order to become capital, needs
to have passed through an authentic evaluation, to have been bought or
sold, its price debated and fixed by a sort of legal convention. E.g.
leather, coming from the slaughterhouse, is the product of the butcher.
Is this leather bought by the tanner? The latter then immediately
carries it or carries its value into his exploitation fund [_fonds
d’exploitation_]. By means of the tanner’s labour, this capital becomes
product again etc.’ [36] Every capital is here ‘_a constituted value_’.
Money is the ‘_most perfect value_’, [37] _constituted value_ to the
highest power. This means, then: (1) Product becomes capital by becoming
value. Or capital is just nothing more than simple value. There is no
difference between them. Thus he says commodity (the natural side of the
same, expressed as product) at one time, value another time,
alternatively, or rather, since he presupposes the act of buying and
selling, price. (2) Since money appears as the perfected form of value
such as it is in simple circulation, therefore money is also the true
_constituted value._)

_Capital and labour. Exchange value and use value for exchange value. – Money and its use value (labour) in this relation, capital. Self-multiplication of value is its only movement. – The phrase that no capitalist will employ his capital without drawing a gain from it. – Capital, as regards substance, objectified labour. Its antithesis, living, productive (i.e. value-preserving and value-increasing) labour. – Productive labour and labour as performance of a service. – Productive and unproductive labour. A. Smith etc. – Thief in Lauderdale’s sense and productive labour_

The transition from simple exchange value and its circulation to capital
can also be expressed in this way: Within circulation, exchange value
appears double: once as commodity, again as money. If it is in one
aspect, it is not in the other. This holds for every particular
commodity. But the wholeness of circulation, regarded in itself, lies in
the fact that the same exchange value, exchange value as subject, posits
itself once as commodity, another time as money, and that it is just
this movement of positing itself in this dual character and of
preserving itself in each of them as its opposite, in the commodity as
money and in money as commodity. This in itself is present in simple
circulation, but is not posited in it. Exchange value posited as the
unity of commodity and money is _capital_, and this positing itself
appears as the circulation of capital. (Which is, however, a spiral, an
expanding curve, not a simple circle.)

Let us analyse first the simple aspects contained in the relation of
capital and labour, in order by this means to arrive at the inner
connection not only of these aspects, but also of their further
development from the earlier ones.

The first presupposition is that capital stands on one side and labour
on the other, both as independent forms relative to each other; both
hence also alien to one another. The labour which stands opposite
capital is _alien_ [_fremde_] labour, and the capital which stands
opposite labour is _alien_ capital. The extremes which stand opposite
one another are _specifically_ different. In the first positing of
simple exchange value, labour was structured in such a way that the
product was not a direct use value for the labourer, not a direct means
of subsistence. This was the general condition for the creation of an
exchange value and of exchange in general. Otherwise the worker would
have produced only a product – a direct use value for himself – but not
an exchange value. This exchange value, however, was materialized in a
product which had, as such, a use value for others, and, as such, was
the object of their needs. The use value which the worker has to offer
to the capitalist, which he has to offer to others in general, is not
materialized in a product, does not exist apart from him at all, thus
exists not really, but only in potentiality, as his capacity. It becomes
a reality only when it has been solicited by capital, is set in motion,
since activity without object is nothing, or, at the most, mental
activity, which is not the question at issue here. As soon as it has
obtained motion from capital, this use value exists as the worker’s
specific, productive activity; it is his vitality itself, directed
toward a specific purpose and hence expressing itself in a specific
form.

In the relation of capital and labour, exchange value and use value are
brought into relation; the one side (capital) initially stands opposite
the other side as _exchange value_, * and the other (labour), stands
opposite capital, as use value. In simple circulation, each of the
commodities can alternately be regarded in one or the other role. In
both cases, when it counts as commodity as such, it steps outside
circulation as object of a need and falls entirely outside the economic
relation. In so far as the commodity becomes fixed as exchange value –
money – it tends towards the same formlessness, but as falling within
the economic relation. In any case, the commodities are of interest in
the exchange-value relation (simple circulation) only in so far as they
have exchange value; on the other side their exchange value is of only
passing interest, in that it suspends the one-sidedness – the
usefulness, use value, existing only for the specific individual, hence
existing _directly_ for him – but not this use value itself; rather, it
posits and mediates it as use value for others etc. But to the degree
that exchange value as such becomes fixed in money, use value no longer
confronts it as anything but abstract chaos; and, through just this
separation from its substance, it collapses into itself and tends away
from the sphere of simple exchange value, whose highest movement is
simple circulation, and whose highest perfection is money. But within
the sphere itself, the distinctness exists in fact only as a superficial
difference, a purely formal distinction. Money itself in its highest
fixedness is itself a commodity again, and distinguishes itself from the
others only in that it expresses exchange value more _perfectly_; but,
as currency, and precisely for that reason, it loses its _exchange
value_ as intrinsic quality, and becomes _mere_ use value, although
admittedly use value for determining the prices etc. of commodities. The
aspects still immediately coincide and just as immediately they
separate. Where they relate to one another independently, _positively_,
as in the case of the commodity which becomes an object of consumption,
it ceases to be a moment of the economic process; where negatively, as
in the case of money, it becomes _madness_; madness, however, as a
moment of economics and as a determinant of the practical life of
peoples.

* Is not _value_ to be conceived as the unity of use value and exchange
value? In and for itself, is value as such the general form, in
opposition to use value and exchange value as _particular_ forms of it?
Does this have significance in economics? Use value presupposed even in
simple exchange or barter. But here, where exchange takes place only for
the reciprocal use of the commodity, the use value, i.e. the content,
the natural particularity of the commodity has as such no standing as an
economic form. Its form, rather, is exchange value. The content apart
from this form is irrelevant; is not a content of the relation as a
social relation. But does this content as such not develop into a system
of needs and production? Does not use value as such enter into the form
itself, as a determinant of the form itself, e.g. in the relation of
capital and labour? the different forms of labour? – agriculture,
industry etc. – ground rent? – effect of the seasons on raw product
prices? etc. If _only_ exchange value as such plays a role in economics,
then how could elements later enter which relate purely to use value,
such as, right away, in the case of capital as raw material etc.? How is
it that the physical composition of the soil suddenly drops out of the
sky in Ricardo? [38] The word _ware_ [commodity] (German _Güter_ [goods]
perhaps as _denrée_ [good] as distinct from _marchandise_ [commodity]?)
contains the connection. The price appears as a merely formal aspect in
it. This is not in the slightest contradicted by the fact that exchange
value is the predominant aspect. But of course use does not come to a
halt because it is determined _only_ by exchange; although of course it
obtains its direction thereby. In any case, this is to be examined with
exactitude in the examination of value, and not, as Ricardo does, to be
entirely abstracted from, nor like the dull Say, who puffs himself up
with the mere presupposition of the word ‘utility’. [39] Above all it
will and must become clear in the development of the individual sections
to what extent use value exists not only as presupposed matter, outside
economics and its forms, but to what extent it enters into it.
Proudhon’s nonsense, see the ‘Misère’. [40] This much is certain: in
exchange we have (in circulation) the commodity – use value – as price;
that it is, apart from its price, a commodity, an object of need, goes
without saying. The two aspects in no way enter into relation with each
other, except in so far as the particular use value appears as the
natural limit of the commodity and hence posits money, i.e. its exchange
value, simultaneously as an existence apart from itself, in money, but
only formally. Money itself is a commodity, has a use value for its
substance.

We have seen earlier that it cannot be said that exchange value is
realized in simple circulation. [41] This is so, however, because use
value does not stand as such opposite exchange value, as something
defined as use value by exchange value; while inversely use value as
such does not stand in a connection with exchange value, but becomes a
specific exchange value only because the common element of use values –
labour time – is applied to it as an external yardstick. Their unity
still immediately splits, and their difference still immediately
coincides. It must now be posited that use value as such becomes what it
becomes through exchange value, and that exchange value mediates itself
through use value. In money circulation, all we had was the different
forms of exchange value (price of the commodity – money) or only
different use values (commodity – C), for which money, exchange value,
is merely a vanishing mediation. A real connection of exchange value and
use value did not take place. The commodity as such – its particularity
– is for that reason an irrelevant, merely accidental, and in general
imaginary content, which falls outside the relation of economic forms;
or, the latter is a merely superficial form, a formal quality: the real
substance lies outside its realm and stands in no relation at all to the
substance as such; therefore if this formal quality as such becomes
fixed in money, then it transforms itself on the sly into an irrelevant
natural product, a metal, in which every trace of a connection, whether
with the individual or with intercourse between individuals, is
extinguished. Metal as such of course expresses no social relations; the
coin form is extinguished in it as well; the last sign of life of its
social significance.

Posited as a side of the relation, exchange value, which stands opposite
use value itself, confronts it as money, but the money which confronts
it in this way is no longer money in its character as such, but money as
_capital_. The _use value_ or commodity which confronts capital or the
posited _exchange value_ is no longer the commodity such as it appeared
in opposition to money, where its specific form was as irrelevant as its
content, and which appeared only as a completely undefined substance.
First, as use value for capital, i.e. therefore as an object in exchange
with which capital does not lose its value-quality, as for example does
money when it is exchanged for a particular commodity. The only utility
whatsoever which an object can have for capital can be to preserve or
increase it. We have already seen, in the case of money, how value,
having become independent as such – or the general form of wealth – is
capable of no other motion than a quantitative one; to increase itself.
It is according to its concept the quintessence of all use values; but
since it is always only a definite amount of money (here, capital), its
quantitative limit is in contradiction with its quality. It is therefore
inherent in its nature constantly to drive beyond its own barrier. (As
consumption-oriented wealth, e.g. in imperial Rome, it therefore appears
as limitless waste, which logically attempts to raise consumption to an
imaginary boundlessness, by gulping down salad of pearls etc.) Already
for that reason, value which insists on itself as value preserves itself
through increase; and it preserves itself precisely only by constantly
driving beyond its quantitative barrier, which contradicts its character
as form, its inner generality. Thus, growing wealthy is an end in
itself. The goal-determining activity of capital can only be that of
growing wealthier, i.e. of magnification, of increasing itself. A
specific sum of money (and money always exists for its owner in a
specific quantity, always as a specific sum of money) (this is to be
developed as early as in the money chapter) can entirely suffice for a
specific consumption, in which it ceases to be money. But as a
representative of general wealth, it cannot do so. As a quantitatively
specific sum, a limited sum, it is only a limited representative of
general wealth, or representative of a limited wealth, which goes as
far, and no further than, its exchange value, and is precisely measured
in it. It thus does not by any means have the capacity which according
to its general concept it ought to have, namely the capacity of buying
all pleasures, all commodities, the totality of the material substances
of wealth; it is not a ‘_précis de toutes les choses_’ [42] etc. Fixed
as wealth, as the general form of wealth, as value which counts as
value, it is therefore the constant drive to go beyond its quantitative
limit: an endless process. Its own animation consists exclusively in
that; it _preserves_ itself as a self-validated exchange value distinct
from a use value only by _constantly multiplying_ itself. (It is damned
difficult for Messrs the economists to make the theoretical transition
from the self-preservation of value in capital to its multiplication;
and this in its fundamental character, not only as an accident or
result. See e.g. Storch, how he brings this fundamental character in
with an adverb, ‘properly’. [43] Admittedly, the economists try to
introduce this into the relation of capital as an essential aspect, but
if this is not done in the brutal form of defining capital as that which
brings profit, where the increase of capital itself is already posited
as a special _economic_ form, profit, then it happens only
surreptitiously, and very feebly, as we shall later show in a brief
review of all that the economists have contributed towards determining
the concept of capital. Drivel to the effect that nobody would employ
his capital without drawing a gain from it [44] amounts either to the
absurdity that the good capitalists will remain capitalists even
_without_ employing their capital; or to a very banal form of saying
that gainful investment is inherent in the concept of capital. Very
well. In that case it would just have to be demonstrated.) – Money as a
sum of money is measured by its quantity. This measuredness contradicts
its character, which must be oriented towards the measureless.
Everything which has been said here about money holds even more for
capital, in which money actually develops in its completed character for
the first time. The only use value, i.e. usefulness, which can stand
opposite capital as such is that which increases, multiplies and hence
preserves it as capital.

Secondly. Capital is by definition money, but not merely money in the
simple form of gold and silver, nor merely as money in opposition to
circulation, but in the form of all substances – commodities. To that
degree, therefore, it does not, as capital, stand in opposition to use
value, but exists apart from money precisely only in use values. These,
its substances themselves, are thus now transitory ones, which would
have no exchange value if they had no use value; but which lose their
value as use values and are dissolved by the simple metabolism of nature
if they are not actually used, and which disappear even more certainly
if they are actually used. In this regard, the opposite of capital
cannot itself be a particular commodity, for as such it would form no
opposition to capital, since the substance of capital is itself use
value; it is not this commodity or that commodity, but all commodities.
The communal substance of all commodities, i.e. their substance not as
material stuff, as physical character, but their communal substance as
_commodities_ and hence _exchange values_, is this, that they are
_objectified labour_. * The only thing distinct from _objectified_
labour is _non-objectified_ labour, labour which is still objectifying
itself, _labour_ as subjectivity. Or, _objectified_ labour, i.e. labour
which is _present in space_, can also be opposed, as _past labour_, to
labour which is _present in time_. If it is to be present in time,
alive, then it can be present only as the _living subject_, in which it
exists as capacity, as possibility; hence as _worker_. The only _use
value,_ therefore, which can form the opposite pole to capital is
_labour (to be exact, value-creating, productive labour._ This marginal
remark is an anticipation; must first be developed, by and by. Labour as
mere performance of services for the satisfaction of immediate needs has
nothing whatever to do with capital, since that is not capital’s
concern. If a capitalist hires a woodcutter to chop wood to roast his
mutton over, then not only does the wood-cutter relate to the
capitalist, but also the capitalist to the wood-cutter, in the relation
of simple exchange. The woodcutter gives him his service, a use value,
which does not increase capital; rather, capital consumes itself in it;
and the capitalist gives him another commodity for it in the form of
money. The same relation holds for all services which workers exchange
directly for the money of other persons, and which are consumed by these
persons. This is consumption of revenue, which, as such, always falls
within simple circulation; it is not consumption of capital. Since one
of the contracting parties does not confront the other as a capitalist,
this performance of a service cannot fall under the category of
productive labour. From whore to pope, there is a mass of such rabble.
But the honest and ‘working’ lumpenproletariat belongs here as well;
e.g. the great mob of porters etc. who render service in seaport cities
etc. He who represents money in this relation demands the service only
for its use value, which immediately vanishes for him; but the porter
demands money, and since the party with money is concerned with the
commodity and the party with the commodity, with money, it follows that
they represent to one another no more than the two sides of simple
circulation; goes without saying that the porter, as the party concerned
with money, hence directly with the general form of wealth, tries to
enrich himself at the expense of his improvised friend, thus injuring
the latter’s self-esteem, all the more so because he, a hard calculator,
has need of the service not _qua capitalist_ but as a result of his
ordinary human frailty. A. Smith was _essentially_ correct with his
_productive_ and _unproductive_ labour, correct from the standpoint of
bourgeois economy. [45] What the other economists advance against it is
either horse-piss (for instance Storch, Senior even lousier etc.), [46]
namely that every action after all acts upon something, thus confusion
of the product in its natural and in its economic sense; so that the
pickpocket becomes a productive worker too, since he indirectly produces
books on criminal law (this reasoning at least as correct as calling a
judge a productive worker because he protects _from_ theft). Or the
modern economists have turned themselves into such sycophants of the
bourgeois that they want to demonstrate to the latter that it is
productive labour when somebody picks the lice out of his hair, or
strokes his tail, because for example the latter activity will make his
fat head – blockhead – clearer the next day in the office. It is
therefore quite correct – but also characteristic – that for the
consistent economists the workers in e.g. luxury shops are productive,
although the characters who consume such objects are expressly
castigated as unproductive wastrels. The fact is that these workers,
indeed, are productive, as far as they increase the capital of their
master; unproductive as to the material result of their labour. In fact,
of course, this ‘productive’ worker cares as much about the crappy shit
he has to make as does the capitalist himself who employs him, and who
also couldn’t give a damn for the junk. But, looked at more precisely,
it turns out in fact that the true definition of a productive worker
consists in this: A person who needs and demands exactly as much as, and
no more than, is required to enable him to gain the greatest possible
benefit for his capitalist. All this nonsense. Digression. But return in
more detail to the productive and unproductive).

* But only this economic (social) substance of use values, i.e. of their
economic character as content as distinct from their form (but this form
_value_, because specific amount of this _labour_), comes into question
when searching for an antithesis to capital. As far as their natural
differences are concerned, none of them excludes capital from entering
into them and making their bodies its own, so long as none excludes the
character of exchange value and of the commodity.

_The two different processes in the exchange of capital with labour. (Here the use value of that which is exchanged for capital belongs to the specific economic form etc.)_

The use value which confronts capital as posited exchange value is
_labour_. Capital exchanges itself, or exists in this role, only in
connection with _not-capital_, the negation of capital, without which it
is not capital; the real _not-capital_ is labour.

If we consider the exchange between capital and labour, then we find
that it splits into two processes which are not only formally but also
qualitatively different, and even contradictory:

(1) The worker sells his commodity, labour, which has a use value, and,
as commodity, also a _price_, like all other commodities, for a specific
sum of exchange values, specific sum of money, which capital concedes to
him.

(2) The capitalist obtains labour itself, labour as value-positing
activity, as productive labour; i.e. he obtains the productive force
which maintains and multiplies capital, and which thereby becomes the
productive force, the reproductive force of capital, a force belonging
to capital itself.

The separation of these two processes is so obvious that they can take
place at different times, and need by no means coincide. The first
process can be and usually, to a certain extent, is completed before the
second even begins. The completion of the second act presupposes the
completion of the product. The payment of wages cannot wait for that. We
will even find it an essential aspect of the relation, that it does not
wait for that.

In simple exchange, circulation, this double process does not take
place. If commodity A is exchanged for money B, and the latter then for
the commodity C, which is destined to be consumed – the original object
of the exchange, for A – then the using-up of commodity C, its
consumption, falls entirely outside circulation; is irrelevant to the
form of the relation; lies beyond circulation itself, and is of purely
physical interest, expressing no more than the relation of the
individual A in his natural quality to an object of his individual need.
What he does with commodity C is a question which belongs outside the
economic relation. Here, by contrast, _the use value of that which is
exchanged for money appears as a particular economic relation, and the
specific utilization of that which is exchanged for money forms the
ultimate aim of both processes. Therefore, this is already a distinction
of form between the exchange of capital and labour, and simple exchange
– two different processes._

If we now further inquire how the exchange between capital and labour is
different in content from simple exchange (circulation), then we find
that this difference does not arise out of an external connection or
equation; but rather that, in the totality of the latter process, the
second form distinguishes itself from the first, in that this equation
is itself comprised within it. The difference between the second act and
the first – note that the particular process of the appropriation of
labour by capital is the second act – is exactly the difference between
the exchange of capital and labour, and exchange between commodities as
it is mediated by money. _In the exchange between capital and labour,
the first act is an exchange, falls entirely within ordinary
circulation; the second is a process qualitatively different from
exchange, and only by misuse_ could it have been called _any sort of
exchange at all._ It stands directly opposite exchange; essentially
different category.

_Capital and modern landed property. – Wakefield_

<_Capital_. I. _Generality_: (1) (a) Emergence of capital out of money.
(b) Capital and labour (mediating itself through _alien_ labour). (c)
The elements of capital, dissected according to their relation to labour
(Product. Raw material. Instrument of labour.) (2) _Particularization of
capital_: (a) Capital circulant, capital fixe. Turnover of capital. (3)
_The singularity of capital_: Capital and profit. Capital and interest.
Capital as _value_, distinct from itself as interest and profit. II.
_Particularity_: (1) Accumulation of capitals. (2) Competition of
capitals. (3) Concentration of capitals (quantitative distinction of
capital as at same time qualitative, as _measure_ of its size and
influence). III. _Singularity_: (1) Capital as credit. (2) Capital as
stock-capital. (3) Capital as money market. In the money market, capital
is posited in its totality; there it _determines prices, gives work,
regulates production,_ in a word, is the _source of production_; but
capital, not only as something which produces itself (positing prices
materially in industry etc., developing forces of production), but at
the same time as a creator of values, has to posit a value or form of
wealth specifically distinct from capital. This is _ground rent._ This
is the only value created by capital which is distinct from itself, from
its own production. By its nature as well as historically, capital is
the _creator_ of modern landed property, of ground rent; just as its
action therefore appears also as the dissolution of the old form of
property in land. The new arises through the action of capital upon the
old. Capital is this – in one regard – as creator of modern agriculture.
The inner construction of modern society, or, capital in the totality of
its relations, is therefore posited in the economic relations of modern
landed property, which appears as a process: ground rent – capital –
wage labour (the form of the circle can also be put in another way: as
wage labour – capital – ground rent; but capital must always appear as
the active middle). The question is now, how does the transition from
landed property to wage labour come about? (The transition from wage
labour to capital arises by itself, since the latter is here brought
back into its active foundation.) Historically, this transition is
beyond dispute. It is already given in the fact that landed property is
the product of capital. We therefore always find that, wherever landed
property is transformed into money rent through the reaction of capital
on the older forms of landed property (the same thing takes place in
another way where the modern farmer is created) and where, therefore, at
the same time agriculture, driven by capital, transforms itself into
industrial agronomy, there the cottiers, serfs, bondsmen, tenants for
life, cottagers etc. become day labourers, wage labourers, i.e. that
_wage labour_ in its totality is initially created by the action of
capital on landed property, and then, as soon as the latter has been
produced as a form, by the proprietor of the land himself. This latter
himself then ‘clears’, as Steuart says, [47] the land of its excess
mouths, tears the children of the earth from the breast on which they
were raised, and thus transforms labour on the soil itself, which
appears by its nature as the direct wellspring of subsistence, into a
mediated source of subsistence, a source purely dependent on social
relations. (The reciprocal dependence has first to be produced in its
pure form before it is possible to think of a real social communality
[_Gemeinschaftlichkeit_]. All relations as posited by society, not as
determined by nature.) Only in this way is the application of science
possible for the first time, and the development of the full force of
production. There can therefore be no doubt that _wage labour_ in its
_classic form,_ as something permeating the entire expanse of society,
which has replaced the very earth as the ground on which society stands,
is initially created only by modern landed property, i.e. by landed
property as a value created by capital itself. This is why landed
property leads back to wage labour. In one regard, it is nothing more
than the extension of wage labour, from the cities to the countryside,
i.e. wage labour distributed over the entire surface of society. The
ancient proprietor of land, if he is rich, needs no capitalist in order
to become the modern proprietor of land. He needs only to transform his
workers into wage workers and to produce for profit instead of for
revenue. Then the modern farmer and the modern landowner are presupposed
in his person. This change in the form in which he obtains his revenue
or in the form in which the worker is paid is not, however, a formal
distinction, but presupposes _a total restructuring of the mode of
production_ (agriculture) itself; it therefore presupposes conditions
which rest on a certain development of industry, of trade, and of
science, in short of the forces of production. Just as, in general,
production resting on capital and wage labour differs from other modes
of production not merely formally, but equally presupposes a total
revolution and development of material production. Although capital can
develop itself completely as commercial capital (only not as much
quantitatively), without this transformation of landed property, it
cannot do so as industrial capital. Even the development of manufactures
presupposes the beginning of a dissolution of the old economic relations
of landed property. On the other hand, only with the development of
modern industry to a high degree does this dissolution at individual
points acquire its totality and extent; but this development itself
proceeds more rapidly to the degree that modern agriculture and the form
of property, the economic relations corresponding to it, have developed.
Thus England in this respect the model country for the other continental
countries. Likewise: if the first form of industry, large-scale
manufacture, already presupposes dissolution of landed property, then
the latter is in turn conditioned by the subordinate development of
capital in its primitive (medieval) forms which has taken place in the
cities, and at the same time by the effect of the flowering of
manufacture and trade in other countries (thus the influence of Holland
on England in the sixteenth and the first half of the seventeenth
century). These countries themselves had already undergone the process,
agriculture had been sacrificed to cattle-raising, and grain was
obtained from countries which were left behind, such as Poland etc., by
import (Holland again). It must be kept in mind that the new forces of
production and relations of production do not develop out of _nothing_,
nor drop from the sky, nor from the womb of the self-positing Idea; but
from within and in antithesis to the existing development of production
and the inherited, traditional relations of property. While in the
completed bourgeois system every economic relation presupposes every
other in its bourgeois economic form, and everything posited is thus
also a presupposition, this is the case with every organic system. This
organic system itself, as a totality, has its presuppositions, and its
development to its totality consists precisely in subordinating all
elements of society to itself, or in creating out of it the organs which
it still lacks. This is historically how it becomes a totality. The
process of becoming this totality forms a moment of its process, of its
development. – On the other hand, if within one society the modern
relations of production, i.e. capital, are developed to its totality,
and this society then seizes hold of a new territory, as e.g. the
colonies, then it finds, or rather its representative, the capitalist,
finds, that his capital ceases to be capital without wage labour, and
that one of the presuppositions of the latter is not only landed
property in general, but modern landed property; landed property which,
as capitalized rent, is expensive, and which, as such, excludes the
direct use of the soil by individuals. Hence Wakefield’s theory of
colonies, followed in practice by the English government in Australia.
[48] Landed property is here artificially made more expensive in order
to transform the workers into wage workers, to make capital act as
capital, and thus to make the new colony productive; to develop wealth
in it, instead of using it, as in America, for the momentary deliverance
of the wage labourers. Wakefield’s theory is infinitely important for a
correct understanding of modern landed property. – Capital, when it
creates landed property, therefore goes back to the production of wage
labour as its general creative basis. Capital arises out of circulation
and posits labour as wage labour; takes form in this way; and, developed
as a whole, it posits landed property as its precondition as well as its
opposite. It turns out, however, that it has thereby only created wage
labour as its general presupposition. The latter must then be examined
by itself. On the other hand, modern landed property itself appears most
powerfully in the process of clearing the estates and the transformation
of the rural labourers into wage labourers. Thus a double transition to
wage labour. This on the positive side. Negatively, after capital has
posited landed property and hence arrived at its double purpose: (1)
industrial agriculture and thereby development of the forces of
production on the land; (2) wage labour, thereby general domination of
capital over the countryside; it then regards the existence of landed
property itself as a merely transitional development, which is required
as an action of capital on the old relations of landed property, and a
_product of their decomposition_; but which, as such – once this purpose
achieved – is merely a limitation on profit, not a necessary requirement
for production. It thus endeavours to dissolve landed property as
private property and to transfer it to the state. This the negative
side. Thus to transform the entire domestic society into capitalists and
wage labourers. When capital has reached this point, then wage labour
itself reaches the point where, on one side, it endeavours to remove the
landowner as an excrescence, to simplify the relation, to lessen the
burden of taxes etc., in the same form as the bourgeois; on the other
hand, in order to escape wage labour and to become an independent
producer – for immediate consumption – it demands the breaking-up of
large landed property. Landed property is thus negated from two sides;
the negation from the side of capital is only a change of form, towards
its undivided rule. (Ground rent as the universal state rent (state
tax), so that bourgeois society reproduces the medieval system in a new
way, but as the latter’s total negation.) The negation from the side of
wage labour is only concealed negation of capital, hence of itself as
well. It must now be regarded as independent in respect to capital. Thus
the transition double: (1) _Positive transition_ from modern landed
property, or from capital through the mediation of modern landed
property, to general wage labour; (2) _negative transition_: negation of
landed property by capital, i.e. thus negation of autonomous value by
capital, i.e. precisely negation of capital by itself. But its negation
is _wage labour_. Then negation of landed property and, through its
mediation, of capital, on the part of wage labour, i.e. on the part of
wage labour which wants to posit itself as independent.>

<The _market_, which appears as an abstract quality at the beginning of
economics, takes on total shapes. First, the _money market_. This
includes the discount market; in general, the loan market; hence money
trade, bullion market. As _money-lending market_ it appears in the
banks, for instance the discount at which they discount: loan market,
billbrokers etc.; but then also as the market in all _interest-bearing
bills_: state funds and the share market. The latter separate off into
larger groups (first the _shares of money institutions_ themselves; bank
shares; joint-stock bank shares; _shares_ in the means of communication
(_railway shares_ the most important; _canal_ shares; steam navigation
shares, telegraph shares, omnibus shares); _shares of general industrial
enterprises (mining shares_ the chief ones). Then in the supply of
common elements (_gas_ shares, water-supply shares). _Miscellaneous_
shares of a thousand kinds. For the _storage of commodities_ (dock
shares etc.). _Miscellaneous_ in infinite variety, such as enterprises
in industry or trading companies founded on shares. Finally, as security
for the whole, _insurance shares_ of all kinds.) Now, just as the market
by and large is divided into home market and foreign market, so the
internal market itself again divides into the market of home shares,
national funds etc. and foreign funds, foreign shares etc. This
development actually belongs properly under the world market, which is
not only the internal market in relation to all foreign markets existing
outside it, but at the same time the internal market of all foreign
markets as, in turn, components of the home market. _The concentration
of the money market_ in a chief location within a country, while the
other markets are more distributed according to the division of labour;
although here, too, great concentration in the capital city, if the
latter is at the same time a port of export. – The various markets other
than the money market are, firstly, as different as are products and
branches of production themselves. The chief markets in these various
products arise in centres which are such either in respect of import or
export, or because they are either themselves centres of a given
production, or are the direct supply points of such centres. But these
markets proceed from this simple difference to a more or less organic
separation into large groups, which themselves necessarily divide up
according to the basic elements of capital itself: product market and
raw-material market. The instrument of production as such does not form
a separate market; it exists as such chiefly, first, in the raw
materials themselves which are sold as means of production; then,
however, in particular in the metals, since these exclude all thought of
direct consumption, and then the products, such as coal, oil, chemicals,
which are destined to disappear as auxiliary means of production.
Likewise dyes, wood, drugs etc. Hence:

I. _Products._ (1) _Grain market_ with its various subdivisions. E.g.
seed market: rice, sage, potatoes etc. This very important economically;
at the same time market for production and for direct consumption. (2)
_Colonial-produce market_. Coffee, tea, cocoa, sugar; spices (pepper,
tobacco, pimento, cinnamon, cassia lignea, cloves, ginger, mace,
nutmegs, etc.). (3) _Fruits_. Almonds, currants, figs, plums, prunes,
raisins, oranges, lemons etc. _Molasses_ (for production etc.). (4)
_Provisions_. Butter; cheese; bacon; hams; lard; pork; beef (smoked),
fish etc. (5) _Spirits._ Wine, rum, beer etc. II. _Raw Materials_. (1)
_Raw materials for mechanical industry._ Flax; hemp; cotton; silk; wool;
hides; leather; gutta-percha etc. (2) _Raw materials for chemical
industry._ Potash, saltpetre; turpentine; nitrate of soda etc. III. _Raw
materials which at the same time instruments of production. Metals_
(copper, iron, tin, zinc, lead, steel etc.), _wood_. Lumber. Timber.
Dye-woods. Specialized wood for shipbuilding etc. _Accessory means of
production and raw materials_. Drugs and dyes. (Cochineal, indigo etc.
Tar. Tallow. Oil. Coals etc.) Of course, every product must go to
market, but really great markets, as distinct from retail trade, are
formed only by the great consumption goods (economically important are
only the grain market, the tea, the sugar, the coffee market (wine
market to some extent, and market in spirits generally), or those which
are raw materials of industry: wool, silk, wood, metal market etc.) To
be seen at what point the abstract category of the market has to be
brought in.>

_Exchange between capital and labour. Piecework wages. – Value of labour power. – Share of the wage labourer in general wealth determined only quantitatively. – The worker’s equivalent, money. Thus confronts capital as equal. – But aim of his exchange satisfaction of his need. Money for him only_ medium of circulation. – _Savings, self-denial as means of the worker’s enrichment. – Valuelessness and devaluation of the worker a condition of capital_

The exchange between the worker and the capitalist is a simple exchange;
each obtains an equivalent; the one obtains money, the other a commodity
whose _price_ is exactly equal to the money paid for it; what the
capitalist obtains from this simple exchange is a use value: disposition
over alien labour. From the worker’s side – and service is the exchange
in which he appears as seller – it is evident that the use which the
buyer makes of the purchased commodity is as irrelevant to the specific
form of the relation here as it is in the case of any other commodity,
of any other use value. What the worker sells is the disposition over
his labour, which is a specific one, specific skill etc.

What the capitalist does with his labour is completely irrelevant,
although of course he can use it only in accord with its specific
characteristics, and his disposition is restricted to a _specific_
labour and is _restricted in time_ (so much labour time). The piece-work
system of payment, it is true, introduces the semblance that the worker
obtains a specified share of the product. But this is only another form
of measuring time (instead of saying, you will work for 12 hours, what
is said is, you get so much per piece; i.e. we measure the time you have
worked by the number of products); it is here, in the examination of the
general relation, altogether beside the point. If the capitalist were to
content himself with merely the capacity of disposing, without actually
making the worker work, e.g. in order to have his labour as a reserve,
or to deprive his competitor of this capacity of disposing (like e.g.
theatre directors who buy singers for a season not in order to have them
sing, but so that they do not sing in a competitor’s theatre), then the
exchange has taken place in full. True, the worker receives money, hence
exchange value, the general form of wealth, in one or another quantity;
and the more or less he receives, the greater or the lesser is the share
in the general wealth he thus obtains. How this more or less is
determined, how the quantity of money he receives is measured, is of so
little relevance to the general relation that it cannot be developed out
of the latter. In general terms, the exchange value of his commodity
cannot be determined by the manner in which its buyer uses it, but only
by the amount of objectified labour contained in it; hence, here, by the
amount of labour required to reproduce the worker himself. For the use
value which he offers exists only as an ability, a capacity [_Vermögen_]
of his bodily existence; has no existence apart from that. The labour
objectified in that use value is the objectified labour necessary bodily
to maintain not only the general substance in which his labour power
exists, i.e. the worker himself, but also that required to modify this
general substance so as to develop its particular capacity. This, in
general terms, is the measure of the amount of value, the sum of money,
which he obtains in exchange. The further development, where wages are
measured, like all other commodities, by the labour time necessary to
produce the worker as such, is not yet to the point here. Within
circulation, if I exchange a commodity for money, buy a commodity for it
and satisfy my need, then the act is at an end. Thus it is with the
worker. But he has the possibility of beginning it again from the
beginning because his life is the source in which his own use value
constantly rekindles itself up to a certain time, when it is worn out,
and constantly confronts capital again in order to begin the same
exchange anew. Like every individual subject within circulation, the
worker is the owner of a use value; he exchanges this for money, for the
general form of wealth, but only in order to exchange this again for
commodities, considered as the objects of his immediate consumption, as
the means of satisfying his needs. Since he exchanges his use value for
the general form of wealth, he becomes co-participant in general wealth
up to the limit of his equivalent – a quantitative limit which, of
course, turns into a qualitative one, as in every exchange. But he is
neither bound to particular objects, nor to a particular manner of
satisfaction. The sphere of his consumption is not qualitatively
restricted, only quantitatively. This distinguishes him from the slave,
serf etc. Consumption certainly reacts on production itself; but this
reaction concerns the worker in his exchange as little as it does any
other seller of a commodity; rather, as regards mere circulation – and
we have as yet no other developed relation before us – it falls outside
the economic relation. This much, however, can even now be mentioned in
passing, namely that the relative restriction on the sphere of the
workers’ consumption (which is only quantitative, not qualitative, or
rather, only qualitative as posited through the quantitative) gives them
as consumers (in the further development of capital the relation between
consumption and production must, in general, be more closely examined)
an entirely different importance as agents of production from that which
they possessed e.g. in antiquity or in the Middle Ages, or now possess
in Asia. But, as noted, this does not belong here yet. Similarly,
because the worker receives the equivalent in the form of money, the
form of general wealth, he is in this exchange an equal _vis-à-vis_ the
capitalist, like every other party in exchange; at least, so he _seems_.
In fact this equality is already disturbed because the worker’s relation
to the capitalist as a use value, in the form specifically distinct from
exchange value, in opposition to value posited as value, is a
presupposition of this seemingly simple exchange; because, thus, he
already stands in an economically different relation – outside that of
exchange, in which the nature of the use value, the particular use value
of the commodity is, as such, irrelevant. This semblance exists,
nevertheless, as an illusion on his part and to a certain degree on the
other side, and thus essentially modifies his relation by comparison to
that of workers in other social modes of production. But what is
essential is that the purpose of the exchange for him is the
satisfaction of his need. The object of his exchange is a direct object
of need, not exchange value as such. He does obtain money, it is true,
but only in its role as coin; i.e. only as a self-suspending and
vanishing mediation. What he obtains from the exchange is therefore not
exchange value, not wealth, but a means of subsistence, objects for the
preservation of his life, the satisfaction of his needs in general,
physical, social etc. It is a specific equivalent in means of
subsistence, in objectified labour, measured by the cost of production
of his labour. What he gives up is his power to dispose of the latter.
On the other side, it is true that even within simple circulation the
coin may grow into money, and that in so far as he receives coin in
exchange, he can therefore transform it into money by stockpiling it,
etc., withdrawing it from circulation; fixes it as general form of
wealth, instead of as vanishing medium of exchange. In this respect it
could thus be said that, in the exchange between capital and labour, the
worker’s object – hence, for him, the product of the exchange – is not
the means of subsistence, but wealth; not a particular use value, but
rather exchange value as such. Accordingly the worker could make
exchange value into his own _product_ only in the same way in which
wealth in general can _appear_ solely as _product of simple circulation_
in which equivalents are exchanged, namely by sacrificing substantial
satisfaction to obtain the _form_ of wealth, i.e. through _self-denial_,
saving, cutting corners in his consumption so as to withdraw less from
circulation than he puts _goods_ into it. This is the only possible form
of enriching oneself which is posited by circulation itself. Self-denial
could then also appear in the more active form, which is not posited in
simple circulation, of denying himself more and more rest, and in
general denying himself any existence other than his existence as
worker, and being as far as possible a worker only; hence more
frequently renewing the act of exchange, or extending it quantitatively,
hence through _industriousness_. [49] Hence still today the demand for
industriousness and also for _saving, self-denial_, is made not upon the
capitalists but on the workers, and namely by the capitalists. Society
today makes the paradoxical demand that he for whom the object of
exchange is subsistence should deny himself, not he for whom it is
wealth. The illusion that the capitalists in fact practised
‘self-denial’ [50] and became capitalists thereby – a demand and a
notion which only made any sense at all in the early period when capital
was emerging from feudal etc. relations – has been abandoned by all
modern economists of sound judgement. The workers are supposed to save,
and much bustle is made with savings banks etc. (As regards the latter,
even the economists admit that their proper purpose is not wealth,
either, but merely a more purposeful distribution of expenditure, so
that in their old age, or in case of illness, crises etc., they do not
become a burden on the poorhouses, on the state, or on the proceeds of
begging (in a word, so that they become a burden on the working class
itself and not on the capitalists, vegetating out of the latter’s
pockets), i.e. so that they save for the capitalists; and reduce the
costs of production for them.) Still, no economist will deny that if the
workers _generally_, that is, as _workers_ (what the individual worker
does or can do, as distinct from his genus, can only exist just as
_exception_, not as _rule_, because it is not inherent in the character
of the relation itself), that is, if they acted according to this demand
as a rule (apart from the damage they would do to general consumption –
the loss would be enormous – and hence also to production, thus also to
the amount and volume of the exchanges which they could make with
capital, hence to themselves as workers) then the worker would be
employing means which absolutely contradict their purpose, and which
would directly degrade him to the level of the Irish, the level of wage
labour where the most animal minimum of needs and subsistence appears to
him as the sole object and purpose of his exchange with capital. If he
adopted wealth as his purpose, instead of making his purpose use value,
he would then, therefore, not only come to no riches, but would moreover
lose use value in the bargain. For, as a rule, the maximum of
industriousness, of labour, and the minimum of consumption – and this is
the maximum of his self-denial and of his moneymaking – could lead to
nothing else than that he would receive for his maximum of labour a
minimum of wages. By his exertions he would only have diminished the
general _level_ of the production costs of his own labour and therefore
its general price. Only as an exception does the worker succeed through
will power, physical strength and endurance, greed etc., in transforming
his coin into money, as an exception from his class and from the general
conditions of his existence. If all or the majority are too industrious
(to the degree that industriousness in modern industry is in fact left
to their own personal choice, which is not the case in the most
important and most developed branches of production), then they increase
not the value of their commodity, but only its quantity; that is, the
demands which would be placed on it as use value. If they all save, then
a general reduction of wages will bring them back to earth again; for
general savings would show the capitalist that their wages are in
general too high, that they receive more than its equivalent for their
commodity, the capacity of disposing of their own labour; since it is
precisely the essence of simple exchange – and they stand in this
relation towards him – that no one throws more into circulation than he
withdraws; but also that no one can withdraw more than he has thrown in.
An individual worker can be _industrious_ above the average, more than
he has to be in order to live as a worker, only because another lies
below the average, is lazier; he can save only because and if another
wastes. The most he can achieve on the average with his self-denial is
to be able better to endure the fluctuations of prices – high and low,
their cycle – that is, he can only distribute his consumption better,
but never attain wealth. And that is actually what the capitalists
demand. The workers should save enough at the times when business is
good to be able more or less to live in the bad times, to endure short
time or the lowering of wages. (The wage would then fall even lower.)
That is, the demand that they should always hold to a minimum of life’s
pleasures and make crises easier to bear for the capitalists etc.
Maintain themselves as pure labouring machines and as far as possible
pay their own wear and tear. Quite apart from the sheer brutalization to
which this would lead – and such a brutalization itself would make it
impossible even to strive for wealth in general form, as money,
stockpiled money – (and the worker’s participation in the higher, even
cultural satisfactions, the agitation for his own interests, newspaper
subscriptions, attending lectures, educating his children, developing
his taste etc., his only share of civilization which distinguishes him
from the slave, is economically only possible by widening the sphere of
his pleasures at the times when business is good, where saving is to a
certain degree possible), [apart from this,] he would, if he saved his
money in a properly ascetic manner and thus heaped up premiums for the
lumpenproletariat, pickpockets etc., who would increase in proportion
with the demand, he could conserve savings – if they surpass the
piggy-bank amounts of the official savings banks, which pay him a
minimum of interest, so that the capitalists can strike high interest
rates out of his savings, or the state eats them up, thereby merely
increasing the power of his enemies and his own dependence – conserve
his savings and make them fruitful only by putting them into banks etc.,
so that, afterwards, in times of crisis he loses his deposits, after
having in times of prosperity foregone all life’s pleasures in order to
increase the power of capital; thus has saved in every way _for_
capital, not for himself.

Incidentally – in so far as the whole thing is not a hypocritical phrase
of bourgeois ‘philanthropy’, which consists in fobbing the worker off
with ‘pious wishes’ – each capitalist does demand that his workers
should save, but only _his own_, because they stand towards him as
workers; but by no means the remaining _world of workers_, for these
stand towards him as consumers. In spite of all ‘pious’ speeches he
therefore searches for means to spur them on to consumption, to give his
wares new charms, to inspire them with new needs by constant chatter
etc. It is precisely this side of the relation of capital and labour
which is an essential civilizing moment, and on which the historic
justification, but also the contemporary power of capital rests. (This
relation between production and consumption to be developed only under
capital and profit etc.) (Or, then again, under accumulation and
competition of capitals.) These are nevertheless all exoteric
observations, relevant here only in so far as they show the demands of
hypocritical bourgeois philanthropy to be self-contradictory and thus to
prove precisely what they were supposed to refute, namely that in the
exchange between the worker and capital, the worker finds himself in the
relation of simple circulation, hence obtains not wealth but only
subsistence, use values for immediate consumption. That this demand
contradicts the relation itself emerges from the simple reflection (the
recently and complacently advanced demand that the workers should be
given a certain share in profits [51] is to be dealt with in the section
_wage labour_; other than as a _special bonus_ which can achieve its
purpose only as an exception from the rule, and which is in fact, in
noteworthy practice, restricted to the buying-up of individual
overlookers etc. in the interests of the employer _against_ the
interests of their class; or to travelling salesmen etc., in short, no
longer _simple workers_, hence also not to the simple relation; or else
it is a special way of cheating the workers and of _deducting a part of
their wages_ in the more precarious form of a profit depending on the
state of the business) that, if the worker’s savings are not to remain
merely the product of circulation – saved up money, which can be
realized only by being converted sooner or later into the substantial
content of wealth, pleasures etc. – then the saved-up money would itself
have to become capital, i.e. buy labour, relate to labour as use value.
It thus presupposes labour which is not capital, and presupposes that
labour has become its opposite – not-labour. In order to become capital,
it itself presupposes labour as not-capital as against capital; hence it
presupposes the establishment at another point of the contradiction it
is supposed to overcome. if, then, in the original relation itself, the
object and the _product_ of the worker’s exchange – as product of mere
exchange, it can be no other – were not use value, subsistence,
satisfaction of direct needs, withdrawal from circulation of the
equivalent put into it in order to be destroyed by consumption – then
labour would confront capital not as labour, not as not-capital, but as
capital. But capital, too, cannot confront capital if capital does not
confront labour, since capital is only capital as not-labour; in this
contradictory relation. Thus the concept and the relation of capital
itself would be destroyed. That there are situations in which
property-owners who themselves work engage in exchange with one another
is certainly not denied. But such conditions are not those of the
society in which capital as such exists in developed form; they are
destroyed at all points, therefore, by its development. As capital it
can posit itself only by positing labour as not-capital, as pure use
value. (As a slave, the worker has _exchange value_, a _value_; as a
free wage-worker he has _no value_; it is rather his power of disposing
of his labour, effected by exchange with him, which has value. It is not
he who stands toward the capitalist as exchange value, but the
capitalist toward him. His _valuelessness_ and _devaluation_ is the
presupposition of capital and the precondition of _free_ labour in
general. Linguet regards it as a step backwards; [52] he forgets that
the worker is thereby formally posited as a person who is something for
himself _apart from his_ labour, and who alienates his life-expression
only as a means towards his own life. So long as the worker as such has
_exchange value, industrial capital_ as such cannot exist, hence nor can
developed capital in general. Towards the latter, labour must exist as
_pure use value_, which is offered as a commodity by its possessor
himself in exchange for it, for its _exchange value,_ which of course
becomes real in the worker’s hand only in its role as general medium of
exchange; otherwise vanishes.) Well. The worker, then, finds himself
only in the relation of simple circulation, of simple exchange, and
obtains only _coin_ for his use value; subsistence; but mediated. This
form of mediation is, as we saw, essential to and characteristic of the
relation. That it can proceed to the transformation of the coin into
money – savings – proves precisely only that his relation is that of
simple circulation; he can save more or less; but beyond that he cannot
get; he can realize what he has saved only by momentarily expanding the
sphere of his pleasures. It is of importance – and penetrates into the
character of the relation itself – that, because money is the product of
his exchange, general wealth drives him forward as an illusion; makes
him industrious. At the same time, this not only formally opens up a
field of arbitrariness in the realiz … [53]

 


NOTEBOOK III

29 November – c. mid-December 1857



THE CHAPTER ON CAPITAL (CONTINUATION)


(_Labour power as_ capital!) – _Wages not productive_

[1] … processes of the same subject; thus e.g. the substance of the eye,
the capital of vision etc. Such belletristic phrases, which relate
everything to everything else by means of some analogy, may even appear
profound the first time they are expressed, all the more so if they
identify the most disparate things. Repeated, however, and then repeated
with outright complacency as statements of scientific value, they are
purely and simply ridiculous. Good only for belletristic sophomores and
empty chatterboxes who defile all the sciences with their
liquorice-sweet filth. The fact that labour is a constant new source of
exchange for the worker as long as he is capable of working – meaning
not exchange in general, but exchange with capital – is inherent in the
nature of the concept itself, namely that he only sells a temporary
disposition over his labouring capacity, [2] hence can always begin the
exchange anew as soon as he has taken in the quantity of substances
required in order to reproduce the externalization of his life
[_Lebensäusserung_]. Instead of aiming their amazement in this direction
– and considering the worker to owe a debt to capital for the fact that
he is alive at all, and can repeat certain life processes every day as
soon as he has eaten and slept enough – these whitewashing sycophants of
bourgeois economics should rather have fixed their attention on the fact
that, after constantly repeated labour, he always has _only_ his living,
direct labour itself to exchange. The repetition itself is in fact only
apparent. _What he exchanges for capital is his entire labouring
capacity, which he spends, say, in 20 years_. Instead of paying him for
it in a lump sum, capital pays him in small doses, as he places it at
capital’s disposal, say weekly. This alters absolutely nothing in the
nature of the thing and gives no grounds whatsoever for concluding that
– because the worker has to sleep 10–12 hours before he becomes capable
of repeating his labour and his exchange with capital – labour forms
_his capital_. [3] What this argument in fact conceives as capital is
the limit, the interruption of his labour, since he is not a perpetuum
mobile. The struggle for the ten hours’ bill etc. proves that the
capitalist likes nothing better than for him _to squander his dosages of
vital force as much as possible, without interruption._ We now come to
the second process, which forms the relation between capital and labour
_after_ this exchange. We want to add here only that the economists
themselves express the above statement by saying that _wages_ are _not
productive._ For them, of course, to be productive means to be
productive of wealth. Now, since wages are the product of the exchange
between worker and capital – and the only product posited in this act
itself – they therefore admit that the worker produces _no wealth_ in
this exchange, neither for the capitalist, because for the latter the
payment of money for a use value – and this _payment_ forms the only
function of capital in this relation – is a sacrifice of wealth, not
creation of the same, which is why he tries to pay the smallest amount
possible; nor for the worker, because it brings him only subsistence,
the satisfaction of individual needs, more or less – _never_ the general
form of wealth, never wealth. Nor can it do so, since the content of the
commodity which he sells rises in no way above the general laws of
circulation: [his aim is] to obtain for the value which he throws into
circulation its equivalent, through the coin, in another use value,
which he consumes. Such an operation, of course, can never bring wealth,
but has to bring back him who undertakes it exactly to the point at
which he began. This does not exclude, as we saw, but rather includes,
the fact that the sphere of his immediate gratifications is capable of a
certain contraction or expansion. On the other side, if the capitalist –
who is not yet posited as capitalist at all in this exchange, but only
as _money_ – were to repeat this act again and again, his money would
soon be eaten up by the worker, who would have wasted it in a series of
other gratifications, mended trousers, polished boots – in short,
services received. In any case, the repetition of this operation would
be precisely limited by the circumference of his moneybag. They would no
more enrich him than does the expenditure of money for other use values
for his beloved person, which, as is well known, do not – pay him, but
cost him.

_The exchange between capital and labour belongs within simple circulation, does not enrich the worker. – Separation of labour and property the precondition of this exchange. – Labour as object absolute poverty, labour as subject general possibility of wealth. – Labour without particular specificity confronts capital_

It may seem peculiar, in this relation between labour and capital, and
already in this first relation of exchange between the two, that the
worker here buys the exchange value and the capitalist the use value, in
that labour confronts capital not as _a_ use value, but as _the_ use
value pure and simple, but that the capitalist should obtain wealth, and
the worker merely a use value which ends with consumption. <In so far as
this concerns the capitalist, to be developed only with the second
process.> This appears as a dialectic which produces precisely the
opposite of what was to be expected. However, regarded more precisely,
it becomes clear that the worker who exchanges his commodity goes
through the form C–M–M–C in the exchange process. If the point of
departure in circulation is the commodity, use value, as the principle
of exchange, then we necessarily arrive back at the commodity, since
money appears only as coin and, as medium of exchange, is only a
vanishing mediation; while the commodity as such, after having described
its circle, is consumed as the direct object of need. On the other hand,
capital represents M–C–C–M, the antithetical moment.

_Separation of property from labour_ appears as the necessary law of
this exchange between capital and labour. Labour posited as
_not-capital_ as such is: (1) _not-objectified labour
[nicht-vergegenständlichte Arbeit], conceived negatively_ (itself still
objective; the not-objective itself in objective form). As such it is
not-raw-material, not-instrument of labour, not-raw-product: labour
separated from all means and objects of labour, from its entire
objectivity. This living labour, existing as an _abstraction_ from these
moments of its actual reality (also, not-value); this complete
denudation, purely subjective existence of labour, stripped of all
objectivity. Labour as _absolute poverty_: poverty not as shortage, but
as total exclusion of objective wealth. Or also as the existing
_not-value_, and hence purely objective use value, existing without
mediation, this objectivity can only be an objectivity not separated
from the person: only an objectivity coinciding with his immediate
bodily existence. Since the objectivity is purely immediate, it is just
as much direct not-objectivity. In other words, not an objectivity which
falls outside the immediate presence [_Dasein_] of the individual
himself. (2) _Not-objectified labour, not-value_, conceived
_positively_, or as a negativity in relation to itself, is the
not-_objectified_, hence non-objective, i.e. subjective existence of
labour itself. Labour not as an object, but as activity; not as itself
_value_, but as the _living source_ of value. [Namely, it is] general
wealth (in contrast to capital in which it exists objectively, as
reality) as the _general possibility_ of the same, which proves itself
as such in action. Thus, it is not at all contradictory, or, rather, the
in-every-way mutually contradictory statements that labour is _absolute
poverty as object_, on one side, and is, on the other side, the _general
possibility_ of wealth as subject and as activity, are reciprocally
determined and follow from the essence of labour, such as it is
_presupposed_ by capital as its contradiction and as its contradictory
being, and such as it, in turn, presupposes capital.

The last point to which attention is still to be drawn in the relation
of labour to capital is this, that as the use value which confronts
money posited as capital, labour is not this or another labour, but
_labour pure and simple_, abstract labour; absolutely indifferent to its
particular _specificity_ [_Bestimmtheit_], but capable of all
specificities. Of course, the particularity of labour must correspond to
the particular substance of which a given capital consists; but since
capital _as such_ is indifferent to every particularity of its
substance, and exists not only as the totality of the same but also as
the abstraction from all its particularities, the labour which confronts
it likewise subjectively has the same totality and abstraction in
itself. For example, in guild and craft labour, where capital itself
still has a limited form, and is still entirely immersed in a particular
substance, hence is not yet _capital as such_, labour, too, appears as
still immersed in its particular specificity: not in the totality and
abstraction of labour _as such_, in which it confronts capital. That is
to say that labour is of course in each single case a specific labour,
but capital can come into relation with every _specific_ labour; it
confronts the _totality_ of all labours δυνάμει, [4] and the particular
one it confronts at a given time is an accidental matter. On the other
side, the worker himself is absolutely indifferent to the specificity of
his labour; it has no interest for him as such, but only in as much as
it is in fact _labour_ and, as such, a use value for capital. It is
therefore his economic character that he is the carrier of labour as
such – i.e. of labour as _use value_ for capital; he is a worker, in
opposition to the capitalist. This is not the character of the craftsmen
and guild-members etc., whose economic character lies precisely in the
_specificity_ of their labour and in their relation to a _specific
master_, etc. This economic relation – the character which capitalist
and worker have as the extremes of a single relation of production –
therefore develops more purely and adequately in proportion as labour
loses all the characteristics of art; as its particular skill becomes
something more and more abstract and irrelevant, and as it becomes more
and more a _purely abstract activity_, a purely mechanical activity,
hence indifferent to its particular form; a merely _formal_ activity,
or, what is the same, a merely _material_ [_stofflich_] activity,
activity pure and simple, regardless of its form. Here it can be seen
once again that the particular specificity of the relation of
production, of the category – here, capital and labour – becomes real
only with the development of a particular _material mode of production_
and of a particular stage in the development of the industrial
_productive forces_. (This point in general to be particularly developed
in connection with this relation, later; since it is here already
_posited_ in the relation itself, while, in the case of the abstract
concepts, exchange value, circulation, money, it still lies more in our
subjective reflection.)

_Labour process absorbed into capital. (Capital and capitalist)_

(2) We now come to the second side of the process. The exchange between
capital or capitalist and the worker is now finished, in so far as we
are dealing with the process of _exchange_ as such. We now proceed to
the relation of capital to labour as capital’s use value. Labour is not
only the _use value_ which confronts capital, but, rather, it is _the
use value_ of capital itself. As the not-being of values in so far as
they are objectified, labour is their being in so far as they are
not-objectified; it is their ideal being; the possibility of values,
and, as activity, the positing of value. As against capital, labour is
the merely abstract form, the mere possibility of value-positing
activity, which exists only as a capacity, as a resource in the
bodiliness of the worker. But when it is made into a real activity
through contact with capital – it cannot do this by itself, since it is
without object – then it becomes a really value-positing, productive
activity. In relation with capital, this activity can in general consist
only of the reproduction of itself – of the preservation and increase of
itself as the _real_ and _effective_ value, not of the merely intended
value, as with money as such. Through the exchange with the worker,
capital has appropriated labour itself; labour has become one of its
moments, which now acts as a fructifying vitality upon its merely
existent and hence dead objectivity. Capital is money (exchange value
posited for itself), but no longer is it money as existing in a
particular substance and hence excluded from other substances of
exchange value and existing alongside them, but rather money as
obtaining its ideal character from all substances, from the exchange
values of every form and mode of objectified labour. Now, in so far as
capital, money existing in all particular forms of objectified labour,
enters into the process with not-objectified, but rather living labour,
labour existing as process and as action, it is initially this
qualitative difference of the substance in which it exists from the form
in which it now _also_ exists as labour. It is the process of this
differentiation and of its suspension, in which capital itself becomes a
process. Labour is the yeast thrown into it, which starts it fermenting.
On the one side, the objectivity in which it exists has to be worked on,
i.e. consumed by labour; on the other side, the mere subjectivity of
labour as a mere form has to be suspended, and labour has to be
objectified in the material of capital. The relation of capital, in its
content, to labour, of objectified labour to living labour – in this
relation, where capital appears as passive towards labour, it is its
passive being, as a particular substance, which enters into relation
with the forming activity of labour – can, in general, be nothing more
than the relation of labour to its objectivity, its material – which is
to be analysed already in the first chapter, which has to precede
exchange value and treat of production in general – and in connection
with labour as activity, the material, the objectified labour, has only
two relations, that of the _raw material_, i.e. of the formless matter,
the mere material for the form-positing, purposive activity of labour,
and that of the _instrument of labour_, the objective means which
subjective activity inserts between itself as an object, as its
conductor. The concept of the _product_, which the economists introduce
here, does not yet belong here at all as an aspect _distinct_ from raw
material and instrument of labour. It appears as _result_, not as
_presupposition_ of the process between the passive content of capital
and labour as activity. As a _presupposition_, the product is not a
distinct relation of the object to labour; distinct from raw material
and instrument of labour, since raw material and instrument of labour,
as substance of values, are themselves already _objectified_ labour,
_products_. The substance of value is not at all the particular natural
substance, but rather objectified labour. This latter itself appears
again in connection with _living labour_ as _raw material_ and
_instrument of labour_. As regards the pure act of production in itself,
it may seem that the instrument of labour and the raw material are found
freely in nature, so that they need merely to be _appropriated_, i.e.
made into the object and means of labour, which is not itself a labour
process. Thus, in contrast to them, the _product_ appears as something
qualitatively different, and is a product not only as a result of labour
with an instrument on a material, but rather as the first
_objectification of labour_ alongside them. But, as components of
capital, raw material and instrument of labour are themselves already
objectified labour, hence _product_. This does not yet exhaust the
relation. For, e.g. in the kind of production in which no exchange
value, no capital at all exists, the product of labour can become the
means and the object of new labour. For example, in agricultural
production purely for use value. The hunter’s bow, the fisherman’s net,
in short the simplest conditions, already presuppose a product which
ceases to count as product and becomes _raw material_ or more
specifically _instrument of production_, for this [is] actually the
first specific form in which the product appears as the means of
reproduction. This link therefore by no means exhausts the relation in
which _raw material_ and _instrument of labour_ appear as moments of
capital itself. The economists, incidentally, introduce the _product_ as
third element of the substance of capital in another connection
entirely, as well. This is the product in so far as its character is to
step outside both the process of production and circulation, and to
become immediate object of individual consumption; _approvisionnement_,
as Cherbuliez calls it. [5] That is, the products presupposed so that
the worker lives as a worker and is capable of living during production,
before a new product is created. That the capitalist possesses this
capacity is posited in the fact that every element of capital is money,
and, as such, can be transformed from its general form of wealth into
the material of wealth, object of consumption. The economists’
_approvisionnement_ thus applies only to the workers; i.e. it is money
expressed in the form of articles of consumption, use values, which they
obtain from the capitalist in the act of exchange between the two of
them. But this belongs within the first act. The extent to which this
first relates to the second is not yet the question here. The only
diremption posited by the process of production itself is the original
diremption, that posited by the difference between objective labour and
living labour itself, i.e. that between _raw material_ and _instrument
of labour_. It is quite consistent of the economists to confuse these
two aspects with each other, because they must bring the two moments in
the relation between capital and labour into confusion and cannot allow
themselves to grasp their specific difference.

Thus: the raw material is consumed by being changed, formed by labour,
and the instrument of labour is consumed by being used up in this
process, worn out. On the other hand, labour also is consumed by being
employed, set into motion, and a certain amount of the worker’s muscular
force etc. is thus expended, so that he exhausts himself. But labour is
not only consumed, but also at the same time fixed, converted from the
form of activity into the form of the object; materialized; as a
modification of the object, it modifies its own form and changes from
activity to being. The end of the process is the _product_, in which the
raw material appears as bound up with labour, and in which the
instrument of labour has, likewise, transposed itself from a mere
possibility into a reality, by having become a real conductor of labour,
but thereby also having been consumed in its static form through its
mechanical or chemical relation to the material of labour. All three
moments of the process, the material, the instrument, and labour,
coincide in the neutral result – the _product_. The moments of the
process of production which have been consumed to form the product are
simultaneously reproduced in it. The whole process therefore appears as
_productive consumption_, i.e. as consumption which terminates neither
in a _void_, nor in the mere subjectification of the objective, but
which is, rather, again posited as an _object_. This consumption is not
simply a consumption of the material, but rather consumption of
consumption itself; in the suspension of the material it is the
suspension of this suspension and hence the _positing_ of the same. [6]
This _form-giving_ activity consumes the object and consumes itself, but
it consumes the given form of the object only in order to posit it in a
new objective form, and it consumes itself only in its subjective form
as activity. It consumes the objective character of the object – the
indifference towards the form – and the subjective character of
activity; forms the one, materializes the other. But as _product_, the
result of the production process is _use value._

If we now regard the result so far obtained, we find:

_Firstly_: The appropriation, absorption of labour by capital – money,
i.e. the act of buying the capacity of disposing over the worker, here
appears only as a means to bring this process about, not as one of its
moments – brings capital into ferment, and makes it into a process,
_process of production_, in whose totality it relates to itself not only
as objectified by living labour, but also, because objectified, [as]
mere _object_ of labour.

_Secondly_: Within simple circulation, the substance of the commodity
and of money was itself indifferent to the formal character, i.e. to the
extent that commodity and money remained moments of circulation. As for
the substance of the commodity, it fell outside the economic relation as
an object of consumption (of need); money, in so far as its form
achieved independence, was still related to circulation, but only
negatively, and was only this negative relation. Fixed for itself, it
similarly became extinguished in dead materiality, and ceased to be
money. Both commodity and money were expressions of exchange value, and
differed only as general and particular exchange value. This difference
itself was again merely a nominal one, since not only were the two roles
switched in real circulation, but also, if we consider each of them by
itself, money itself was a particular commodity, and the commodity as
price was itself general money. The difference was only formal. Each of
them was posited in the one role only in so far as and because it was
not posited in the other. Now however, in the process of production,
capital distinguishes itself as form from itself as substance. It is
both aspects at once, and at the same time the relation of both to one
another. But:

_Thirdly_: It still only appeared as this relation _in itself_. The
relation is not _posited_ yet, or it is posited initially only in the
character of one of its two moments, the _material_ moment, which
divides internally into material (raw material and instrument) and form
(labour), and which, as a relation between both of them, as a real
process, is itself only a material relation again – a relation of the
two material elements which form the content of capital as distinct from
its formal relation as capital. If we now consider the aspect of capital
in which it originally appears in distinction from labour, then it is
merely a passive presence in the process, a merely objective being, in
which the formal character which makes it capital – i.e. a social
relation existing as being-for-itself [_für sich seiendes_] – is
completely extinguished. It enters the process only as content – as
objectified labour in general; but the fact that it is objectified
labour is completely irrelevant to labour – and the relation of labour
to it forms the process; it enters into the process, is worked on,
rather, only as object, not as _objectified labour_. Cotton which
becomes cotton yarn, or cotton yarn which becomes cloth, or cloth which
becomes the material for printing and dyeing, exist for labour only as
available cotton, yarn, cloth. They themselves do not enter into any
process as products of labour, as objectified labour, but only as
material existences with certain natural properties. _How_ these were
posited in them makes no difference to the relation of living labour
towards them; they exist for it only in so far as they exist as distinct
from it, i.e. as material for labour. This [is the case], in so far as
the point of departure is capital in its objective form, presupposed to
labour. On another side, in so far as labour itself has become one of
capital’s objective elements through the exchange with the worker,
labour’s distinction from the objective elements of capital is itself a
merely objective one; the latter in the form of rest, the former in the
form of activity. The relation is the material relation between one of
capital’s elements and the other; but not _its own_ relation to both. It
therefore appears on one side as a merely _passive object_, in which all
formal character is extinguished; it appears on the other side only as a
simple _production process_ into which capital as such, as distinct from
its substance, does not enter. It does not even appear in the substance
appropriate to itself – as objectified labour, for this is the substance
of exchange value – but rather only in the natural form-of-being
[_Daseinsform_] of this substance, in which all relation to exchange
value, to objectified labour, and to labour itself as the use value of
capital – and hence all relation to capital itself – is extinguished.
Regarded from this side, the process of capital coincides with the
simple process of production as such, in which its character as capital
is quite as extinguished in the form of the process, as money was
extinguished as money in the form of value. To the extent to which we
have examined the process so far, capital in its being-for-itself, i.e.
the capitalist, does not enter at all. It is not the capitalist who is
consumed by labour as raw material and instrument of labour. And it is
not the capitalist who does this consuming but rather labour. Thus the
process of the production of capital does not appear as the process of
the production of capital, but as the process of production in general,
and capital’s _distinction from labour_ appears only in the material
character of _raw material_ and _instrument of labour_. It is this
aspect – which is not only an arbitrary abstraction, but rather an
abstraction which takes place within the process itself – on which the
economists seize in order to represent capital as a necessary element of
every production process. Of course, they do this only by forgetting to
pay attention to its conduct as capital during this process.

This is the occasion to draw attention to a moment which here, for the
first time, not only arises from the standpoint of the observer, but is
posited in the economic relation itself. In the first act, in the
exchange between capital and labour, labour as such, existing _for
itself_, necessarily appeared as _the worker_. Similarly here in the
second process: capital as such is posited as a value existing for
itself, as egotistic value, so to speak (something to which money could
only aspire). But capital in its being-for-itself is the _capitalist_.
Of course, socialists sometimes say, we need capital, but not the
capitalist. [7] Then capital appears as a pure thing, not as a relation
of production which, reflected in itself, is precisely the capitalist. I
may well separate capital from a given individual capitalist, and it can
be transferred to another. But, in losing capital, he loses the quality
of being a capitalist. Thus capital is indeed separable from an
individual capitalist, but not from _the_ capitalist, who, as such,
confronts _the_ worker. Thus also the individual worker can cease to be
the being-for-itself [_Fürsichsein_] of labour; he may inherit or steal
money etc. But then he ceases to be a _worker_. As a worker he is
nothing more than labour in its being-for-itself. (This to be further
developed later.) [8]

Production process _as content of capital. Productive and unproductive labour (productive labour – that which produces capital). – The worker relates to his labour as exchange value, the capitalist as use value etc. – He divests himself_ [entäussert sich] _of labour as the wealth-producing power. (Capital appropriates it as such.) Transformation of labour into capital etc. Sismondi, Cherbuliez, Say, Ricardo, Proudhon etc._

Nothing can emerge at the end of the process which did not appear as a
presupposition and precondition at the beginning. But, on the other
hand, everything also has to come out. Thus, if at the end of the
process of production, which was begun with the presuppositions of
capital, capital appears to have vanished as a formal relation, then
this can have taken place only because the invisible threads which draw
it through the process have been overlooked. Let us therefore consider
this side.

The first result, then, is this:

(α) Capital becomes the process of production through the incorporation
of labour into capital; initially, however, it becomes the _material_
process of production; the process of production in general, so that the
process of the production of capital is not distinct from the material
process of production as such. Its formal character is completely
extinguished. Because capital has exchanged a part of its objective
being for labour, its objective being is itself internally divided into
object and labour; the connection between them forms the production
process, or, more precisely, the _labour process_. With that, the
_labour process posited prior to value, as point of departure_ – which,
owing to its abstractness, its pure materiality, is common to all forms
of production – here reappears _again within capital_, as a process
which proceeds within its substance and forms its content.

(It will be seen that even within the production process itself this
_extinguishing of the formal character_ is merely a semblance.) [9]

In so far as capital is value, but appears as a process initially in the
form of the simple production process, the production process posited in
no particular _economic_ form, but rather, the production process pure
and simple, to that extent – depending on which particular aspect of the
simple production process (which, as such, as we saw, by no means
presupposes capital, but is common to all modes of production) is fixed
on – it can be said that capital becomes product, or that it is
instrument of labour or raw material for labour. Further, if it is
conceived in one of the aspects which confronts labour as material or as
mere means, then it is correct to say that capital is not productive, *
because it is then regarded merely as the object, the material which
confronts labour; as merely passive. The correct thing, however, is that
it appears not as one of these aspects, nor as a difference within one
of these aspects, nor as mere result (product), but rather as the simple
production process itself; that this latter now appears as the
self-propelling _content_ of capital.

* What is _productive labour_ and what is _not_, a point very much
disputed back and forth since Adam Smith made this distinction, [10] has
to emerge from the dissection of the various aspects of capital itself.
_Productive labour_ is only that which produces _capital_. Is it not
crazy, asks e.g. (or at least something similar) Mr Senior, that the
piano maker is a _productive worker_, but not the _piano player_,
although obviously the piano would be absurd without the piano player?
[11] But this is exactly the case. The piano maker reproduces _capital_;
the pianist only exchanges his labour for revenue. But doesn’t the
pianist produce music and satisfy our musical ear, does he not even to a
certain extent produce the latter? He does indeed: his labour produces
something; but that does not make it _productive labour_ in the
_economic sense_; no more than the labour of the madman who produces
delusions is productive. _Labour becomes productive only by producing
its own opposite._ Other economists therefore allow the so-called
unproductive worker to be productive indirectly. For example, the
pianist stimulates production; partly by giving a more decisive, lively
tone to our individuality, and also in the ordinary sense of awakening a
new need for the satisfaction of which additional energy becomes
expended in direct material production. This already admits that only
such labour is productive as produces capital; hence that labour which
does not do this, regardless of how _useful_ it may be – it may just as
well be harmful – is not productive for capitalization, is hence
unproductive labour. Other economists say that the difference between
productive and unproductive applies not to production but to
consumption. Quite the contrary. The producer of tobacco is productive,
although the consumption of tobacco is unproductive. Production for
unproductive consumption is quite as productive as that for productive
consumption; always assuming that it produces or reproduces capital.
‘_Productive labourer he that directly augments his master’s wealth,_’
Malthus therefore says, quite correctly (IX,40); [12] correct at least
in one aspect. The expression is too abstract, since in this formulation
it holds also for the slave. The master’s wealth, in relation to the
worker, is the form of wealth itself in its relation to labour, namely
capital. Productive labourer he that directly augments capital.

(β) Now to look at the side of the form-character, such as it preserves
and modifies itself in the production process.

As _use value_, labour exists only _for capital_, and is itself the use
value of capital, i.e. the mediating activity by means of which it
_realizes_ [_verwertet_] itself. Capital, as that which reproduces and
increases its value, is autonomous exchange value (money), as a process,
as the _process of realization._ Therefore, labour does not exist as a
use value for the worker; _for_ him it is therefore not a _power
productive of wealth,_ [and] not a means or the activity of gaining
wealth. He brings it as a use value into the exchange with capital,
which then confronts him not as capital but rather as _money_. In
relation to the worker, it is capital as capital only in the consumption
of labour, which initially falls outside this exchange and is
independent of it. A _use value_ for capital, labour is a _mere exchange
value_ for the worker; available _exchange value_. It is posited as such
in the act of exchange with capital, through its sale for money. The use
value of a thing does not concern its seller as such, but only its
buyer. The property of saltpetre, that it can be used to make gunpowder,
does not determine the price of saltpetre; rather, this price is
determined by the cost of production of saltpetre, by the amount of
labour objectified in it. The value of use values which enter
circulation as prices is not the product of circulation, although it
realizes itself only in circulation; rather, it is _presupposed_ to it,
and is realized only through exchange for money. Similarly, the labour
which the worker sells as a _use value_ to capital is, for the worker,
his _exchange value_, which he wants to realize, but which is already
_determined_ prior to this act of exchange and presupposed to it as a
condition, and is determined like the value of every other commodity by
supply and demand; or, in general, which is our only concern here, by
the cost of production, the amount of objectified labour, by means of
which the labouring capacity of the worker has been produced and which
he therefore obtains for it, as its equivalent. The exchange value of
labour, the realization of which takes place in the process of exchange
with the capitalist, is therefore _presupposed_, predetermined, and only
undergoes the formal modification which every only ideally posited price
takes on when it is realized. It is not determined by the use value of
labour. It has a use value for the worker himself only in so far as it
is _exchange value_, not in so far as it produces exchange values. It
has exchange value for capital only in so far as it is use value. It is
a use value, as distinct from exchange value, not for the worker
himself, but only for capital. The worker therefore sells labour as a
simple, predetermined exchange value, determined by a previous process –
he sells labour itself as _objectified labour_; i.e. he sells labour
only in so far as it already objectifies a definite amount of labour,
hence in so far as its equivalent is already measured, given; capital
buys it as living labour, as the general productive force of wealth;
activity which increases wealth. It is clear, therefore, that the worker
cannot become _rich_ in this exchange, since, in exchange for his labour
capacity as a fixed, available magnitude, he surrenders its _creative
power_, like Esau his birthright for a mess of pottage. Rather, he
necessarily impoverishes himself, as we shall see further on, because
the creative power of his labour establishes itself as the power of
capital, as an _alien power_ confronting him. He _divests_ himself
[_entäussert sich_] of labour as the force productive of wealth; capital
appropriates it, as such. The separation between labour and property in
the product of labour, between labour and wealth, is thus posited in
this act of exchange itself. What appears paradoxical as _result_ is
already contained in the presupposition. The economists have expressed
this more or less empirically. Thus the productivity of his labour, his
labour in general, in so far as it is not a _capacity_ but a motion,
_real_ labour, _comes_ to confront the worker as an _alien power_;
capital, inversely, realizes itself through the _appropriation of alien
labour_. (At least the possibility of realization is thereby posited; as
result of the exchange between labour and capital. The relation is
realized only in the act of production itself, where capital really
consumes the alien labour.) Just as labour, as a _presupposed_ exchange
value, is exchanged for an equivalent in money, so the latter is again
exchanged for an equivalent in _commodities_, which are consumed. In
this process of exchange, labour is not productive; it becomes so only
for capital; it can take out of circulation only what it has thrown into
it, a _predetermined_ amount of commodities, which is as little its own
product as it is its own value. Sismondi says that the workers exchange
their labour for grain, which they consume, while their labour ‘has
become _capital_ for its master’. (Sismondi, VI.) [13] ‘Giving their
labour in exchange, the workers _transform_ it into capital.’ (id.,
VIII.) [14] By selling his labour to the capitalist, the worker obtains
a right only to the _price of labour_, not to the _product of his
labour_, nor to the value which _his labour has added to it._
(Cherbuliez XXVIII.) ‘_Sale of labour = renunciation of all fruits of
labour._’ (loc.cit.) [15] Thus all the progress of civilization, or in
other words every increase in the _powers of social production_
[_gesellschaftliche Produktivkräfte_], if you like, in the _productive
powers of labour itself_ – such as results from science, inventions,
division and combination of labour, improved means of communication,
creation of the world market, machinery etc. – enriches not the worker
but rather _capital_; hence it only magnifies again the power dominating
over labour; increases only the productive power of capital. Since
capital is the antithesis of the worker, this merely increases the
_objective power_ standing over labour. The _transformation of labour_
(as living, purposive activity) into _capital_ is, _in itself_, the
result of the exchange between capital and labour, in so far as it gives
the capitalist the title of ownership to the product of labour (and
command over the same). _This transformation is posited_ only in the
_production process_ itself. Thus, the question whether capital is
productive or not is absurd. Labour itself is _productive only_ if
absorbed into capital, where capital forms the basis of production, and
where the capitalist is therefore in command of production. The
productivity of labour becomes the productive force of capital just as
the general exchange value of commodities fixes itself in money. Labour,
such as it exists _for itself_ in the worker in opposition to capital,
that is, labour in its _immediate being_, separated from capital, is
_not productive_. Nor does it ever become _productive_ as an activity of
the worker so long as it merely enters the simple, only formally
transforming process of circulation. Therefore, those who demonstrate
that the productive force ascribed to capital is a _displacement_, a
_transposition of the productive force_ of labour, [16] forget precisely
that capital itself is essentially this _displacement, this
transposition_, and that wage labour as such presupposes capital, so
that, from its standpoint as well, capital is this _transubstantiation_;
the necessary process of positing its own powers as _alien_ to the
worker. Therefore, the demand that wage labour be continued but capital
suspended is self-contradictory, self-dissolving. Others say, even
economists, e.g. Ricardo, Sismondi etc., that _only labour_ is
productive, not capital. [17] But then they do not conceive [18] capital
in its _specific character as form_, as a _relation of production_
reflected into itself, but think only about its material substance, raw
material etc. But these material elements do not make capital into
capital. Then, however, they recall that capital is also in another
respect a _value_, that is, something _immaterial_, something
indifferent to its material consistency. Thus, Say: ‘_Capital is always
an immaterial essence_, because it is not material which makes capital,
but the _value_ of this material, a value which has nothing corporeal
about it.’ (Say, 21.) [19] Or: Sismondi: ‘Capital is a commercial
_idea_.’ (Sismondi, LX.) [20] But then they recall that capital is a
different economic quality as well, other than _value_, since otherwise
it would not be possible to speak of capital _as distinct from value_ at
all, and, if all capitals were value, all values as such would still not
be capital. Then they take refuge again in its material form within the
production process, e.g. when Ricardo explains that capital is
‘accumulated labour employed in the production of new labour’, [21] i.e.
merely as _instrument of labour_ or _material for labour_. In this sense
Say even speaks of the ‘_productive service of capital_’, [22] on which
remuneration is supposed to be based, as if the instrument of labour as
such were entitled to thanks from the worker, and as if it were not
precisely because of him that it is posited as instrument of labour, as
_productive_. This presupposes the autonomy of the instrument of labour,
i.e. of its _social_ character, i.e. its character as capital, in order
to derive the privileges of capital from it. Proudhon’s phrase ‘_le
capital vaut, le travail produit_’ [23] means absolutely nothing more
than: capital is value, and, since nothing further is here said about
capital other than that it is value, that value is value (the subject of
the judgement is here only another name for the predicate); [24] and
labour produces, is productive labour, i.e. labour is labour, since it
is precisely nothing apart from ‘_produire_’. [25] It must be obvious
that these identical judgements do not contain any particularly deep
wisdom, and that above all, they cannot express a relation in which
value and labour enter into connection, in which they connect and divide
in relation to one another, and where they do not lie side by side in
mutual indifference. Already the fact that it is _labour_ which
confronts capital as subject, i.e. the worker only in his character as
_labour_, and not _he himself_, should open the eyes. This alone,
disregarding capital, already contains a relation, a relation of the
worker to his own activity, which is by no means the _‘natural’_ one,
but which itself already contains a specific _economic_ character.

To the extent that we are considering it here, as a relation distinct
from that of value and money, capital is _capital in general_, i.e. the
incarnation of the qualities which distinguish value as capital from
value as pure value or as money. Value, money, circulation etc., prices
etc. are presupposed, as is labour etc. But we are still concerned
neither with a _particular_ form of capital, nor with an _individual_
capital as distinct from other individual capitals etc. We are present
at the process of its becoming. This dialectical process of its becoming
is only the ideal expression of the real movement through which capital
comes into being. The later relations are to be regarded as developments
coming out of this germ. But it is necessary to establish the specific
form in which it is posited at a _certain_ point. Otherwise confusion
arises.

Realization process [_Verwertungsprozess_]. – _(Costs of production.) – (Surplus value not explicable by exchange._ Ramsay. Ricardo.) _Capitalist cannot live from his wage etc._ (Faux frais de production.) [26] – _Mere self-preservation, non-multiplication of value contradicts the essence of capital_

Hitherto, capital has been regarded from its material side as a _simple
production process_. But, from the side of its formal specificity this
process is a _process of self-realization_. Self-realization includes
preservation of the prior value, as well as its multiplication.

Value enters as subject. Labour is purposeful activity, and the material
side therefore presupposes that the instrument of labour has really been
used as means to an end in the production process, and that the raw
material has obtained a higher use value as product than it had before,
whether this is due to chemical alteration or mechanical modification.
However, this side alone, as impinging merely on the use value, still
belongs in the simple production process. It is not the point here –
this is, rather, understood, presupposed – that a higher use value has
been created (this in itself is very relative; when grain is transformed
into spirits, the higher use value is itself already posited in respect
of circulation); no higher use value has yet been created for the
individual, the producer. This, in any case, is accidental, and does not
affect the relation as such; rather, a higher use value _for others_.
The point is, [rather,] that a _higher exchange value_ be created. In
the case of simple circulation, the process ended for the individual
commodity by its being consumed as use value. With that, it left
circulation; lost its exchange value, its economic form-character
[_Formbestimmung_] in general. Capital has consumed its material with
labour and its labour with material; it has consumed itself as use
value, but only as _use value for itself_, as capital. Its consumption
as use value therefore in this case falls within circulation itself, or
rather it itself posits the _beginning of circulation_ or its end, as
one prefers. The consumption of the use value itself here falls within
the economic process, because the use value here is itself determined by
exchange value. In no moment of the production process does capital
cease to be capital or value to be value, and, as such, _exchange
value_. Nothing is more ridiculous than to say, as does Mr Proudhon,
that capital changes from a product into an exchange value by means of
the act of exchange, i.e. by re-entering simple circulation. [27] We
would then be thrown back to the beginning, to direct barter even, where
we observe the origin of exchange value out of the product. Already its
presupposition as self-preserving exchange value comprises the
possibility that capital can and does re-enter into circulation as a
commodity at the end of the production process, after its consumption as
use value. However, in so far as the product now again becomes
commodity, and as commodity, exchange value, and obtains a price and is
realized as such in money, to that extent it is a simple commodity,
exchange value as such, and, as such, its fate within circulation may be
to be realized in money, or it may equally be that it does not realize
itself in money; i.e. that its exchange value becomes money or not. Thus
its exchange value has become much more problematic – before, it was
posited ideally – than the fact that it came into existence. What is
more, its being _really_ posited as a higher exchange value in
circulation cannot originate out of circulation itself, in which, in its
simple character, only equivalents are exchanged. Therefore, if it comes
out of circulation as a higher exchange value, it must have entered into
it as such.

Capital as a form consists not of objects of labour and labour, but
rather of _values_, and, still more precisely, of _prices_. The fact
that its value-elements have various substances in common during the
production process does not affect their character as values; they are
not changed thereby. If, out of the form of unrest – of the process – at
the end of the process, they again condense themselves into a resting,
objective form, in the product, then this, too, is merely a change of
the material [_Stoffwechsel_] in relation to value, and does not alter
the latter. [28] True, the substances as such have been destroyed, but
they have not been made into nothing, but rather into a substance with
another form. Earlier, they appeared as elemental, indifferent
preconditions of the product. Now they are the product. The value of the
product can therefore only = the sum of the values which were
materialized in the specific material elements of the process, i.e. raw
material, instrument of labour (including the merely instrumental
commodities), and labour itself. The raw material has been entirely used
up, labour has been entirely used up, the instrument has been only
partly used up, hence continues to possess a part of the value of the
capital in its specific mode of existence as present prior to the
process. This part therefore does not come under view here at all, since
it has suffered no modification. The different modes in which the values
existed were a pure semblance; value itself formed the constantly
self-identical essence within their disappearance. Regarded as a value,
the product has in this respect not become _product_, but rather
remained identical, unchanged value, which merely exists in a different
mode, which is, however, irrelevant to it and which can be exchanged for
money. The value of the product is = to the value of the raw material +
the value of the part of the instrument of labour which has been
destroyed, i.e. transferred to the product, and which is suspended in
its original form, + the value of labour. Or, the price of the product
is equal to these costs of production, i.e. = to the sum of the prices
of the commodities consumed in the production process. That means, in
other words, nothing more than that the production process in its
material aspect has been irrelevant to value; that value therefore has
remained identical with itself and has merely taken on another mode of
existence, become materialized in another substance and form. (The form
of the substance is irrelevant to the economic form, to value as such.)
If capital was originally = to 100 thalers, then afterwards, as before,
it remains equal to 100 thalers, although the 100 thalers existed in the
production price as 50 thalers of cotton, 40 thalers of wages + 10
thalers of spinning machine, and now exist as cotton yarn to the price
of 100 thalers. This reproduction of the 100 thalers is a simple
retention of self-equivalence [_Sichselbstgleichbleiben_], except that
it is mediated through the material production process. The latter must
therefore proceed to the product, for otherwise cotton loses its value,
instrument of labour used up for nothing, wages paid in vain. The only
stipulation for the self-preservation of value is that the production
process really be a total process, i.e. continue to the point where a
product exists. The completeness [_Totalität_] of the production
process, i.e. the fact that it proceeds to the product, is here in fact
the precondition of the self-preservation, the self-equivalent retention
of value; but this is already contained in the first precondition, that
capital really becomes use value, a real production process; is
therefore _presupposed_ at this point. On the other hand, the production
process is a production process for capital _only_ to the extent that it
preserves itself in this process as value, i.e. as product. The
statement that the necessary price = the sum of the prices of the costs
of production is therefore purely analytical. It is the presupposition
of the production of capital itself. First capital is posited as 100
thalers, as simple value; then it is posited in this process as a sum of
prices of specific value-elements of itself, elements specified by the
price of production itself. The price of capital, its value expressed in
money, = the price of its product. That means the value of capital as
the result of the production process is the same as it was as the
presupposition of the process. However, during the process it does not
retain the simplicity it had at the beginning, and which it takes on
once again at the end, as the result; rather, it decomposes into the
initially quite irrelevant quantitative elements of value of labour
(wage), value of the instrument of labour, and value of the raw
material. No further relation has been posited, other than that the
simple value decomposes quantitatively to form the price of production,
as a number of values which recombine in their simplicity in the
product, but which exists now as a _sum._ But the sum is = to the
original unity. Otherwise, as regards value, and apart from the
quantitative subdivision, there is not the least difference in the
relation between the distinct amounts of value. The original capital was
100 thalers; the product is 100 thalers, but now 100 thalers as the sum
of 50 + 40 + 10 thalers. I could just as well have regarded the original
100 thalers as a sum of 50 + 40 + 10 thalers, but equally as a sum of 60
+ 30 + 10 thalers, etc. The fact that they now appear as the sum of
specific amounts of units is posited because each of the different
material elements into which capital decomposed in the production
process represents a part of its value, but a specific part.

It will be seen later that these amounts into which the original unity
is decomposed themselves have certain relations with one another, but
this does not concern us here yet. In so far as any movement in the
value itself is posited during the production process, it is the purely
formal one which consists of the following simple act: that value exists
first as a unity, a specific amount of units, which are themselves
regarded as a unity, a whole: capital in the amount of 100 thalers;
secondly, that this unity is divided during the production process into
50 thalers, 40 thalers and 10 thalers, a division which is essential to
the extent that material, instrument and labour are required in specific
quantities, but which here appears, in regard to the 100 thalers
themselves, merely as an irrelevant decomposition of the same unity into
different amounts; finally, that the 100 thalers reappear as a sum in
the product. The only process, as regards value, [is] that it sometimes
appears as a whole, unity; then as a division of this unity into certain
amounts; finally, as sum. The 100 thalers which appear at the end as a
sum are just as much a sum and in fact exactly the same sum as that
which appeared at the outset as a unity. The character of being a sum,
of being added up, arose only out of the subdivision which took place in
the act of production; but does not exist in the product as such. The
statement thus says nothing more than that the price of the product =
the price of the costs of production, or that the value of capital = the
value of the product, that the value of the capital has preserved itself
in the act of production, and now appears as a sum. With this mere
identity of capital, or, reproduction of its value throughout the
production process, we would have come no further than we were at the
beginning. What was there at the outset as presupposition is now there
as result, and in unchanged form. It is clear that it is not in fact
this to which the economists refer when they speak of the determination
of price by the cost of production. Otherwise, a value greater than that
originally present could never be created; no greater exchange value,
although perhaps a greater use value, which is quite beside the point
here. We are dealing with the _use value of capital_ as such, not with
the use of value of a commodity.

When one says that the cost of production or the necessary price of a
commodity is = to 110, then one is calculating in the following way:
Original capital = 100 (e.g. raw material = 50; labour = 40; instrument
= 10) + 5% interest + 5% profit. Thus the production cost = 110, not =
100; the production cost is thus greater than the cost of production.
Now, it is no help at all to flee from exchange value to the use value
of the commodity, as some economists love to do. Whether the use value
is greater or lesser is not, as such, determined by the exchange value.
Commodities often fall beneath their prices of production, although they
indisputably have obtained a higher use value than they had in the
period _prior_ to production. It is equally useless to seek refuge in
circulation. I produce at 100, but I sell at 110. ‘Profit is not made by
exchanging. Had it not existed before, neither could it after that
transaction.’ (Ramsay, IX, 88.) [29] This signifies the attempt to
explain the augmentation of value with the aid of simple circulation,
despite the fact that the latter _expressly_ posits value as an
equivalent only. It is clear even empirically that if everyone sold for
10% too much, this is the same as if they all sold at the cost of
production. The surplus value [_Mehrwert_] would then be purely nominal,
artificial, a convention, an empty phrase. And, since money is itself a
commodity, a product, it also would be sold for 10% too much, i.e. the
seller who received 110 thalers would in fact receive only 100. (Consult
Ricardo on foreign trade, which he conceives as simple circulation, and
says, therefore: ‘foreign trade can never increase the amount of
exchange value in a country’. (Ricardo, 39, 40.) [30] The grounds he
cites for this conclusion are absolutely the same as those which ‘prove’
that exchange as such, simple circulation, i.e. commerce in general, in
so far as it is conceived as such, can never increase _exchange values_,
never create _exchange value_.) The statement that the price = the cost
of production would otherwise have to read, also: the price of a
commodity is always greater than its cost of production. In addition to
the simple division and re-addition, the production process also adds
the formal element to value, namely that its elements now appear as
_production costs_, i.e. precisely that the elements of the production
process are not preserved in their material character, but rather as
_values_, while the mode of existence which these had _before_ the
production process is consumed.

It is clear, on another side, that if the act of production is merely
the reproduction of the value of capital, then it would have undergone a
merely material but not an economic change, and such a simple
preservation of its value contradicts its concept [_Begriff_]. True, it
would not remain outside circulation, as in the case of autonomous
money, but would, rather, take on the form of different commodities;
however, it would do so for nothing; this would be a purposeless
process, since it would ultimately represent only the same sum of money,
and would only have run the risk of suffering some damage in the act of
production – [moreover, it is a process] which can fail, and in which
money surrenders its immortal form. Well then. The production process is
now at an end. The product, too, is realized in money again, and has
again taken on the original form of the 100 thalers. But the capitalist
has to eat and drink, too; he cannot live from this change into the form
of money. Thus, a part of the 100 thalers would have to be exchanged not
as capital, but as coin for commodities as use values, and be consumed
in this form. The 100 thalers would have become 90, and since he always
ultimately reproduces capital in the form of money, more precisely, in
the quantity of money with which he began production, at the end the 100
thalers would be eaten up and the capital would have disappeared. But
the capitalist is paid for the _labour_ of throwing the 100 thalers into
the production process as capital, instead of eating them up. But with
what is he to be paid? And does not his labour appear as absolutely
useless, since capital includes the wage; so that the workers could live
from the simple reproduction of the cost of production, which the
capitalist cannot do? He would thus appear among the _faux frais de
production_. [31] But, whatever his merits may be, reproduction would be
possible without him, since, in the production process, the workers only
transfer the value which they take out, hence have no need for the
entire relation of capital in order to begin it always anew; and
secondly, there would then be no fund out of which to pay him what he
deserves, since the price of the commodity = the cost of production.
But, if his labour were defined as a particular labour alongside and
apart from that of the workers, e.g. that of the labour of
superintendence etc., [32] then he would, like them, receive a certain
wage, would thus fall into the same category as they, and would by no
means relate to labour as a capitalist; and he would never get rich, but
receive merely an exchange value which he would have to consume via
circulation. The existence of capital _vis-à-vis_ labour requires that
capital in its being-for-itself, the capitalist, should exist and be
able to live as _not-worker_. It is equally clear, on the other side,
that capital, even as conventionally defined, would not retain its value
if it could retain nothing but its _value. The risks of production have
to be compensated._ Capital has to preserve itself through the
fluctuations of prices. The constantly ongoing devaluation of capital,
resulting from the increase in the force of production, has to be
compensated, etc. The economists therefore state flatly that if no gain,
no profit were to be made, everyone would eat up his money instead of
throwing it into production and employing it as capital. In short, if
this _not-realization_ [_Nichtverwerten_], i.e. the non-multiplication
of the value of capital, is presupposed, then what is presupposed is
that capital is not a real element of production, that it is not a
_specific relation of production_; then a condition is presupposed in
which the production costs do not have the form of capital and where
capital is not posited as the condition of production.

It is easy to understand how labour can increase use value; the
difficulty is, how it can create exchange values greater than those with
which it began.

Suppose that the exchange value which capital pays the worker were an
exact equivalent for the value which labour creates in the production
process. In that case, an increase in the exchange value of the product
would be impossible. Everything which labour as such had brought into
the production process, in addition to the already present value of the
raw material and of the instrument of labour, would have been paid to
the worker. In so far as the value of the product is a surplus over and
above the value of raw material and instrument, that value would go to
the worker; except that the capitalist would pay him this value in his
wages, and that the worker pays it back to the capitalist in the
product.

_Capital enters the cost of production as capital._ Interest-bearing capital. Proudhon

<Interest on borrowed capital makes tangible the truth that what is
meant by _the cost of production_ – even by economists who make this
assertion – is not the sum of values which enter into production. For
the industrial capitalist, interest is among his direct expenses, his
_real_ costs of production. But interest itself already presupposes that
capital emerges from production as surplus value, since interest is
itself only _one form_ of this surplus value. Therefore, since, from the
standpoint of the borrower, interest already enters into his _direct
production costs_, it is apparent that capital enters as such into the
cost of production, but that capital as such is not the mere addition of
its value-components. – As interest, capital itself appears again in the
character of a _commodity_, but a commodity _specifically_ distinct from
all other commodities; _capital as such_ – not as a mere sum of exchange
values – enters into circulation and becomes a _commodity_. Here, the
character of the commodity is itself present as an _economic, specific_
determinant, not irrelevant as in simple circulation, nor directly
related to labour as its opposite, as its use value, as with industrial
capital; [but, rather,] capital as it exists in its further aspects,
after emerging from circulation and production. The commodity as
capital; or capital as _commodity_, is therefore not exchanged for an
equivalent in circulation; by entering into circulation, it _obtains its
being-for-itself_; it obtains its original relation to its owner, even
when it passes into the possession of another. It is therefore merely
_loaned_. For its owner, its use value as such is its _realization_
[_Verwertung_]; money as money, not as medium of circulation; its _use
value as capital_. The demand raised by Mr Proudhon, that capital should
not be loaned out and should bear no interest, but should be sold like a
commodity for its equivalent, [33] amounts at bottom to no more than the
demand that exchange value should never become capital, but always
remain simple exchange value; that _capital_ should _not exist as
capital_. This demand, combined with the other, that wage labour should
remain the general basis of production, reveals a happy confusion with
regard to the simplest economic concepts. Hence the miserable role he
plays in the polemic with Bastiat, about which, later. His chatter about
considerations of fairness and right only amounts to this, that he wants
to use the relation of property or of law corresponding to simple
exchange as the measuring-rod for the relation of property and law at a
higher stage of exchange value. Which is why Bastiat himself,
unconsciously, stresses those moments of simple circulation which drive
in the direction of capital. – Capital itself as commodity is _money as
capital_ or _capital as money_.>

<The third moment to be developed in the formation of the concept of
capital is _original accumulation_ [_ursprüngliche Akkumulation_] as
against labour, hence the still objectless labour _vis-à-vis_
accumulation. The _first moment_ took its point of departure from value,
as it arose out of and presupposed circulation. This was the _simple
concept_ of capital; money on the direct path to becoming capital; the
_second moment_ proceeded from capital as the presupposition and result
of production; the _third moment_ posits capital as a _specific unity_
of circulation and production. (Relation between capital and labour,
capitalist and worker itself [posited] as a result of the production
process.) A distinction is to be drawn between the accumulation of
capitals, which presupposes capitals, the relation of capital as
_present_ [_daseiend_], which also presupposes its relations to labour,
prices (fixed capital and circulating capital), interest and profit.
[34] But in order to come into being, capital presupposes a certain
accumulation; which is already contained in the independent antithesis
between objectified and living labour; in the independent survival of
this antithesis. This accumulation, necessary for capital to come into
being, which is therefore already included in its concept as
presupposition – as a moment – is to be distinguished essentially from
the accumulation of capital which has already become capital, where
there must already be _capitals_.>

<We have already seen so far that capital presupposes: (1) the
production process in general, such as is common to all social
conditions, that is, without historic character, _human_, if you like;
(2) _circulation_ which is already a specific _historic_ product in each
of its moments, and even more so in its totality; (3) _capital_ as a
_specific_ unity of the two. Now, the extent to which the production
process in general comes to be modified historically as soon as it
becomes merely an element of capital has to be found out in the course
of developing it; just as the simple conception of the specific
characteristics of capital must yield its general historic
presuppositions.>

<Everything else is empty chatter. Only at the end, and as a result of
the whole development, can it become clear which aspects belong in the
first section, ‘Production in General’, and which into the first section
of the second section, ‘Exchange Value in General’. We already saw, for
example, that the distinction between use value and exchange value
belongs within economics itself, and that use value does not lie dead as
a simple presupposition, which is what Ricardo makes it do. [35] The
chapter on production objectively ends with the product as result; that
on circulation begins with the _commodity_, which is itself again a _use
value_ and an _exchange value_ (hence, also, distinct from both, a
_value_), circulation as the unity of both – which is, however, merely
formal and hence collapses into the commodity as mere object of
consumption, extra-economic, and exchange value as independent money.>

_Surplus value. Surplus labour time. – Bastiat on wages. Value of labour. How determined? – Self-realization is self-preservation of capital. Capitalist may not live merely from his labour etc. Conditions for the self-realization of capital. Surplus labour time etc. – To the extent that capital is productive (as creator of surplus labour etc.), this only historic-transitory. – The free blacks in Jamaica. – Wealth which has gained autonomy requires slave labour or wage labour (forced labour in both cases)_

_The surplus value which capital has at the end of the production
process_ – a surplus value which, as a higher price of the product, is
realized only in circulation, but, like all prices, is realized in it by
already being ideally _presupposed_ to it, determined before they enter
into it – signifies, expressed in accord with the general concept of
exchange value, that the labour time objectified in the product – or
amount of labour (expressed passively, the magnitude of labour appears
as an amount of space; but expressed in motion, it is measurable only in
time) – is greater than that which was present in the original
components of capital. This in turn is possible only if the labour
objectified in the price of labour is smaller than the living labour
time purchased with it. The labour time objectified in capital appears,
as we have seen, [36] as a sum consisting of three parts: (a) the labour
time objectified in the raw material; (b) the labour time objectified in
the instrument of labour; (c) the labour time objectified in the price
of labour. Now, parts (a) and (b) remain unchanged as components of
capital; while they may change their form, their modes of material
existence, in the process, they remain unchanged as values. Only in (c)
does capital exchange one thing for something qualitatively different; a
given amount of objectified labour for an amount of living labour. If
living labour reproduced only the labour time objectified in the labour
price, this also would be merely formal, and, as regards value, the only
change which would have taken place would have been that from one mode
to another mode of the existence of the same value, just as, in regard
to the value of the material of labour and the instrument, only a change
of its mode of material existence has taken place. If the capitalist has
paid the worker a price = one working day, and the worker’s working day
adds only one working day to the raw material and the instrument, then
the capitalist would merely have exchanged exchange value in one form
for exchange value in another. He would not have acted as capital. At
the same time, the worker would not have remained within the simple
exchange process; he would in fact have obtained the product of his
labour in payment, except that the capitalist would have done him the
favour of paying him the price of the product in advance of its
realization [_Realisation_]. The capitalist would have advanced him
credit, and free of charge at that, _pour le roi de Prusse._ [37] _Voilà
tout_. No matter that for the worker the exchange between capital and
labour, whose result is the price of labour, is a simple exchange; as
far as the capitalist is concerned, it has to be a not-exchange. He has
to obtain more value than he gives. Looked at from the capitalists’
side, the exchange must be only _apparent_; i.e. must belong to an
economic category other than exchange, or capital as capital and labour
as labour in opposition to it would be impossible. They would be
exchanged for one another only as identical exchange values existing in
different material modes. – Thus the economists take refuge in this
simple process in order to construct a legitimation, an apology for
capital by explaining it with the aid of the very process which makes
its existence impossible. In order to demonstrate it, they demonstrate
it away. You pay me for my labour, you exchange it for its product and
deduct from my pay the value of the raw material and instrument which
you have furnished. That means we are _partners_ who bring different
elements into the process of production and exchange according to their
values. Thus the product is transformed into money, and the money is
divided in such a way that you, the capitalist, obtain the price of your
raw material and your instrument, while I, the worker, obtain the price
which my labour added to them. The benefit for you is that you now
possess raw material and instrument in a form in which they are capable
of being consumed (circulated); for me, that my labour has realized
itself [_sich verwertet_]. Of course, you would soon be in the situation
of having eaten up all your capital in the form of money, whereas I, as
worker, would enter into the possession of both.

What the worker exchanges with capital is his labour itself (the
capacity of disposing over it); he _divests himself of it_ [_entäussert
sie_]. What he obtains as price is the _value_ of this divestiture
[_Entäusserung_]. He exchanges value-positing activity for a
predetermined value, regardless of the result of his activity. * Now how
is its value determined? By the objectified labour contained in his
commodity. This commodity exists in his vitality. In order to maintain
this from one day to the next – we are not yet dealing with the working
class, i.e. the replacement for wear and tear so that it can maintain
itself as a class, since the worker here confronts capital as a
_worker_, i.e. as a presupposed perennial subject [_Subjekt_], and not
yet as a mortal individual of the working species – he has to consume a
certain quantity of food, to replace his used-up blood etc. He receives
no more than an equivalent. Thus tomorrow, after the completed exchange
– and only after he has formally completed the exchange does he execute
it in the process of production – his labouring capacity exists in the
same mode as before: he has received an exact equivalent, because the
price which he has obtained leaves him in possession of the same
exchange value he had before. Capital has paid him the amount of
objectified labour contained in his vital forces. Capital has consumed
it, and because it did not exist as a thing, but as the capacity of a
living being, the worker can, owing to the _specific_ nature of his
commodity – the specific nature of the life process – resume the
exchange anew. Since we are dealing here not with any _particularly_
qualified labour but with labour in general, simple labour, we are here
not yet concerned with the fact that there is more labour objectified in
his immediate existence than is contained in his mere vitality – i.e.
the labour time necessary to pay for the products necessary to maintain
his vitality – namely the values he has consumed in order to produce a
specific _labouring capacity_, a special _skill_ – and the value of
these shows itself in the costs necessary to produce a similar labouring
skill.

* One of Mr Bastiat’s tremendous profundities is that _wage labour_ is
an inessential, only formal form, a form of association, which, _as
such_, has nothing to do with the economic relation of labour and
capital. If, he says, the workers were rich enough to be able to await
the completion and sale of the product, then wages, wage labour, would
not hinder them from making as advantageous a contract with their
capitalist as their capitalist makes with another capitalist. Thus the
evil lies not in the wage form, but in conditions independent of it.
That these conditions are themselves the _wage condition_ naturally does
not occur to him. If the workers were capitalists at the same time, then
indeed they would relate to non-working capital not as working workers,
but as working capitalists – i.e. not in the form of wage-labourers.
That is why wages and profit are _essentially_ the same for him as
_profit_ and _interest_. This he calls the _harmony of economic
relations_, namely that only _seemingly_ economic relations exist, but
in fact, in essence, there exists only one relation, that of simple
exchange. The _essential_ forms therefore appear to him as _lacking
content_, i.e. not as real forms. [38]

If one day’s work were necessary in order to keep one worker alive for
one day, then capital would not exist, because the working day would
then exchange for its own product, so that capital could not realize
itself and hence could not maintain itself as capital. The
self-preservation of capital is its self-realization. If capital also
had to work in order to live, then it would not maintain itself as
capital but as labour. Property in raw materials and instruments of
labour would be merely _nominal_; economically they would belong to the
worker as much as to the capitalist, since they would create _value_ for
the capitalist only in so far as he himself were a worker. He would
relate to them therefore not as capital, but as simple material and
means of labour, like the worker himself does in the production process.
If, however, only half a working day is necessary in order to keep one
worker alive one whole day, then the surplus value of the product is
self-evident, because the capitalist has paid the price of only half a
working day but has obtained a whole day objectified in the product;
thus has exchanged _nothing_ for the second half of the work day. The
only thing which can make him into a capitalist is not exchange, but
rather a process through which he obtains _objectified labour time_,
i.e. _value_, without exchange. Half the working day costs capital
nothing; it thus obtains a value for which it has given no equivalent.
And the multiplication of values can take place only if a value in
excess of the equivalent has been obtained, hence _created_.

Surplus value in general is value in excess of the equivalent. The
equivalent, by definition, is only the identity of value with itself.
Hence surplus value can never sprout out of the equivalent; nor can it
do so originally out of circulation; it has to arise from the production
process of capital itself. The matter can also be expressed in this way:
if the worker needs only half a working day in order to live a whole
day, then, in order to keep alive as a worker, he needs to work only
half a day. The second half of the labour day is forced labour;
surplus-labour. What appears as surplus value on capital’s side appears
identically on the worker’s side as surplus labour in excess of his
requirements as worker, hence in excess of his immediate requirements
for keeping himself alive. The great historic quality of capital is to
create this _surplus labour_, superfluous labour from the standpoint of
mere use value, mere subsistence; and its historic destiny
[_Bestimmung_] is fulfilled as soon as, on one side, there has been such
a development of needs that surplus labour above and beyond necessity
has itself become a general need arising out of individual needs
themselves – and, on the other side, when the severe discipline of
capital, acting on succeeding generations [_Geschlechter_], has
developed general industriousness as the general property of the new
species [_Geschlecht_] – and, finally, when the development of the
productive powers of labour, which capital incessantly whips onward with
its unlimited mania for wealth, and of the sole conditions in which this
mania can be realized, have flourished to the stage where the possession
and preservation of general wealth require a lesser labour time of
society as a whole, and where the labouring society relates
scientifically to the process of its progressive reproduction, its
reproduction in a constantly greater abundance; hence where labour in
which a human being does what a thing could do has ceased. Accordingly,
capital and labour relate to each other here like money and commodity;
the former is the general form of wealth, the other only the substance
destined for immediate consumption. Capital’s ceaseless striving towards
the general form of wealth drives labour beyond the limits of its
natural paltriness [_Naturbedürftigkeit_], and thus creates the material
elements for the development of the rich individuality which is as
all-sided in its production as in its consumption, and whose labour also
therefore appears no longer as labour, but as the full development of
activity itself, in which natural necessity in its direct form has
disappeared; because a historically created need has taken the place of
the natural one. This is why _capital is productive; i.e. an essential
relation for the development of the social productive forces._ It ceases
to exist as such only where the development of these productive forces
themselves encounters its barrier in capital itself.

_The Times_ of November 1857 contains an utterly delightful cry of
outrage on the part of a West-Indian plantation owner. This advocate
analyses with great moral indignation – as a plea for the
re-introduction of Negro slavery – how the _Quashees_ (the free blacks
of Jamaica) content themselves with producing only what is strictly
necessary for their own consumption, and, alongside this ‘use value’,
regard loafing (indulgence and idleness) as the real luxury good; how
they do not care a damn for the sugar and the fixed capital invested in
the plantations, but rather observe the planters’ impending bankruptcy
with an ironic grin of malicious pleasure, and even exploit their
acquired Christianity as an embellishment for this mood of malicious
glee and indolence. [39] They have ceased to be slaves, but not in order
to become wage labourers, but, instead, self-sustaining peasants working
for their own consumption. As far as they are concerned, capital does
not exist as capital, because autonomous wealth as such can exist only
either on the basis of _direct_ forced labour, slavery, or _indirect_
forced labour, _wage labour_. Wealth confronts direct forced labour not
as capital, but rather as _relation of domination_
[_Herrschaftsverhältnis_]; thus, the relation of domination is the only
thing which is reproduced on this basis, for which wealth itself has
value only as gratification, not as wealth itself, and which can
therefore never create _general industriousness._ (We shall return to
this relation of slavery and wage labour.) [40]

Surplus value. _Ricardo. Physiocrats. A. Smith. Ricardo_

The difficulty of grasping the creation of value shows itself (1) in
those modern English economists who accuse Ricardo of not having
understood the surplus, the _surplus value_ (see _Malthus on value_, who
at least tries to proceed scientifically), [41] whereas, among all the
economists, Ricardo alone understood it, as is demonstrated by his
polemic against A. Smith’s confusion of the determination of value by
wages and by the labour time objectified in the commodity. The newcomers
are just plain simpletons. However, Ricardo himself often gets into
confusion, because, although he well understands that the creation of
surplus value is the presupposition of capital, he often goes astray in
conceiving the multiplication of values on any basis other than the
investment of _additional objectified labour time_ in the same product,
in other words, on any basis other than when production becomes _more
difficult_. Hence the absolute antithesis in his thinking between
_value_ and _wealth_. Hence the one-sidedness of his theory of ground
rent; his erroneous theory of international trade, which is supposed to
produce only use value (which he calls wealth), not exchange value. [42]
The only avenue for the increase of values as such, apart from the
_growing difficulty of production_ (theory of rent), remains population
growth (the natural increase among workers resulting from the growth of
capital), although he himself never plainly summarized this relation.
The basic mistake, that he never investigates where actually the
distinction between the determination of value by wages and that by
objectified labour comes from. Money and exchange itself (circulation)
therefore appear only as purely formal elements in his economics; and
although, according to him, economics is concerned _only_ with exchange
value, profit etc. appears there _only_ as a percentage share of the
product, which happens just as much on the basis of slavery. He never
investigated the form of the mediation.

(2) _The Physiocrats._ Here the difficulty of grasping capital, the
self-realization of value, hence the surplus value created by capital in
the act of production, presents itself in tangible form, and this was
necessarily so among the fathers of modern economics, just as was the
case with the creation of surplus value in Ricardo, which he conceives
in the form of rent, during the final classical conclusion of this
economics. It is at bottom the question of the concept of capital and of
wage labour, and therefore the fundamental question which presents
itself at the threshold of the system of modern society. The Monetary
System had understood the autonomy of value only in the form in which it
arose from simple circulation – _money_; it therefore made this
_abstract form_ of wealth into the exclusive object [_Objekt_] of
nations which were just then entering into the period in which the
_gaining of wealth as such_ appeared as the aim of society itself. Then
came the Mercantile System, an epoch where industrial capital and hence
wage labour arose in manufactures, and developed in antithesis to and at
the expense of non-industrial wealth, of feudal landed property. [The
Mercantilists] already have faint notions of money as capital, but
actually again only in the form of money, of the circulation of
_mercantile_ capital, of capital which _transforms_ itself into _money_.
Industrial capital has value for them, even the highest value – as a
means, not as wealth itself in its productive process – because it
creates mercantile capital and the latter, via circulation, becomes
money. Labour in manufactures – i.e. at bottom industrial labour, but
agricultural labour was and appeared to them, in antithesis, as chiefly
productive of use values; raw products, processed, are more valuable,
because in a clearer form, likewise more suitable for circulation,
commerce; creating more money for the mercantile form (in this regard
the historic view of wealth of non-agricultural peoples such as Holland,
for example, in antithesis to that of the agricultural, feudal;
agriculture did not appear at all in industrial form, but in feudal,
hence as source of feudal, not of bourgeois wealth). Thus one form of
wage labour, the industrial, and one form of capital, the industrial,
were recognized as sources of wealth, but only in so far as they
produced money. Exchange value itself therefore not yet conceived in the
form of capital. Now the _Physiocrats_. They distinguish between capital
and money, and conceive it in its general form as autonomous exchange
value which preserves and increases itself in and through production.
They also therefore examine the relation for itself, not merely as a
moment of simple circulation, but rather as its presupposition which
constantly rises out of it to become its presupposition again. They are
therefore the fathers of modern economics. They also understand that the
creation of surplus value by wage labour is the self-realization
[_Selbstverwertung_], i.e. the realization [_Verwirklichung_] of
capital. But how does labour act as a means to produce a surplus value
out of capital, i.e. already-present value? Here they let the form drop
altogether and only look at the simple production process. Hence only
that labour can be productive which takes place in the kind of field
where the natural force of the instrument of labour tangibly permits the
labourer to produce more value than he consumes. Surplus value therefore
does not arise from labour as such, but rather from the natural forces
which labour uses and conducts – agriculture. This is therefore the only
_productive labour_, for they have come so far that [they consider that]
_only labour which creates surplus value is productive_ (that surplus
value has to express itself in a material product is a crude view which
still occurs in A. Smith. [43] Actors are productive workers, not in so
far as they produce a play, but in so far as they increase their
employer’s wealth. But what sort of labour takes place, hence in what
form labour materializes itself, is absolutely irrelevant for _this
relation_. It is not irrelevant, again, from later points of view); but
this surplus value surreptitiously transforms itself into a quantity of
use value coming out of production, larger than that which is consumed
in it. This multiplication of use values, the excess of the product
above that which has to serve as a means for new production – of which a
part can therefore be consumed unproductively – appears tangibly only in
the relation between the natural seed and its product. Only a part of
the harvest has to be directly returned to the soil as seed; products
found in nature, the elements air, water, earth, light, and added
substances such as fertilizer, then recreate the seed again in
multiplied quantity as grain etc. In short, human labour has only to
conduct the chemical processes (in agriculture), and in part also to
promote them mechanically, or promote the reproduction of life itself
(cattle-raising) in order to obtain the surplus, i.e. to transform the
identical natural substances from a useless into a valuable form. An
over-abundance of agricultural products (grain, cattle, raw materials)
is therefore the true form of general wealth. From the economic
viewpoint, therefore, _rent_ is the only form of wealth. Thus it is that
the first prophets of capital conceive only the not-capitalists, the
_feudal landed proprietors_, as the representatives of _bourgeois_
wealth. The consequence, the levy of all taxes on rent, is then,
however, entirely to the advantage of bourgeois capital. The bourgeois
glorify feudalism in theory – many a feudal figure, like the elder
Mirabeau [44] has been duped by this – only in order to ruin it in
actual practice. All other values merely represent raw material +
labour; labour itself represents grain or other products of the soil,
which labour consumes; hence the factory worker etc. adds no more to the
raw material than he consumes in raw materials. Therefore, his labour as
well as his employer create no additional wealth – wealth being the
surplus above the commodities consumed in production – but merely give
it forms more pleasant and useful for consumption. At that time the
utilization of natural energy in industry had not developed, nor the
division of labour etc. which increases the natural force of labour
itself. This was the case, however, in A. Smith’s time. With him,
therefore, labour in principle the source of value, likewise of wealth,
but actually labour too posits surplus value only in so far as in the
division of labour the surplus appears as just as much a gift of nature,
a natural force of society, as the soil with the Physiocrats. Hence the
weight A. Smith lays on the division of labour. _Capital_, on the other
hand, appears to him – because, although he defines labour as productive
of value, he conceives it as use value, as productivity for-itself [_für
sich seiend_], as _human_ natural force in general (this distinguishes
him from the Physiocrats), but not as wage labour, not in its _specific_
character as form in antithesis to capital – not as that which contains
wage labour as its internal contradiction from its origin, but rather in
the form in which it emerges from circulation, as money, and is
therefore created out of circulation, by _saving_. Thus capital does not
originally realize itself – precisely because the appropriation of alien
labour [_fremde Arbeit_] is not itself included in its concept. Capital
appears only _afterwards_, after already having been presupposed as
_capital_ – a vicious circle – as _command over alien labour_. Thus,
according to A. Smith, labour should actually have its own product for
wages, wages should be = to the product, hence labour should not be wage
labour and capital not capital. Therefore, in order to introduce profit
and rent as original elements of the cost of production, i.e. in order
to get a surplus value out of the capitalist production process, he
presupposes them, in the clumsiest fashion. The capitalist does not want
to give the use of his capital for nothing; the landowner, similarly,
does not want to give land and soil over to production for nothing. They
want something in return. This is the way in which they are introduced,
with their demands, as historical facts, but not explained. Wages are
actually the _only economically_ justifiable, because necessary, element
of production costs. Profit and rent are only _deductions_ from wages,
arbitrarily wrested by force in the historical process by capital and
landed property, and justified _by law_, not economically. But on the
other side, since he [Adam Smith] then confronts labour with the means
and materials of production in the form of landed property and capital,
as independent entities, he has essentially posited labour as wage
labour. Therefore contradictions. Hence his vacillation in the
determination of value; the placing of profit and ground rent on the
same level; erroneous views about the influence of wages on prices etc.
Now Ricardo (see 1). [45] With him, however, wage labour and capital are
again conceived as a natural, not as a historically specific social form
[_Gesellschaftsform_] for the creation of wealth as use value; i.e.
their form as such, precisely because it is natural, is _irrelevant_,
and is not conceived in its _specific_ relation to the form of wealth,
just as wealth itself, in its exchange-value form, appears as a merely
formal mediation of its material composition; thus the specific
character of bourgeois wealth is not grasped – precisely because it
appears there as the adequate form of wealth as such, and thus, although
_exchange value_ is the point of departure, the _specific economic forms
of exchange_ themselves play no role at all in his economics. Instead,
he always speaks about distribution of the general product of labour and
of the soil among the three classes, as if the form of wealth based on
_exchange value_ were concerned only with _use value_, and as if
exchange value were merely a ceremonial form, which vanishes in Ricardo
just as money as medium of circulation vanishes in exchange. Therefore,
in order to bring out the true laws of economics, he likes to refer to
this relation of money as a merely formal one. Hence also his weakness
in the doctrine of money proper.

The exact development of the concept of capital [is] necessary, since it
[is] the fundamental concept of modern economics, just as capital
itself, whose abstract, reflected image [is] its concept [_dessen
abstraktes Gegenbild sein Begriff_], [is] the foundation of bourgeois
society. The sharp formulation of the basic presuppositions of the
relation must bring out all the contradictions of bourgeois production,
as well as the boundary where it drives beyond itself.

<It is important to note that wealth as such, i.e. bourgeois wealth, is
always expressed to the highest power as exchange value, where it is
posited as _mediator_, as the mediation of the extremes of exchange
value and use value themselves. This intermediary situation [_Mitte_]
always appears as the _economic_ relation in its completeness, because
it comprises the opposed poles, and ultimately always appears as a
one-sidedly higher power _vis-à-vis_ the extremes themselves; because
the movement, or the relation, which _originally_ appears as mediatory
between the extremes necessarily develops dialectically to where it
appears as mediation with itself, as the subject [_Subjekt_] for whom
the extremes are merely its moments, whose autonomous presupposition it
suspends in order to posit itself, through their suspension, as that
which alone is autonomous. Thus, in the religious sphere, Christ, the
mediator between God and humanity – a mere instrument of circulation
between the two – becomes their unity, God-man, and, as such, becomes
more important than God; the saints more important than Christ; the
popes more important than the saints. Where it is posited as middle
link, exchange value is always the total economic expression, itself
one-sided against the extremes; e.g. money in simple circulation;
capital itself as mediator between production and circulation. Within
capital itself, one form of it in turn takes up the position of use
value against the other as exchange value. Thus e.g. does industrial
capital appear as producer as against the merchant, who appears as
circulation. Thus the former represents the material [_stofflich_], the
latter the formal side, i.e. wealth as wealth. At the same time,
mercantile capital is itself in turn the mediator between production
(industrial capital) and circulation (the consuming public) or between
exchange value and use value, where both sides are posited alternately,
production as money and circulation as use value (consuming public) or
the former as use value (product) and the latter as exchange value
(money). Similarly within commerce itself: the wholesaler as mediator
between manufacturer and retailer, or between manufacturer and
agriculturalist, or between different manufacturers; he is the same
mediator at a higher level. And in turn, in the same way, the commodity
brokers as against the wholesalers. Then the banker as against the
industrialists and merchants; the joint-stock company as against simple
production; the financier as mediator between the state and bourgeois
society, on the highest level. _Wealth as such_ presents itself more
distinctly and broadly the further it is removed from direct production
and is itself mediated between poles, each of which, considered for
itself, is already posited as economic form. Money becomes an end rather
than a means; and the higher form of mediation, as capital, everywhere
posits the lower as itself, in turn, labour, as merely a source of
surplus value. For example, the bill-broker, banker etc. as against the
manufacturers and farmers, which are posited in relation to him in the
role of labour (of use value); while he posits himself toward them as
capital, extraction of surplus value; the wildest form of this, the
financier.>

_Capital is direct unity_ of product and money or, better, of production
and circulation. Thus it itself is again something _immediate_, and its
development consists of positing and suspending itself as this unity –
which is posited as a specific and therefore simple relation. The unity
at first appears in capital as something _simple_.

<Ricardo’s reasoning is simply this: products are exchanged for one
another – hence capital for capital – according to the amounts of
objectified labour contained in them. A day’s work is always exchanged
for a day’s work. This is presupposition. Exchange itself can therefore
be entirely left out. The product – capital posited as product – is
exchange value _in itself_, to which exchange merely adds form; formal
form with him. The only question is now in what _proportions_ this
product is divided up and distributed. Whether these _proportions_ are
regarded as specific quotas of the presupposed exchange value, or of its
content, material wealth, [is] the same thing. Moreover, since exchange
as such is merely circulation – money as circulation – it is better to
abstract from it altogether, and to examine only the proportions of
material wealth which have been distributed within the production
process or because of it to the various factors. In the _exchange_ form,
all value etc. is merely _nominal_; it is real only in the form of the
_proportion_. Exchange as a whole, to the extent that it creates no
greater _material_ variety, is _nominal_. Since a full day’s work is
always exchanged for a full day’s work, the sum of _values_ remains the
same – the growth in the forces of production affects only the content
of wealth, not its form. An increase of values can arise, therefore,
only out of an increasing difficulty in production – and this can take
place only where the forces of nature no longer afford an equal service
to equal quantities of human labour, i.e. where the fertility of the
natural elements decreases – in agriculture. The decline of profits is
therefore caused by rent. [46] Firstly the false presupposition that a
_full day’s work_ is always worked in all social conditions; etc. etc.
(see above [47]).>

 

_Surplus value and productive force. Relation when these increase. – Result. – Productive force of labour is productive force of capital. – In proportion as necessary labour is already diminished, the realization of capital becomes more difficult_

We have seen: The worker needs to work only e.g. half a working day in
order to live a whole one; and hence to be able to begin the same
process again the next day. Only half a day’s work is objectified in his
labouring capacity – to the extent that it exists in him as someone
_alive_, or as a _living_ instrument of labour. The worker’s entire
living day (day of life) is the static result, the objectification of
half a day’s work. By appropriating the entire day’s work and then
consuming it in the production process with the materials of which his
capital consists, but by giving in exchange only the labour objectified
in the worker – i.e. half a day’s work – the capitalist creates the
surplus value of his capital; in this case, half a day of objectified
labour. Now suppose that the productive powers of labour double, i.e.
that the same labour creates double the _use value_ in the same time.
(For the moment, use value is defined in the present relation as only
that which the worker consumes in order to stay alive as a worker; the
quantity of the means of life for which, through the mediation of money,
he exchanges the labour objectified in his living labouring capacity.)
The worker would then have to work only 1/4 day in order to live a full
day; the capitalist then needs to give the worker only 1/4 day’s
objectified labour in exchange, in order to increase his surplus value
in the production process from 1/2 to 3/4; so that he would gain 3/4
day’s objectified labour instead of 1/2. At the end of the production
process, the value of the capital would have risen by 3/4 instead of by
2/4. Thus the capitalist would have to make the workers work only 3/4
day, in order to add the same surplus value – that of 1/2 or 2/4
objectified labour – to his capital. However, as representative of the
general form of wealth – money – capital is the endless and limitless
drive to go beyond its limiting barrier. Every boundary [_Grenze_] is
and has to be a barrier [_Schranke_] for it. [48] Else it would cease to
be capital – money as self-reproductive. If ever it perceived a certain
boundary not as a barrier, but became comfortable within it as a
boundary, it would itself have declined from exchange value to use
value, from the general form of wealth to a specific, substantial mode
of the same. Capital as such creates a specific surplus value because it
cannot create an infinite one all at once; but it is the constant
movement to create more of the same. The quantitative boundary of the
surplus value appears to it as a mere natural barrier, as a necessity
which it constantly tries to violate and beyond which it constantly
seeks to go. * Therefore (quite apart from the factors entering in
later, competition, prices etc.) the capitalist will make the worker
work not only 3/4 day, because the 3/4 day bring him the _same surplus
value_ as the whole day did before, but rather he will make him work the
full day; and the increase in the productive force which allows the
worker to work for 1/4 day and live a whole day now expresses itself
simply in that he now has to work 3/4 day for capital, whereas before he
worked for it only 2/4 day. The increased productive force of his
labour, to the extent that it is a shortening of the time required to
replace the labour objectified in him (for use value, subsistence),
appears as a lengthening of the time he labours for the realization of
capital (for exchange value). From the worker’s standpoint, he now has
to do a surplus labour of 3/4 day in order to live a full day, while
before he only had to do a surplus labour of 2/4 day. The increase, the
doubling of the productive force, has increased his surplus labour by
1/4 [day]. One remark here: the productive force has doubled, the
surplus labour the worker has to do has not doubled, but has only grown
by 1/4 [day]; nor has capital’s surplus value doubled; but it, too, has
grown by only 1/4 [day]. This shows, then, that surplus labour (from the
worker’s standpoint) or surplus value (from capital’s standpoint) does
not grow in the same numerical proportion as the productive force. Why?
The doubling in the productive force is the reduction of necessary
labour (for the worker) by 1/4 [day], hence also the [increase of the]
production of surplus value by 1/4, because the original relation was
posited as 1/2. If the worker had to work, originally, 2/3 day in order
to live one full day, then the surplus value would have been 1/3, and
the surplus labour the same. The doubling in the productive force of
labour would then have enabled the worker to restrict his necessary
labour to half of 2/3 or 2/(3 × 2), 2/6 or 1/3 day, and the capitalist
would have gained 1/3 [day] of value. But the total surplus labour would
have become 2/3 [day]. The doubling of the productive force, which
resulted in 1/4 [day] surplus value and surplus labour in the first
example, would now result in 1/3 [day] surplus value or surplus labour.
The multiplier of the productive force – the number by which it is
multiplied – is therefore not the multiplier of surplus labour or of
surplus value; but rather, if the original relation of the labour
objectified in the labour price was 1/2 of the labour objectified in 1
working day, which always appears as the limit, † then the doubling is
equal to the division of 1/2 by 2 (in the original relation), i.e. 1/4.
If the original relation was 2/3, then the doubling equals the division
of 2/3 by 2 = 2/6 or 1/3. The multiplier of the productive force is thus
never the multiplier but always the divisor of the original relation,
not the multiplier of its numerator but of its denominator. If it were
the former, then the multiplication of the productive force would
correspond to the multiplication of the surplus value. Instead, the
surplus value is always equal to the division of the original relation
by the multiplier of the productive force. If the original relation was
8/9, i.e. the worker needs 8/9 of a working day to live, so that capital
gains only 1/9 in its exchange with living labour, if surplus labour
equals 1/9, then the worker can now live from half of 8/9 of a working
day, i.e. with 8/18 = 4/9 (whether we divide the numerator or multiply
the denominator the same thing), and the capitalist, who orders a full
day’s work, would have a total surplus value of 4/9 working day;
subtracting the original surplus value of 1/9 from this leaves 3/9 or
1/3. The doubling of the productive force therefore = here an increase
in surplus value or surplus time by 1/3. This is simply because the
surplus value is always equal to the relation between the whole working
day and that part of the working day necessary to keep the worker alive.
The unit in which surplus value is calculated is always a fraction, i.e.
the given part of a day which exactly represents the price of labour. If
that is = 1/2, then the increase in the productive force = the reduction
of necessary labour to 1/4; if it is = 1/3, then reduction of necessary
labour to 1/6; hence in the first, the total surplus value = 3/4; in the
second = 5/6; the relative surplus value, i.e. relative to that present
before, in the first case = 1/4, in the second = 2/6 or 1/3. Therefore
the value of capital does not grow in the same proportion as the
productive force increases, but in the proportion in which the increase
in the productive force, the multiplier of productive force, divides the
fraction of the working day which expresses the part of the day
belonging to the worker. The extent to which the productive force of
labour increases the value of capital thus depends on the original
relation between the portion of labour objectified in the worker and his
living labour. This portion is always expressed as a fractional part of
the whole working day, 1/3, 2/3, etc. The increase in productive force,
i.e. its multiplication by a given amount, is equal to a division of the
numerator or the multiplication of the denominator of this fraction by
the same amount. Thus the largeness or smallness of the increase of
value depends not only on the number which expresses the multiplication
of the productive force, but equally on the previously given relation
which makes up the part of the work day belonging to the price of
labour. If this relation is 1/3, then the doubling of the productive
force of the working day = a reduction of the same to 1/6; if it is 2/3,
then reduction to 2/6. The objectified labour contained in the price of
labour is always equal to a fractional part of the whole day; always
arithmetically expressed as a fraction; always a relation between
numbers, never a simple number. If the productive force doubles,
multiplies by 2, then the worker has to work only 1/2 of the previous
time in order to get the price of labour out of it; but how much labour
time he still needs for this purpose depends on the first, given
relation, namely on the time which was required before the increase in
productive force. The multiplier of the productive force is the divisor
of this original fraction. Value or surplus labour therefore does not
increase in the same numerical relation as productive force. If the
original relation is 1/2 and the productive force is doubled, then the
_necessary_ (for the worker) labour time reduces itself to 1/4 and the
surplus value grows by only 1/4. If the productive force is quadrupled,
then the original relation becomes 1/8 and the value grows by only 1/8.
The value can never be equal to the entire working day; i.e. a certain
part of the working day must always be exchanged for the labour
objectified in the worker. Surplus value in general is only the relation
of living labour to that objectified in the worker; _one member of the
relation must therefore always_ _remain_. A certain relation between
increase in productive force and increase of value is already given in
the fact that the relation is constant as a relation, although its
factors vary. We see therefore, on one side, that relative surplus value
is exactly equal to relative surplus labour; if the working day was 1/2
and the productive force doubles, then the part belonging to the worker,
_necessary labour_, reduces itself to 1/4 and the new value is also
exactly 1/4; but the total value is now 3/4. While surplus value rose by
1/4, i.e. in the relation of 1:4, the total surplus value = 3/4 = 3:4.
Now if we assume that 1/4 was the original _necessary_ working day, and
a doubling in productive force took place, then necessary labour is
reduced to 1/8 and surplus labour or surplus value exactly = 1/8 = 1:8.
The total surplus value by contrast = 7:8. In the first example the
original total surplus value = 1:2 (1/2) and then rose to 3:4; in the
second case the original total surplus value was 3/4 and has now risen
to 7:8 (7/8). In the first case it has grown from 1/2 or 2/4 to 3/4; in
the second from 3/4 or 6/8 to 7/8; in the first case by 1/4, in the
second by 1/8; i.e. in the first case it rose twice as much as in the
second: but in the first case the total surplus value is only 3/4 or 6/8
while it is 7/8 in the second, i.e. 1/8 more.

* The barrier appears as an accident which has to be conquered. This is
apparent on even the most superficial inspection. If capital increases
from 100 to 1,000, then 1,000 is now the point of departure, from which
the increase has to begin; the tenfold multiplication, by 1,000% counts
for nothing; profit and interest themselves become capital in turn.
_What appeared as surplus value now appears us simple presupposition
etc._, as included in its _simple composition._

† Messrs the manufacturers have, however, also prolonged it into the
night, _ten hours’ bill_. See the report of Leonard Horner. [49] The
working day itself does not recognize daylight as a limit; it can be
lengthened _deep into the night_; this belongs to the chapter on
_wages_.

Let _necessary labour_ be 1/16, then total surplus value = 15/16; which
was 5/8 = 10/16 in the previous relation; thus the total surplus value
presupposed is by 5/16 higher than in the previous case. [50] Now let
the productive force double, then necessary labour = 1/32; which was
previously = 2/32 (1/16); hence surplus time has risen by 1/32, surplus
value by the same proportion. As regards the total surplus value, which
was 15/16 or 30/32, this is now 31/32. Compared to the earlier relation
(where _necessary_ labour was 1/4 or 8/32), the total surplus value is
now 31/32, whereas it was only 30/32 earlier, hence grew by 1/32. But
regarded relatively, the doubling of production increased it in the
first case by 1/8 or 4/32, while it has now increased by only 1/32, i.e.
by 3/32 less.

If _necessary labour_ had already been reduced to 1/1,000, then the
total surplus value would be = 999/1,000. Now if the productive force
increased a thousandfold, then necessary labour would decline to
1/1,000,000 working day and the total surplus value would amount to
999,999/1,000,000 of a working day; whereas before this increase in
productive force it amounted to only 999/1,000 or 999,000/1,000,000; it
would thus have grown by 999/1,000,000 = 1/11 (with the addition of
1/(11 + 1/999), [51] i.e. the thousandfold increase in productive force
would have increased the total surplus by not even 1/11, i.e. not even
by 3/33, whereas in the previous case it rose by 1/32 owing to a mere
doubling of the productive force. If necessary labour falls from 1/1,000
to 1/1,000,000, then it falls by exactly 999/1,000,000 (for 1/1,000 =
1,000/1,000,000), i.e. by the surplus value.

If we summarize this, we find:

_Firstly_: The increase in the productive force of living labour
increases the _value_ of capital (or diminishes the value of the worker)
not because it increases the quantity of products or use values created
by the same labour – the productive force of labour is its natural force
– but rather because it diminishes _necessary_ labour, hence, in the
same relation as it diminishes the former, it creates _surplus labour_
or, what amounts to the same thing, surplus value; because the surplus
value which capital obtains through the production process consists only
of the excess of surplus labour over _necessary labour_. The increase in
productive force can increase surplus labour – i.e. the excess of labour
objectified in capital as product over the labour objectified in the
exchange value of the working day – only to the extent that it
diminishes the relation of _necessary labour_ to _surplus labour_, and
only in the proportion in which it diminishes this relation. Surplus
value is exactly equal to surplus labour; the increase of the one [is]
exactly measured by the diminution of _necessary labour_.

_Secondly_: The surplus value of capital does not increase as does the
multiplier of the productive force, i.e. the amount to which the
productive force (posited as unity, as multiplicand) increases; but by
the surplus of the fraction of the living work day which originally
represents necessary labour, in excess over this same fraction divided
by the multiplier of the productive force. Thus if _necessary labour_ =
1/4 of the living work day and the productive force doubles, then the
value of capital does not double, but grows by 1/8; which is equal to
1/4 or 2/8 (the original fraction of the work day which represents
necessary labour) − 1/4 divided by 2, or = 2/8 minus 1/8 = 1/8. (That
value doubles itself can also be expressed, it grows 4/2 [-fold] or 16/8
[-fold]. Its growth would relate to that of the productive force by
1:16. (That is it!) [52] If the fraction was 1/1,000 and the productive
force increases a thousandfold, then the value of capital does not grow
a thousandfold, but rather by far less than 1/11; it grows by 1/1,000 −
1/1,000,000, i.e. by 1,000/1,000,000 − 1/1,000,000 = 999/1,000,000.)

Thus the _absolute sum_ by which capital increases its value through a
given increase of the productive force depends on the _given fractional
part_ of the working day, on the fractional part of the working day
which represents _necessary labour_, and which therefore expresses the
original relation of necessary labour to the living work day. The
increase in productive force in a given relation can therefore increase
the value of capital differently e.g. in the _different countries_. A
general increase of productive force in a given relation can increase
the value of capital differently in the different branches of industry,
and will do so, depending on the different relation of _necessary
labour_ to the living work day in these branches. This relation would
naturally be the same in all branches of business in a system of free
competition, if labour were simple labour everywhere, hence _necessary
labour_ the same. (If it represented the same amount of objectified
labour.)

_Thirdly_: The larger the surplus value of capital _before the increase
of productive force_, the larger the amount of presupposed surplus
labour or surplus value of capital; or, the smaller the fractional part
of the working day which forms the equivalent of the worker, which
expresses necessary labour, the smaller is the increase in surplus value
which capital obtains from the increase of productive force. Its surplus
value rises, but in an ever smaller relation to the development of the
productive force. Thus the more developed capital already is, the more
surplus labour it has created, the more terribly must it develop the
productive force in order to realize itself in only smaller proportion,
i.e. to add surplus value – because its barrier always remains the
relation between the fractional part of the day which expresses
_necessary labour_, and the entire working day. It can move only within
these boundaries. The smaller already the fractional part falling to
_necessary labour_, the greater the _surplus labour_, the less can any
increase in productive force perceptibly diminish necessary labour;
since the denominator has grown enormously. The self-realization of
capital becomes more difficult to the extent that it has already been
realized. The increase of productive force would become irrelevant to
capital; realization itself would become irrelevant, because its
proportions have become minimal, and it would have ceased to be capital.
If necessary labour were 1/1,000 and the productive force tripled, then
it would fall to only 1/3,000 or surplus labour would have increased by
only 2/3,000. But this happens not because wages have increased or the
share of labour in the product, but because it has _already_ fallen so
low, regarded in its relation to the product of labour or to the living
work day. *

* The labour objectified in the worker here shows itself as a fraction
_of his own living work day_; for that is the same as [the proportion]
in which the objectified labour which he obtains from capital as wages
stands to the entire working day.

(All these statements correct only in this abstraction for the relation
from the present standpoint. Additional relations will enter which
modify them significantly. The whole, to the extent that it proceeds
entirely in generalities, _actually already belongs in the doctrine of
profit._)

So much in general for the time being: the development of the productive
force of labour – first the positing of surplus labour – is a necessary
condition for the growth of value or the realization of capital. As the
infinite urge to wealth, it strives consistently towards infinite
increase of the productive forces of labour and calls them into being.
But on the other hand, every increase in the productive force of labour
– leaving aside the fact that it increases the use values for the
capitalist – is an increase in the productive force of capital and, from
the present standpoint, is a productive force of labour only in so far
as it is a productive force of capital.

_Concerning increases in the value of capital_

This much is already clear, can at least be mentioned in anticipation:
the increase in the productive force does not in and by itself increase
prices. For example the bushel of wheat. If a half of a working day
objectifies itself in one bushel of wheat, and if this is the worker’s
price, then the surplus labour can only produce 2 bushels of wheat. Thus
2 bushels of wheat [is] the value of one working day, and if that = 26s.
in money, = 26s. Each bushel = 13s. Now if the productive force doubles,
then the bushel of wheat no more than = 1/4 working day; = 6 1/2s. With
the productive force, the price of this fractional part of the commodity
fell. But the total price remained; but now a surplus of 3/4 working
day. Every fourth = 1 bushel wheat = 6 1/2s. Thus the total product =
26s. = 4 bushels. Same as before. The value of the capital increased
from 13s. to 19 1/2s. The value of labour diminished from 13s. to 6
1/2s.; material production rose from 2 bushels to 4. Now 19 1/2. [53]
Now, if the force of production were to double also in gold production,
so that, if 13s. were the product of half a working day and this half a
day were the _necessary labour_ before; now 1/4 [working day] produces
52s. or 52 − 13 = 39s. more. 1 bushel of wheat now = 13s.; the same
fractional price afterwards as before; but the total product = 52s.;
before only = 26s. On the other hand, the 52s. would now buy 4 bushels,
while the 26, earlier, bought only 2.

Well. First of all it is clear that if capital has already raised
surplus labour to the point where the entire living work day is consumed
in the production process (and we here assume the working day to be the
natural amount of labour time which the worker is able to put at the
disposal of capital; this is always only for a _specific time_, i.e.
_specific labour time_), then an increase in the productive force cannot
increase labour time, nor, therefore, objectified labour time. The
product objectifies one working day, whether the necessary time of
labour is represented by 6 or 3 hours, by 1/2 or 1/4 of the working day.
The surplus value of capital has grown; i.e. its value relative to the
worker – for if it was only = 2/4 before, it is now = to 3/4 of
objectified labour time; but its value increased not because the
_absolute_ but because the _relative amount of labour_ grew; i.e. the
total amount of labour did not grow; the working day is as long before
as after; hence no absolute increase in surplus time (surplus labour
time); rather the _amount of necessary labour decreased_, and that is
how relative surplus labour increased. The worker in fact worked a whole
day before, but only 1/2 day of surplus time; afterwards, as before, he
works the whole day, but 3/4 of a day of surplus time. To that extent,
therefore, the price (presupposing this as its gold and silver value),
or the exchange value of capital, has not increased with the doubling of
the productive force. This therefore concerns the _rate of profit_, not
the price of the product or the value of the capital, which became a
commodity again in the product. But in fact the absolute values also
increase in this manner, because that part of wealth which is posited as
capital – as self-realizing value – also increases. (_Accumulation of
capitals._) Take our earlier example. Let _capital_ = 100 thalers, and
let it decompose in the production process into the following parts: 50
thalers cotton, 40 thalers wages, 10 thalers instrument. Assume at the
same time, in order to simplify the arithmetic, that the entire
instrument of labour is consumed in one act of production (and this is
quite beside the point here, so far), so that its entire value would
reappear in the form of the product. Suppose in this case that the 40
thalers which go to labour express a labour time objectified in living
labouring capacity of, say, 4 hours, giving capital 8 hours.
Presupposing the instrument and the raw material, the total product
would amount to 100 thalers, if the worker works only 4 hours, i.e. if
the raw material and the instrument were his property and he worked for
4 hours only. He would increase the 60 thalers by 40, which he could
consume, since firstly he replaces the 60 thalers in raw material and
instrument required for production, and then adds a surplus value of 40
thalers as reproduction of his own living labour capacity or of the time
objectified in him. He could repeat the work again and again, since he
would have reproduced the value of the raw material and of the
instrument as well as of the labouring capacity; the latter by
constantly increasing the value of the former by 4 hours of objectified
labour. But now let him receive the 40 thalers in wages only by working
8 hours, so that he would add to the material and instrument of labour,
which now confront him as capital, a surplus value of 80 thalers; while
the former surplus value of 40 thalers, which he added, is only exactly
the value of his labour. He would thus add a surplus value exactly = to
the surplus labour or surplus time. * The value of capital would thus
have increased from 100 thalers to 140. †

* It is not in the least necessary at this point to assume that the
material and instrument also has to increase along with surplus labour
or surplus time. How surplus labour by itself increases the raw
material, see Babbage, e.g. the working of gold wire etc. [54]

† Assume further that raw material doubles and the instrument of labour
(for the sake of simpler arithmetic) increases by one-half. Then capital
costs would amount to 100 thalers cotton, 20 thalers instrument, i.e.
120 thalers; for labour, now as then, 40 thalers; altogether 160
thalers. If a surplus labour of 4 hours increases 100 thalers by 40%,
then it increases 160 thalers by 64 thalers. Hence the total product =
224 thalers. We here have presupposed, further, that the rate of profit
does not vary with the size of capital; and material and instrument of
labour are not regarded as being themselves realizations,
capitalizations of surplus labour; as we saw, the greater the already
posited surplus time, i.e. the size of capital as such, the more is it
presupposed that an _absolute increase of labour time_ is impossible,
and that a relative increase, resulting from an increase in the
productive force, declines in geometric proportion.

Now, capital regarded as simple exchange value would be absolutely
greater, 140 thalers instead of 100; but in fact, a new value would
merely have been created, i.e. a value which is not merely necessary to
replace the 60 thalers in advances for the materials and the instrument
of labour and the 40 thalers for labour, a new value of 40 thalers. The
values in circulation would have been increased by 80 thalers, by 40
thalers of additional objectified labour time.

Now assume the same presupposition. 100 thalers capital; specifically,
50 for cotton, 40 for labour, 10 for instrument of production; let the
surplus labour time remain as before, i.e. 4 hours, and the total labour
time 8 hours. Thus in all cases the product only = 8 hours labour time =
140 thalers. Now suppose the productive force of labour doubles; i.e. 2
hours would be enough for the worker to realize raw materials and
instrument to the extent required to maintain his labouring capacity. If
40 thalers were an objectified labour time of 4 hours, then 20 thalers
would be the objectified labour time of 2 hours. These 20 thalers now
express the same use value as the 40 thalers before. The exchange value
of labouring capacity has diminished by half, because half of the
original labour time creates the same use value, while the exchange
value of the use value is measured purely by the labour time objectified
in it. But the capitalist makes the workers work 8 hours now as before,
and his product therefore represents now as before a labour time of 8
hours = 80 thalers of labour time, while the value of raw material and
material remain the same, namely 60 thalers; altogether, as before, 140
thalers. (In order to live, the worker himself would have had to add to
the 60 thalers of raw material and instrument a value of no more than 20
thalers, he would thus have created a value of only 80 thalers. The
total value of his product would have diminished, by the doubling of
production, from 100 to 80, by 20 thalers, i.e. by 1/5 of 100 = 20%.)
But the surplus time or surplus value for capital is now 6 hours instead
of 4, or 60 thalers instead of 40. Its increment is 2 hours, 20 thalers.
His accounts would now show the following: for raw material, 50; for
labour, 20; for instrument, 10; costs = 80 thalers. Gain = 60 thalers.
Now as before he would sell the product for 140 thalers, but would show
a gain of 60 thalers instead of 40 as before. On one side, therefore, he
throws only the same exchange value into circulation as before, 140
thalers. But the surplus value of his capital has grown by 20 thalers.
Accordingly, only the share he gets of the 140 thalers [is] the rate of
his profit. The worker in fact worked 2 hours more for him free of
charge, i.e. 6 hours instead of 4, and this is the same for him as if he
had worked 10 hours instead of 8 in the earlier relation, had increased
his _absolute labour time_. But indeed a _new value_ has arisen also;
namely 20 additional thalers are posited as _autonomous_ value, as
objectified labour which has become free, unbound from the task of
serving only in exchange for earlier labour power [_Arbeitskraft_]. This
can present itself in two ways. Either the 20 thalers set as much
additional labour into motion as becomes _capital_ and creates larger
exchange value: make more objectified labour into the point of departure
for the new production process; or the capitalist exchanges the 20
thalers as money for commodities other than those which he needs in its
production as industrial capital; all commodities other than labour and
money themselves thus are exchanged for 20 more thalers, for 2 more
hours of objectified labour time. Their _exchange value_ has thus
increased by just this _liberated sum_. In fact, 140 thalers are 140
thalers, as the very ‘perceptive’ French publisher of the Physiocrats
remarks against Boisguillebert. [55] But it is false that these 140
thalers only represent more use value; they represent a greater amount
of _independent exchange value,_ of _money_, of _latent capital_; i.e.
of wealth posited as _wealth_. The economists themselves admit this
later when they allow the accumulation of capitals to accumulate not
only the mass of use values, but that of _exchange values_ too; for,
according to Ricardo himself, the element of the accumulation of
capitals is posited just as completely with relative surplus labour as
with absolute – impossible any other way. [56] On the other side, it is
already implicit in the thesis best developed by Ricardo, that these
excess 20 thalers, which are created purely by the increase in
productive force, can become capital again. Earlier, only 40 of the 140
thalers (leaving capital’s consumption aside for now) could become new
capital; 100 do not become capital but remain capital; now 60 [can],
i.e. the present capital is greater by an exchange value of 20 thalers.
Thus, exchange value, _wealth as such_, has increased, although the
total sum of the same has not directly increased. Why has it increased?
Because that part of the total sum has increased which was not a mere
medium of circulation, but money; or which was not merely equivalent,
but _exchange value for-itself_ [_für sich seiend_]. Either the
liberated 20 thalers were accumulated as money, i.e. added to the stock
of exchange values in general (abstract) exchange value form; or they
all circulated, and then the prices of the commodities bought with them
rise; they all represent more money, as well as, since the production
cost of gold has not fallen (rather, risen relative to the commodity
produced by the more productive capital), more objectified labour
(because of this, the excess production, which at first only appeared on
the side of the one producing capital, now appears on the side of the
others, which produce the more expensive commodities); or the 20 thalers
are directly used up as capital by the originally circulating capital.
Thus a new capital of 20 thalers is posited – a sum of self-preserving
and self-realizing wealth. Capital has risen by the exchange value of 20
thalers. (Circulation actually does not yet concern us here, since we
are here dealing with capital in general, and circulation can only
mediate between capital in the form of money and capital in its form as
capital; the first capital may realize money as such, i.e. exchange it
for commodities, consume more than before; but in the hand of the
producer of these commodities this money becomes capital. Thus it
becomes capital directly in the hands of the first capital, or, via a
detour, [in those] of another capital. But the other capital is always
in turn capital as such; and we are concerned here with _capital as
such_, [let us] say the capital of the whole society. The
differentiation etc. of capitals does not concern us yet.) In general,
these 20 thalers can appear only in a double form. As money, so that
capital again exists in the character of money which has not yet become
capital – its point of departure; the abstract-autonomous form of
exchange value or of general wealth; or itself in turn as capital, as a
new domination of objectified labour over living labour. * (Every
increase in the mass of capital employed can increase the _productive
force_ not only at an arithmetical but at a geometrical rate; although
it can increase profit at the same time – as increase of productive
force – only at a much lower rate. The influence of the increase of
capital on the increase of productive force is thus infinitely greater
than that of the increase of the productive force on the growth of
capital.) As general wealth, materialized in the form of money (of the
thing, in its mere abstractness), or of _new_ living labour. The
capitalist consumes, say, 20 of the 140 thalers as use values for
himself, through the mediation of money as means of circulation. Thus,
in the first presupposition, he could begin the process of
self-realization only with a larger capital, a larger use value of 120
(as against 100). After the doubling in the productive forces, he can do
it with 140 thalers without restricting his consumption. A larger part
of the exchange values solidifies as exchange value, instead of
vanishing in use value (whether it solidifies as such, through
production, directly or indirectly). To create a larger capital means to
create a larger exchange value; although exchange value in its _direct
form_ as simple exchange value has not been increased by the growth of
productivity, it has in its intensified form as _capital_. This larger
capital of 140 thalers represents, absolutely, more objectified labour
than the earlier capital of 120 thalers. It therefore also, at least
relatively, sets more living labour into motion and therefore also
ultimately reproduces more simple exchange value. The capital of 120
thalers at 40% produced a product or simple exchange value of 60 thalers
at 40%; the capital of 140 thalers a simple exchange value of 64
thalers. Here, then, the increase in exchange value in the form of
capital is still posited directly as an increase in exchange value in
its simple form. It is of the highest importance to remember this. It is
not enough to say, like Ricardo, that exchange value does not increase;
i.e. the abstract form of wealth; but only exchange value as capital.
[57] In saying this he is looking only at the original production
process. But if relative surplus labour increases – and capital
therefore increases absolutely – then there is necessarily also an
increase within circulation also of _relative exchange value existing as
exchange value_, money as such, and therefore, through the mediation of
the production process, _absolute exchange value_. In other words, of
this same amount of exchange value – or money – and the product of the
realization process appears in this simple form – the product is surplus
value only relative to capital, to value such as it existed before the
production process; for itself, regarded as an independent existence, it
is merely _quantitatively defined exchange value_ – a part has become
liberated, which does not exist as equivalent for already present
exchange values or for already present labour time. If it is exchanged
for those already present, it gives them not an equivalent but more than
an equivalent, and thus liberates a part of the exchange value on their
side. In a static state, this liberated exchange value by which society
has become richer can only be money, in which case only the abstract
form of wealth has increased; [is] in motion: [it] can realize itself
only in _new_ living labour (whether labour which had been dormant is
set into motion, or _new workers_ are created (population [growth] is
accelerated) or again a new circle of exchange values, of exchange
values in circulation, is expanded, which can occur on the production
side if the liberated exchange value opens up a _new branch of
production_, i.e. a new object of exchange, objectified labour in the
form of a new use value; or the same is achieved when objectified labour
is put in the sphere of circulation in a new country, by an expansion of
trade). The latter must then be created.

* In the example given, the productive force has doubled, risen by 100%,
the value of capital has risen by 20%.

The form in which Ricardo attempts to clarify the matter for himself
(and he is very unclear in this regard) says at bottom nothing more than
that he just introduces a certain relation, instead of saying, simply,
that out of the same sum of simple exchange values a smaller part posits
itself in the form of simple exchange value (equivalent) and a larger
part in the form of money (money as the original, antediluvian form out
of which capital always arises anew; money in its character as money,
not as coin etc.); that therefore the part posited _as_ exchange value
for-itself, i.e. as _value_, increases, i.e. _wealth in the form of
wealth_ (whereas he comes to just the mistaken conclusion that it
increases only in the form of material, physical wealth as use value).
The origin of _wealth as such_, in so far as it arises not from _rent_,
i.e., according to him, not from the _increase_ in productive force, but
rather from the _decrease of the same_, is therefore _totally
incomprehensible_ to him, and he entangles himself in the wildest
contradictions. Let us take the form of the matter. [58] Capital 1,000
sets 50 workers into motion; or 50 living work days; through a doubling
of the productive force, it could set 100 working days into motion. But
these latter do not exist in the presupposition, and are introduced
arbitrarily, because otherwise – unless _more real working days_ are
introduced – he does not grasp the increase in exchange value which
arises from increased productivity. At the same time, the _growth of
population_ is never _developed_ by him as an _element in the increase_
of exchange values; never clearly and definitely stated. Let the
presupposition be capital 1,000 and workers 50. The correct deduction,
which he himself _also draws_ (see Notebook) [59] : capital 500 with 25
workers can produce the same use value as before; the other 500 with the
other 25 workers establish a new business and likewise produce an
exchange value of 500. The profit remains the same, since it arises not
from the exchange of 500 for 500, but from the proportions in which
profit and wages originally divide in the 500, and since exchange deals
in equivalents, which can no more increase value than _external trade_
can, which Ricardo explicitly demonstrates. Since the exchange of
equivalents just means nothing more than that the value in the hands of
_A_ before the exchange with _B_ still exists in his hands after the
exchange with _B_. The total value or wealth has remained the same. Use
value, however, or the _material of wealth_, has doubled. Now, there is
absolutely no reason here why _wealth_ should grow as _wealth, exchange
value as such_ – as far as the _increase in the productive forces_ is
concerned. If the productive forces again double in both branches, then
capital _A_ can again divide into two of 250 with 12 1/2 working days
each, capital _B_ can do the same. [60] There are now four capitals with
the same total exchange value of £1,000, consuming 50 living work days
as before, * producing four times as much use value as before the
doubling of consumption value. Ricardo is too classical to commit
absurdities, like those who claim to improve on him, who derive the
larger value after the increase in productive force from one party
selling at a higher price within circulation. As soon as the capital of
500 has become commodity, simple exchange value, instead of exchanging
it for 500, he exchanges it for 550 (at 10%), but then the other party
obviously only gets 450 in exchange value instead of 500 and the total
sum remains 1,000 as before. This happens often enough in commerce, but
explains the profit made by one capital only by the loss of the other
capital, and not _the_ profit of _capital_; and without this
presupposition there can be profit neither on one nor on the other side.
Ricardo’s process can therefore go on without any other limit than the
_increase of the productive force_ (and this is again physical, located
outside the _economic relation_ itself) possible with a capital of 1,000
and 50 workers. See the following passage: ‘Capital is that part of the
wealth of a country which is employed with a view to future production,
_and may be increased in the same manner as wealth._’ [61] (_Wealth_ for
him the abundance of use values; and, seen from the standpoint of simple
exchange, the identical objectified labour can express itself in
limitless use values and constantly remain _the same exchange value_, as
long as it remains the same amount of objectified labour, for its
_equivalent_ is measured not by the mass of use value in which it
exists, but rather by its own amount.) ‘An _additional capital_ will be
equally efficacious in the formation of future wealth, whether it be
obtained from improvements of skill or machinery, or from using more
revenue productively; for wealth’ (use value) ‘always depends on the
_quantity_ of commodities produced’ (also somewhat on their variety, it
seems), ‘without regard to the facility with which the instruments
employed in production may have been produced’ (i.e. the labour time
objectified in them). ‘A certain quantity of clothes and provisions will
maintain and employ the same number of men; but they will be of twice
the value’ (_exchange value_) ‘if 200 have been employed on their
production.’ If, owing to an increase in the productive force, 100
produce as much in use values as 200 earlier, then: ‘of the 200, half
are let go, so that the remaining 100 produce as much as the 200 did
before. Thus a half of the capital can be withdrawn from this branch of
business; as much capital has become free as labour. And since one half
of the capital now does quite the same service as did the whole, two
capitals have now been formed etc.’ (cf. 39, 40 ibid. on national trade,
[62] to which we must return). Ricardo does not speak here about the
working day; [the fact] that, if the capitalist earlier exchanged half
of an objectified working day for the worker’s entire living work day,
[he] thus at bottom gains only half a living work day, since he gives
the other half in objectified form to the worker, and obtains it from
him in the living form, i.e. pays the worker a half of the working day,
instead of in the form of simultaneous working days, i.e. of different
workers; this does not alter the matter, only its expression. Each one
of these working days furnishes so much more surplus time. If the
capitalist, before, had _the_ working day as limit, he now has 50
working days etc. As has been said, this form does not posit an increase
in exchange values with an increase in the number of capitals through
productivity, and, according to Ricardo, it would also be possible for
the population to fall from, say, 10,000,000 to 10,000, without a
decrease in exchange values or the quantity of use values (see
conclusion of his book). [63] We are the last to deny that _capital_
contains contradictions. Our purpose, rather, is to develop them fully.
But Ricardo _does not develop them_, but rather shifts them off by
considering the value in exchange as indifferent for the formation of
wealth. That is to say, he contends that in a society based upon the
value of exchange, and wealth resulting from such value, the
contradictions to which this form of wealth is driven with the
development of productive powers etc. do not exist, and that a progress
of value is not necessary in such a society to secure the progress of
wealth, consequently that value as the form of wealth does not at all
affect that wealth itself and its development, i.e. he regards exchange
value as merely _formal_. Then, however, he remembers (1) that the
capitalists are concerned with value, (2) that, historically, with the
progress of the productive forces (of international trade too, he
_should have_ noted), there is a growth in _wealth as such,_ i.e. the
sum of values. Now, how to explain this? Capitals accumulate faster than
the population; thus wages rise; thus population; thus grain prices;
thus the difficulty of production and hence the _exchange values_. The
latter are then finally reached by a detour. We will here entirely omit
the moment of rent, since we are not yet concerned with increased
difficulty of production but rather with its opposite, with increase in
the productive forces. With the accumulation of capitals, wages rise
unless population grows simultaneously; the worker marries, production
is spurred on or his children live better, do not die before their time
etc. In short, the population grows. Its growth, however, gives rise to
competition among the workers, and thereby forces the worker to sell his
labour power to the capitalist at its _value_ again, or momentarily even
below it. Now the accumulated capital, which has meanwhile grown up more
slowly, again has the surplus which it earlier spent in the form of
wages, i.e. as coin, in order to buy the use value of labour, available
to it in the form of money, in order to realize it as capital in living
labour, and, since it now also disposes over a greater amount of working
days, its _exchange value_ grows in turn. (Even this not really
developed in Ricardo, but mixed up with the theory of rent; since the
surplus which capital earlier lost in the form of wages is now lost to
it in the form of rent, owing to the growth of population.) But even the
growth of population is not really comprehensible in his theory. At no
time has he shown that there is an _inherent_ relation between the whole
of the labour objectified in capital and the living work day (whether
the latter is represented as one working day of 50 × 12 hours, or as 12
hours of labour by 50 workers, is the same thing as far as the relation
goes), and that this inherent relation is just the _relation between the
fractional part of the living work day,_ or that between the equivalent
of the objectified labour with which the worker is paid, and the living
working day; where the whole is the day itself, and the inherent
relation is the variable relation (the day itself is a constant) between
the _fractional part of the necessary hours of labour_ and the _hours of
surplus labour_. And, just because he has not developed this relation,
he has also not developed [the point] (which did not concern us up to
now, since we were concerned with _capital as such_ and introduced the
development of the productive forces as an external relation) that the
development of the productive forces itself presupposes both the
increase of capital and the increase of simultaneous working days,
which, however, within the given barrier of a capital that sets one
working day into motion (even if it be a day of 50 × 12 hours, 600
hours), is itself the barrier to the development of its productive
force. The wage covers not only the worker, but also his reproduction;
so that when this specimen of the working class dies, another replaces
it; after the 50 workers are dead, 50 new ones are there to replace
them. The 50 workers themselves – as living labour capacities –
represent not only the costs of their own production, but also the costs
which had to be paid to their parents above and beyond their wages as
individuals, in order to replace themselves with 50 new individuals.
Thus the population progresses even without a rise in wages. But now,
why does it not progress rapidly enough? and why does it need a special
stimulus? Surely only because the aim of capital is not served merely by
obtaining more ‘wealth’ in the Ricardian sense, but because it wants
more _value_, to command more objectified labour. But indeed, according
to him, it can command the latter only if wages fall; i.e. if more
living work days are exchanged for the same capital with objectified
labour, and hence a greater value is created. In order to make wages
fall, he presupposes increase of population. And in order to prove
increase of population here, he presupposes that the demand for working
days increases, in other words, that capital can buy more _objectified
labour_ (objectified in labouring capacity), hence that its _value_ has
grown. Originally, however, he proceeded from just the contrary
presupposition, and took the detour only _because_ that is where he
began. If £1,000 was able to buy 500 working days, and the productive
force increases, then either it can proceed to employ the 500 in the
same branch of work, or it can divide up and employ 250 in one branch of
work, 250 in another, so that this capital splits into 2 capitals of 500
each. But it can never command more than 500 working days, since
otherwise, according to Ricardo, not only the use values it produces but
also their _exchange value_ must have multiplied itself, the
_objectified labour time_ over which it exercises command. Thus, given
his presupposition, an increased demand for labour cannot take place.
But if it does take place, then capital’s _exchange value_ has grown.
Compare _Malthus on value_, who _senses_ the contradictions, but falls
flat when he himself tries to develop them. [64]

* It is _at bottom false to say_ that living labour consumes capital;
capital (objectified labour) consumes the living in the production
process.

_Labour does not_ reproduce _the value of the material in which, and of the instrument with which, it works. It_ preserves _their value simply by relating to them in the labour process as to their objective conditions. This animating and preserving force costs capital_ nothing; _appears, rather, as its own force etc._

We have always spoken only about the two elements of capital, the two
parts of the living work day, of which one represents wages, the other
profit; one, necessary labour, the other, surplus labour. But what about
the other two parts of capital, which are realized in the material of
labour and the instrument of labour? As far as the simple production
process is concerned, labour presupposes the existence of an instrument
which facilitates the work, and of a material in which it presents
itself, which it forms. This form gives it its use value. This use value
becomes exchange value through exchange, to the extent that it contains
objectified labour. But are they, as components of capital, values which
labour must replace? Thus in the above example (and such objections
[were] heaped on Ricardo; that he regarded profit and wages only as
components of production costs, not the machine and the material), it
seems that if the capital is 100, divided 50 for cotton, 40 for wages,
10 for instrument; and if the wages, of 40 thalers, = 4 hours of
objectified labour, and capital orders a working day of 8 hours, then
the worker who has to reproduce 40 thalers for wages, 40 thalers surplus
time (profit), 10 thalers instrument, 50 thalers cotton = 140 thalers,
reproduces only 80 thalers. For 40 thalers are the product of half a
working day; 40 are the other, surplus half. But the value of the two
other component parts of capital is 60 thalers. Since the worker’s real
product is 80 thalers, he can reproduce only 80, not 140. He would have,
instead, decreased the value of the 60; since 40 of the 80 [is]
replacement for his wages; and the remaining 40 of surplus labour [is]
smaller by 20 than 60. Instead of a profit of 40, the capitalist would
have a loss of 20 on the part of his original capital consisting of
instrument and material. How is the worker supposed to create still
another 60 on top of the 80 thalers of value, since one half of his
working day, as his wages show, creates only 40 thalers out of the
instrument and the material; the other half only the same; and he
disposes of only one working day, cannot work two days in one? Suppose
the 50 thalers in material = _x_ lb. of cotton yarn; the 10 thalers in
instrument = spindle. Now, first, as regards the _use value_, it is
clear that if the cotton did not already have the form of yarn and wood
and iron the form of the spindle, then the worker could produce no
_fabric_, no higher use value. For him himself, the 50 thalers and the
10 thalers in the production process are _nothing but yarn and spindle,
not exchange values_. His labour has given them a higher use value, and
added objectified labour to the amount of 80 thalers to them, i.e. 40
thalers to reproduce his wages, 40 surplus time. The use value – the
fabric – contains one additional working day, half of which, however,
replaces only that part of capital for which the disposition over the
labouring capacity has been exchanged. The worker has not created the
objectified labour contained in yarn and spindle, which form a part of
the value of the product; for him they were and remain material to which
he gave another form and into which he incorporated new labour. The only
condition is that he should not waste them, and this he did not do, in
so far as his product has use value, and a higher use value than before.
It now contains objectified labour in two parts – his working day, and
that already contained in his material, yarn and spindle, independent of
him and before him. The previously objectified labour was the condition
of _his_ labour; it was necessary to make his labour what it is, costs
him no labour. Suppose they were not already presupposed as components
of capital, as _values_, and had cost _him_ nothing. Then the value of
the product, if he worked a whole day, would be 80, if a half day, 40
thalers. It would just = one objectified working day. Indeed, they cost
him nothing in production; however, this does not destroy the labour
time objectified in them, which remains and merely obtains another form.
If, in addition to the fabric, the worker also had to create the yarn
and the spindle in the same working day, then the process would be in
fact impossible. The fact, therefore, that they call for his labour
neither as use values in their original form, nor as exchange values,
but are _on hand,_ makes it possible for the addition of a working day
by him to create a product of a value higher than one working day. He
succeeds in this, however, to the extent that he does not have to create
this additional part, but rather _finds it on hand_ as material, as
presupposition. It can therefore only be said that he reproduces these
values in so far as _without_ labour they would rot, be useless; but
_without them, labour_ would be equally useless. In so far as the worker
reproduces these values, he does so not by giving them a higher exchange
value, or entering into any process with their exchange value at all,
but merely by subordinating them to the simple production process,
merely by _working_. But this costs him no additional labour time
_besides_ what he needs for their processing and higher realization. It
is a situation into which capital has put him so that he may work. He
reproduces the values only by giving them a higher value, and this
giving of a higher value is = his working day. Otherwise he lets them be
as they are. That their old value is preserved happens because a new one
is added to them, not that the old is itself _reproduced_, created. In
so far as they are products of previous labour, a product of previous
labour, a sum of previously objectified labour remains an element of his
_product_, so that the product contains, in addition to its new value,
the old as well. He therefore in fact produces in this product only the
day’s work which he adds to it, and the preservation of the old value
costs him absolutely nothing apart from what it costs him to add the
new. For him it is only a material, and remains that no matter how it
changes its form; therefore [it is] something present _independently_ of
his labour. That this material, which remains that, since it only
obtains a different form, itself already contains labour time is the
business of capital, not his own; similarly, it is _independent_ of his
labour and continues on _after_ it, just as it existed before it. This
so-called reproduction costs him no labour time, but is rather the
condition of his labour time, since it is nothing more than positing the
substance on hand as the material of his labour, relating to it as
material. He therefore replaces the old labour time by the _act_ of
working itself, not by the addition of special labour time for this
purpose. He replaces it simply by the addition of the _new_, by means of
which the old is preserved in the product and becomes an element of a
new product. Thus the worker in his working day does not replace the raw
material and the instrument in so far as they are values. _The
capitalist thus obtains this preservation of the old value just as free
of charge as he obtains surplus labour._ But he obtains it free of
charge, because it costs the worker nothing, and is, instead, the result
of the fact that the material and the instrument of labour are already
in his hands as _presupposition_, and the worker cannot _work_,
therefore, without making this already objectified labour, now in the
hands of capital, into the material of his own labour, thereby also
preserving the labour objectified in this material. The capitalist,
then, pays the worker nothing for the fact that the yarn and the spindle
– their value – reappear, as far as their value is concerned, in the
fabric, and are thus preserved. This preservation takes place simply by
the addition of new labour, which adds a higher value. What arises from
the original relation between capital and labour, then, is that the same
service which living labour as living labour performs for objectified
labour costs capital nothing, just as it costs the worker nothing, but
merely expresses the relation that the material and the instrument of
labour confront the worker as capital, as presuppositions _independent_
of him. The preservation of the old value is not a separate act from the
addition of the new, but happens by itself; appears as a natural result
of the same. But the fact that this preservation costs capital nothing
and costs the worker nothing either is already posited in the relation
of _capital and labour_, which in itself is already the former’s profit
and the latter’s wage.

The individual capitalist may imagine (and for his accounts it serves as
well) that, if he owns a capital of 100 thalers, 50 thalers in cotton,
40 thalers to buy labour with, 10 thalers in instrument, plus a profit
of 10% counted as part of his production costs, then labour has to
replace his 50 thalers of cotton, 40 thalers subsistence, 10 thalers
instrument plus 10% of 50, of 40 and of 10; so that in his imagination,
labour creates 55 thalers of raw material, 44 thalers subsistence and 11
thalers instrument for him, together = 110. But this is a peculiar
notion for economists, even though it has been advanced with great pomp
as an innovation against Ricardo. If the worker’s working day = 10
hours, and if he can create 40 thalers in 8 hours, i.e. can create his
wage, or, what is the same, can maintain and replace his labour
capacity, then he needs 4/5 of a day in order to replace his wages for
capital, and he gives capital 1/5 in surplus labour, or 10 thalers. In
exchange for the 40 thalers in wages, for 8 hours of objectified labour,
therefore, capital obtains 10 hours of living labour, and this excess
constitutes the entirety of its profit. The total objectified labour
which the worker has created, then, is 50 thalers, and, regardless of
the costs of the instrument and of the raw materials, more he cannot
add, for his day cannot objectify itself in more labour than that; now,
the fact that he adds these 50 thalers – 10 hours of labour (of which
only 8 replace the wage) – to the 60 thalers contained in raw material
and instrument – and thereby has simultaneously preserved the raw
material and the instrument – they are preserved just by coming into
contact again with living labour, and being used as instrument and as
material – this costs him no labour (and he would have no time available
in which to do this), nor does the capitalist pay him for it. Like every
other natural or social power of labour unless it is the product of
previous labour, or of such previous labour as does not need to be
repeated (e.g. the historical development of the worker etc.), this
natural animating power of labour – namely that, by using the material
and instrument, it preserves them in one or another form, including the
labour objectified in them, their exchange value – becomes a _power of
capital_, not of labour. Hence not paid for by capital. As little as the
worker is paid for the fact that he can think etc.

We have seen the original presupposition of the coming into being of
_capital_ is the existence of _money as money_, i.e. as money which has
withdrawn from circulation and asserts itself _negatively_ towards it,
i.e. _value_ which has become independent from and _against_ circulation
– i.e. the commodity for which the character of exchange value is not
merely a formal, vanishing character, [which it possesses only] before
being exchanged for another use value and finally disappearing as an
object of consumption. On the other side, _money_ (in its third,
adequate form) – as value which no longer enters circulation as
equivalent, but is not yet potentiated as capital, i.e. value
independent of and relating _negatively_ against circulation – is at the
same time the result of capital’s product, in so far as that product is
not merely its own _reproduction_ (but this reproduction is merely
formal, since, of the three parts of its value, only one is really
consumed and hence reproduced, namely that which replaces wages; profit,
on the other hand, is not reproduction but addition of value, surplus
value). Just as money at first appeared as the presupposition, the cause
of capital, so it now appears as its effect. In the first movement,
money arose out of simple circulation; in the second it arises from the
production process of capital. In the first, it _makes a transition to_
capital; in the second it appears as a presupposition of capital posited
by capital itself; and is therefore already posited as capital _in
itself_ [_an sich_], already contains the ideal relation towards
capital. It does not simply make a transition to capital, but rather, as
_money,_ its potential to be transformed into capital is already posited
in it.

_Absolute surplus labour time. Relative. – It is not the_ quantity _of living labour, but rather its_ quality _as labour which simultaneously preserves the labour time already contained in the material etc. – The change of form and substance in the direct production process. – The preservation of the previous stage of production by the subsequent one is contained in the simple production process etc. – Preservation of the old use value by new labour etc. – Process of production and process of realization. The_ quantity _of objectified labour is preserved because contact with living labour preserves its quality as use value for new labour. – In the real production process, the separation of labour from its objective conditions of existence is suspended. But in this process labour already incorporated in capital etc. Appears as capital’s power of self-preservation. Eternalization of value_

The increase of values is therefore the result of the self-realization
of capital; [regardless of] whether this self-realization is the result
of _absolute_ surplus time or of _relative_, i.e. of a real increase in
absolute labour time or of an increase in relative surplus labour, i.e.
of a decrease in the fractional part of the working day which is
required as labour time necessary to preserve the labouring capacity, as
_necessary labour_ in general.

Living labour time reproduces nothing more than that part of objectified
labour time (of capital) which appears as an equivalent for the power of
disposition over living labour capacity, and which, therefore, as an
equivalent, must replace the labour time objectified in this labouring
capacity, i.e. replace the production costs of the living labour
capacities, in other words, must keep the workers alive as workers. What
it produces in addition to that is not reproduction but rather new
creation, and, more specifically, creation of new values, because it is
the objectification of new labour time in a use value. That the labour
time contained in the raw material and instrument is preserved at the
same time is a result _not of the quantity of labour_, but of its
_quality_ of being labour as such; and there is no special payment for
this, its general quality, for the fact that _labour, as labour, is
labour_ – leaving aside all special qualifications, all specific kinds
of labour – because capital has bought _this quality_ as part of its
exchange with the worker.

But the equivalent for this quality (for the specific use value of
labour) is measured simply by the _quantity_ of labour time which has
produced it. Initially the worker’s use of the instrument as an
instrument, and his shaping of the raw material, adds to the value of
the raw material and of the instrument as much new form as is = to the
labour time contained in his own wage; what he adds additionally is
surplus labour time, surplus value. For their part, the raw materials
and the instrument are preserved not in their form but in their
substance, through the simple relation of being used as instrument and
being posited as the raw material of labour, the simple process of
coming into contact with labour, being posited as its means and object
and therefore as objectification of living labour, moments of labour
itself; and, viewed economically, their substance is objectified labour
time. By being posited as a material mode of existence – means and end
[_Objekt_] – of living labour, objectified labour time ceases to exist
in a one-sided, objective form, in which, as a mere thing, it is at the
prey of processes of chemical decay etc. There is an indifference on the
part of the substance [_Stoff_] towards the form, which develops out of
merely objectified labour time, in whose objective existence labour has
become merely the vanished, _external form_ of its natural substance,
existing merely in the external form of the substantial [_das
Stoffliche_] (e.g. the form of the table for wood, or the form of the
cylinder for iron); [65] no immanent law of reproduction maintains this
form in the way in which the tree, for example, maintains its form as a
tree (wood maintains itself in the specific form of the tree because
this form is a form of the wood; while the form of the table is
accidental for wood, and not the intrinsic form of its substance); it
exists only as a form external to the substance, or it exists only as a
substance [_stofflich_]. The dissolution to which its substance is prey
therefore dissolves the form as well. However, when they are posited as
conditions of living labour, they are themselves reanimated. Objectified
labour ceases to exist in a dead state as an external, indifferent form
on the substance, because it is itself again posited as a moment of
living labour; as a relation of living labour to itself in an objective
material, as the _objectivity_ of living labour (as means and end
[_Objekt_]) (the _objective_ conditions of living labour). The
transformation of the material by living labour, by the realization of
living labour in the material – a transformation which, as purpose,
determines labour and is its purposeful activation (a transformation
which does not only posit the form as external to the inanimate object,
as a mere vanishing image of its material consistency) – thus preserves
the material in a definite form, and subjugates the transformation of
the material to the purpose of labour. Labour is the living, form-giving
fire; it is the transitoriness of things, their temporality, as their
formation by living time. In the simple production process – leaving
aside the realization process – the transitoriness of the forms of
things is used to posit their usefulness. When cotton becomes yarn, yarn
becomes fabric, fabric becomes printed etc. or dyed etc. fabric, and
this becomes, say, a garment, then (1) the substance of cotton has
preserved itself in all these forms. (The chemical process, regulated by
labour, has everywhere consisted of an exchange of (natural) equivalents
etc.); (2) in each of these subsequent processes, the material has
obtained a more useful form, a form making it more appropriate to
consumption; until it has obtained at the end the form in which it can
directly become an object of consumption, when, therefore, the
consumption of the material and the suspension of its form satisfies a
human need, and its transformation is the same as its use. The substance
of cotton preserves itself in all of these processes; it becomes extinct
in one form of use value in order to _make way for a higher one, until
the object is in being as an object of direct consumption_. But when
cotton is posited, say, as twist, then it is posited in a specific
relation to a further kind of labour. If this labour were not to take
place, then not only has the form been posited in it uselessly, i.e. the
previous labour is not reaffirmed by new labour, but the material is
also spoiled, because, in the form of twist, it has a use value only in
so far as it is worked on further: it is a use value only in respect of
the use which further labour makes of it; is use value only in so far as
its form as twist is suspended in the form of fabric; while cotton in
its existence as cotton is capable of an infinite number of useful
employments. Thus, without further labour, the use value of cotton and
twist, material and form, would be botched; it would be destroyed
instead of produced. Material as well as form, substance like form, are
preserved by further labour – preserved as use value, until they obtain
the form of use value as such, whose use is consumption. It is therefore
already a part of the simple production process that the earlier stage
of production is preserved by the later, and that positing the higher
use value preserves the old, or, the old use value is transformed only
to the extent that it is raised to a higher use value. It is living
labour which preserves the use value of the incomplete product of labour
by making it the material of further labour. It preserves it, however,
i.e. protects it from uselessness and decay, only by working it in a
purposeful way, by making it the object of new living labour. _This
preservation of the old use value_ is not a process taking place
separately from the increase or the completion of the use value by new
labour; it takes place, rather, entirely in this new labour of raising
the use value. When the labour of weaving transforms yarn into fabric,
i.e. treats yarn as the raw material of weaving (a particular form of
living labour) (and twist has a use value only if it is woven into
fabric), it thereby preserves the use value which cotton had as such, as
well as that which cotton had obtained specifically as yarn. It
preserves the product of labour by making it into the raw material of
new labour; but what happens is not that it (1) adds new labour and (2)
besides that, by means of additional labour, preserves the use value of
the raw material. _It preserves the utility of cotton as yarn by weaving
the yarn into fabric._ (All this belongs already in the first chapter
_on production in general_.) _Preserves it by weaving it._ This
preservation of labour as product – of the use value of the product of
labour by its becoming the raw material of new labour, being again
posited as material objectivity of purposeful living labour – is given
with the simple production process. As regards use value, labour has the
property of preserving the existing use value by raising it, and it
raises it by making it into the object of new labour as defined by an
ultimate aim; by changing it in turn from the form of its indifferent
consistency into that of objective material, the body of labour. (_The
same holds for the instrument._ A spindle maintains itself as a use
value only by being used up for spinning. If it is not, the specific
form which is here posited in iron and wood would be spoiled for use,
together with the labour which posited it and the material in which it
did the positing. The use value of wood and iron, and of their form as
well, are preserved only by being posited as a means of living labour,
as an objective moment of the existence of labour’s vitality. As an
instrument of labour, it is their destiny [_Bestimmung_] to be used up,
but used up in the process of spinning. The increased productivity which
it lends to labour creates more use values and thereby replaces the use
value eaten up in the consumption of the instrument. This appears most
clearly in agriculture, because there the instrument appears most
easily, because most anciently, as a use value, directly as a means of
life – in contrast to exchange value. If the hoe allows the tiller to
grow twice as much grain as before, then he has to spend less time on
the production of the hoe itself; he has enough food to make a new hoe.)
Now, in the realization process, the value components of capital – the
one in the form of the material, the other in the form of instrument –
confront the worker, i.e. living labour (for the labourer exists in the
process only as such) not as values, but rather as simple moments of the
production process; as use values for labour, as the objective
conditions of its efficacity, or as its objective moments. It lies in
the nature of labour itself to preserve them by using the instrument as
instrument and by giving the raw material a higher form of use value.
But, as components of capital, the use values thus obtained from labour
are exchange values; as such, determined by the costs of production
contained in them, the amount of labour objectified in them. (Use value
is concerned only with the _quality_ of the labour already objectified.)
The quantity of _objectified labour_ is preserved in that its _quality_
is preserved as _use value for further labour_, through the contact with
living labour. The use value of cotton, as well as its use value as
yarn, are preserved by being woven; by existing as one of the objective
moments (together with the spinning wheel) in the weaving process. _The
quantity of labour time contained in the cotton and the cotton yarn are
therefore also preserved thereby. The preservation of the quality of
previous labour in the simple production process, – hence of its
material_ as well – becomes, in the realization process, the
preservation of the quantity of labour already objectified. _For
capital_, this preservation is the preservation of the amount of
objectified labour _by_ the production process; for _living labour_
itself, it is merely the preservation of the already present use value.
Living labour _adds a new amount of labour_; however, it is not this
_quantitative addition_ which preserves the amount of already
objectified labour, but rather its _quality as living labour_, the fact
that it relates as labour to the use values in which the previous labour
exists. But living labour is not paid for this quality, which it
possesses as living labour – if it were not living labour, it would not
be bought at all – rather, it is paid for the _amount of labour_
contained in itself. What is paid for is only the _price_ of its use
value, like that of all other commodities. It does not receive payment
for its specific quality of adding new amounts of labour to the amounts
of labour already objectified, and at the same time preserving labour
which is already objectified as objectified labour; and this quality
does not cost the worker anything either, since it is a natural property
of his labouring capacity. Within the production process, the separation
of labour from its objective moments of existence – instruments and
material – is _suspended. The existence of capital and of wage labour
rests on this separation. Capital does not pay for the suspension of
this separation which proceeds in the real production process_ – for
otherwise work could not go on at all. (Nor does this suspension take
place in the process of exchange with the worker; but rather _in the
process of work itself, during production_. But, as _ongoing labour_, it
is itself already incorporated in capital, and a moment of the same.
This preserving force of labour therefore appears as the self-preserving
force of capital. The worker has merely added new labour; as for
previous labour – owing to the existence of capital – this has an
eternal existence as value, quite independent of its material existence.
This is how the matter appears to capital and to the worker.) If it had
to pay for this quality also, then it would just cease to be capital.
This is part of the material role which labour plays by its nature in
the production process; of its use value. But as use value, labour
belongs to the capitalist; it belongs to the worker merely as exchange
value. Its living quality of preserving objectified labour time by using
it as the objective condition of living labour in the production process
is none of the worker’s business. _This appropriation, by means of which
living labour makes instrument and material in the production process_
into the body of its soul and thereby resurrects them from the dead,
does indeed stand in antithesis to the fact that labour itself is
objectless, is a reality only in the immediate vitality of the worker –
and that the instrument and material, in capital, exist as
beings-for-themselves [_für sich selbst seiende_]. (Return to this.) The
process of the realization of capital proceeds by means of and within
the simple production process, by putting living labour into its natural
relation with its moments of material being. But to the extent that
labour steps into this relation, this relation exists not for itself,
but for capital; labour itself has become already a moment of capital.

_Capitalist obtains surplus labour free of charge together with the maintenance of the value of material and instrument. Labour, by adding a new value to the old one, at the same time maintains, eternizes [sic] the latter. – The_ preservation _of values in the product costs capital nothing. – By means of the appropriation of ongoing labour, the capitalist already possesses a claim to (and, respectively) appropriation of future labour_

We see therefore that the capitalist, by means of the exchange process
with the worker – by indeed paying the worker an equivalent for the
costs of production contained in his labour capacity, i.e. giving him
the means of maintaining his labour capacity, but appropriating living
labour for himself – obtains two things free of charge, first the
surplus labour which increases the value of his capital; but at the same
time, secondly, the quality of living labour which maintains the
previous labour materialized in the component parts of capital and thus
preserves the previously existing value of capital. But this
preservation does not take place as a result of an _increase in the
amount of labour objectified_ by living labour, a creation of value, but
simply as a result of its existence as living _labour_ in the proper
relation with material and instrument, i.e. through its _quality_ as
living labour. As such a quality, it is itself a moment of the simple
production process and does not cost the capitalist anything, any more
than yarn and spindle do, apart from their price, for having also become
moments of the production process.

When e.g. in times of stagnations of trade etc. the mills are shut down,
then it can indeed be seen that the machinery rusts away and that the
yarn is useless ballast and rots, as soon as their connection with
living labour ceases. If the capitalist employs labour only in order to
create surplus value – to create value in addition to that already
present – then it can be seen as soon as he orders work to stop that his
already present capital, as well, becomes devalued; that living labour
hence not only adds new value, but, by the very act of adding a new
value to the old one, maintains, eternizes it. (This shows clearly the
absurdity of the charge against Ricardo, that he conceives _only_
profits and wages as necessary components of the cost of production, and
not also the part of capital contained in raw materials and instrument.
To the extent that the value which they represent is merely preserved,
there are no new production costs. But as far as these present values
themselves are concerned, they all dissolve again into objectified
labour – necessary labour and surplus labour – wages and profit. The
purely natural material in which no human labour is objectified, to the
extent that it is merely a material that exists independently of labour,
has no _value_, since only objectified labour is value; as little value
as is possessed by the common elements as such.) The maintenance of
present capital by the labour which realizes it therefore costs capital
nothing and hence does not belong among the production costs; although
the present values are preserved in the product and equivalents have
therefore to be given for them in exchange. But the _maintenance of
these values_ in the product costs capital nothing and cannot therefore
be cited among the costs of production. Nor are they replaced by labour,
since they are not consumed, except in so far as they are consumed apart
from and outside labour, i.e. as labour _consumes_ (suspends) their
_transitoriness_. Only the wage is really consumed.

Let us return once more to our example. 100 thalers capital, i.e. 50
thalers raw material, 40 thalers labour, 10 thalers instrument of
production. Let the worker require 4 hours in order to create the
fraction of production necessary for his maintenance, the 40 thalers
representing the means of his life. Let his working day be 8 hours. The
capitalist then obtains a surplus of 4 hours free of charge; his surplus
value equals 4 objectified hours, 40 thalers; hence his product = 50 +
10 (preserved, not reproduced values; remained _constant, unchanged_ as
values) + 40 thalers (wages, reproduced, because consumed in the form of
wage) + 40 thalers of surplus value. _Sum_: 140 thalers. Of these 140,
40 are excess. The capitalist had to live during production and before
he began to produce; say 20 thalers. He had to own the latter apart from
his capital of 100 thalers; hence equivalents for them had to be present
in circulation. (How these arose does not concern us here.) Capital
presupposes circulation as a constant magnitude. These equivalents now
present again. Thus consumes 20 thalers of his gain. These enter into
simple circulation. The 100 thalers also enter into simple circulation,
but only in order to be transformed again into the conditions of new
production, 50 thalers of raw material, 40 subsistence for workers, 10
instrument. There remains a surplus value, an addition as such, newly
created, of 20 thalers. This is _money_, posited as a negatively
independent value against circulation. It cannot enter into circulation
as a mere equivalent, in order to exchange for objects of mere
consumption, since circulation is presupposed as constant. But the
independent, illusory existence of money is suspended; it now only
exists in order to be realized, i.e. to become capital. In order to
become that, however, it would again have to be exchanged for the
moments of the production process, subsistence for workers, raw material
and instrument; all these dissolve into objectified labour, can only be
posited by living labour. _Money_, then, in so far as it now already _in
itself_ exists as capital, is therefore simply _a claim on future_ (new)
labour. It exists, objectively, merely as _money_. Surplus value, the
new growth of _objectified labour_, to the extent that it exists for
itself, is _money_; but now, it is money which _in itself_ is already
capital; and, as such, it is a _claim on new labour_. Here capital
already no longer enters into relation with ongoing labour, but with
future labour. And it no longer appears dissolved into its simple
elements in the production process, but as money; no longer, however, as
money which is merely the abstract form of general wealth, but as a
claim on the real possibility of general wealth – labour capacity, and
more precisely, _labour capacity in the process of becoming_ [_das
werdende Arbeitsvermögen_]. As a claim, its material existence as money
is irrelevant, and can be replaced by any other title. Like the creditor
of the state, every capitalist with his newly gained value possesses a
claim on future labour, and, by means of the appropriation of ongoing
labour has already at the same time appropriated future labour. (This
side of capital to be developed to this point. But already here its
property of existing as value separately from its substance can be seen.
This already lays the basis for credit.) To stockpile it in the form of
money is therefore by no means the same as materially to stockpile the
material conditions of labour. This is rather a stockpiling of property
titles to labour. Posits future labour as _wage labour_, as use value
for capital. No _equivalent_ on hand for the newly created value; its
possibility only in new labour.

In this example, then, an absolute surplus labour time of 4 hours
created, added to the old values, to the world of available wealth, a
new value of 20 thalers money, and money already in connection with its
form as capital (already as _posited possibility_ of capital, not as
before, becoming the possibility of capital as such only by ceasing to
be money as such).

Now if the productive force doubles, so that instead of 4 hours the
worker has to put in only 2 hours of _necessary labour_, and if the
capitalist makes him work 8 hours as before, then the accounts are as
follows: 50 thalers material, 20 wages, 10 instrument of labour, 60
surplus value (6 hours, 4 before). New growth of absolute surplus value:
2 hours or 20 thalers. _Sum_: 140 thalers (in the product).

A total of 140 thalers as before; but now 60 of them are surplus value;
of which 40 for absolute increase in surplus time as before, 20 for
relative. But the simple exchange value only contains 140 thalers as
before. Now, is it only the use values which have increased, or has a
new value been created? Before, capital had to begin again with 100 in
order to realize itself anew at 40%. What happens to the 20 of surplus
value? Before, the capitalist ate up 20 of them; he was left with a
value of 20. Now he eats up 20 and is left with 40. On another side, the
capital entering into production remained 100; now it has become 80.
What is gained in value on one side in one form is lost as value on the
other side in another form. The first capital re-enters into the
production process; again produces a surplus value (capitalist’s
consumption deducted) of 20. At the end of this second operation, a
newly created value is present without equivalent. 20 thalers together
with the first 40. Now let us take the second capital.

Material, 50; wages (2 hours), 20; instrument, 10. But in the 2 hours he
produces a value of 8, i.e. 80 thalers (of which 20 for costs of
production). Remainder, 60, since 20 reproduce the wage (disappear as
wage). 60 + 60 = 120. At the end of this second operation, 20 thalers
for consumption; remainder surplus value 20; together with the first
operation, 60. In the third operation with the first capital, 60; with
the second, 80; in the fourth operation with the first capital 80, with
the second, 100. The first capital has increased as _value_ in
proportion as its exchange value, as productive capital, has decreased.

Suppose both capitals together with their surplus can be used as
capital; i.e. their surplus exchanged for new labour. We then get the
following calculation (leaving consumption aside): the _first_ capital
produces 40%, the second 60%. 40% of 140 is 56; 60% of 140 (i.e.
capital, 80; surplus value, 60) is 84. The total product in the first
case 140 + 56 = 196; in the second 140 + 84 = 224. In the second case
absolute surplus value 28 higher than in the first. The first capital
has 40 thalers with which to buy new labour time; the value of the hour
of labour was presupposed at 10 thalers; therefore, his 40 thalers buy 4
new hours of labour, which produce 80 for him (of which 40 go to replace
the wages of 8 hours of labour). At the end it was 140 + 80 (i.e.
reproduction of the capital of 100: surplus value of 40, or reproduction
of 140; or, in the first case, 100 thalers reproduce themselves as 140;
the second 40, since they are spent only to buy new labour, hence do not
_simply_ replace value – impossible presupposition, by the way) which
produce 80. 140 + 80 = 220. The second capital of 140; the 80 produce
40; or the 80 thalers reproduce themselves as 120; the remaining 60,
however, reproduce themselves (since they are spent _purely_ for the
purchase of _labour_, and do not therefore simply replace any value, but
reproduce out of themselves and posit the surplus) as 180; then 120 +
120 = 240. (Produced 40 thalers more than the first capital, exactly the
surplus time of two hours, for the first is a surplus time of 2 hours as
assumed in the first case). Thus the result is a greater exchange value,
because more labour objectified; 2 hours more surplus labour.

Something else should be noted here as well: 140 thalers at 40% yield
56; capital and interest together = 140 + 56 = 196; but we have obtained
220; according to which the interest on 140 would be not 56 but 84;
which would be 60% on 140 (140:84 = 100:_x_; _x_ = 8,400/140 = 60).
Similarly in the second case: 140 at 60% = 84; capital and interest =
140 + 84 = 224; but we obtain 240; according to which the interest on
the 140 is not 84 but 100; (140 + 100 = 240); i.e., %, (140:100 =
100:_x; x_ = 10,000/140); [_x_ = 71 3/7%]. Now where does this come
from? (In the first case 60% instead of 40; in the second 71 3/7 instead
of 60%.) In the first case, where it was 60 instead of 40, hence 20% too
much came out; in the second case 71 3/7 instead of 60, i.e. 11 3/7 too
much. Why, then, firstly the difference between the two cases and
secondly the difference in each case?

In the first case, the original capital was 100 = 60 (material and
instrument of labour) plus 40 in labour; 2/5 labour, 3/5 (material). The
first 3/5 bring no interest at all; the last 2/5 bring 100%. But
computed on the basis of the whole capital, the increase is only 40%;
2/5 of 100 = 40. But the 100% on the latter amount to only 40% on the
whole 100; i.e. an increase of 2/5 in the whole. Now, if only 2/5 of the
newly arrived capital of 40 had increased by 100%, then this would yield
an increase of the whole by 16 [thalers]. 40 + 16 = 56. This together
with the 140 = 196; which is then actually 40% on 156, capital and
interest reckoned together. 40 increased by 100%, doubled, is 80; 2/5 of
40 increased by 100% is 16. [66] 40 of the 80 replace capital. Gain of
40.

The account then: 100_c_ + 40 interest + 40_c_ + 40_i_ = 220; or,
capital of 140 with an interest of 80; but if we had calculated 100_c_ +
40_i_ + 40_c_ + 16_i_ = 196; or, capital of 140 with interest of 56.

An interest of 24 on a capital of 40 is too much; but 24 = 3/5 of 40 (3
× 8 = 24); i.e. in addition to the capital, only 2/5 of the capital grew
by 100%; the whole capital therefore by only 2/5, i.e. 16%. [67] The
interest computation on 40 is 24% too high (by 100% on 3/5 of the
capital); 24 on 24 is 100% on 3 × 8 (3/5 of 40). But on the whole amount
of 140, it is 60% instead of 40; i.e. 24 too much out of 40, 24 out of
40 = 60%. Thus we figured 60% too much on a capital of 40 (60 = 3/5 of
100). But we figured 24 too high on 140 (and this is the difference
between 220 and 196); this is first 1/5 of 100 then 1/12 of 100 too
much; 1/5 of 100 = 20%; 1/12 of 100 = 8 4/12% or 8 1/3%; thus altogether
28 1/3% too high. Thus on the whole not 60%, as on 40, but only 28 1/3%
too much; which makes a difference of 31 2/3, depending on whether we
figure 24 too many on the 40 [or on] the capital of 140. Similarly in
the other example.

In the first 80 which produce 120, 50 + 10 was simply replaced, but 20
reproduced itself threefold: 60 (20 reproduction, 40 surplus).

  ---- ---- ------- ------ ----------------------------------
  If   20   posit   60,    making up triple the value, then
       60           180.    
  ---- ---- ------- ------ ----------------------------------

  : Hours of labour


NOTEBOOK IV

Mid-December 1857 – 22 January, 1858



THE CHAPTER ON CAPITAL (CONTINUATION)


_Confusion of profit and surplus value. Carey’s erroneous calculation. – The capitalist, who does_ not pay _the worker for the_ preservation _of the old value, then demands remuneration for giving the worker permission to preserve the old capital. – Surplus value and profit etc. – Difference between consumption of the instrument and of wages. The former consumed in the production process, the latter outside it. – Increase of surplus value and decrease in rate of profit. (Bastiat)_

This highly irksome calculation will not delay us further. The point is
simply this: if, as in our first example, material and instrument amount
to 3/5 (60 out of 100), and wages 2/5 (40), and if the capital yielded a
gain of 40%, then it equals 140 at the end (this 40% gain equal to the
fact that the capitalist made the workers put out 12 hours of labour,
where 6 were necessary, hence gained 100% on the necessary labour time).
Now if the 40 thalers which were gained go to work again as capital with
the same presuppositions – and at the present point, the presuppositions
have not changed yet – then of the 40 thalers 3/5 i.e. 24 thalers have
to be used for material and instrument, and 2/5 for labour; so that the
only thing that doubles is the wage of 16 which becomes 32, 16 for
reproduction, 16 surplus labour; so that altogether at the end of
production 40 + 16 = 56 or 40%. Thus the entire capital of 40 would have
produced 196 under the same conditions. It should not be assumed, as
happens in most of the economics books, that the 40 thalers are spent
purely for wages, to buy living labour, and thus yield 80 thalers at the
end of production.

<If it is said: a capital of 100 yields 10% in one period, 5% in
another, then nothing is more mistaken than to conclude, as do Carey and
consorts, that the share of capital in production was 1/10 and that of
labour 9/10 in the first case; in the second case, the share of capital
only 1/20 and that of labour 19/20; i.e. that the share of labour rises
as the rate of profit falls. [1] From the viewpoint of capital – and
capital has no awareness whatever of the nature of its process of
realization, and has an interest in having an awareness of it only in
times of _crisis_ – a profit of 10% on a capital of 100 looks like a
profit on each of its value components – material, instrument, wages –
equally and indifferently, as if this capital were simply a sum of 100
thalers of value which had, as such, increased by 10%. But the question
is, in fact: (1) what was the relation between the component parts of
capital and (2) how much surplus labour did it buy with the wage – with
the hours of labour objectified in the wage? If I know the total size of
a capital, the relation of its value components to one another (in
practice, I would also have to know what part of the instrument of
production is used up in the process, i.e. actually enters into it), and
if I know the profit, then I know how much surplus labour has been
created. If 3/5 of the capital consisted of material (which for the sake
of convenience we here suppose to be entirely consumed productively as
material of production), i.e. 60 thalers, and wages 40, and if the
profit on the 100 thalers is 10, then the labour bought for 40 thalers
of objectified labour time has created 50 thalers of objectified labour
in the production process, hence has worked a surplus labour time or
created a surplus value of 25% = 1/4 of the necessary labour time. Then
if the worker works a day of 12 hours, he has worked 3 hours of surplus
time, and the labour time necessary to maintain him alive for one day
was 9 hours of labour. The new value created in production may only be
10 thalers, but, according to the real rate, these 10 thalers are to be
reckoned on the base of the 40, not of the 100. The 60 thalers of value
have created no value whatever; the working day has. Thus the worker has
increased the part of capital spent for labour capacity by 25%, not by
10%. The total capital has grown by 10%. 10 is 25% of 40; it is only 10%
of 100. Thus the profit rate on capital in no way expresses the rate at
which living labour increases objective labour; for this increase is
merely = to the surplus with which the worker reproduces his wage, i.e.
= to the time which he works over and above that which he would have to
work in order to reproduce his wages. If the worker in the above example
were not a worker for a capitalist, and if he related to the use values
contained in the 100 thalers not as to capital but simply as to the
objective conditions of his labour, then, before beginning the
production process anew, he would possess 40 thalers in subsistence,
which he would consume during the working day, and 60 thalers in
instrument and material. He would work only 3/4 of a day, 9 hours, and
at the end of the day his product would be not 110 thalers but 100,
which he would again exchange in the above proportions, beginning the
process again and again. But he would also work 3 hours less; i.e. he
would save 25% surplus labour = 25% surplus value out of the exchange
which he undertakes between 40 thalers in subsistence and his labour
time; and if at some time he worked 3 hours extra, because the material
and the instrument were there on hand, then it would not occur to him to
say that he had created a new value of 10%, but rather one of 25%,
because he could buy one fourth additional subsistence, 50 thalers’
worth instead of 40; and, since he is concerned with use values, these
items of subsistence by themselves would be of value for him. This
illusion that the new value is derived not from the exchange of 9 hours
of labour time as objectified in 40 thalers for 12 hours of living
labour, i.e. a surplus value of 25% on this part, but that it comes from
an even 10% increase in the total capital – 10% of 60 is 6 and of 40 is
4 – this illusion is the basis of the notorious Dr Price’s _compound
interest calculation_, [2] which led the heaven-born Pitt to his
_sinking fund_ idiocy. [3] The identity of surplus gain with surplus
labour time – absolute and relative – sets a qualitative limit on the
accumulation of capital, namely the _working day_, the amount of time
out of 24 hours during which labouring capacity can be active, the
degree to which the productive forces are developed, and the population,
which expresses the number of simultaneous working days etc. If, on the
other side, surplus value is defined merely as interest – i.e. as the
relation in which capital increases itself by means of some imaginary
sleight of hand, then the limit is merely quantitative, and there is
then absolutely no reason why capital cannot every other day convert the
interest into capital and thus yield interest on its interest in
infinite geometrical progression. Practice has shown the economists that
Price’s interest-multiplication is impossible; but they have never
discovered the blunder contained in it.

Of the 110 thalers which emerge at the end of production, 60 thalers
(material and instrument), in so far as they are values, have remained
absolutely unchanged. The worker took nothing away from them and added
nothing to them. Of course, from the standpoint of the capitalist, the
fact that the worker maintains the value of objectified labour by the
very fact of his labour being living labour appears as if the worker
still had to pay the capitalist to get permission to enter into the
proper relation with the objectified moments, the objective conditions,
of labour. Now, as regards the remaining 50 thalers, 40 of them
represent not only preservation but _actual reproduction_, since capital
has divested itself of them [_von sich entäussert_] in the form of wages
and the worker has consumed them; 10 thalers represent production above
and beyond reproduction, i.e. 1/4 surplus labour (of 3 hours). Only
these 50 thalers are a product of the production process. Therefore, if
the worker, as is wrongly asserted, divided the product with the
capitalist so that the former’s share were 9/10, then he would have to
get not 40 thalers (and he has obtained them in advance, in exchange for
which he has reproduced them and paid them back in their entirety, as
well as maintaining the already existing values for the capitalist free
of charge), which is only 8/10 but rather 45, which would leave capital
only 5. Then, having begun the production process with 100 thalers, the
capitalist would have at the end only 65 thalers as product. But the
worker obtains none of the 40 thalers he has reproduced, nor any of the
10 thalers of surplus value. If the 40 thalers which have been
reproduced are to serve for the purchase of further living labour, then,
as far as the relation is concerned, all that can be said is that an
objectified labour of 9 hours (40 thalers) buys living labour for 12
hours (50 thalers) and thus yields a surplus value of 25% of the real
product (partly reproduced as wage fund, partly newly produced as
surplus value) in the realization process.

Just now the original capital of 100 was: 50 – 10 – 40. [4] Produced
surplus gain of 10 thalers (25% surplus time). _Altogether_ 110 thalers.

Now suppose it were: 60 – 20 – 20. The result would be 110 thalers, so
says the ordinary economist, and the even more ordinary capitalist says
that 10% has been produced in equal proportions by all parts of the
capital. Again, 80 thalers of capital would merely be preserved; no
change taken place in its value. Only the 20 thalers would have turned
into 30; i.e. surplus labour would have increased by 50%, not by 25% as
before.

Take the third case: 100: 70 – 20 – 10. Result 110.

Then the invariable value, 90. The new product 20; hence surplus value
or surplus time 100%. Here we have three cases in which the profit on
the whole capital is always 10, but in the first case the new value
created was 25% above the objectified labour spent to buy living labour,
in the second case 50%, in the third: 100%.>

The devil take this wrong arithmetic. [5] But never mind. _Commençons de
nouveau._

In the first case we had:

  Invariable value   Wage labour   Surplus value   Total
  ------------------ ------------- --------------- -------
  60                 40            10              110

We continue to presuppose a working day = 12 hours. (We could also
assume a growing working day, e.g. _x_ hours before, but now _x_ + _b_
hours, while productive force remains constant; or both factors
variable.)

 

Hours

Thalers

 

If the worker produces in

12

50

 

then in

1

4 1/6

 

then in

9 3/5

40

} in 12 hours 50 thalers

then in

2 2/5

10

The worker’s necessary labour then amounts to 9 3/5 hours (40 thalers);
hence surplus labour 2 2/5 hours (value of 10 thalers). 2 2/5 hours is
1/5 of the working day. The worker’s surplus labour amounts to 1/5 of
the day, i.e. = the value of 10 thalers. Now if we look at these 2 2/5
hours as a percentage which capital has gained above the labour time
objectified in 9 3/5 hours, then 2 2/5:9 3/5 = 12/5:48/5, i.e. = 12:48 =
1:4. Thus 1/4 of the capital = 25% of it. Likewise, 10 thalers : 40
thalers = 1:4 = 25%. Now, summarizing the whole result: [6]

  No. I   Original capital:   Constant value:   Value reproduced for wages:   Surplus value from production:   Total sum:   Surplus time and value:                % of objectified labour exchanged:
  ------- ------------------- ----------------- ----------------------------- -------------------------------- ------------ -------------------------------------- ------------------------------------
          100                 60                40                            10                               110          2 2/5 hours or 10. (2 2/5 of labour)   25%

(It might be said that the _instrument of labour_, its value, has to be
not only replaced but reproduced; since it is in fact used up, consumed
in production. This to be looked at under _fixed capital_. In actuality
the value of the instrument is transposed to that of the material; to
the extent that it is objectified labour, it only changes its form. If
in the above example the value of the material was 50 and that of the
instrument 10, then now, with the instrument used up by 5, the value of
the material is 55 and that of the instrument 5; if it disappears
altogether, then that of the material has reached 60. This is an element
of the simple production process. Unlike wages, the instrument has not
been consumed _outside the production process._)

Now to the second presupposition:

  Original capital:   Constant Value:   Value reproduced for wages:   Surplus value from production:   Total sum:
  ------------------- ----------------- ----------------------------- -------------------------------- ------------
  100                 80                20                            10                               110

If the worker produces 30 thalers in 12 hours, then in 1 hour 2 2/4
thalers, in 8 hours 20 thalers, in 4 hours 10 thalers. 10 thalers are
50% of 20 thalers; as are 4 hours out of 8 hours; the surplus value = 4
hours, 1/3 of a day, or 10 thalers surplus value.

Thus:

  -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  No. II   Original capital   Constant value:   Value reproduced for wages:   Surplus value from production:   Total sum:   Surplus time and value:   % on capital:
  -------- ------------------ ----------------- ----------------------------- -------------------------------- ------------ ------------------------- ---------------
           100                80                20                            10                               110          4 hours or 10.            50%
                                                8 hours                                                                     2 working days            

  -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

In the first case, like the second, the profit on a total capital of 100
= 10%, but in the first case the real surplus value which capital
obtains from the production process is 25%, in the second, 50%.

The conditions presupposed in No. II are in themselves as possible as
those in No. I. But brought into connection with one another, those of
No. II are absurd. Material and instrument have been raised from 60 to
80, the productivity of labour has fallen from 4 1/6 thalers per hour to
2 3/4 and surplus value increased by 100%. (Suppose, however, that the
increased expenditure for wages expresses more working days in the first
case, fewer in the second, and then the presupposition is correct.) It
is in itself irrelevant that necessary wages, i.e. the value of labour
expressed in thalers, have fallen. Whether the value of an hour of
labour is expressed in 2 thalers or in 4, in both cases the product of
12 hours of labour is exchanged (in circulation) for 12 hours of labour,
and in both cases surplus labour appears as surplus value. The absurdity
of the presupposition comes from the fact (1) that we have posited 12
hours as the minimum working time; and hence cannot introduce additional
or fewer working days; (2) the more we make capital increase on one
side, the more we not only make _necessary_ labour decline, but have
also to decrease its _value_, although the value is the same. In the
second case, the price would, rather, have to rise. The fact that the
worker can live from less work, i.e. that he produces more in the same
number of hours, would have to be shown not in a decrease in the thalers
for necessary labour, but in the number of necessary hours. If he gets,
as e.g. in the first case, 4 1/6 thalers, but if the use value of this
value, which has to be _constant_ in order to express _value_ (not
price), had multiplied, then he no longer needs 9 3/5 but only 4 hours
for the reproduction of his living labouring capacity, and this would
have to express itself in the surplus over the value. But the way we
have set up the presuppositions, our ‘invariable value’ is variable,
while the 10% are invariable, here a constant addition to reproductive
labour, although it expresses different percentage parts of the same. In
the first case the invariable value is smaller than in the second case,
but the total product of labour is larger; since, if one part of 100 is
smaller, the other has to be larger; and, since absolute labour time is
fixed at the identical amount, and since further the total product of
labour becomes smaller, in proportion as ‘invariable value’ becomes
larger, and larger as the latter becomes smaller, we therefore obtain
less product (absolutely) from the same labour time in proportion as
more capital is employed. Now, this would be quite correct, since, if
out of a given sum such as 100 more is spent as ‘invariable value’, less
can be spent for labour time, and thus, _relative_ to total capital,
less new overall value can be created; but then, if capital is to make a
profit, one cannot hold _labour time_ constant, as is done here, or, if
one holds it constant, the _value of the working hour_ cannot become
smaller, as it does here; which is impossible if ‘invariable value’
becomes larger and _surplus value_ becomes _larger_; the _number of_
working hours would have to become smaller. But that is what we have
assumed in the example. We assume in the first case that 50 thalers are
produced in 12 hours of labour; in the second case, only 30 thalers. In
the first, we make the worker work 9 3/5 hours; in the second only 6,
although he produces less per hour. It’s absurd. But, understood
differently, is there not after all something correct in these figures?
Does not absolute new value decrease despite an increase in the
relative, as soon as relatively more material and instrument than labour
is introduced into the component parts of capital? Relative to a given
capital, less living labour is employed; hence, even if the excess of
this living labour above its costs is greater, and therefore the
percentage of wages rises, i.e. the percentage relative to capital
actually consumed, then the absolute new value does not necessarily
become relatively smaller than in the case of a capital which employs
less material and instrument (and this is the main point of the change
in invariable value, i.e. value unchanged as value in the production
process) and relatively more living labour; precisely because relatively
more living labour is employed? An increase in the productive force then
corresponds to the increase in the instrument, since the surplus value
of the instrument does not keep pace, as in the previous mode of
production, with its use value, its productive force, and since any
increase in productive force creates more surplus value, although by no
means in the same numerical proportion. The increase in the productive
forces, which has to express itself in an enlargement of the value of
the instrument – the space it takes up in capital expenditure –
necessarily brings with it an increase in the material, since more
material has to be worked in order to produce more product. (The
increase in the productive force can, however, also relate to quality;
but if that is given, only to quantity; or to quantity if quality is
given; or to both.) Now, although there is less (necessary) labour in
relation to surplus labour, and absolutely less living labour in
relation to capital, is it not possible for its surplus value to rise,
although in relation to the capital as a whole it declines, i.e. the
so-called rate of profit declines? Take for example a capital of 100.
Let material be 30 at first. 30 for instrument. (Together, invariable
value of 60.) Wages 40 (4 working days). Profit 10%. Here profit is 25%
on wages and 10% on capital as a whole. Now let material become 40 and
instrument 40. Let productivity double, so that only 2 working days
necessary = 20. Now posit that the absolute profit be smaller than 10;
i.e. the profit on total capital. Is it not possible for profit on
labour employed to be more than 25%, i.e. in the given case, more than
merely a fourth of 20? In fact, a third of 20 is 6 2/3; i.e. less than
10, but 33 1/3% of labour employed, while in the previous case it was
only 25%. In this case, we would end up with only 106 2/3, while in the
previous case we would have had 110, but still, with the same capital
(100) the surplus labour, surplus gain relative to labour employed,
would be greater than in the first case; but since 50% less labour was
employed, in absolute terms, than in the first case, while the profit on
labour employed was only 8 1/3 more than in the first case, it follows
that the absolute quantity which results has to be smaller, and the same
applies to the profit on total capital. For 20 × 33 1/3 is smaller than
40 × 25. This whole instance is improbable and cannot count as a general
example in economics; for an increase in the instrument and an increase
in the material worked are both presupposed, while not only the relative
but the absolute number of workers has declined. (Of course, when two
factors = a third, one has to grow smaller as the other grows larger.)
But an increase in the value of the instrument in relation to capital as
a whole, and an increase in the value of the material, all in all
presuppose a division of labour, hence at least an absolute increase in
the number of workers, if not an increase relative to capital as a
whole. However, take the case of the lithographing machine, which
everyone can use to make lithographs without special skill; suppose the
value of the instrument immediately upon its invention to be greater
than that which 4 workers absorbed before these handy things were
invented; it now requires only 2 workers (here, as with many
instrument-like machines, no further division of labour takes place;
instead, the qualitative division disappears); let the instruments
originally have a value of only 40, but let 4 working days be necessary
(necessary, here, for the capitalist to make a profit). (There are
machines, e.g. forced air heating ducts, where labour as such disappears
altogether except at a single point; the duct is open at one point, and
carries heat to the others; no workers are required at all. This the
case generally (see Babbage) [7] with energy transmission, where,
previously, energy had to be carried in material form by numbers of
workers, here firemen, from one point to another – where the
transmission from one room to another, which has now become a physical
process, appeared as the labour of numbers of workers.) Now, if he uses
this lithographing machine as a source of income, as capital, and not as
use value, then the material must necessarily increase, since he can put
out more lithographs in the same amount of time, which is precisely
where this greater profit comes from. Let this lithographer then employ
an instrument to the amount of 40, material 40, 2 working days (20)
which [give] him 33 1/3%, i.e. 6 2/3 out of an objectified labour time
of 20; then his capital, like the other’s, consists of 100, only yields
6 2/3%, but he gains 33 1/3 on labour employed, while the other gains 10
on capital, but only 25% on labour. The value obtained from labour
employed may be smaller, but the profits on the whole capital are
greater if the other elements of capital are relatively smaller. Despite
this, the business at 6 2/3% on the total capital and 33 1/3% on labour
could become more profitable than the earlier one based on 25% on labour
and 10% profit on the total capital. Suppose e.g. that grain prices etc.
rose so that the maintenance of the worker rose by 25% in value. The 4
working days would now cost the first lithographer 50 instead of 40. His
instruments and material would remain the same: 60 thalers. He would
then have to lay out a capital of 110. With this capital, his profit on
the 50 thalers for 4 working days would be 12 (25%). Hence 12 thalers on
110 (i.e. 9 1/6% on the total capital of 110). The other lithographer:
machine 40, material 40; but the 2 working days will cost him 25% more
than 20, i.e. 25. He would thus have to lay out 105; his surplus value
on labour 33 1/3%, i.e. 1/3, is 8 1/3. He would gain then, 8 1/3 on 105;
13 1/8%. Then suppose a 10 year cycle with 5 bad and 5 good harvests at
the above average proportions; then the first lithographer would gain 50
thalers of interest on the second during the first 5 years; in the last
5 45 5/6; altogether 95 5/6 thalers; average interest over the 10 years
9 7/12 thalers. The other capitalist would have gained 31 1/3 in the
first 5 years, 65 5/8 in the last; 96 23/24 altogether; a 10-year
average of 9 84/120. Since No. II uses up more material at the same
price, he sells cheaper. It could be said in reply that he sells dearer
because he uses up more instrument; especially because he uses up more
of the value of the machine in proportion as he uses up more material;
however, it is in practice not true that machines wear out and have to
be replaced more rapidly as they work more material. But all this is
beside the point. Let the relation between the value of the machine and
that of the material be constant in both cases.

This example attains significance only if we assume a smaller capital
which employs more labour and less material and machinery, but yields a
higher percentage on the total capital; and a larger capital employing
more machinery and more material, as many working days in absolute
numbers but relatively fewer, and a smaller percentage on the whole,
because less on labour, being more productive, division of labour used,
etc. It also has to be postulated (which was not done above) that the
use value of the machine significantly greater than its value; i.e. that
its devaluation in the service of production is not proportional to its
increasing effect on production.

Thus, as above, a press (first, hand-operated printing press; second,
self-acting printing press).

_Capital I_, 100, uses 30 in material; 30 for the manual press; 4
working days = 40 thalers; gain 10%; hence 25% on living labour (1/4
surplus time).

_Capital II_, 200, uses 100 in materials; 60 in press, 4 working days
(40 thalers); gain on the 4 working days 13 1/3 thalers = 1 working day
and 1/3, compared to only 1 working day in the first case; total sum:
213 1/3. I.e. 6 2/3%, compared to 10% in the first case. Nevertheless,
the surplus value on the labour which has been employed is 13 1/3 in
this second case, as against 10 in the first; in the first, 4 days
create 1 surplus day in 4 working days; in the second, 4 days create 1
1/3 surplus days. But the rate of profit on the total capital is 1/3 or
33 1/3% smaller than in the first; the total amount of the gain is 1/3
greater. Now let us suppose that the 30 and the 100 in material are
sheets of book paper, and that the instruments wear out in the same
space of time, say 10 years or 1/10 per year. Then No. I has to replace
1/10 of 30 in material, i.e. 3; No. II, 1/10 of 60, i.e. 6. The material
does not enter further into annual production (which may be regarded as
4 working days of 3 months each) on either side, see above.

_Capital I_ sells 30 sheets at 30 for materials + 3 for instrument + 50
(objectified labour time) (production time) = 83.

_Capital II_ sells 100 sheets at 100, material, + 6, instrument, + 53
1/3 = 159 1/3.

_Capital I_ sells 30 sheets for 83 thalers, 1 sheet at 83/80 thalers = 2
thalers, 23 silver groschen.

_Capital II_ sells 100 sheets for 159 thalers, 10 silver groschen; 1
sheet at

  -------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------
  159 thalers 10 silver groschen   i.e., 1 thaler, 17 silver groschen, 8 pfennigs.
  100                               
  -------------------------------- -------------------------------------------------

It is clear then that Capital I is done for, because its selling price
is infinitely too high. Now, although in the first case the profit on
total capital was 10% and in the second case only 6 2/3%, the first
capital only took in 25% on labour time, while the second takes 33 1/3%.
With Capital I, necessary labour is greater relative to the total
capital; and hence surplus labour, while smaller in absolute terms than
with Capital II, shows up as a higher rate of profit on the smaller
total capital. 4 working days at 60 are greater than 4 at 160; in the
first, 1 working day corresponds to a capital of 15; in the second, 1
working day corresponds to 40. But with the second capital, labour is
more productive (which is given both in the _greater_ amount of
machinery, hence the greater amount of space that it takes up among the
value components of capital; and in the greater amount of material in
which a working day, which consists of a greater proportion of surplus
time and hence uses more material in the same time, is expressed). It
creates more surplus time (relative surplus time, i.e. determined by the
development of the force of production). In the first case, surplus time
is 1/4, in the second, 1/3. It therefore creates more use values and a
higher exchange value in the same amount of time; but the latter not in
proportion with the former, since, as we saw, exchange value does not
rise in the same numerical proportion as the productivity of labour. The
fractional price is therefore smaller than the total production price –
i.e. the fractional price multiplied by the amount of fractional prices
produced is greater. Now, if we had assumed an _absolutely greater_
number of working days than in No. I, although a relatively smaller
number, then the matter would have been even more striking. The profit
of the larger capital, working with more machinery, therefore appears
smaller than that of the smaller capital working with relatively or
absolutely more living labour, precisely because the _higher profit on
living labour_ appears as smaller, when calculated on the basis of a
total capital in which living labour makes up a lesser proportion of the
whole, than the _lower profit on living labour_ which makes up a larger
proportion of the smaller total capital. But the fact that No. II can
employ more material, and that a larger proportion of the total value is
in the instrument, is only the expression of the productivity of labour.

This, then, is the unfortunate Bastiat’s famous riddle; he had firmly
convinced himself – to which Mr Proudhon had no answer – that because
the rate of profit of the larger and more productive total capital is
smaller, it follows that the worker’s share has grown larger, whereas
precisely the _opposite_ is the case; his surplus labour has grown
larger. [8]

Nor does Ricardo seem to have understood the matter, for otherwise he
would not have tried to explain the periodic decline of profit merely by
the rise in wages caused by the rise in grain prices (and hence of
rent). [9] But at bottom, surplus value – in so far as it is indeed the
foundation of profit, but still distinct from profit commonly so-called
– has never been developed. The unfortunate Bastiat would have said in
the above case that in the first example the profit was 10% (i.e. 1/10),
in the second only 6 1/4%, i.e. 1/16 (leaving out the percentage), so
that the worker receives 9/10 in the first case, 15/16 in the second.
The relation is correct in neither of the two cases, nor is their
relation to one another correct. Now, as far as the further relation of
the new value of capital to capital as _indifferent total value_ is
concerned (and this is how capital as such appeared to us at the
beginning, before we moved on into the production process, and it must
again appear to us in this way at the end of the process), this is to be
developed partly under the rubric of _profit_, where the new value
obtains a new character, and partly under the heading of _accumulation_.
We are here initially concerned only with developing the nature of
surplus value as the equivalent of the absolute or relative labour time
mobilized by capital above and beyond necessary labour time.

The consumption, in the production process, of the element of value
consisting of the instrument cannot in the least [serve to] distinguish
the instrument of labour from the material – here, where all that is to
be explained is the creation of surplus value, self realization. This is
because this consumption is part of the simple production process
itself, hence the value of the consumed instrument (whether it be the
_simple use value_ of the instrument itself or the exchange value, if
production has already progressed to where there is a division of labour
and where at least the surplus is exchanged) has to be recovered again
in the value (exchange value) or the use value of the product – so that
the process can begin anew. The instrument loses its use value in the
same proportion as it helps to raise the exchange value of the raw
material and serves as a means of labour. This point must, indeed, be
examined, because the distinction between the invariable value, the part
of capital which is preserved; that which is reproduced (_reproduced_
for capital; from the standpoint of the real production of labour –
_produced_); and that which is newly produced, is of essential
importance.

_Multiplication of simultaneous working days._ (Accumulation of capital.) – _Growth of the constant part of capital in relation to the variable part spent on wages = growth of the productivity of labour. – Proportion in which capital has to increase in order to employ the same number of workers if productivity rises_

It is now time to finish with the question of the value resulting from
the growth of the productive forces. We have seen: this creates a
_surplus value_ (not merely a greater use value) just as in the case of
an absolute increase in surplus labour. If a certain limit is given, say
e.g. that the worker needs only half a day in order to produce his
subsistence for a _whole_ day – and if the natural limit has been
reached – then an increase of absolute labour time is possible only if
more workers are employed _at the same time_, so that the real working
day is simultaneously multiplied instead of only lengthened (in the
given conditions, the individual worker can work no more than 12 hours;
if a surplus time of 24 hours is to be gained, then there have to be 2
workers). Capital in this case, before entering the self-realization
process, has to buy 6 additional hours of labour in the act of exchange
with the worker, i.e. has to lay out a greater part of itself; at the
same time it has to lay out more for material, on the average (beside
the fact that the extra worker has to be _available_, i.e. that the
working population has to have grown). Hence the possibility of this
further realization process depends here on a previous accumulation of
capital (as regards its material existence). If, however, productivity
increases, and hence relative surplus time – at the present point we can
still regard capital as always directly engaged in the production of
subsistence, raw materials etc. – then less expenditure is necessary for
wages and the growth in the material is created by the realization
process itself. But this question belongs, rather, with the
_accumulation_ of capitals.

We now come to the point where we last broke off. [10] An increase in
productivity increases the _surplus value_, although it does not
increase the absolute amount of exchange values. It increases values
because it creates a new _value as value_, i.e. a value which is not
merely an equivalent destined for exchange, but which asserts itself as
such; in a word, more money. The question is: does it ultimately also
increase the amount of exchange values? This is, at bottom, admitted;
for even Ricardo admits that along with the accumulation of capitals
there is an increase in savings, hence a growth in the exchange values
produced. The growth of savings means nothing more than the growth of
independent values – of money. But Ricardo’s demonstration contradicts
his own assertion.

Our old example. 100 thalers capital; 60 thalers in constant value; 40
in wages; produces 80; hence product = 140. * Let these 40 in surplus
value be absolute labour time.

* Here we see again that the surplus value on the whole of the capital =
to half of the newly produced value, since a half of the latter = to
necessary labour. The relation between this surplus value, which is
always equal to surplus time, i.e. = to the worker’s total product minus
the part which forms his wage, depends (1) on the relation between the
constant part of capital and the productive part; (2) between necessary
labour time and surplus time. In the above case, the relation of surplus
time to necessary time is 100%; gives 40% on a capital of 100; hence (3)
it depends further, not only on the relation given above in (2), but
also on the absolute magnitude of necessary labour. If, in a capital of
100, the constant part were 80, then the part exchanged for necessary
labour would be = 20, and if this created 100% surplus time, the profit
on capital would be 20%. But if the capital were 200 with the same
relation between the constant and the variable part (i.e. 3/5 to 2/5),
then the total would be 280, which is 40 out of 100. In this case the
absolute amount of profit would rise from 40 to 80, but the relation
would remain at 40%. However, if out of the 200 the constant element
were 120 and the quantity of necessary labour 80, but the latter
increased by only 10%, i.e. 8, then the total sum would be = 208, i.e. a
profit of 4%; if it increased by only 5, then the total 205, i.e. 2
1/2%.

Now suppose that productivity doubles: then, if a wage of 40 gives 8
hours of necessary labour, the worker could now produce a whole day of
living labour in 4 hours. Surplus time would then increase by 1/3 (2/3
of a day to produce a whole day before, now 1/3). 2/3 of the product of
the working day would be surplus value, and if the hour of necessary
labour = 5 thalers (5 × 8 = 40), then he would now need only 5 × 4 = 20
thalers. For capital, then, a surplus gain of 20, i.e. 60 instead of 40.
At the end, 140, of which 60 = the constant value, 20 = the wage and 60
= the surplus gain; together, 140. The capitalist can then begin
production anew with 80 thalers of capital:

Let capitalist A on the same stage of old production invest his capital
of 140 in new production. Following the original proportions, he needs
3/5 for the invariable part of capital, i.e. 3 × 140/5 = 3 × 28 = 84,
leaving 56 for necessary labour. Before, he spent 40 on labour, now 56;
2/5 of 40 additionally. Then at the end, his capital = 84 + 56 + 56 =
196.

Capitalist B on the higher stage of production would similarly employ
his 140 thalers for new production. If out of a capital of 80 he needs
60 for invariable value and only 20 for labour, then out of a capital of
60 he needs 45 for invariable value and 15 for labour; thus the total
would be = 60 + 20 +20 = 100 in the first and, secondly, 45 + 15 + 15 =
75. Thus his total yield is 175, while that of the first = 196. An
increase in the productivity of labour means nothing more than that the
same capital creates the same value with less labour, or that less
labour creates the same product with more capital. That less necessary
labour produces more surplus labour. The necessary labour is smaller in
relation to capital; for the process of its realization this is
obviously the same as: capital is larger in relation to the necessary
labour which it sets into motion; for the same capital sets more surplus
labour in motion, hence less necessary labour. *

* If it is postulated, as in our case, that the capital remains the
same, i.e. that both begin again with 140 thalers, then in the case of
the more productive capital, a larger part has to go to capital (i.e. to
its invariable part), while with the less productive capital, a larger
part to labour. The first capital of 140 thus sets into motion a
necessary labour of 56, and this necessary labour presupposes an
invariable part of 84 out of the total capital. The second sets labour
in the amount of 20 + 15 = 35 into motion, and an invariable capital of
60 + 45 = 105 (it further follows from what was developed earlier that
an increase in the force of production does not proportionately increase
value). In the first case, as already shown above, the absolute new
value is greater than in the second, because the mass of labour employed
is greater in relation to the invariable part; while in the second the
former is smaller, precisely because labour is more productive. However
(1) the difference between the new value of 60 in one case and 40 in the
other means that the first cannot begin production anew with the same
capital as the second; for a part of the new value on both sides has to
enter into circulation as an equivalent so that the capitalist can live,
and live from his capital. If both of them eat up 20 thalers then the
first begins anew with a capital of 120, the other also with 120 etc.
See above. Return to this whole matter again; [11] but the question of
the relation between the new value created by the increased force of
production and the new value created by absolute increases in labour
belongs in the chapter on _accumulation and profit_.

It is sometimes said about machinery, therefore, that it _saves labour_;
however, as Lauderdale correctly remarked, the mere saving of labour is
not the characteristic thing; [12] for, with the help of machinery,
human labour performs actions and creates things which without it would
be absolutely impossible of accomplishment. The latter concerns the use
value of machinery. What is characteristic is the _saving_ of necessary
labour and the creating of _surplus labour._ The higher productivity of
labour is expressed in the fact that capital has to buy a smaller amount
of necessary labour in order to create the same value and a greater
quantity of use values, or that less necessary labour creates the same
exchange value, realizes more material and a greater mass of use values.
Thus, _if the total value of the capital remains the same_, an increase
in the productive force means that the constant part of capital
(consisting of machinery and material) grows relative to the variable,
i.e. to the part of capital which is exchanged for living labour and
forms the wage fund. This means at the same time that a smaller quantity
of labour sets a larger quantity of capital in motion. If the _total
value of capital_ entering into the production process increases, then
the wage fund (this variable part of capital) must decrease
_relatively_, compared to the relation if the productivity of labour,
i.e. the relation of necessary to surplus labour, had remained the same.
Now let us assume in the above case that the capital of 100 is
agricultural capital. Then, 40 thalers for seeds, fertilizer etc.; 20
thalers instrument of labour, and 40 thalers wage labour, at the old
level of production. (Let these 40 thalers = 4 days of necessary
labour.) At the old production level, these create a total of 140. Now
let fertility double, owing to improvement either in the instrument or
in the fertilizer etc. In this case the product has to = 140 thalers
(given that the instrument is entirely consumed). Let fertility double,
so that the price of the necessary working day falls by half; so that
only 4 necessary half days of work (i.e. 2 whole ones) are necessary in
order to produce 8. 2 working days to produce 8 is the same as when 1/4
of each working day (3 hours) is required for necessary labour. Now,
instead of 40 thalers, the farmer has to spend only 20 for labour. Thus
at the end of the process the component parts of capital have changed;
from the original 40 for seed etc., which now have double the use value;
20 for instrument and 20 for labour (2 whole working days). Before the
relation of the constant part of capital to the variable = 60:40 = 3:2;
now 80:20 = 4:1. Looking at the whole capital, necessary labour was =
2/5; now 1/5. Now, if the farmer wants to continue to use labour in the
old relation, then by how much would his capital have to increase? Or –
in order to avoid the _nefarious presupposition_ that he continued to
operate with a constant capital of 60 and a wage fund of 40 – after a
doubling of productive force, which introduces false relations; *
because it presupposes that, despite the doubled force of production,
capital continued to operate with the same component parts, to employ
the same quantity of necessary labour without spending more for raw
material and instrument of labour; † then, therefore, productivity
doubles, so that he now needs to spend only 20 thalers on labour,
whereas he needed 40 before. (If it is given that 4 whole working days
were necessary, each = 10 thalers, in order to create a surplus of 4
whole working days, and if this surplus is provided for him by the
transformation of 40 thalers of cotton into yarn, then he now needs only
2 whole working days in order to create the same value, i.e. that of 8
working days; the value of the yarn expressed a surplus time of 4
working days before, now of 6. Or, each of the workers needed 6 hours of
necessary labour time before in order to create 12; now 3. Necessary
labour time was 12 × 4 = 48, or 4 days. In each of these days, the
surplus time was = 1/2 day (6 hours). It now amounts to only 12 × 2 = 24
or 2 days; 3 hours per day. In order to bring forth the surplus value,
each of the 4 workers would have to work 6 × 2 hours; i.e. 1 day; now he
needs to work only 3 × 2 hours; i.e. 1/2 day. Now, whether 4 work 1/2 a
day or 2 a whole (1) day is the same. The capitalist could dismiss 2
workers. He would even have to dismiss them, since a certain quantity of
cotton is only enough to make a certain quantity of yarn; thus he cannot
order 4 whole days of work any more, but only 4 half days. But if the
worker has to work 12 hours in order to obtain 3 hours, i.e. his
_necessary_ wage, then, if he works 6 hours, he will obtain only 1 1/2
hours of exchange value. But if he can live for 12 hours with 3 hours of
necessary labour, then with it he can live only 6 hours. Thus if all 4
workers were to be employed, each of the 4 could live only half a day;
i.e. the same capital cannot keep all 4 alive as _workers_, but only 2.
The capitalist could pay 4 out of the old fund for 4 half days of work;
then he would pay 2 too many and would make the workers a present of the
productive force; since he can use only 4 half days of living labour;
such ‘possibilities’ neither occur in practice, nor can we deal with
them here, where we are concerned with the relation of capital as such.)
Now 20 thalers of the capital of 100 are not directly employed in
production. The capitalist uses 40 thalers of raw material, 20 for
instrument, together 60 as before, but now only 20 thalers for labour (2
working days). Of the whole capital of 80 he uses 3/4 (60) for the
constant part and only 1/4 for labour. Then if he employs the remaining
20 in the same way, 3/4 for constant capital, 1/4 for labour; then 15
for the first, 5 for the second. Now since 1 working day = 10 thalers
(given), 5 would be only = 6 hours = 1/2 working day. With the new value
of 20, gained through productivity, capital could buy only 1/2 a working
day more, if it continues to realize itself in the same proportion. It
would have to grow threefold (namely, 60) (together with the 20 = 80) in
order to employ the 2 dismissed workers for the previous 2 full working
days. In the new relation, the capital uses 3/4 in constant capital in
order to employ 1/4 as wage fund.

* Although in the case e.g. of the farmer this is quite correct, if the
seasons bring a doubling of fertility, and correct for every
industrialist if the force of production doubles not in his branch, but
in the branch whose output he uses; i.e. if e.g. raw cotton cost 50%
less and grain (i.e. wages) and the instrument likewise; he would then
continue as before to spend 40 thalers for raw cotton, but in twice the
quantity, 20 for machinery, 40 for labour.

† Suppose cotton alone doubled in productivity, the machine remains the
same, then – this to be examined further.

Thus if 20 is the whole capital, 3/4 i.e. 15 constant and 1/4 labour
(i.e. 5) = 1/2 a working day.

With a whole capital of 4 × 20, hence 4 × 15 = 60 constant, hence 4 × 5
= 20 wages = 4/2 working days = 2 working days.

Therefore, if the productive force of labour doubles, so that a capital
of 60 thalers in raw materials and instrument now needs only 20 thalers
in labour (2 working days) for its realization, whereas it needed 100
before, then the total capital of 100 would have to grow to 160, or the
capital of 80 now being dealt with would have to double in order to
retain all the labour put out of work. But the doubling of productive
force creates a new capital of only 20 thalers = 1/2 of the labour time
employed earlier; and this is only enough to employ 1/2 a working day
additionally. Before the doubling of the productive force, the capital
was 100 and employed 4 working days (on the supposition that 2/5 = wage
fund of 40); now, when the wage fund has fallen to 1/5 of 100, to 20 = 2
working days (but to 1/4 of 80, the capital newly entering into the
realization process), it would have to rise to 160, by 60%, in order
still to be able to employ 4 working days as before. It can only employ
1/2 a new working day with the 20 thalers drawn from the increase in the
productive force, if the whole old capital continues operating. Before,
it employed with 100, 16/4 (4 days) working days; it could now employ
only 5/4. Therefore, when the force of production doubles, capital does
not need to double in order to set the same necessary labour into
motion, 4 working days; i.e. it does not need to rise to 200, but needs
to rise only by double the whole, minus the part deducted from the wage
fund. (100 − 20 = 80) × 2 = 160. (By contrast, the first capital, before
the increase in productive force, which divided 100 as 60 constant 40
wages (4 working days), in order to employ two additional days, would
need to grow from 100 to only 150; i.e. 3/5 constant capital (30) and
2/5 wage fund (20). If it is given that the working day doubles in both
cases, then the second would amount to 250 at the end, the first only
160.) Of the part of capital which is withdrawn from the wage fund owing
to the increase in the force of production, one part has to be
transformed again into raw material and instrument, another part is
exchanged for living labour; this can take place only in the proportions
between the different parts which are posited by the new productivity.
It can no longer take place in the old proportion, for the relation of
the wage fund to the constant fund has decreased. If the capital of 100
first used 2/5 for wage fund (40) and, owing to a doubling of productive
force, then used only 1/5 (20), then 1/5 of the capital has become free
(20 thalers); and the employed part, 80, uses only 1/4 as wage fund.
Thus, of the 20, similarly, only 5 thalers (1/2 working day). The whole
capital of 100 therefore now employs 2 1/2 working days; or, it would
have to grow to 160 in order to employ 4 again.

If the original capital had been 1,000, divided in the same way: 3/5
constant capital, 2/5 wage fund, then 600 + 400 (let 400 equal 40
working days; each working day = 10 thalers). Now double the productive
force of labour, i.e. only 20 working days required for the same product
(= 200 thalers), then the capital necessary to begin production anew
would be = 800; that is 600 + 200; 200 thalers would have been set free.
Employed in the same relation, then 3/4 for constant capital = 150 and
1/4 wages = 50. Thus, if the 1,000 thalers are employed in their
entirety, then now 750 constant + 250 wage fund = 1,000 thalers. But 250
wage fund would be = 25 working days (i.e. the new fund can employ
labour time only in the new relation, i.e. at 1/4; in order to employ
the entire labour time as before, it would have to _quadruple_). The
liberated capital of 200 would employ a wage fund of 50 = 5 working days
(1/4 of the liberated labour time). (The part of the labour fund
disconnected from capital is itself employed as capital at only 1/4 for
labour fund; i.e. precisely in the relation in which that part of the
new capital which is labour fund stands to the total sum of the
capital.) Thus in order to employ 20 working days (4 × 5 working days),
this fund would have to grow from 50 to 4 × 50 = 200; i.e. the liberated
part would have to grow from 200 to 600, i.e. triple; so that the entire
new capital would amount to 800. Then the total capital, 1,600; of this,
1,200 constant part and 400 labour fund. Thus if a capital of 1,000
originally contained a labour fund of 400 (40 working days), and if,
owing to a doubling of productive force, it now needs to employ a labour
fund of only 200 in order to buy _necessary_ labour, i.e. only 1/2 of
the previous labour; then the capital would have to grow by 600 in order
to employ all the previous labour in its entirety (in order to gain the
same amount of surplus time). It would have to be able to employ twice
the labour fund, i.e. 2 × 200 = 400; but, since the relation of the
labour fund to the total capital is now = 1/4, this requires a total
capital of 4 × 400 = 1,600. *

* The total capital which would be necessary in order to employ the old
labour time is therefore = _to the old labour fund multiplied by the
denominator_ of the fraction which now expresses the relation of the
labour fund to the new total capital. If the doubling of productive
force has reduced the latter to 1/4, then multiplied by 4; if to 1/3,
then multiplied by 3. If the productive force has doubled, then
necessary labour, and thereby the labour fund, is reduced to 1/2 of its
earlier value; but this makes up 1/4 relative to the new total capital
of 800 or 1/5 relative to the old total capital of 1,000. _Or the new
total capital is_ = 2 × _the old capital minus the liberated part of the
labour fund_; (1,000 − 200) × 2 = 800 × 2 = 1,600. The new total capital
expresses the total sum of constant and variable capital required in
order to employ half of the old labour time (1/3, 1/4, 1/_x_, etc,
depending on whether the force of production increased 3 ×, 4 ×, _x_ ×
); 2 × then the capital required to employ all of it (or 3 ×, 4 ×, etc.,
depending on the relation in which the productive force has grown). The
original relation of the parts of capital must here always be given
(_technologically_); on this depends, e.g., in what ratios the
multiplication of productive force expresses itself as a division of
_necessary labour._

Or, which is the same thing, it is = 2 × _the new capital_ which owing
to the new productive force replaces the old in production (800 × 2)
(thus if the productive force had quadrupled, quintupled etc. = 4 ×, 5 ×
_the new capital_ etc. If the force of production has doubled, then
_necessary labour_ is reduced to 1/2; likewise the labour fund. Thus if
it amounted, as in the above case of the old capital of 1,000, to 400,
i.e. 2/5 of the total capital, then, afterwards, 1/5 or 200. This
relation, by which it is reduced, is the liberated part of the labour
fund = 1/5 of the old capital = 200. 1/5 of the old = 1/4 of the new.
The new capital is = to the old + 3/5 of the same. These trivia more
closely later etc.)

Given the same original relations between the parts of the capital and
the same increase in the productive force, the largeness or smallness of
the capital is completely irrelevant for the general theses. Quite
another question is whether, when capital grows _larger_, the relations
remain the same (but this belongs under accumulation). But, given this,
we see how an increase in the force of production changes the relations
between the component parts of capital. If in both cases 3/5 was
originally constant and 2/5 labour fund, then doubling the productive
force acts in the same way on a capital of 100 as on one of 1,000. (The
word _labour fund_ is here used only for convenience’s sake; we have not
yet developed capital in this _specificity_ [_Bestimmtheit_]. So far two
parts; the one exchanged for commodities (material and instrument), the
other for labour capacity.) (The _new capital_, i.e. the part of the old
capital which represents its _function_, is = the old minus the
liberated part of the labour fund; this liberated part, however, = the
fraction which used to express necessary labour (or, same thing, the
labour fund) divided by the multiplier of the productive force. Thus, if
the old capital = 1,000 and the fraction expressing necessary labour or
the labour fund = 2/5, and if the force of production doubles, then the
new capital which represents the function of the old = 800, i.e. 2/5 of
the old capital = 400; this divided by 2, the multiplier of productive
force, = 2/10 = 1/5 = 200. Then the new capital = 800 and the liberated
part of the labour fund = 200.)

We have seen that under these conditions a capital of 100 thalers has to
grow to 160, and a capital of 1,000 to 1,600, in order to retain the
same labour time (of 4 or 40 working days) etc.; both have to grow by
60%, i.e. 3/5 of themselves (of the old capital), in order to be able to
re-employ the liberated labour time (in the first case 20 thalers, in
the second 200) of 1/5 – the liberated labour fund – as such.

_Percentage of total capital can express very different relations. – Capital (like property) rests on_ productivity of labour

<_Notabene_. We saw above that identical percentages of the total
capital can express very different relations in which capital creates
its surplus value, i.e. posits surplus labour, relative or absolute.
[13] If the relation between the invariable value-part of capital and
the variable part (that exchanged for labour) such that the latter = 1/2
the total capital (i.e. capital 100 = 50 (constant) + 50 (variable),
then the part exchanged for labour would have to increase by only 50% in
order to yield 25% on the capital; i.e. 50 + 50 (+ 25) = 125; while in
the above example 75 + 25 (+ 25) = 125; i.e. the part exchanged for
living labour increases by 100% in order to yield 25% on the capital.
Here we see that, if the relations remain the same, the same percentage
on the total capital holds no matter how big or small it may be; i.e. if
the relation of the labour fund to the total capital remains the same;
thus, above, 1/4. Thus: 100 yields 125, 80 yields 100, 1,000 yields
1,250, 800 yields 1,000, 1,600 yields 2,000 etc., always = 25%. If
capitals whose component parts are in different relations, including
therefore their forces of production, nevertheless yield the same
percentages on total capital, then the real surplus value has to be very
different in the different branches.>

<Thus the example is correct, the productive force compared under the
same conditions with the same capital _before_ the rise in productive
force. Let a capital of 100 employ constant value 50, labour fund = 50.
Let the fund increase by 50%, i.e. 1/2; then the total product = 125.
Let the labour fund of 50 thalers employ 10 working days, pay 5 thalers
per day. Since the new value is 1/2, the surplus time has to be = 5
working days; i.e. the worker who needed to work only 10 working days in
order to live for 15 has to work 15 for the capitalist in order to live
for 15; and his surplus labour of 5 days constitutes capital’s surplus
value. Expressed in hours, if the work day = 12 hours, then surplus
labour = 6 per day. Thus in 10 days or 120 hours, the worker works 60
hours = 5 days too many. But now with the doubling of productivity,
relations within the 100 thalers would be 75 and 25, i.e. the same
capital now needs to employ only 5 workers in order to create the same
value of 125; the 5 working days then = 10; doubled; i.e. 5 working days
are paid, 10 produced. The worker would need to work only 5 days in
order to live 10 (before the increase in productive force he had to work
10 to live 15; thus, if he worked 5, he could live only 7 1/2); but he
has to work 10 for the capitalist in order to live 10; the latter thus
makes a profit of 5 days; 1 day per day; or, expressed in days, the
worker had to work 1/2 to live 1 before (i.e. 6 hours to live 12); now
he needs to work only 1/4 to live 1 (i.e. 3 hours). If he worked a whole
day, he could live 2; if he worked 12 hours, 24; if he worked 6, 12
hours. But he now has to work 12 hours to live 12. He would need to work
only 1/2 in order to live 1; but he has to work 2 × 1/2 = 1 to live 1.
In the old state of the productive force, he had to work 10 days to live
15; or 12 hours to live 18; or 1 hour to live 1 1/2, or 8 hours to live
12, i.e. 2/3 of a day to live 3/3. But he has to work 3/3 to live 2/3,
i.e. 1/3 too much. The doubling of the productive force increases the
relation of surplus time from 1:1 1/2 (i.e. 50%) to 1:2 (i.e. 100%). In
the earlier labour time relation: he needed 8 to live 12, i.e. 2/ 3 of
the whole day was necessary labour; he now needs only 1/2, i.e. 6, to
live 12. That is why capital now employs 5 workers instead of 10. If the
10 (cost 50) produced 75 before, then now the 25, 50: i.e. the former
only 50%, the second 100. The workers work 12 hours as before; but in
the first case capital bought 10 working days, now merely 5; because the
force of production doubled, the 5 produce 5 days of surplus labour;
because in the first case 10 working days yielded only 5 days of surplus
labour; now, with the force of production doubled, i.e. risen from 50%
to 100% – 5, 5; in the first case 120 working hours (= 10 working days)
produce 180; in the second, 60, 60; i.e. in the first case, the surplus
time is 1/3 of the whole day (50% of necessary labour) (i.e. 4 hours out
of 12; necessary time 8); in the second case surplus time is 1/2 the
whole day (100% of necessary labour) (i.e. 6 hours out of 12; necessary
time 6); hence the 10 days yielded 5 days of surplus time (surplus
labour) in the first case, and in the second the 5 yield 5. Thus
relative surplus time has doubled; relative to the first relation it
grew by only 1/2 compared to 1/3; i.e. by 16 4/6%.>

        constant       variable    
  ----- ---------- --- ---------- ---------------------
  100   60         +   40         (original relation)
  100   75         +   25         (+ 25) = 125 (25%)
  160   120        +   40         (+ 40) = 200 (25%)

Since surplus labour, or surplus time, is the presupposition of capital,
it therefore also rests on the fundamental presupposition that there
exists a surplus above the labour time necessary for the maintenance and
reproduction of the individual; that the individual e.g. needs to work
only 6 hours in order to live one day, or 1 day in order to live 2 etc.
With the development of the forces of production, necessary labour time
decreases and surplus labour time thereby increases. Or, as well, that
one individual can work for 2 etc. (‘_Wealth is disposable_ time and
nothing more. … If the whole labour of a country were sufficient only to
raise the support of the whole population, there would be no _surplus
labour_, consequently nothing that can be allowed to accumulate as
capital . . . Truly wealthy a nation, if there is _no interest_ or if
the working day is 6 hours rather than 12 … Whatever may be _due_ to the
capitalist, he can only receive the _surplus labour_ of the labourer;
for the labourer must live.’ (_The Source and Remedy of the National
Difficulties._) [14]

‘_Property_. Origin in the productivity of labour. If one can produce
only enough for one, everyone worker; there can be no property. When one
man’s labour can maintain five, there will be four idle men for one
employed in production. Property grows from the improvement in the mode
of production … The growth of the property, this greater ability to
maintain idle men and unproductive industry = capital … machinery itself
can seldom be applied with success to abridge the labours of an
individual: _more time would be lost in its construction than could be
saved by_ _its application. It is only really useful when it acts on
great masses, when a single machine can assist the labours of
thousands._ It is accordingly in the most populous countries where there
are most idle men that it is always most abundant. It is not called into
action by scarcity of men, but by the facility with which they are
brought together … Not 1/4 of the English population provides everything
that is consumed by all. Under William the Conqueror for example the
amount of those directly participating in production much greater
relative to the idle men.’ (Ravenstone, IX, 32.) [15]

Just as capital on one side creates surplus labour, surplus labour is at
the same time equally the presupposition of the existence of capital.
The whole development of wealth rests on the creation of disposable
time. The relation of _necessary_ labour time to the _superfluous_ (such
it is, initially, from the standpoint of necessary labour) changes with
the different stages in the development of the productive forces. In the
less productive [16] stages of exchange, people exchange nothing more
than their _superfluous labour time_; this is the measure of their
exchange, which therefore extends only to superfluous products. In
production resting on capital, the existence of _necessary_ labour time
is conditional on the creation of _superfluous_ labour time. In the
lowest stages of production, firstly, few human needs have yet been
produced, and thus few to be satisfied. Necessary labour is therefore
restricted, not because labour is productive, but because it is not very
necessary; and secondly, in all stages of production there is a certain
common quality [_Gemeinsamkeit_] of labour, _social_ character of the
same, etc. The force of social production develops later etc. (Return to
this.) [17]

_Increase of surplus labour time. Increase of simultaneous working days_ (Population). _(Population can increase in proportion as_ necessary labour time _becomes smaller, i.e. the time required to produce living labour capacities decreases.) – Surplus capital and surplus population. – Creation of free time for society_

_Surplus time_ is the excess of the working day above that part of it
which we call _necessary_ labour time; it exists secondly as the
multiplication of _simultaneous working days_, i.e. of the _labouring
population._ (It can also be created – but this is mentioned here only
in passing, belongs in the chapter on wage labour – by means of forcible
prolongation of the working day beyond its natural limits; by the
addition of women and children to the labouring population.) The first
relation, that of the surplus time and the necessary time in the day,
can be and is modified by the development of the productive forces, so
that necessary labour is restricted to a constantly smaller fractional
part. The same thing then holds relatively for the population. A
labouring population of, say, 6 million can be regarded as one working
day of 6 × 12, i.e. 72 million hours: so that the same laws applicable
here.

It is a law of capital, as we saw, to create surplus labour, disposable
time; it can do this only by setting _necessary labour_ in motion – i.e.
entering into exchange with the worker. It is its tendency, therefore,
to create as much labour as possible; just as it is equally its tendency
to reduce necessary labour to a minimum. It is therefore equally a
tendency of capital to increase the labouring population, as well as
constantly to posit a part of it as surplus population – population
which is useless until such time as capital can utilize it. (Hence the
correctness of the theory of surplus population and surplus capital.) It
is equally a tendency of capital to make human labour (relatively)
superfluous, so as to drive it, as human labour, towards infinity. Value
is nothing but objectified labour, and surplus value (realization of
capital) is only the excess above that part of objectified labour which
is necessary for the reproduction of labouring capacity. But labour as
such is and remains the presupposition, and surplus labour exists only
in relation with the necessary, hence only in so far as the latter
exists. Capital must therefore constantly posit necessary labour in
order to posit surplus labour; it has to multiply it (namely the
_simultaneous_ working days) in order to multiply the surplus; but at
the same time it must suspend them as necessary, in order to posit them
as surplus labour. As regards the single working day, the process is of
course simple: (1) to lengthen it up to the limits of natural
possibility; (2) to shorten the necessary part of it more and more (i.e.
to increase the productive forces without limit). But the working day,
regarded spatially – time itself regarded as space – is _many working
days alongside one another_. The more working days capital can enter
into exchange with at once, during which it exchanges _objectified for
living_ _labour_, the greater its realization _at once_. It can leap
over the _natural_ limit formed by one individual’s living, working day,
_at a given stage in the development of the forces of production_ (and
it does not in itself change anything that this stage is changing) only
by positing _another_ working day alongside the _first_ at the same time
– by the spatial addition _of more simultaneous working days_. E.g. I
can drive the surplus labour of A no higher than 3 hours; but if I add
the days of B, C, D etc., then it becomes 12 hours. In place of a
surplus time of 3, I have created one of 12. This is why capital
solicits the increase of population; and the very process by means of
which necessary labour is reduced makes it possible to put new necessary
labour (and hence surplus labour) to work. (I.e. the _production of
workers_ becomes cheaper, more workers can be produced in the same time,
in proportion as _necessary labour time_ becomes smaller or the time
required for the _production of living labour capacity_ becomes
relatively smaller. These are identical statements.) (This still without
regard to the fact that the increase in population increases the
productive force of labour, since it makes possible a greater division
and combination of labour etc. The increase of population is a _natural
force_ of labour, for which nothing is paid. From this standpoint, we
use the term _natural force_ to refer to the _social force_. All
_natural forces of social labour_ are themselves historical products.)
It is, on the other side, a tendency of capital – just as in the case of
the single working day – to reduce the many simultaneous necessary
working days (which, as regards their value, can be taken as _one_
working day) to the minimum, i.e. to posit as many as possible of them
as _not necessary_. Just as in the previous case of the single working
day it was a tendency of capital to reduce the necessary working hours,
so now the necessary working days are reduced in relation to the total
amount of objectified labour time. (If 6 are necessary to produce 12
superfluous working hours, then capital works towards the reduction of
these 6 to 4. Or 6 working days can be regarded as one working day of 72
hours; if necessary labour time is reduced by 24 hours, then two days of
necessary labour fall away – i.e. 2 workers.) At the same time, the
newly created surplus capital can be realized as such only by being
again exchanged for living labour. Hence the tendency of capital
simultaneously to increase the _labouring population_ as well as to
reduce constantly its _necessary_ part (constantly to posit a part of it
as reserve). And the increase of population itself the chief means for
reducing the necessary part. _At bottom this is only an application of
the relation of the single working day_. Here already lie, then, all the
contradictions which modern population theory expresses as such, but
does not grasp. Capital, as the positing of surplus labour, is equally
and in the same moment the positing and the not-positing of necessary
labour; it exists only in so far as necessary labour both exists and
does not exist. *

If the relation of the necessary working days to the total number of
objectified working days was = 9:12 (hence surplus labour = 1/4), then
the striving of capital is to reduce it to 6:9 (i.e. 2/3, hence surplus
labour = 1/3). (Develop this more closely later; still, the major basic
traits here, where we are dealing with the general concept of capital.)

* It does not belong here, but can already be recalled here, that the
creation of surplus labour on the one side corresponds to the creation
of minus-labour, relative idleness (or _not-productive_ labour at best),
on the other. This goes without saying as regards capital itself; but
holds then also for the classes with which it shares; hence of the
paupers, flunkeys, lickspittles etc. living from the surplus product, in
short, the whole train of retainers; the part of the _servant_
[_dienenden_] class which lives not from capital but from revenue.
Essential difference between this _servant_ class and the _working_
class. In relation to the whole of society, the creation of _disposable
time_ is then also creation of time for the production of science, art
etc. The course of social development is by no means that because one
individual has satisfied his need he then proceeds to create a
superfluity for himself; but rather because one individual or class of
individuals is forced to work more than required for the satisfaction of
its need – because _surplus labour_ is on one side, therefore not-labour
and surplus wealth are posited on the other. In reality the development
of wealth exists only in these opposites [_Gegensätze_]: in
potentiality, its development is the possibility of the suspension of
these opposites. [18] Or because an individual can satisfy _his own_
need only by simultaneously satisfying the need of and providing a
surplus above that for _another_ individual. This brutal under slavery.
Only under the conditions of wage labour does it lead to _industry,
industrial_ labour. – Malthus therefore quite consistent when, along
with surplus labour and surplus capital, he raises the demand for
surplus idlers, consuming without producing, or the necessity of waste,
luxury, lavish spending etc.

 

_Transition from the process of the production of capital into the process of circulation. – Devaluation of capital itself owing to increase of productive forces. (Competition.)_ (Capital _as unity and contradiction of production process and realization process.) Capital as barrier to production. – Overproduction. (Demand by the workers themselves.) – Barriers to capitalist production_

We have now seen how, in the _realization process,_ capital has (1)
maintained its value by means of exchange itself (exchange that is, with
living labour); (2) increased, created a surplus value. There now
appears, as the result of this unity of the process of production and
the process of realization, the product of the process, i.e. capital
itself, emerging as product from the process whose presupposition it was
– as a product which is a value, or, _value_ itself appears as the
product of the process, and specifically a _higher value,_ because it
contains more objectified labour than the value which formed the point
of departure. This value as such is _money._ However, this is the case
only _in itself;_ it is not posited as such; that which is _posited_ at
the outset, which is on hand, is a commodity with a certain (ideal)
price, i.e. which exists only ideally [_ideell_] as a certain sum of
money, and which first has to _realize_ itself [_sich realisieren_] as
such in the exchange process, hence has to re-enter the process of
simple circulation in order to be posited as _money._ We now come
therefore to the _third side of the process_ in which capital is posited
as such.

(3) Looked at precisely, that is, the _realization process_ of capital –
and money becomes capital only through the realization process – appears
at the same time as its _devaluation process_ [_Entwertungsprozess_],
its demonetization. And this in two respects. First, to the extent that
capital does not increase absolute labour time but rather decreases the
relative, necessary labour time, by increasing the force of production,
to that extent does it reduce the costs of its own production – in so
far as it was presupposed as a certain sum of commodities, reduces its
exchange value: one part of the capital on hand is constantly devalued
owing to a decrease in the costs of production at which it can be
_reproduced;_ not because of a decrease in the amount of labour
objectified in it, but because of a decrease in the amount of living
labour which it is henceforth necessary to objectify in this specific
product. This constant devaluation of the _existing_ capital does not
belong here, since it already presupposes capital as completed. It is
merely to be noted here in order to indicate how later developments are
already contained in the general concept of capital. Belongs in the
doctrine of the concentration and competition of capitals. – The
_devaluation_ being dealt with here is this, that capital has made the
transition from the form of money into the form of a _commodity,_ of a
product, which has a certain price, which is to be _realized_. In its
money form it existed as _value._ It now _exists_ as product, and only
ideally as price; but not as _value as_ such. In order to _realize_
itself, i.e. to maintain and to multiply itself as value, it would first
have to make the transition from the form of money into that of use
values (raw material – instrument – wages); but it would thereby lose
the _form_ of value; and it now has to enter anew into circulation in
order to posit this form of general wealth anew. The capitalist now
enters the process of circulation not simply as one engaged in exchange,
but as _producer,_ and the others engaged in exchange are, relative to
him, _consumers._ They must exchange money in order to obtain his
commodity for their consumption, while he exchanges his product to
obtain their money. Suppose that this process breaks down – and the
separation by itself implies the possibility of such a miscarriage in
the individual case – then the capitalist’s money has been transformed
into a worthless product, and has not only not gained a new value, but
also lost its original value. But whether this is so or not, in any case
devaluation forms one moment of the realization process; which is
already simply implied in the fact that the product of the process in
its immediate form is not _value,_ but first has to enter anew into
circulation in order to be realized as such. Therefore, while capital is
reproduced as value and new value in the production process, it is at
the same time posited as _not-value,_ as something which first has to be
_realized as value by means of exchange._ The three processes of which
capital forms the unity are external; they are separate in time and
space. As such, the transition from one into the other, i.e. their unity
as regards the individual capitalists, is accidental. Despite their
_inner unity,_ they exist _independently_ alongside one another, each as
the presupposition of the other. Regarded broadly and as a whole, this
inner unity must necessarily maintain itself to the extent that the
whole of production rests on capital, and it must therefore realize all
the necessary moments of its self-formation, and must contain the
determinants necessary to make these moments real. But at the point we
have reached so far, capital still does not appear as the determinant of
circulation (exchange) itself but merely as one moment of the latter,
and it appears to stop being capital just at the point where it enters
into circulation. As a _commodity,_ capital now shares the fate of
commodities in general; it is a matter of accident whether or not it is
exchanged for money, whether its _price_ is realized or not.

In the production process itself – where capital continued to be
presupposed as value – its _realization_ appeared totally dependent
solely on the relation of itself as objectified labour to living labour;
i.e. on the relation of capital to wage labour. But now, as a product,
as a commodity, it appears dependent on circulation, which lies outside
this process. (In fact, as we have seen, it returns into it as its
ground, but also and equally emerges from it again.) [19] As a
commodity, it must be (1) a use value and, as such, an object of need,
object of consumption; (2) it must be exchanged for its equivalent – in
money. The new value can be realized only through a sale.

If it contained objectified labour at a price of 100 thalers before, and
now at a price of 110 (the price here merely an expression, in money, of
the amount of objectified labour), then this has to be demonstrated
through the exchange of the labour objectified in the newly produced
commodity for 110 thalers. The product is devalued [_entwertet_]
initially in so far as it must be exchanged for money at all, in order
to obtain its form as value again. Inside the production process,
realization appeared totally identical with the production of surplus
labour (the objectification of surplus time), and hence appeared to have
no _bounds_ other than those partly presupposed and partly posited
within this process itself, but which are always posited within it as
_barriers_ to be forcibly overcome. There now appear barriers to it
which lie _outside_ it. To begin with, even on an entirely superficial
inspection, the commodity is an exchange value only in so far as it is
at the same time a _use value,_ i.e. an object of consumption (still
entirely irrelevant here, what kind of consumption); it ceases to be an
exchange value when it ceases to be a use value (since it does not yet
exist as money again, but rather still in a specific mode of existence
coinciding with its natural quality). Its first barrier, then, is
_consumption itself –_ the _need for it._ (Given the present
presuppositions, there is no basis whatever for speaking of ineffective,
_non-paying needs;_ i.e. a need which does not itself possess a
commodity or money to give in exchange.) Then, secondly, there has to be
an equivalent for it, and, since circulation was presupposed at the
outset as a constant magnitude – as having a given volume – but since,
on the other hand, capital has created a new value in the production
process, it seems indeed as if no equivalent were available for it.
Thus, by emerging from the production process and re-entering
circulation, capital (a) as _production,_ appears to encounter a barrier
in the available magnitude of _consumption –_ of _consumption capacity._
As a specific use value, its quantity is irrelevant up to a certain
point; then, however, at a certain level – since it satisfies only a
specific need – it ceases to be required for consumption. As a
_specific, one-sided, qualitative_ use value, e.g. grain, its quantity
itself is irrelevant only up to a certain level; it is required only in
a specific quantity; i.e. in a certain _measure._ This measure, however,
is given partly in its quality as use value – its _specific_ usefulness,
applicability – partly in the number of individuals engaged in exchange
who have a need for this specific consumption. The number of consumers
multiplied by the magnitude of their need for this _specific_ product.
Use value in itself does not have the boundlessness of value as such.
Given objects can be consumed as objects of needs only up to a certain
level. For example: No more than a certain amount of grain is consumed
etc. Hence, as _use value,_ the product contains a barrier – precisely
the barrier consisting of the need for it – which, however, is measured
not by the need of the producers but by the total need of all those
engaged in exchange. Where the need for a certain use value ceases, it
ceases to be a use value. It is measured as a use value by the need for
it. But as soon is it ceases to be a use value, it ceases to be an
object of circulation (in so far as it is not money). (b) As _new value_
and as _value_ as such, however, it seems to encounter a barrier in the
magnitude of _available equivalents,_ primarily money, not as medium of
circulation but as money. The surplus value (distinct, obviously, from
the original value) requires a surplus equivalent. This now appears as a
second barrier.

(c) Money – i.e. wealth as such, i.e. wealth existing in and because of
the exchange for _alien objectified labour –_ originally appeared to
collapse into itself [_in sich zusammenzufallen_] to the extent that it
did not proceed to the exchange for _alien living labour,_ i.e. to the
production process. Circulation was incapable of renewing itself from
within itself. At the same time, the production process now appears to
be in a fix, in as much as it is not able to make the transition into
the process of circulation. Capital, as production resting on wage
labour, presupposes circulation as the necessary condition and moment of
the entire motion. This specific form of production presupposes this
specific form of exchange which finds its expression in the circulation
of money. In order to renew itself, the entire product has to be
transformed into money; not as in earlier stages of production, where
exchange is by no means concerned with production in its totality, but
only with superfluous production and superfluous products.

These are, then, the contradictions which present themselves of their
own accord to a simple, objective, non-partisan view. How they are
constantly suspended in the system of production resting on capital, but
also constantly created again – and are suspended only by force
(although this suspension appears up to a certain point merely as a
quiet equilibration) – this is another question. The important thing at
present is to take note of the existence of these contradictions. All
the contradictions of circulation come to life again in a new form. The
product as use value is in contradiction with itself as value; i.e. in
as much as it exists in a specific quality, as a specific thing, as a
product of specific natural properties, as a substance of need in
contradiction with its substance as value, which it possesses
exclusively on account of its being _objectified labour._ But this time,
this contradiction is posited not merely as it was in circulation, as a
_merely formal difference_; rather the quality of being measured by use
value is here firmly determined as the quality of being measured by the
total requirement for this product by all those engaged in exchange –
i.e. by the amount of total consumption. The latter here appears as
_measure_ for it as use value and hence also as _exchange value._ In
simple circulation it had simply to be transposed from the form of a
particular use value into the form of exchange value. Its barrier then
appeared only in the fact that, [coming] from circulation, it existed in
a particular form owing to its _natural composition,_ rather than in the
value form in which it could be exchanged for all other commodities
directly. What is posited now is that the _measure_ of its availability
is given in its _natural composition_ itself. In order to be transposed
into the general form, the use value has to be present in a limited and
specific quantity; a _quantity_ whose _measure_ does not lie in the
amount of _labour objectified in it,_ but arises from its _nature as use
value,_ in particular, _use value for others._ At the same time, the
previous contradiction, that money for-itself [_das für sich seiende
Geld_] had to proceed to exchange itself for living labour, now appears
even greater, in as much as the surplus money, in order to exist as
such, or the surplus value, has to exchange itself for surplus value.
Hence, as value, it encounters its barrier in alien production, just as,
as use value, its barrier is alien consumption; in the latter, its
measure is the amount of need for the specific product, in the former,
the amount of _objectified labour_ existing in circulation. The
indifference of value as such towards use value is thereby brought into
just as false a position [_Position_] as are, on the other side, the
substance of value and its measure as objectified labour in general. *

* The transition to the relation of supply, demand, prices cannot be
made yet, as their development proper presupposes capital. Should not
demand and, supply, in so far as they are abstract categories and do not
yet express any particular economic relations, perhaps be examined
already together with simple circulation or production?

The main point here – where we are concerned with the general concept of
capital – is that it is this _unity of production and realization,_ not
_immediately_ but only as a _process,_ which is linked to certain
conditions, and, as it appeared, _external_ conditions. *

* We saw earlier that the capital realization process presupposes the
prior development of the _simple production process._ [20] This will be
the case with _demand and supply_ as well, to the extent that simple
exchange presupposes a need for the product. The (direct) producer’s
_own_ need as the need for others’ demand. In the course of this
development itself it will be seen what has to be presupposed to it, and
all this is then to be thrown into the first chapters.

The creation by capital of _absolute surplus value –_ more objectified
labour – is conditional upon an expansion, specifically a constant
expansion, of the sphere of circulation. The _surplus value_ created at
one point requires the creation of surplus value at _another_ point, for
which it may be exchanged; if only, initially, the production of more
gold and silver, more money, so that, if surplus value cannot directly
become capital again, it may exist in the form of money as the
possibility of new capital. A precondition of production based on
capital is therefore _the production of a constantly widening sphere of
circulation,_ whether the sphere itself is directly expanded or whether
_more points within it are created as points of production._ While
circulation appeared at first as a constant magnitude, it here appears
as a moving magnitude, being expanded by production itself. Accordingly,
it already appears as a moment of production itself. Hence, just as
capital has the tendency on one side to create ever more surplus labour,
so it has the complementary tendency to create more points of exchange;
i.e., here, seen from the standpoint of _absolute_ surplus value or
surplus labour, to summon up more surplus labour as complement to
itself; i.e. at bottom, to propagate production based on capital, or the
mode of production corresponding to it. The tendency to create the
_world market_ is directly given in the concept of capital itself. Every
limit appears as a barrier to be overcome. Initially, to subjugate every
moment of production itself to exchange and to suspend the production of
direct use values not entering into exchange, i.e. precisely to posit
production based on capital in place of earlier modes of production,
which appear primitive [_naturwüchsig_] from its standpoint. _Commerce_
no longer appears here as a function taking place between independent
productions for the exchange of their excess, but rather as an
essentially all-embracing presupposition and moment of production
itself. *

* Of course, all production aimed at direct use value decreases the
number of those engaged in exchange, as well as the sum of exchange
values thrown into circulation, and above all the production of surplus
values. Hence the tendency of capital (1) continually to enlarge the
periphery of circulation; (2) to transform it at all points into
production spurred on by capital. [21]

On the other side, the production of _relative surplus value,_ i.e.
production of surplus value based on the increase and development of the
productive forces, requires the production of new consumption; requires
that the consuming circle within circulation expands as did the
productive circle previously. Firstly quantitative expansion of existing
consumption; secondly: creation of new needs by propagating existing
ones in a wide circle; _thirdly:_ production of _new_ needs and
discovery and creation of new use values. In other words, so that the
surplus labour gained does not remain a merely quantitative surplus, but
rather constantly increases the circle of qualitative differences within
labour (hence of surplus labour), makes it more diverse, more internally
differentiated. For example, if, through a doubling of productive force,
a capital of 50 can now do what a capital of 100 did before, so that a
capital of 50 and the necessary labour corresponding to it become free,
then, for the capital and labour which have been set free, a new,
qualitatively different branch of production must be created, which
satisfies and brings forth a new need. The value of the old industry is
preserved by the creation of the fund for a new one in which the
relation of capital and labour posits itself in a _new_ form. Hence
exploration of all of nature in order to discover new, useful qualities
in things; universal exchange of the products of all alien climates and
lands; new (artificial) preparation of natural objects, by which they
are given new use values. * The exploration of the earth in all
directions, to discover new things of use as well as new useful
qualities of the old; such as new qualities of them as raw materials
etc.; the development, hence, of the natural sciences to their highest
point; likewise the discovery, creation and satisfaction of new needs
arising from society itself; the cultivation of all the qualities of the
social human being, production of the same in a form as rich as possible
in needs, because rich in qualities and relations – production of this
being as the most total and universal possible social product, for, in
order to take gratification in a many-sided way, he must be capable of
many pleasures [_genussfähig_], hence cultured to a high degree – is
likewise a condition of production founded on capital. This creation of
new branches of production, i.e. of qualitatively new surplus time, is
not merely the division of labour, but is rather the creation, separate
from a given production, of labour with a new use value; the development
of a constantly expanding and more comprehensive system of different
kinds of labour, different kinds of production, to which a constantly
expanding and constantly enriched system of needs corresponds.

* The role played by _luxury_ in antiquity in contrast to its role among
the moderns, to be alluded to later.

Thus, just as production founded on capital creates universal
industriousness on one side – i.e. surplus labour, value-creating labour
– so does it create on the other side a system of general exploitation
of the natural and human qualities, a system of general utility,
utilizing science itself just as much as all the physical and mental
qualities, while there appears nothing _higher in itself,_ nothing
legitimate for itself, outside this circle of social production and
exchange. Thus capital creates the bourgeois society, and the universal
appropriation of nature as well as of the social bond itself by the
members of society. Hence the great civilizing influence of capital; its
production of a stage of society in comparison to which all earlier ones
appear as mere _local_ _developments_ of humanity and as
_nature-idolatry._ For the first time, nature becomes purely an object
for humankind, purely a matter of utility; ceases to be recognized as a
power for itself; and the theoretical discovery of its autonomous laws
appears merely as a ruse so as to subjugate it under human needs,
whether as an object of consumption or as a means of production. In
accord with this tendency, capital drives beyond national barriers and
prejudices as much as beyond nature worship, as well as all traditional,
confined, complacent, encrusted satisfactions of present needs, and
reproductions of old ways of life. It is destructive towards all of
this, and constantly revolutionizes it, tearing down all the barriers
which hem in the development of the forces of production, the expansion
of needs, the all-sided development of production, and the exploitation
and exchange of natural and mental forces.

But from the fact that capital posits every such limit as a barrier and
hence gets _ideally_ beyond it, it does not by any means follow that it
has _really_ overcome it, and, since every such barrier contradicts its
character, its production moves in contradictions which are constantly
overcome but just as constantly posited. Furthermore. The universality
towards which it irresistibly strives encounters barriers in its own
nature, which will, at a certain stage of its development, allow it to
be recognized as being itself the greatest barrier to this tendency, and
hence will drive towards its own suspension.

Those economists who, like Ricardo, conceived production as directly
identical with the self-realization of capital – and hence were heedless
of the barriers to consumption or of the existing barriers of
circulation itself, to the extent that it must represent counter-values
at all points, having in view only the development of the forces of
production and the growth of the industrial population – supply without
regard to demand – have therefore grasped the positive essence of
capital more correctly and deeply than those who, like Sismondi,
emphasized the barriers of consumption and of the available circle of
counter-values, although the latter has better grasped the limited
nature of production based on capital, its negative one-sidedness. The
former more its universal tendency, the latter its particular
restrictedness. The whole dispute as to whether _overproduction_ is
possible and necessary in capitalist production revolves around the
point whether the process of the realization of capital within
production directly posits its realization in circulation; whether its
realization posited in the _production process_ is its _real_
realization. Ricardo himself, of course, has a suspicion that the
_exchange value_ of a commodity is not a value apart from exchange, and
that it proves itself as a value only in exchange; but he regards the
barriers which production thereby encounters as accidental, as barriers
which are overcome. He therefore conceives the overcoming of such
barriers as being in the essence of capital, although he often becomes
absurd in the exposition of that view; while Sismondi, by contrast,
emphasizes not only the encounter with the barriers, but their creation
by capital itself, and has a vague intuition that they must lead to its
breakdown. He therefore wants to put up barriers to production, from the
outside, through custom, law etc., which of course, as merely external
and artificial barriers, would necessarily be demolished by capital. On
the other side, Ricardo and his entire school never understood the
really _modern crises,_ in which this contradiction of capital
discharges itself in great thunderstorms which increasingly threaten it
as the foundation of society and of production itself.

The attempts made from the orthodox economic standpoint to deny that
there is _general overproduction_ at any given moment are indeed
childish. Either, in order to rescue production _based on capital_ (see
e.g. MacCulloch), [22] all its specific qualities are ignored and their
specific character as forms omitted, and capital is conceived as its
inverse, as simple production for _immediate use value._ Totally
abstracts away the essential relations. In fact, in order to cleanse it
of contradictions, it is virtually dropped and negated. [23] – Or, like
e.g. Mill, more perceptively (copied from the dull Say): _supply_ and
_demand_ are allegedly identical, and should therefore necessarily
correspond. [24] Supply, namely, is allegedly a demand measured by its
own amount. Here a great confusion: (1) This identity of supply, so that
it is a demand measured by its own amount, is true only to the extent
that it is _exchange value =_ to a certain amount of objectified labour.
To that extent it is the measure of its own demand – as far as _value_
is concerned. But, as such a value, it first has to be realized through
the exchange for _money,_ and as object of exchange for money it depends
(2) on its _use value,_ but as use value it depends on the mass of needs
present for it, the demand for it. But as use value it is absolutely not
measured by the labour time objectified in it, but rather a measuring
rod is applied to it which lies outside its nature as exchange value.
Or, it is further said: _Supply itself is demand for a certain product_
of a _certain value_ (which expresses itself in the demanded amount of
the product). Then, if the supplied product is unsaleable, it proves
that too much has been produced of the supplied commodity and too little
of what the supplier demands. Thus allegedly there is no general
overproduction, but merely overproduction of one or a few articles, as
against underproduction of others. This again forgets that what the
producing capital demands is not a specific use value, but _value_ for
itself, i.e. money – money not in the role of medium of circulation, but
as a general form of wealth, or a form of the realization of capital in
one regard, a return to its original dormant state in the other. But the
assertion that too little _money_ is produced means indeed nothing else
than what is being asserted, that production is not identical with
realization, i.e. that it is _overproduction,_ or, what is the same,
that it is production which cannot be transformed into money, into
_value;_ production which does not pass the test of circulation. Hence
the illusion of the money-artists (including Proudhon etc.), that it is
a case of lack of _means of circulation –_ on account of the high cost
of money – and that more money has to be created artificially. [25] (See
also the Birminghamites, e.g. the _Gemini_.) [26] Or it is said that
_production and consumption_ are the same _from the social standpoint,_
that hence an excess or disproportion between the two can never take
place. Social standpoint here means the abstraction which ignores
precisely the specific social structure and relations and hence also the
contradictions which emerge from it. Storch, for example, remarked quite
correctly against Say that a great part of consumption is not
consumption for immediate use, but consumption in the production
process, e.g. consumption of machines, coal, oil, required buildings
etc. [27] This consumption is in no way identical with that at issue
here. Malthus and Sismondi have likewise correctly remarked that e.g.
the workers’ consumption is in no way in itself a _sufficient_
consumption for the capitalist. [28] The moment of realization is here
simply thrown out entirely, and production and consumption are simply
equated, i.e. not production based on capital but production based
directly on _use value_ is presupposed. Or, expressed _socialistically_:
[29] labour and the exchange of labour, i.e. production and its exchange
(circulation), are allegedly the entire process; how then could a
disproportion arise except by oversight, miscalculation? Labour is here
regarded not as wage labour, nor capital as capital. On one side, the
consequences of production based on capital are accepted, on the other
side the presuppositions and conditions of these consequences are denied
– necessary labour as posited by and for surplus labour. Or – e.g.
Ricardo – since production is itself regulated by the costs of
production, it allegedly regulates itself, and if one branch of
production does not realize itself then capital withdraws from it to a
certain degree and throws itself on another point where it is needed.
[30] But apart from the fact that this necessity of evening-up already
_presupposes_ the unevenness, the disharmony and hence the contradiction
– in a general crisis of overproduction the contradiction is not between
the different kinds of productive capital, but between industrial and
loanable capital – between capital as directly involved in the
production process and capital as money existing (relatively) outside of
it. Finally: _proportionate production_ (this is already in Ricardo
also, etc.) only when it is capital’s tendency to distribute itself in
correct proportions, but equally its necessary tendency – since it
strives limitlessly for surplus labour, surplus productivity, surplus
consumption etc. – to drive beyond the proportion. (In _competition_
this inner tendency of capital appears as a compulsion exercised over it
by _alien capital,_ which drives it forward beyond the correct
proportion with a constant _march, march!_ Free competition, as Mr
Wakefield correctly sniffs out in his commentary on Smith, has _never
yet_ been developed by the economists, no matter how much they prattle
about it, and [no matter] how much it is the basis of the entirety of
bourgeois production, production resting on capital. [31] It has been
understood only negatively: i.e. as negation of monopolies, the guild
system, legal regulations etc. As negation of feudal production. But it
also has to be something _for itself,_ after all, since a mere 0 is an
empty negation, abstraction, from a barrier which immediately arises
again e.g. in the form of monopoly, natural monopolies etc.
Conceptually, _competition_ is nothing other than the inner _nature of
capital,_ its essential character, appearing in and realized as the
reciprocal interaction of many capitals with one another, the inner
tendency as external necessity.) (Capital exists and can only exist as
many capitals, and its self-determination therefore appears as their
reciprocal interaction with one another.) Capital is just as much the
constant positing as the suspension of _proportionate production._ The
existing proportion always has to be suspended by the creation of
surplus values and the increase of productive forces. But this demand,
that production should be expanded _simultaneously_ and _at once in the
same proportion,_ makes external demands upon capital which in no way
arise out of it itself; at the same time, the departure from the given
proportion in one branch of production drives all of them out of it, and
in unequal proportions. So far (for we have not yet reached the aspect
of capital in which it is _circulating capital,_ and still have
circulation on one side and capital on the other, or production as its
presupposition, or ground from which it arises), even from the
standpoint of production alone, circulation contains the relation to
consumption and production – in other words, surplus labour as counter
value [_Gegenwert_], and differentiation of labour in an ever richer
form.

The simple concept of capital has to contain its civilizing tendencies
etc. _in themselves;_ they must not, as in the economics books until
now, appear merely as external consequences. Likewise the contradictions
which are later released, demonstrated as already latent within it.

So far in the realization process, we have only the indifference of the
individual moments towards one another; that they determine each other
internally and search for each other externally; but that they may or
may not find each other, balance each other, correspond to each other.
The inner necessity of moments which belong together, and their
indifferent, independent existence towards one another, are already a
foundation of contradictions.

Still, we are by no means finished. The contradiction between production
and realization – of which capital, by its concept, is the unity – has
to be grasped more intrinsically than merely as the indifferent,
seemingly reciprocally independent appearance of the individual moments
of the process, or rather of the totality of processes.

To approach the matter more closely: _First of all, there is a limit,
not inherent to production generally, but to production founded on
capital._ This limit is double, or rather the same regarded from two
directions. It is enough here to demonstrate that capital contains a
_particular_ restriction of production – which contradicts its general
tendency to drive beyond every barrier to production – in order to have
uncovered the foundation of _overproduction,_ the fundamental
contradiction of developed capital; in order to have uncovered, more
generally, the fact that capital is not, as the economists believe, the
_absolute_ form for the development of the forces of production – not
the absolute form for that, nor the form of wealth which absolutely
coincides with the development of the forces of production. The stages
of production which precede capital appear, regarded from its
standpoint, as so many fetters upon the productive forces. It itself,
however, correctly understood, appears as the condition of the
development of the forces of production as long as they require an
external spur, which appears at the same time as their bridle. It is a
discipline over them, which becomes superfluous and burdensome at a
certain level of their development, just like the guilds etc. These
inherent limits have to coincide with the nature of capital, with the
essential character of its very concept. These necessary limits are:

(1) _Necessary labour_ as limit on the exchange value of living labour
capacity or of the woes of the industrial population;

(2) _Surplus value_ as limit on surplus labour time; and, in regard to
relative surplus labour time, as barrier to the development of the
forces of production;

(3) What is the same, the _transformation into money,_ exchange value as
such, as limit of production; or exchange founded on value, or value
founded on exchange, as limit of production. This is:

(4) again the same as _restriction of the production of use values by
exchange value;_ or that real wealth has to take on a _specific_ form
distinct from itself, a form not absolutely identical with it, in order
to become an object of production at all.

However, these limits come up against the _general tendency of capital_
(which showed itself in simple circulation, where money as medium of
circulation appeared as merely vanishing, without independent necessity,
and hence not as limit and barrier) to forget and abstract from:

(1) necessary labour as limit of the exchange value of living labour
capacity; (2) surplus value as the limit of surplus labour and
development of the forces of production; (3) money as the limit of
production; (4) the restriction of the production of use values by
exchange value.

Hence overproduction: i.e. the sudden _recall_ of all these necessary
moments of production founded on capital; hence general devaluation in
consequence of forgetting them. Capital, at the same time, [is] thereby
faced with the task of launching its attempt anew from a higher level of
the development of productive forces, with each time greater collapse
_as capital._ Clear, therefore, that the higher the development of
capital, the more it appears as barrier to production – hence also to
consumption – besides the other contradictions which make it appear as
burdensome barrier to production and intercourse.

<The entire _credit system,_ and the over-trading, over-speculation etc.
connected with it, rests on the necessity of expanding and leaping over
the barrier to circulation and the sphere of exchange. This appears more
colossally, classically, in the relations between peoples than in the
relations between individuals. Thus e.g. the English forced to _lend_ to
foreign nations, in order to have them as customers. At bottom, the
English capitalist exchanges doubly with _productive_ English capital,
(1) as himself, (2) as Yankee etc. or in whatever other form he has
placed his money.>

<Capital as _barrier to production_ is pointed out: e.g. Hodgskin: [32]
‘In the present state, every accumulation of capital adds to the amount
of profit demanded from the labourer, and extinguishes all that labour
which would only procure the labourer his comfortable existence …
_Profit_ the limitation of production.’ (H[odgskin, Notebook,] p. 46.)
[33] Through foreign trade, the barrier of the sphere of exchange [is]
expanded, and [it is] made possible for the capitalist to consume more
surplus labour: ‘In a series of years the world can take no more from us
than we can take from the world. Even the profits made by our merchants
in their foreign trade are paid by the consumer of the return goods
here. Foreign trade mere barter, and as such exchange for the
convenience and enjoyment of the capitalist. But he can consume
commodities to a certain degree only. He exchanges cottons etc. for the
wines and silks of foreign countries. But these _represent only the
surplus labour of our own population_ as much as the clothes and
cottons, and in this way the _destructive power of the capitalist is
increased beyond all bounds._ Thus nature is _outwitted.’ (Source and
Remedy_ etc., pp. 27, 28.) [34] How the _glut_ is connected with the
_barrier_ of necessary labour: ‘The very meaning of an increased demand
by the labourers is, a disposition to take less themselves, and leave a
larger share for their employers; and if it be said that this, _by
diminishing consumption, increases glut,_ I can only say that _glut then
is synonymous with high profits.’ (Enquiry,_ London, 1821, p. 12.) [35]
Herein the one side of the contradiction completely expressed. ‘The
practice of stopping labour at that point where it can produce, in
addition to the subsistence of the labourer, a profit for the
capitalist, opposed to the natural law which regulates production.’
(H[odgskin, Notebook,] 41, IX.) [36] ‘The more the capital accumulates,
the more the _whole amount of profit demanded does so;_ so there arises
an _artificial check_ to production and population.’ (H[odgskin,
Notebook,] 46.) [37] The contradictions between capital as instrument of
production in general and as instrument of production of value,
developed as follows by Malthus (X, 40 seq.): ‘Profits are invariably
measured by _value_ and never by _quantity …_ The _wealth_ of a country
depends partly upon the _quantity of produce_ obtained by its labour,
and partly upon _such an adaptation of this quantity to the wants and
powers of the existing population_ as is calculated to give it value.
Nothing can be more certain than that it is not determined by either of
them alone. But where wealth and value are perhaps the most nearly
connected, is in _the necessity of the latter to the production of the
former._ The value set upon commodities, that is the sacrifice of labour
which people are willing to make in order to sustain them, in the actual
state of things may be said to be _almost the sole cause_ of the
existence of wealth … The consumptive demand occasioned only by the
workmen employed in productive labour can never _alone_ furnish a motive
to the accumulation and employment of capital … _the powers of
production alone do not secure the creation of a proportionate degree of
wealth,_ as little as the _increase of population._ What it requires in
addition is _such a distribution of produce,_ and such an adaptation of
this produce to the wants of those who are to consume it, as constantly
to increase _the exchangeable value of the whole mass,_ i.e. the powers
of production are only called fully into motion by the unchecked demand
for all that is produced … [38] This is however brought about on the one
hand by constantly new branches of industry (and _reciprocal_ expansion
of the old), by means of which the old obtain new _markets_ etc.
Production indeed itself creates demand, in that it employs more workers
in the same branch of business, and creates new branches of business,
where new capitalists again employ new workers and at the same time
alternately become market for the old; but the demand created by the
productive labourer himself can never be an _adequate_ demand, because
it does not go to the full extent of what he produces. If it did, there
would be no profit, consequently no motive to employ him. The very
existence of a profit upon any commodity presupposes _a demand exterior
to that of the labourer who has produced it._’ ‘Both labourers and
capital may be redundant compared with the means of employing them
profitably.’> [39]

<To be noted for (3), to which we shall soon proceed, that the
provisional accumulation, as which capital appears _vis-à-vis_ labour,
and by means of which it is the command over labour, is at first nothing
else but _surplus labour_ itself in the form of _surplus produce,_ at
the same time _claim on alien co-existing labour._>

The point here, of course, is not yet to develop overproduction
specifically, but only the predisposition to it, such as it is posited
in primitive form in the capital relation itself. We must also,
therefore, omit here any regard for the other possessing and consuming
etc. classes, which do not produce but live from their revenue, hence
exchange with capital; form centres of exchange for it. We can consider
them only partly (but better, along with _accumulation_), in so far as
they are most important for the historic formation of capital.

In production based on slavery, as well as in patriarchal
agricultural-industrial production, where the greatest part of the
population directly satisfies the greatest part of its needs directly by
its labour, the sphere of circulation and exchange is still very narrow;
and more particularly in the former, the slave does not come into
consideration as _engaged in exchange_ at all. But in production based
on capital, consumption is mediated at all points by exchange, and
labour never has a _direct_ use value for those who are working. Its
entire basis is labour as exchange value and as the creation of exchange
value.

Well. First of all

the wage worker as distinct from the slave is himself an independent
centre of circulation, someone who exchanges, posits exchange value, and
maintains exchange value through exchange. _Firstly:_ in the exchange
between that part of capital which is specified as wages, and living
labour capacity, the _exchange value_ of this part of capital is posited
immediately, before capital again emerges from the production process to
enter into circulation, or this can be conceived as itself still an act
of circulation. _Secondly:_ To each capitalist, the total mass of all
workers, with the exception of his own workers, appear not as workers,
but as consumers, possessors of exchange values (wages), money, which
they exchange for his commodity. They are so many centres of circulation
with whom the act of exchange begins and by whom the exchange value of
capital is maintained. They form a proportionally very great part –
although not quite so great as is generally imagined, if one focuses on
the industrial worker proper – of all consumers. The greater their
number – the number of the industrial population – and the mass of money
at their disposal, the greater the sphere of exchange for capital. We
have seen that it is the tendency of capital to increase the industrial
population as much as possible.

Actually, the relation of one capitalist to the workers of _another_
capitalist is none of our concern here. It only shows every capitalist’s
illusion, but alters nothing in the relation of capital in general to
labour. Every capitalist knows this about his worker, that he does not
relate to him as producer to consumer, and [he therefore] wishes to
restrict his consumption, i.e. his ability to exchange, his wage, as
much as possible. Of course he would like the workers of _other_
capitalists to be the greatest consumers possible of _his own_
commodity. But the relation of _every_ capitalist to _his own_ workers
is the _relation as such_ of _capital and labour,_ the essential
relation. But this is just how the illusion arises – true for the
individual capitalist as distinct from all the others – that _apart from
his_ workers the whole remaining working class confronts him as
_consumer_ and _participant in exchange,_ as money-spender, and not as
worker. It is forgotten that, as Malthus says, ‘the very existence of a
profit upon any commodity pre-supposes a _demand exterior to that of the
labourer who has produced it’,_ [40] and hence the _demand of the
labourer himself can never be an adequate demand._ Since one production
sets the other into motion and hence creates consumers for itself in the
_alien_ capital’s workers, it _seems_ to each individual capital that
the demand of the working class posited by production itself is an
‘adequate demand’. On one side, this demand which production itself
posits drives it forward, and must drive it forward beyond the
_proportion_ in which it would have to produce with regard to the
workers; on the other side, if the demand _exterior to the demand of the
labourer himself_ disappears or shrinks up, then the collapse occurs.
Capital itself then regards _demand by the worker –_ i.e. the payment of
the wages on which this demand rests – not as a gain but as a loss. I.e.
the _immanent relation between capital and labour_ asserts itself. _Here
again it is the competition among capitals,_ their indifference to and
independence of one another, which brings it about that the individual
capital relates to the workers of the entire remaining capital _not as
to workers:_ hence is driven beyond the right proportion. What precisely
distinguishes capital from the master-servant relation is that the
_worker_ confronts him as consumer and possessor of exchange values, and
that in the form of the _possessor of money,_ in the form of money he
becomes a simple centre of circulation – one of its infinitely many
centres, in which his specificity as worker is extinguished. *

* It is quite the same with the demand created by production itself for
raw material, semi-finished goods, machinery, means of communication,
and for the auxiliary materials consumed in production, such as dyes,
coal, grease, soap, etc. This effective, exchange-value-positing demand
is adequate and sufficient as long as the producers exchange among
themselves. Its inadequacy shows itself as soon as the final product
encounters its limit in direct and final consumption. This _semblance,_
too, which drives beyond the correct proportion, is founded in the
essence of capital, which, as will be developed more closely in
connection with competition, _is_ something which repels itself, _is_
many capitals mutually quite indifferent to one another. In so far as
one capitalist _buys_ from others, buys commodities, or sells, they are
within the simple exchange relation; and do not relate to one another as
capital. The _correct_ (imaginary) proportion in which they must
exchange with one another in order to realize themselves at the end as
capital lies _outside_ their relation to one another.

To begin with: capital forces the workers beyond necessary labour to
surplus labour. Only in this way does it realize itself, and create
surplus value. But on the other hand, it posits necessary labour only
_to the extent_ and _in so far as_ it is surplus labour and the latter
is _realizable_ as _surplus value._ It posits surplus labour, then, as
the condition of the necessary, and surplus value as the limit of
objectified labour, of value as such. As soon as it cannot posit value,
it does not posit necessary labour; and, given its foundation, it cannot
be otherwise. It therefore restricts labour and the creation of value –
by an artificial check, as the English express it – and it does so on
the same grounds as and to the same extent that it posits surplus labour
and surplus value. By its nature, therefore, it posits a _barrier_ to
labour and value-creation, in contradiction to its tendency to expand
them boundlessly. And in as much as it both posits a barrier _specific_
to itself, and on the other side equally drives over and beyond _every_
barrier, it is the living contradiction. *

* Since value forms the foundation of capital, and since it therefore
necessarily exists only through exchange for _counter-value,_ it thus
necessarily repels itself from itself. A _universal capital,_ one
without alien capitals confronting it, with which it exchanges – and
from the present standpoint, nothing confronts it but wage labourers or
itself – is therefore a non-thing. The reciprocal repulsion between
capitals is already contained in capital as realized exchange value.

While capital thus, on one side, makes surplus labour and its _exchange_
for _surplus labour_ into the precondition of necessary labour and hence
of the positing of _labour capacity_ [_Arbeitsvermögen_] as a centre of
exchange – hence already narrows and attaches conditions to the sphere
of exchange from this side – it is just as essential to it, on the other
side, to restrict the worker’s consumption to the amount necessary to
reproduce his labour capacity – to make the value which expresses
_necessary labour_ the barrier to the realization of labour capacity and
hence of the worker’s _exchange capacity,_ and to strive to reduce the
relation of this necessary labour to surplus labour to the minimum.
[Thus we have] a new barrier to the sphere of exchange, which is,
however, at the same time identical, as is the first, with the tendency
of capital to relate to every limit on its self-realization as to a
barrier. The boundless enlargement of its value – boundless creation of
value – therefore absolutely identical here with the positing of
barriers to the sphere of exchange, i.e. the possibility of realization
– the realization of the value posited in the production process.

The same with the _productive force._ On the one hand, the necessary
tendency of capital to raise it to the utmost, in order to increase
relative _surplus time._ On the other hand, thereby decreases _necessary
labour time,_ hence the worker’s exchange capacity. Further, as we have
seen, relative _surplus value_ rises much more slowly than the force of
production, and moreover this proportion grows ever smaller as the
magnitude reached by the productive forces is greater. _But the mass of
products grows in a similar proportion –_ if not, then new capital would
be set free – as well as labour – which did not enter into circulation.
But to the same degree as the mass of products grows, so grows the
difficulty of realizing the labour time contained in them – because the
demands made on consumption rise. (We are still concerned here only with
the way in which the capital _realization process_ is its _devaluation
process._ Out of place here would be the question how, while it has the
tendency to _heighten the productive forces boundlessly,_ it _also and
equally_ makes one-sided, limits etc. the _main force of production, the
human being himself,_ and has the tendency in general to restrict the
forces of production.)

Capital, then, posits _necessary labour time_ as the barrier to the
exchange value of living labour capacity; _surplus labour time_ as the
barrier to necessary labour time; and _surplus value_ as the barrier to
surplus labour time; while at the same time it drives over and beyond
all these barriers, to the extent that it posits _labour capacity_
opposite itself as something simply engaged in exchange, as money, and
surplus labour time as the only barrier, because creatrix of surplus
value. (Or, from the first aspect, it posits the exchange of surplus
values as the barrier to the exchange of the necessary values.)

In one and the same moment, it posits the _values on hand_ in
circulation – or, what is the same, the proportion of values posited by
it to the values contained in it and _presupposed_ in circulation – as
the barrier, the necessary barrier to its value-creation; on the other
hand, its productivity as the only barrier and creatrix of values. It
therefore drives constantly on one side towards its own devaluation, on
the other side towards the obstruction of the productive forces, and of
labour which objectifies itself in values.

_Overproduction. – Proudhon (How is it possible that in the price of the commodity which the worker buys, he pays the profit etc. and still obtains his necessary wages). – Price of the commodity and labour time. Surplus etc. (_Price _and value etc.) – Capitalist does not sell_ too dear; _but still above what the thing costs him. – Price (fractional). Bastiat. Decline of the fractional price. – Price can fall below value without damage to capital. Number and unit (measure) important in the multiplication of prices_

<This nonsense about the impossibility of overproduction (in other
words, the assertion of the immediate identity of capital’s process of
production and its process of realization) has been expressed in a
manner which is at least sophistical, i.e. ingenious, as mentioned
above, [41] by James Mill, in the formula that supply = its own demand,
that supply and demand therefore balance, which means in other words the
same thing as that value is determined by labour time, and hence that
_exchange adds nothing to it,_ and which forgets only that exchange does
have to take place and that this depends (in the final instance) on the
_use value._ Mill says, then, that if demand and supply do not balance,
this comes about because too much has been produced of one specific
product (the supplied product) and too little of the other (the one in
demand). This too much and too little concerns not the exchange value,
but the use value. More of the supplied product exists than is ‘needed’;
this is what it boils down to. Hence that overproduction comes from use
value and therefore from exchange itself. This in stultified form in Say
– products are exchanged only for products; [42] therefore, at most, too
much has been produced of one and too little of another. Forgetting: (1)
that values are exchanged for values, and a product exchanges for
another only to the extent that it is value; i.e. that it is or becomes
money; (2) it exchanges for labour. The good gentleman adopts the
standpoint of _simple exchange,_ in which indeed no overproduction is
possible, for it is indeed concerned not with exchange value but with
use value. Overproduction takes place in connection with realization,
not otherwise. [43]>

Proudhon, who certainly hears the bells ringing but never knows where,
therefore sees the origin of overproduction in the fact ‘that the worker
cannot buy back his product’. [44] By this he understands that interest
and profit are added on to it; or that the price of the product is an
overcharge on top of its real value. This demonstrates first of all that
he understands nothing about the determination of value, which,
generally speaking, can include no overcharge. In practical commerce,
capitalist A can screw capitalist B. The one pockets what the other
loses. If we add them both together, then the sum of their exchange =
the sum of the labour time objectified in it, of which capitalist A has
merely pocketed more than his share in relation to B. From all the
profits made by capital, i.e. the total mass of capitalists, there is
deducted (1) the constant part of capital; (2) the wage, or, the amount
of objectified labour time necessary in order to reproduce living labour
capacity. They can therefore divide nothing among themselves other than
the surplus value. The proportion – just or unjust – in which they
distribute this surplus value among themselves alters absolutely nothing
about exchange or about the exchange relation between capital and
labour.

It might be said that _necessary labour time_ (i.e. the wage), which
therefore excludes profit, and is rather to be deducted from it, is
itself again determined by the _prices_ of products which already
include profit. Where else could the profit come from which the
capitalist who does not directly employ this worker makes in the
exchange with him? For example, the spinner’s worker exchanges his wages
for so many bushels of grain. But in the price of each bushel, the
profit of the farmer, i.e. of capital, is already included. So that the
_price_ of the consumption goods which are bought by necessary labour
itself already includes surplus labour time. It is clear, first of all,
that the wage paid by the spinner to his workmen must be high enough to
buy the necessary bushel of wheat, regardless of what profit for the
farmer may be included in the _price_ of the bushel of wheat; but that,
likewise, on the other side, the wage which the farmer pays his workers
must be high enough to procure for them the necessary quantity of
clothing, regardless of what profit for the weaver and the spinner may
be included in the _price_ of these articles of clothing.

The puzzle arises simply because (1) _price_ and _value_ are being mixed
up; (2) relations are brought in which are irrelevant to the
determination of value of such. Suppose initially – and this is the
conceptual relation – that capitalist A himself produces all the
consumption goods which the worker needs, or which represent the sum of
use values in which his necessary labour objectifies itself. Then, with
the money which he obtains from the capitalist – money appears in this
transaction only as medium of circulation – the worker would have to buy
back from the capitalist, with that money, a fractional part – the part
representing his necessary labour – of his product. The _price_ of a
fractional part of capitalist A’s product is of course the same for the
worker as for everyone else engaged in exchange. From the moment he buys
from the capitalist, his specific quality as worker is extinguished; the
money contains no trace of the relation in which, or of the operation by
which, it was obtained; in circulation he confronts the capitalist
simply as M, and the capitalist confronts him as C; as realizer of the
_price_ of C, which is hence presupposed for him just as for every other
representative of M, i.e. buyer. Good. But in the price of the
fractional part of the commodity which he buys, the profit is included
in which the surplus value going to the capitalist appears. If his
necessary labour time, therefore, represents 20 thalers = a certain
fractional part of the product, it follows that, if the profit is 10%,
the capitalist sells him the commodity for 22 thalers.

That is what Proudhon thinks, and concludes from it that the worker
cannot buy back his product, i.e. the fractional part of the total
product which objectifies his _necessary labour._ (We will come back
directly to his other conclusion, that _therefore_ capital cannot
adequately exchange, _hence_ overproduction.) To make the matter
tangible, say that the worker’s 20 thalers = 4 bushels of grain.
Consequently – if 20 thalers is the value of the 4 bushels expressed in
money – if the capitalist sells them for 22, then the worker could not
buy back the 4 bushels, or rather he could buy only 3 7/11 bushels. In
other words, he imagines that the monetary transaction distorts the
relation. 20 thalers is the price of necessary labour = 4 bushels; and
the capitalist pays this to the worker; but as soon as the latter
presents his 20 thalers and asks for the 4 bushels, he gets only 3 7/11.
Since he would thereby receive less than the _necessary_ wage, he could
not live at all, and thus Mr Proudhon proves more than he intends. *

* It is beside the point here that capital, in practice as well as in
general tendency, directly employs _price,_ as e.g. in the truck system,
to defraud _necessary labour,_ and to reduce it below the standard given
by nature as well as by a specific state of society. We must always
presuppose here that the wage paid is _economically_ just, i.e. that it
is determined by the general laws of economics. The contradictions have
to follow here from the general relations themselves, and not from fraud
by individual capitalists. The further forms which this assumes in
reality belong in the doctrine of wages.

But the presupposition, if you please, is wrong. If 5 thalers expresses
the _value_ of a bushel, i.e. the labour time objectified in it, and if
4 bushels express the necessary wages of labour, then capitalist A sells
these 4 bushels not, as Proudhon thinks, for 22 but for 20 thalers. But
the thing is this: let the total product (including necessary and
surplus labour time) equal 110 thalers = 22 bushels; let 16 of these
bushels = 80 thalers, represent the capital invested in seed, machinery
etc.; 4 bushels = 20 thalers for necessary labour time; 2 bushels = 10
thalers, surplus labour time. The capitalist sells each bushel at 5
thalers, the necessary value of the bushel, and nevertheless he makes a
gain of 10% on each bushel, or 5/10 of a thaler, 1/2 a thaler = 15
silver groschen. How? Because he sells 22 × 5 instead of 20 × 5. We can
here equate to 0 the additional capital he would have to lay out in
order to produce 2 additional bushels, since these can dissolve in pure
surplus labour, more thorough ploughing, elimination of weeds,
procurement of mineral fertilizer which, say, costs him nothing, etc.
The value contained in the 2 surplus bushels has cost _him nothing,_
hence makes up a surplus above his expenditures. If he sells 20 of the
22 bushels for what they cost him, for 100 thalers, plus 2, which cost
him nothing – but whose value = the labour contained in them – for 10
thalers, then it is the same for him as if he sold all of them, each
bushel for 15 silver groschen more than it cost him. (For 1/2 a thaler
or 10% of 5 thalers = 5/10.) Therefore, although he makes 2 thalers on
the 4 bushels he sells to the worker, the worker obtains each bushel at
its necessary value. The capitalist makes 2 thalers on them only
because, beside these 4 bushels, he sells 18 additional ones at the
identical price. If he sold only 16, he would make nothing; for then he
would sell a total of: 5 × 20 =100, his invested capital.

Indeed, in manufacturing, too, it is possible that the capital’s outlays
do not increase, while a surplus value is sold nevertheless; i.e. it is
not necessary that the outlay in raw material and machinery should grow.
Assume that the same product obtains a higher finish through labour by
hand – the mass of required raw material and instrument held constant –
and hence its use value, therefore the use value of the product,
increases, not in quantity, but in quality, owing to the increased hand
labour employed on it. Its exchange value – the labour objectified in it
– simply grows in relation to this labour. If the capitalist then sells
for 10% more, then the worker gets paid the fractional part of the
product, expressed in money, which represents necessary labour; and if
the product could be divided, then the worker could buy this fractional
part. The capitalist’s profit would come not from overcharging the
worker for this fractional part, but from the fact that in the whole of
the product he sells a fractional part which he has not paid for, and
which represents, precisely, _surplus labour time._ The product is
always divisible as value; in its natural form, it need not be so.
Profit here always comes from the fact that the whole value contains a
fractional part which is not paid, and hence a fractional part of
surplus labour is paid in each fractional part of the whole. So in the
above example. When the capitalist sells 22 bushels, i.e. 2 which
represent surplus labour, it is the same as if he sold an extra 1/10 of
a bushel per bushel, i.e. 1/10 surplus value. If e.g. only one clock has
been produced, where the relation of labour, capital and surplus value
is the same, then the quality of the clock has been raised 1/10 in value
by 1/10 labour time which costs the capitalist nothing.

Third case, that the capitalist, as is usual in manufacturing (but not
in extractive industry), needs more raw material (let the instrument
remain constant; however, nothing is changed if it, too, is variable) in
which the surplus labour time objectifies itself. (Actually this does
not belong here yet, for capital here can or must just as well be
assumed as having also produced the raw material, e.g. the cotton, and
surplus production at any point has to reduce itself to _mere_ surplus
labour, or, what is rather the _reality,_ presupposes _simultaneous_
surplus labour at all points of circulation.) Assume that he spins up 25
lb. of cotton, which cost him 50 thalers, and for which he requires
machinery (which we will assume to be entirely consumed in the
production process) at 30 thalers, and wages 20 thalers, for 25 lb. of
twist, which he sells at 110. He sells each pound of twist, then, for 4
2/5 thalers, or 4 thalers 12 silver groschen. The worker thus obtains 4
6/11 lb. of twist, if he wants to buy it again. If the worker were
working for himself, he would likewise sell the pound for 4 thalers 12
silver groschen and make no profit – presupposing that he performs only
the necessary labour; but he would spin up less cotton.

As we know, the value of a pound of twist consists exclusively of the
amount of labour time objectified in it. Now suppose that the value of
the pound of twist = 5 thalers. Given that 4/5, i.e. 4 thalers,
represent cotton, instrument etc.; then 1 thaler represents the labour
realized in the cotton by means of the instrument. If the worker, in
order to live from spinning, needs say 20 thalers per month, then –
since he earns 1 thaler for spinning 1 lb. of twist, but needs 20 – he
would have to spin 20 lb. of twist. If he himself owned the cotton,
material etc., and were working for himself, hence were his own master,
then he would have to sell 20 lb. of twist; since he would earn only 1/5
on each, one thaler, and 1 × 20 = 20. If he works for the capitalist,
then the labour which spins up 20 lb. of cotton only represents the
necessary labour; for, by presupposition, of the 20 lb. of twist or 20 ×
5 = 100 thalers, 80 thalers only represent the already purchased cotton
and instrument, and the newly reproduced value represents nothing but
_necessary labour._ Of the 20 lb. of twist, 4 lb. = 20 thalers would
represent necessary labour, and 16 nothing more than the constant part
of capital. 16 × 5 = 80 thalers. Each additional pound which the
capitalist orders to be produced over and above the 20 contains 1/5
surplus labour, surplus value for him. (Objectified labour which he has
sold without having paid for it.) If he orders 1 more pound spun, he
gains 1 thaler; 10 lb, more, 10 thalers. Out of 10 lb. or 50 thalers,
the capitalist would have 40 thalers to replace his investment and 10
thalers of surplus labour; or 8 lb. of twist with which to buy the
material for 10 (machinery and cotton), and 2 lb. of twist, or their
value, which have cost him nothing. If we now summarize the capitalist’s
accounts, we find that he has invested, in thalers

 

Wages

Surplus value

80 + 40 =

120 (raw material, instrument, etc.)

20

10

 

120

20

10 = 150

Altogether he has produced 30 lb. of twist (30 × 5 = 150); the pound at
5 thalers, the exact _value_ of the pound, i.e. purely determined by the
labour objectified in it, and deriving value only from the latter. Of
this 30 lb., 24 represent constant capital, 4 lb. go for wages, and 2
form the _surplus value_. Calculating it on the basis of his total
investment, 140 thalers or 28 lb., as the capitalist himself does, this
surplus value forms 1/14 = 7 1/7% (although, in the example given, the
surplus value amounts to 50% on labour).

Now assume that the productivity of labour grows to the extent that he
is capable of spinning 40 lb. with the same wage cost. According to our
assumption he would sell these 40 lb. at their real value, i.e. the
pound at 5 thalers, of which 4 thalers is labour objectified in cotton
etc., 1 thaler is newly added labour. He would then sell:

40 lb. - the lb. @ 5 thalers = 40 × 5 = 200; from these 40 lb., deduct

+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| 20 lb. for necessary  | = 100                 |                       |
| labour                |                       |                       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | -------------------   |                       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | 100                   | On the first 20 lb.   |
|                       |                       | he would have made    |
|                       |                       | not a farthing;       |
|                       |                       | of the remaining      |
|                       |                       | hundred, take off 4/5 |
|                       |                       | = 4 × 20 = 80.        |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       |  80                   | for material, etc.    |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | -------------------   | Leaves:               |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | 20                    | thalers               |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+

On an investment of 200 thalers the capitalist would have earned 20, or
10%. 10% on total investment; but in fact 20 on the second hundred
thalers or second 20 lb., in which he did not pay the objectified
labour. Now assume that he is capable of making double that, say

+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| lb.                   | Thalers               |                       |
+=======================+=======================+=======================+
| 80                    | 400                   | Of this, take off 20  |
|                       |                       | lb. for [necessary    |
|                       |                       | labour]               |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| 20 for necessary      |  100                  |                       |
| labour etc. =         |                       |                       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | -------------------   |                       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| Leaves:               | 300                   | Of these, take off    |
|                       |                       | 4/5 for material      |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       |  240                  | etc.                  |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | -------------------   |                       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| Leaves:               | 60                    | A profit of 60 on 400 |
|                       |                       | is = 6 on 40 = 15%.   |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+

In fact in the above example the capitalist’s investment is only 180; on
this he makes 20, or 11 1/9%.

The smaller the part of the outlay becomes which represents necessary
labour, the greater the gain, although it stands in no obvious relation
to the real surplus value, i.e. surplus labour. For example. In order
for the capitalist to gain 10%, he has to spin 40 lb. of twist; the
worker needs to spin only 20 = necessary labour. Surplus labour =
necessary labour, 100% surplus value. This is our old law. But this is
not the matter at issue here.

In the above example with the 40 lb., the _real value_ of the pound is 5
thalers, and, like the capitalist, the worker himself, if he conducted
his own business _as a worker_ (and could advance himself enough funds
to be able to realize the raw material etc. to the extent necessary to
allow him to live as a worker), would sell the pound at 5 thalers. He
would, however, produce only 20 lb., and from its sale he would use 4/5
to obtain new raw material, and 1/5 to live. The only thing he would
make out of the 100 thalers would be his wages. The capitalist’s gain
comes not from selling the pound _too dear_ – he sells it at its _exact
value_ – but from selling it above the _costs of production, his costs_
(not _the_ costs, for the 1/5 costs the worker surplus labour). If he
sold at less than 5 thalers, he would be selling _below_ the value, and
the buyer would have the 1/5 of labour contained in every pound of twist
above the investment etc., for nothing. But the capitalist calculates in
this manner:

+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| Value of 1 pound =    | 5                     | thalers               |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| of 40 pounds =        | 200                   | thalers; from which   |
|                       |                       | take off costs:       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | 180                   |                       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | -------------------   |                       |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
|                       | 20                    | Leaves 20.            |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+

What he calculates is not that he gains 20 thalers out of the second 100
thalers, but that he gains 20 on his entire investment of … 180 thalers.
This gives him a profit of 11 1/9%, instead of 20. He calculates further
that, in order to make this profit, he has to sell 40 lb. 40 lb. at 5
thalers gives him not 1/5, or 20%, but 20 thalers distributed over 40
lb., or 1/2 a thaler per pound. At the price for which he sells the
pound, he makes 1/2 a thaler out of 5 thalers; or 1 out of 10 thalers;
10% of the selling price. The price is determined by the price of the
fractional unit (1 pound) multiplied by the number to be sold; here 1
pound at 5 thalers × 40. While this determination of price is correct
for the capitalist’s pocket, it is equally liable to lead one astray
theoretically, in as much as it now seems as if an overcharge above the
_real_ value took place in each individual pound, and the origin of the
surplus value in each individual pound has become invisible. This
_determination of price by the multiplication of the value of the unit
(measure) of the use value (pound, yard, ton etc.) with the number of
these units produced_ is important later in the theory of prices. There
follows from it among other things that a decline in the price of the
unit and an increase in the number of units – brought about by growth of
the productive forces – shows that profit increases in relation with
labour, or that the proportion [_Verhältnis_] of necessary labour
declines in relation [_im Verhältnis_] to surplus labour – and not the
opposite, as is the opinion of Mr Bastiat etc. [45] E.g. if labour grew,
owing to productivity, to the point where the worker was producing twice
as many pounds in the same time as before – presupposing that 1 lb. of
twist renders him entirely the same service, regardless of its cost, and
that twist, clothing, is all he needs to live – then the value added by
labour to 20 lb. of twist would no longer amount to 1/5 but now only to
1/10, because he would be transforming the 20 lb. cotton into twist in
1/2 the time. To the 80 thalers which the raw material cost, there would
then be added not 20 thalers but only 10. The 20 lb. would cost 90
thalers and each pound 90/20 or 4 10/20 thalers. But if the total labour
time remained the same, then labour would now transform 80 lb. of cotton
into twist, instead of 40. 80 lb. twist, the pound at 4 9/20 thalers, =
356 thalers. [46] The capitalist’s account would be –

  ------------------ ----- ---------- ------------------------------------------------
  _Total receipts_   356   thalers;   deduct for labour

                      90              

                     266              Of which, take off for investment etc.

                     239   17/89      

                     26    72/89      

                                      The capitalist’s gain thus 26 72/89 instead of
                                      20. Say 27 (which a little too high (17/89 too
                                      high)). His total outlays etc. 330; over
                                      12%, although he would make less on
                                      the individual pound.
  ------------------ ----- ---------- ------------------------------------------------

The capitalist’s gain from the value of the measure (unit) of use value
– pound, yard, quarter etc. – decreases in proportion as the relation of
living labour to raw material etc. – of newly added labour – decreases;
i.e. the less labour time is necessary to give the raw material the form
which the unit expresses. Yard of cloth etc. But on the other side, –
since this identical with the increased productivity of labour, or the
growth of surplus labour time – the number of these units grows, units
in which surplus labour time is contained, i.e. labour time not paid
for.

It further follows from the above that the price can fall _below_ the
value, and capital can still make a gain; he must sell, however, a
number multiplied by the unit large enough to form a surplus over the
number multiplied by the unit which forms the necessary price of labour.
If the relation of labour to raw material etc. is 1/5, then he can sell
at e.g. only 1/10 above the constant value, since the surplus labour
_costs_ him _nothing._ He then makes a present of 1/10 of the surplus
labour to the consumer and realizes only 1/10 for himself. This very
important in competition; overlooked in particular by Ricardo. The
determination of prices is founded on the determination of values, but
new elements enter in. The price, which originally appeared only as the
value expressed in money, becomes further determined as itself a
specific magnitude. If 5 thalers is the _value_ of a pound of twist,
i.e. the same labour time as is contained in 5 thalers is contained in 1
pound of twist, then this remains its value regardless of whether 4 or 4
million lb. of twist are being appraised. The moment of the NUMBER OF
POUNDS, because it expresses the relation of surplus labour to necessary
labour in another form, becomes decisively important in the
_determination of price._ This matter brought to popular awareness in
the question of the _ten hours’ bill_ etc.

Specific accumulation _of capital (transformation of surplus labour (revenue) into capital). – Proudhon. Value- and price- determination. In antiquity (slaves) not overproduction but over-consumption_

It follows further from the above:

If the worker were to restrict himself to _necessary labour,_ he would
spin no more than 20 lb. of twist, and realize no more raw material,
machinery etc. than would have a value of 80 thalers monthly. Apart from
the raw material, machinery etc. which are required for the workers
_reproduction,_ self-maintenance, the capitalist must _necessarily_ lay
out capital in raw material (and machinery, even if not in the same
proportion) for the objectification of surplus labour. (In agriculture,
fishery, in short, the extractive industries, this is not absolutely
necessary; it becomes so, however, when they are conducted on a large
scale, i.e. _industrially;_ it appears then as surplus outlay not in raw
material itself, but in the instruments to take it out with.) These
surplus outlays – i.e. the tendering of the material for surplus labour
– of the objective elements of its realization [_Verwirklichung_] are
actually what forms the specific so-called _provisional accumulation_ of
capital: the accumulation of the stock (let us say for the time being)
_specifically_ of capital. For it is stupid, as we shall see more
closely, to regard it as a quality specific to capital – that the
objective conditions of living labour must be present, as such – whether
they are furnished by nature or produced in history. These _specific
advances_ which capital makes signify nothing more than that it
_realizes_ objectified surplus labour – surplus product – in new living
surplus labour, instead of investing (spending) it, like, say, Egyptian
kings or Etruscan priest-nobles for pyramids etc.

Into the _determination of prices_ (as we shall also see with profit)
there also enters – _fraud, reciprocal chicanery._ One party can win in
exchange what the other loses; all they can distribute among themselves
is the surplus value – capital as a class. But these proportions open a
field for individual deception etc. (apart from supply and demand) which
has nothing to do with the determination of value as such.

Thus, out the window goes Mr Proudhon’s discovery that the worker cannot
buy back his product. The basis on which this rests is that he
(Proudhon) understands nothing, either about value-determination or
about price-determination. But, furthermore and regardless of that, his
conclusion that _this is why_ there is over production is false in this
abstraction. In the slave relation, the masters are not troubled by the
fact that the workers do not compete with them as consumers.
(Nevertheless, _production for luxury_ as it presents itself in
antiquity is a necessary result of the slave relation. Not
overproduction, but _over-consumption_ and _insane consumption,_
signifying, by its turn towards the monstrous and the bizarre, the
downfall of the old system of states.)

After capital steps out of the production process as _product,_ it must
be transformed into money again. The money which previously appeared
merely as realized commodity etc., now appears as _realized capital,_
or, realized capital as _money._ This an aspect of _money_ (as of
capital). The mass of money as medium of circulation has nothing to do
with the difficulty of making capital into a reality [_realisieren],_
i.e. of realizing it [_verwerten]._ This can already be seen from the
above development.

_The general rate of profit. – If the capitalist merely sells at_ his own _cost of production, then it is a_ transfer _to another capitalist. Worker gains almost nothing thereby_

In the above example, where the capitalist, if he sells the pound of
twist at 5 thalers – i.e. 40 lb. at 5 thalers each – hence sells the
pound of twist at its _real value_ and thereby gains 1/2 a thaler out of
5 (the selling price), 10% on the selling price, or 1/2 on 4 1/2, i.e.
11 1/9% of his outlay, if he sells at only 10% – assume now a profit of
merely 9/20 of a thaler on 4 1/2 thalers (this is a 1/20 difference from
1/2 on 4 1/2 thalers; a difference of just 1 1/9%). He then sells the
pound at 4 1/2 thalers + 9/20 of a thaler; i.e. at 4 19/20 thalers or
the 40 lb. at 198 thalers. Now various cases are possible. The
capitalist with whom he exchanges – to whom he sells his 40 lb. – assume
him to be the owner of a silver mine, i.e. silver producer – pays him
only 198 thalers – hence gives him 2 thalers too little objectified
labour in silver for the labour objectified in 40 lb. of cotton. Posit
that with this capitalist B, the proportions of the outlay are exactly
the same, etc. If capitalist B also takes only 10 instead of 11 1/9,
then for 200 thalers he could not demand 40 lb. twist, but only 39 3/5.
It is therefore impossible that both capitalists at the same time sell
at 1 1/9% too little, or that the one offered 40 lb. for 198 thalers and
the other offered 200 thalers for 39 3/5 lb., a case that cannot occur.
In the previously assumed case, capitalist B would have paid 1 1/9% too
little in his purchase of 40 lb. twist, i.e. apart from the profit which
he does not obtain from exchange, but which exchange merely confirms,
i.e. a profit of 11 1/9, he would also have gained the 1 1/9% lost by
the other capitalist, for a total of 12 2/9%. From his own workers – the
labour set into motion by his own capital – he would have gained 11
1/9%; the additional 1 1/9% are surplus labour by the workers of
capitalist A, which he appropriates for himself. The _general rate of
profit_ can therefore fall in one or another branch of business if
competition etc. forces the capitalist to sell below the _value,_ i.e.
to realize a part of the surplus labour not for himself, but for those
who buy from him. But the general rate cannot fall in this way; it can
fall only if the proportion of surplus labour to necessary labour falls
_relatively,_ and this, as we saw earlier, takes place if the proportion
is already very large, or, expressed differently, if the proportion of
living labour set into motion by capital is very small – if the part of
capital which exchanges for living labour is very small compared to that
which exchanges for machinery and raw material. The general rate of
profit can fall in that case, even though absolute surplus labour rises.

With that, we come to another point. A _general rate of profit_ as such
is possible only if the rate of profit in one branch of business is too
high and in another too low; i.e. that a part of the surplus value –
which corresponds to surplus labour – is transferred from one capitalist
to the other. If in 5 branches of business, for example, the respective
rate of profit is

  ------ ------ ------ ----- ----
  A      B      C      D     E
  15%,   12%,   10%,   8%,   5%
  ------ ------ ------ ----- ----

then the average rate is 10%; but, in order for this to exist in
reality, capitalist A and B have to give up 7% to D and E – more
particularly, 2 to D and 5 to E – while C remains as it was. It is
impossible for rates of profit on the same capital of 100 to be equal,
since the relations of surplus labour are altogether different,
depending on the productivity of labour and on the relation between raw
material, machinery and wages, and on the overall volume in which
production takes place. But suppose that a given branch of business, E,
is necessary, say, the bakery trade, then the average 10% has to be paid
to it. But this can happen only if A and B credit E with a part of their
surplus labour. The capitalist class thus to a certain extent
distributes the total surplus value so that, to a certain degree, it
[shares in it] evenly in accordance with the _size_ of its capital,
instead of in accordance with the surplus values actually created by the
capitals in the various branches of business. The larger profit –
arising from the real surplus labour within a branch of production, the
really created surplus value – is pushed down to the average level by
competition, and the deficit of surplus value in the other branch of
business raised up to the average level by withdrawal of capitals from
it, i.e. a favourable relation of demand and supply. Competition cannot
lower this level itself, but merely has the tendency to create such a
level. Further developments belong in the section on competition. This
is realized [_realisiert_] by means of the relation of prices in the
different branches of business, which fall _below_ the _value_ in some,
rise _above_ it in others. This makes it seem as if an equal sum of
capital in unequal branches of business created _equal surplus labour or
surplus value._

Now in the above example, where capitalist A is forced, say by
competition, to sell at a profit of 10% instead of 11 1/9%, and hence
sells the pound of twist at 1/20 of a thaler too cheaply, the worker
would continue to obtain 20 thalers as before, in money, his necessary
wages; but in twist, he would obtain 4 4/90 lb. instead of 4 lb. If his
wages were in twist, he would have obtained 4/20 of a thaler = 1/5 of a
thaler or 6 silver groschen, i.e. 1% more than his necessary wages. If
the worker works in a branch of business whose product lies entirely
outside the sphere of his consumption, then he gains not a farthing in
this operation; rather, for him it is a matter of performing a part of
his surplus labour indirectly for capitalist B, instead of directly for
capitalist A; i.e. through the mediation of capitalist A. He can gain
from the fact that capitalist A lets go of a part of the labour
objectified in his product for nothing, only if he is himself a consumer
of this product, and only to the extent that he is such a consumer.
Thus, if his consumption of twist makes up 1/10 of his expenditure, then
he gains exactly 1/50 of a thaler from the operation (2/100 of a thaler
out of 2 thalers, 1/100 of 1, exactly 1% of the 2 thalers), i.e. 1/10%
of his total wages of 20 thalers, or, 7 1/5 pfennigs. This would be the
proportion – 7 1/5 pfennigs – in which he would participate in his own
surplus labour of 20 thalers. Such are the proportions of the surplus
wages which the worker makes at best, when the _price_ in the branch of
business where he is occupied falls below the necessary value. In the
_best case_ – and this is impossible – the limit (in the instance given)
is 6 silver groschen or 1%, i.e. if he could live exclusively on twist;
i.e. in the best case his surplus wages are determined by the relation
of necessary labour time to surplus labour time. In the luxury-goods
industries proper, from whose consumption he is himself excluded, it is
always = 0.

Now let us assume that capitalists A, B, C exchange among one another;
the total product of each = 200 thalers. Let A produce twist, B grain
and C silver; let the relations of surplus and necessary labour, and of
outlays and profit be just the same. A sells 40 lb. twist at 198,
instead of at 200 thalers, and loses 1 1/9% of his gains; ditto B his,
say 40 bushels wheat, at 198 instead of 200; but C exchanges the labour
objectified in his 200 thalers in full. Between A and B the relation is
such that neither of them loses in the exchange with the other. A would
obtain 40 bushels wheat, B 40 lb. twist; but each of them a value of
only 198. C obtains 40 lb. twist or 40 bushels wheat for 198 thalers and
in both cases pays 2 thalers too little, or obtains 2/3 lb. twist or 2/5
bushel wheat too much. But now assume that the relation takes the form
that A sells his 40 lb. to the silver man, C, for 200 thalers, but C has
to pay 202 to the grain man, B, or 2 thalers above its value. Between
twist A and silver C everything is all right; both exchange at value
with each other; but because B’s price has risen above its value, the 40
lb. twist and the 200 thalers silver, when expressed in grain, have
fallen by 1 1/9%, or, neither of them could in fact any longer buy 40
bushels grain for 200 thalers, but only 39 2/5. 39 2/5 bushels wheat
would cost 200 thalers, or the single bushel wheat, [47] instead of 5
thalers, 5 1/20 thalers; 5 thalers 1 1/4 silver groschen. Now, in this
last relation, assume that the worker’s consumption consists 1/2 of
wheat; his twist consumption was 1/10 of his income; his wheat
consumption 5/10. On the 1/10 he had gained 1/10% on his total wages; on
the wheat, he loses 5/10; thus on the whole he loses 4/10% instead of
gaining. Although the capitalist would have paid him his necessary
labour, his wages would fall beneath the necessary pay as a consequence
of grain man B’s overcharging. If this continued on, then his necessary
_wages_ would have to _rise._ Thus if the sale of twist by capitalist A
is due to a rise above value in the price of _grain_ or of other use
values which form the most essential part of the worker’s consumption –
then capitalist A’s worker would lose in the same relation as his
consumption of the now more expensive product is greater than the
cheaper product he himself produces. But if A had sold twist at 1 1/9%
above its value, and B sold grain at 1 1/9% below, then, in the best
case, if the worker consumed nothing but grain, he could gain at most 6
silver groschen, or, since we presupposed half in grain, only 3 silver
groschen, or 3% on his wages of 20 thalers. Thus the worker may
experience all three cases: his gain or loss from the operation = 0; it
may depreciate his necessary wages, so that they no longer suffice,
hence make him fall below the necessary minimum; it can thirdly bring
him a surplus wage, which is resolved into a very small share of his own
surplus labour.

We saw above that if the relation of necessary labour to the other
conditions of production = 2/5 (20 out of 100 total outlay) or = 40% of
the total value (in 20 lb. twist = 4 lb. twist) (or of 100 thalers, 80
raw material and instrument, 20 labour) and the relation of surplus
labour to necessary labour is 100% (i.e. the same quantity), then the
capitalist makes 11 1/9% on his outlay.

If he took only 10% and made a gift of the 1 1/9 or 2 thalers
(transferred surplus value), then the worker, in so far as he is a
consumer, would likewise gain, and in the best (impossible) case, if he
lived only from the products of his master, it would [be], as we saw:

Suppose the capitalist sold the pound of twist at 4 15/20 (4 3/4)
instead of at 5 thalers, then the worker would gain 5/20 on the pound,
and 20/20 = 1 on 4 lb.; but 1 out of 20 = 1/20 = 5% (1 thaler out of
20); the capitalist would sell the 40 lb. at 4 15/20 thalers = 95/20 of
a thaler × 40 = 190 thalers; his outlays 180, his gain = 10 = 5 6/9[%],
his minus-gain = 5 6/9; if he, the capitalist, sold at 4 12/20, then the
worker would gain 8/20 thalers per pound, 32/20 per 4 lb., 1 thaler
12/20 or 1 3/5 thalers on his total wages, i.e. 8 48/119%, while the
capitalist would lose 16 thalers of the surplus gain, or would only keep
altogether 184 thalers, or 4 thalers gain on 180 = 1/45 of 180 = 2 2/9%;
would lose 8 8/9; assume finally the capitalist sold the pound of twist
at 4 1/2 thalers; the 40 lb. at 180; his profit = 0; he would make the
consumer a present of the worker’s surplus value or surplus labour time,
then the worker’s gain = 1/2 of a thaler per lb., = 4/2 of a thaler = 2
thalers, or 2 thalers out of 20 = 10%.

1 1/9% loss on the capitalist’s side:=

1% = 6 silver groschen on 20 thalers (= 1/5 of a thaler out of 20) gain
above wages for the worker: = 1 thaler

5 6/9; (= 10 thalers)

= 5% (1 thaler out of 20)

= 8 8/9% (= 16)

= 8 48/119% (1 thaler 18 silver groschen)

Gain = 0 (loss = 11 1/9%)

 

 

= 10% (2 thalers)
(_less than 1/2 pound_)

If on the other hand the capitalist had raised wages by 10% from 20 to
22 thalers, because, say, the demand for labour in his branch of
business had risen above the supply – while he continued to sell the
pound of twist at its value, i.e. at 5 thalers as before, then his
profit would have fallen by only 2 thalers, from 200 to 198, i.e. by 1
1/9%, and would still have been 10%.

It follows from this that if the capitalist, say, out of consideration
for Mr Proudhon, sold his commodities at the production costs they cost
_him,_ and if his total profit = 0, this would be merely a transfer of
the surplus value or surplus labour time from capitalist A to B, C, D
etc., and as regards his worker, his gain at best – i.e. his share of
his own surplus labour – would be limited to that part of the wage which
he consumed in the depreciated commodity; and if he spent his entire
wages on it, the gain could not be greater than the proportion of
necessary labour to the total product (in the above example 20: 200 =
1/10, 1/10 of 20 = 2 thalers). As regards the other workers, the case is
entirely the same; they gain from the depreciated commodity only in
relation (1) as they consume it; (2) relative to the size of their wage,
which is determined by necessary labour. If the depreciated commodity
were, e.g. grain – one of the staffs of life – then first its producer,
the farmer, and following him all other capitalists, would make the
discovery that the worker’s necessary wage is no longer the necessary
wage; but stands above its level; hence it is brought down; hence
ultimately only the surplus value of capitals A, B, C etc. is increased,
and the surplus labour of those occupied in them.

Posit 5 capitalists, A, B, C, D and E. Let E produce a commodity which
is consumed only by workers. E would then realize his profit purely in
the exchange of his commodity with wages; but, as always, his profit
would originate not in the exchange of his commodity for the workers’
money, but in the exchange of his capital with living labour. Posit that
necessary labour relates in all 5 branches of business at 1/5; let 1/5
be surplus labour in all of them; let constant capital be = 3/5 in all.
Capitalist E exchanges his product for 1/5 of capital A, 1/5 of capital
B, 1/5 of capital C, 1/5 of capital D, and 1/5 constitutes his wages. He
would make no profit on this last 1/5, as we have seen; or rather his
profit would not arise from the fact that he gives the workers 1/5 of
his capital in money, and that they buy back the same 1/5 from him as
money – would not originate from the exchange with them as _consumers,_
as centres of circulation. His whole transaction with them as consumers
rests on the basis that he gives them his product in the form of money,
and they give him back the same money for exactly the same fractional
part of the product. With the workers of A, B, C, D, his relation is not
that of capitalist to worker, but of C[ommodity] to M[oney], of vendor
to buyer. We have presupposed that the workers of A, B, C, D consume no
part of their own products; D does, however, exchange for 1/5 of the
product of A, B, C and E, i.e. 4/5 of their product; but this exchange
is only a detour to get to the wages which A, B, C and D pay their own
workers. They each give the workers money to the value of 1/5 of their
product, or 1/5 of their product as payment for necessary labour, and
with this, with 4/5 of the value of their product or capital, they then
buy E’s commodity. But this exchange with E is then only an indirect
form of advancing the part of capital which represents necessary labour
– i.e. _deduction_ from their capital. They cannot therefore gain
thereby. The gain comes from the realization of the remaining 4/5 of
capital A, B, C, D, and this realization consists of each of them,
through the exchange, getting back the labour objectified in his
product, in another form. For each of them, since there is a division of
labour, 3/5 replaces his constant capital, raw material and material of
labour. Their gain – the realization of surplus labour time, its
positing as surplus value – consists in the reciprocal realization of
the last 1/5. It is not necessary that capitals A, B, C, D exchange the
entire 4/5 with one another. Since they are, as capitalists, at the same
time large consumers, and can in no way live on air, but since, as
capitalists, they do not live from their labour either, they have
nothing to exchange or to consume apart from other peoples’ products.
That is, for their own consumption they exchange just that 1/5 which
represents surplus labour time, the labour created by means of capital.
Posit that each consumes 1/5 of this 1/5, i.e. 1/25, in the form of his
own product. There remain 4/25 to be either realized or to be
transformed into use values for their own consumption through exchange.
Let A exchange 2/25 with B, 1/25 with C, 1/25 with E, and likewise on
the part of B, C, E.

The case we have posited, where capital E realizes the whole of its
profit in exchange with wages, is the most favourable – or expresses,
rather, the only correct relation in which it is possible for capital to
realize the surplus value created in _production_ through _exchange_
with the workers’ consumption. But capitals A, B, C, D can realize their
value in this case only through exchange among one another, i.e. through
the exchange of capitalists among themselves. Capitalist E consumes
nothing of his own commodity, since he has paid 1/5 of it to his own
workers, exchanged 1/5 for 1/5 of capital A, 1/5 for 1/5 of capital B,
1/5 for 1/5 of capital C, 1/5 for 1/5 of capital D. A, B, C, D make no
profit on this exchange, since it is the respective 1/5 which they have
paid to their own workers.

Given the relation we have assumed, of 2/5 raw material, 1/5 machinery,
1/5 workers’ necessaries, and 1/5 surplus product, from which Messrs the
capitalists at the same time live and realize their surplus value, then
we need, if the total product of each of A, B, C, D, E = 100, a producer
E for workers’ necessaries, 2 capitalists A and B, who produce raw
materials for all the others, 1, C, who produces the machinery, and 1,
D, who makes the surplus produce, The accounts would be these (the
machinery-maker etc. has to produce every part of his commodity for
himself):

  ----- ------------------ --------- ----------- ------------- ---------- ------- ----
                           _For      _Raw        _Machinery_   _Surplus           
                           labour_   material_                 product_           

  (A)   Raw material       20        40          20            20         = 100   2½
        manufacturer                                                              

  (B)   Ditto              20        40          20            20         = 100   2½

  (C)   Machinery          20        40          20            20         = 100   2½
        manufacturer                                                              

  (E)   Workers’           20        40          20            20         = 100   2½
        necessaries                                                               

  (D)   Surplus producer   20        40          20            20         = 100   

                           10        20          10            10         = 50    
  ----- ------------------ --------- ----------- ------------- ---------- ------- ----

E therefore exchanges his entire product of 100 for 20 in his own
workers’ wages, 20 in wages for workers of raw material A, 20 for the
workers of raw material B, 20 for the workers of machinery maker C, 20
for the workers of surplus producer D; of this he exchanges 40 for raw
material, 20 for machinery, 20 he obtains back for workers’ necessaries,
and 20 remain for him to buy surplus produce, from which he himself
lives. Likewise the others in the relation. What constitutes their
surplus value is the 1/5 or 20, which all of them can exchange for
surplus product. If they consumed the entire surplus, then they would
have come no further at the end than they were at the beginning, and the
surplus value of their capital would not grow. Posit that they eat up
only 10; or 1/10, half of the surplus value; then surplus producer D
himself would eat up 10 less; and each of the others 10 less; all in
all, then, he would sell only half of his commodity, = 50, and could not
begin his business anew. Posit therefore that he consumes only 50 in
consumables. Likewise, 50 in money, then each of the capitalists A, B,
C, D, E, would accumulate 10 thalers in money. These would represent the
surplus value not consumed. These 10 thalers, or together 50, could be
realized, however, only by being laid out for new labour. In order to
produce more raw material, A and B need 4 thalers more of living labour,
and, since they have no additional machinery for it, more labour by hand
to the amount of 6 thalers. Thus, out of the 400 thalers which exist in
raw materials, machines and workers’ necessaries, only 50 are there for
capitalists’ consumables. But each of the capitalists now owns a surplus
of 10, out of which 4 are in raw material, 2 in machines, 2 in workers’
necessaries, on which he must make a gain of 2 (like 100 from 80, as
before); D has gained 10 on his 40 and can therefore increase his
production in the same proportion, i.e. by 5. The next year he produces
7 1/2% more = 57 1/2.

This example may or may not be continued later. Does not actually belong
here. This much is clear, that realization here takes place in the
exchange among the capitalists, for although E produces only for
workers’ consumption, he exchanges with the others through the form of
wages, 1/5 of A, 1/5 of B, 1/5 of C, 1/5 of D etc. A, B, C, D likewise
exchange with E: not directly, but indirectly, in that each of them
requires 1/5 from him as necessaries for his workers. The realization
consists of each of them exchanging his own product for fractional parts
of the products of the other four, and this in such a way that a part of
the surplus product goes for the capitalist’s own consumption, and a
part is transformed into surplus capital with which to set new labour
into motion. The realization consists of the _real possibility_ of
increased realization – production of new and larger values. It is clear
here that D and E, where E represents all commodities consumed by the
workers and D all those consumed by the capitalists, would have produced
too much – that is, too much relative to the proportion of the part of
capital going to the worker, or too much relative to the part of capital
consumable by the capitalists (too much relative to the proportion by
which they must increase their capital; and this proportion later
obtains a minimum limit in the form of interest) – that _general
overproduction_ would take place, not because relatively _too little_
[sic] had been produced of the commodities consumed by the workers or
too little [sic] of those consumed by the capitalists, but because too
much _of both_ had been produced – _not_ too much _for consumption,_ but
too much to retain _the correct relation between consumption and
realization; too much for realization._

_Barrier of capitalist production. – Relation of surplus labour to necessary labour. Proportion of the surplus consumed by capital to that transformed into capital. – Devaluation during crises_

In other words: At a given point in the development of the productive
forces – for this will determine the relation of necessary labour to
surplus labour – a fixed relation becomes established, in which the
product is divided into one part – corresponding to raw material,
machinery, necessary labour, surplus labour – and finally surplus labour
divides into one part which goes to consumption and another which
becomes capital again. This inner division, inherent in the concept of
capital, appears in exchange in such a way that the exchange of the
capitals among one another takes place in specific and restricted
proportions – even if these are constantly changing, in the course of
production. If the relations are e.g. those of 2/5 raw material, 1/5
machinery, 1/5 wages, 1/5 surplus product, of which 1/10 for
consumption, 1/10 for new production – this is the division within
capital – this will appear in the exchange process as distribution
among, say, 5 capitals. This gives, in any case, both the sum total of
the exchange which can take place, and the proportions in which each of
these capitals must both exchange and produce. If the relation of
necessary labour to the constant part of capital is, as e.g. in the
above example, = 1/5:3/5, then we have seen that the capital which works
for the consumption of capitalists and workers combined may not be
greater than 1/5 + 1/10 of the 5 capitals, each of which represents 1, =
1 1/2 capitals. Given likewise is the relation in which each capital
must exchange with each other one, which represents a specific one of
its own moments. Finally, in which each of them must exchange at all.
If, for example, the relation of raw material = 2/5, then the capitals
which produce raw material can at any final point exchange no more than
3/5, while 2/5 must be regarded as fixed. (E.g. as seed etc. in
agriculture.) _Exchange_ in and for itself gives these conceptually
opposite moments an indifferent being; they exist independently of one
another; their inner necessity becomes _manifest_ in the crisis, which
puts a forcible end to their seeming indifference towards each other.

A revolution in the forces of production further alters these relations,
_changes_ these relations themselves, whose foundations – from the
standpoint of capital and hence also of that of realization through
exchange – always remains _the relation of necessary to surplus labour,_
or, if you like, of the different moments of objectified to living
labour. It is possible, as we have already indicated earlier, that the
capital as well as the living labour capacity set free owing to the
increase in productive forces must both lie dormant, because they are
not present in the proportions in which production must take place on
the basis of the newly developed productive forces. If it proceeds
regardless of that, then ultimately a minus, a negative magnitude, will
come out of the exchange on one side or the other.

The barrier always remains, that exchange – hence production as well –
takes place in such a way that the relation of surplus labour to
necessary labour remains the same – for this is = to the constancy
[_Gleichbleiben_] of the realization of capital. The second relation –
the proportion between the part of the surplus product consumed by
capital and that part transformed anew into capital – is determined by
the first relation. Firstly, _the magnitude of the sum to be divided
into these two parts depends on this original relation;_ secondly, just
as the creation of surplus value by capital depends on the creation of
surplus labour, so does the increase of capital as capital
(accumulation, and, without accumulation, capital cannot form the
foundation of production, since it would remain stagnant, and would not
be an element of progress, required already by the mere increase of
population etc.) depend on the transformation of a part of this surplus
product into new capital. If the surplus value were simply consumed,
then capital would _not_ have realized itself as capital, and not
produced itself as _capital,_ i.e. as value which produces value.

We have seen that if 40 lb. of twist of a value of 200 thalers – because
they contain labour time objectified in 200 thalers – are exchanged for
198 thalers, then not only does the manufacturer of twist lose 1 1/9%
gain; but also his product is devalued, has been sold _below_ its real
value, although it is sold at a _price_ which still leaves him a profit
of 10%. On the other hand, the producer of silver gains 2 thalers. Keeps
2 thalers as liberated capital. Nevertheless, a devaluation has taken
place as regards the total sum. For the sum is 398 thalers instead of
400. For, in the hand of the producer of silver, the 200 thalers of
twist are also worth only 198; it is the same for him as if the
productive force of his labour had increased to the point where the same
objectified labour were contained in 200 thalers as before, but that 2
of these thalers had left the column of necessary outlays in his books
and gone over into the column of surplus value, so that he would have
paid 2 thalers less for necessary labour. The opposite could be the case
only if the silver producer were able to re-sell for 200 thalers the 40
lb. of twist he bought at 198 thalers. Then he would have 202 thalers,
and say he sold them to a manufacturer of silk who gave him silk to the
value of 200 thalers in exchange for the 40 lb. of twist. The 40 lb.
twist would then have been sold at their true value, although not
first-hand by their producer, but rather second-hand, by their buyer,
and the total accounts would look as follows: Exchanged, 3 products each
containing objectified labour of a value of 200 thalers; hence _sum_ of
the values of the capitals: 600. The manufacturer of twist, A, the
manufacturer of silver, B, the manufacturer of silk, C: A 198, B 202
(i.e. 2 extra from the first exchange and 200 in silk), C 200. _Total_
600. In this case the combined value of the capitals remained the same,
and all that took place was a displacement, in that B pocketed as an
extra the value-fraction which A lost.

If A, the twist maker, could sell only 180 (the cost of the thing for
_him_), and absolutely could not find a buyer for 20 twist, then
objectified labour in the amount of 20 thalers would have become
valueless. The same would be the case if he gave a value of 200 for 180
thalers; for B, the manufacturer of silver – to the extent that this
necessity had arisen for A owing to overproduction of twist, so that B,
too, could not get rid of the value contained in the 40 lb. twist for
more than 180 – 20 thalers of his capital would have been set free. He
would have in hand a relative surplus value of 20 thalers, but in
absolute values – objectified labour time to the extent that it is
exchangeable – he would have only 200 as before – that is, 40 lb. twist
at 180 and 20 thalers liberated capital. It would be the same for him as
if the production costs of twist had decreased, i.e. as if, owing to
increased labour productivity, 40 lb. twist contained 20 thalers less
labour time, or as if, with a working day = 4 thalers, 5 working days
less were necessary in order to transform _x_ lb. of cotton into 40 lb.
twist; so that, then, he would have to exchange less labour time
objectified in silver for the labour time objectified in twist. But the
combined sum of the values on hand would be 380 instead of 400. Thus a
_general depreciation_ of 20 thalers would have taken place, or a
destruction of capital to the amount of 20 thalers. A _general
devaluation_ thus takes place despite the fact that the _depreciation_
of the twist manufacturer’s 40 lb. twist from 200 to 180 necessarily
appears as an appreciation on the part of silver, a depreciation of
twist relative to silver; and a general depreciation of prices as such
always includes an appreciation of money, i.e. of the commodity in which
all the others are appraised. Thus, in a crisis – a general depreciation
of prices – there occurs up to a certain moment a _general devaluation_
or _destruction of capital._ The devaluation, like the _depreciation,_
can be absolute and not merely relative, because value expresses not
merely a relation between one commodity and another, as does price, but
rather the relation between the price of the commodity and the labour
objectified in it, or between one amount of objectified labour of the
same quality and another. If these amounts are not equal, then
_devaluation_ takes place, which is not outweighed by appreciation on
the other side, for the other side expresses a fixed amount of
objectified labour which remains unchanged by exchange. In general
crises, this devaluation extends even to living labour capacity itself.
In consequence of what has been indicated above, the destruction of
value and capital which takes place in a crisis coincides with – or
means the same thing as – a general growth of the _productive forces,_
which, however, takes place not by means of a real increase of the
productive force of labour (the extent to which this happens in
consequence of crises is beside the point here), but by means of a
decrease of the existing value of raw materials, machines, labour
capacity. For example. The cotton manufacturer loses capital on his
products (e.g. twist), but he buys the same value of cotton, labour etc.
at a lower price. It is the same for him as if the _real value_ of
labour, of cotton etc., had decreased, i.e. as if they had been produced
more cheaply owing to an increase in the productive force of labour. In
the same way, on the other hand, a sudden general increase in the forces
of production would relatively devalue all the _present values_ which
labour objectifies at the lower stage of the productive forces, and
hence would destroy present capital as well as present labouring
capacity. The other side of the crisis resolves itself into a real
decrease in production, in living labour – in order to restore the
correct relation between necessary and surplus labour, on which, in the
last analysis, everything rests. (Thus it is by no means true, as Lord
Overstone thinks – as a true usurer – that crises simply resolve
themselves in enormous profits for the one, and tremendous losses for
the other.) [48]

_Capital coming out of the production process becomes money again_

Exchange does not change the inner characteristics of realization; but
it projects them to the outside; gives them a reciprocally independent
form, and thereby lets their unity exist merely as an inner necessity,
which must therefore come forcibly to the surface in crises. Both are
therefore posited in the essence of capital: the devaluation
[_Entwertung_] of capital in the production process, as well as the
suspension of devaluation and the creation of the conditions for the
realization [_Verwertung_] of capital. The process by which this takes
place in reality can be examined only as soon as _real_ capital, i.e.
competition etc. – the actual real conditions – have been examined. Does
not belong here yet. On the other hand, _without_ exchange the
production of capital as such would not exist, since _realization_ as
such cannot exist without exchange. Without exchange, the only question
of concern would be the measurement etc. of the _use value_ produced,
only use value as such.

After capital, in the production process, (1) has realized itself, i.e.
created a new value; (2) become devalued, i.e. made the transition from
money to the form of a particular commodity, it (3) realizes itself
together with its new value, in that the product is thrown into
circulation again, and, as C, is exchanged for M. At the point where we
stand now, where capital is being examined only in general, the real
difficulties of this third process are present only as _possibilities,_
and are therefore suspended, again as _possibilities._ Therefore, the
product now posited as having been transformed back into money.

Capital is thus now posited as money again, and money therefore posited
in the _new_ aspect of _realized capital,_ not merely as realized price
of the commodity. Or, the commodity realized in the price is now
realized capital. We will examine this new aspect of money, or rather of
capital as money, later. In accord with the initial nature of money, the
only apparent feature by which capital – when transformed into money –
may be measured is the new value which it has created; i.e. the first
aspect of money as the general measure of commodities repeats itself;
now as the measure of surplus value – of the realization of capital. In
the form of money, this realization appears as measured by itself; as
being its own measure. The capital was originally 100 thalers; because
it is now 110, the measure of its realization is posited in its own form
– as a proportion of the capital returned (returned to its money form)
from the production process and from exchange, relative to the original
capital; no longer as a relation between two unequal qualities –
objectified and living labour – or necessary labour and surplus labour.
When capital is posited as money, it is therefore posited in the first
aspect of money, as measure of value. Here, however, this value is its
own value, or the measure of its self, negation. [49] We will return to
this (under profit).

The second form of money was that of the medium of circulation, and in
this regard the money form of capital appeared as a mere vanishing
moment for the purpose of exchanging it again, but not, as in the case
of money as a medium of circulation in general, an exchange in return
for commodities – use values – for final consumption, but rather an
exchange in return for those particular use values in which it is able
to begin its course as capital anew – raw material and instrument on the
one hand, living labour capacity on the other. In this role it is
_circulating capital,_ about which later. However, the end-product of
money in its role as medium of circulation is the beginning of the act
of production with _posited_ capital as the point of departure, and this
is the point which we will here examine before we go further. (In the
first aspect, _measure,_ the _new value_ did appear as measured; but the
difference merely formal; instead of surplus labour, money – surplus
labour objectified in a specific commodity. But the _qualitative_ nature
of this new value also undergoes a change – i.e. the magnitude of the
measure itself, to be examined only later. Secondly, as medium of
circulation the disappearance of the money form is also merely _formal._
It only becomes _essential_ after not only the first but also the second
circular path has been completed. Thus initially it results only in our
standing again at the beginning of the _realization process._ We
therefore begin to take up the continuation at _this point._)

The third form of money, as independent value in a negative relation
_vis-à-vis_ circulation, is capital which does not step out of the
production process into exchange again to become money. Rather, it is
capital which becomes a commodity and enters into circulation in the
form of self-sufficient value [_sich auf sich selbst beziehenden
Werts_]. This third form presupposes capital in the earlier forms and at
the same time forms the transition from _capital_ to the _particular
capitals,_ the real capitals; since now, in this last form, capital
already in its very concept divides into two capitals with an
independent existence. Along with the duality, plurality in general is
then given. Such is the march of this development. [50]

<Before we go any further, just one remark. _Capital in general,_ as
distinct from the particular capitals, does indeed appear (1) _only as
an abstraction;_ not an arbitrary abstraction, but an abstraction which
grasps the specific characteristics which distinguish capital from all
other forms of wealth – or modes in which (social) production develops.
These are the aspects common to every capital as such, or which make
every specific sum of values into capital. And the distinctions within
this abstraction are likewise abstract particularities which
characterize every kind of capital, in that it is their position
[_Position_] or negation [_Negation_] (e.g. fixed capital or circulating
capital); (2) however, capital in general, as _distinct_ from the
particular real capitals, is itself a _real_ existence. This is
recognized by ordinary economics, even if it is not _understood,_ and
forms a very important moment of its doctrine of equilibrations etc. For
example, capital in this _general form,_ although belonging to
individual capitalists, in its _elemental form_ as capital, forms the
capital which accumulates in the banks or is distributed through them,
and, as Ricardo says, so admirably distributes itself in accordance with
the needs of production. [51] Likewise, through loans etc., it forms a
level between the different countries. If it is therefore e.g. a law of
capital in general that, in order to realize itself, it must posit
itself doubly, and must realize itself in this double form, then e.g.
the capital of a particular nation which represents capital _par
excellence_ in antithesis to another will have to lend itself out to a
third nation in order to be able to realize itself. This double
positing, this relating to self as to an alien, becomes damn real in
this case. While the general is therefore on the one hand only a mental
[_gedachte_] mark of distinction [_differentia specifica],_ it is at the
same time a _particular_ real form alongside the form of the particular
and individual. [52] (We will return later to this point, which, while
having more of a logical than an economic character, will nevertheless
have a great importance in the course of our inquiry. The same also in
algebra. For example, _a, b, c_ are numbers as such; in general; but
then again they are whole numbers as opposed to _a/b, b/c, c/b, c/a,
b/a_ etc., which latter, however, presuppose the former as their general
elements.>

 

_Surplus labour or surplus value becomes surplus capital. All determinants of capitalist production now appear as results of (wage) labour itself. The realization process_ [Verwirklichungsprozess] _of labour at the same time its de-realization process_ [Entwirklichungsprozess]

The new value, then, [is] itself posited as capital again, as
objectified labour entering into the process of exchange with living
labour, and hence dividing itself into a constant part – the objective
conditions of labour, material and instrument – and the conditions for
the subjective condition of labour, the existence of living labour
capacity, the necessaries, subsistence goods for the worker. With this
second entrance by capital in this form, some points appear clarified
which were altogether unclear in its first occurrence – as money in
transition from its role as value to its role as capital. Now they are
solved through the process of realization and production itself. In the
first encounter, the _presuppositions_ themselves appeared to come in
from the outside, out of circulation; as external presuppositions for
the arising of capital; hence not emergent from its inner essence, and
not explained by it. These _external_ presuppositions will now appear as
moments of the motion of capital itself, so that it has itself –
regardless how they may arise historically – pre-posited them as its own
moments.

Within the production process itself, surplus value, the surplus value
procured through compulsion by capital, appeared as _surplus labour,_
itself in the form of living labour, which, however, since it cannot
create something out of nothing, finds its objective conditions laid out
before it. Now this _surplus labour_ appears in objectified form as
_surplus product,_ and, in order to realize itself as capital, this
surplus product divides into a double form: as _objective condition of
labour –_ material and instrument; as subjective – consumption goods for
the living labour now to be put to work. The general form as value –
objectified labour – and objectified labour coming out of circulation –
is of course the general, self-evident presupposition. Further: the
surplus product in its totality – which objectifies surplus labour in
its totality – now appears as _surplus capital_ (in contrast to the
original capital, before it had undertaken this cycle), i.e. as
independent exchange value, in which living labour capacity encounters
its _specific use value._ All moments which confronted living labour
capacity, and employed it as _alien, external_ powers, and which
consumed it under _certain conditions independent of itself,_ are now
posited as _its own product and result._

_Firstly: surplus value or the surplus product_ are nothing but a
specific sum of objectified living labour – the sum of surplus labour.
This new _value_ which confronts living labour as independent, as
engaged in exchange with it, as capital, is the _product of labour._ It
is itself nothing other than the _excess of labour as such above
necessary labour –_ in objective form and hence as _value._

_Secondly:_ the particular forms which this value must adopt in order to
realize itself anew, i.e. to posit itself as capital – on one side as
raw material and instrument, on the other as subsistence goods for
labour during the act of production – are likewise, therefore, only
_particular_ forms of surplus labour itself. Raw material and instrument
are produced by it in such relations – or, it is itself objectively
posited in production as raw material and instrument in such a
proportion – that a given sum of necessary labour – i.e. living labour
which reproduces (the value of) the consumption goods – can objectify
itself in it, and objectify itself in it continuously, i.e. can always
begin anew the diremption into the objective and subjective conditions
of its self-preservation and self-reproduction. In addition to this,
living labour, in the process of reproducing its objective conditions,
has at the same time posited raw material and instrument in such
proportions that it can realize itself in them as _surplus labour, as
labour beyond the necessary,_ and can hence make them into material for
the creation of _new_ values. The objective conditions of _surplus
labour –_ which are restricted to the proportion of raw material and
instrument beyond the requirements of necessary labour, whereas the
objective conditions of necessary labour divide within their objectivity
into objective and subjective, into objective moments of labour as well
as subjective (consumption goods for living labour) – therefore now
appear, are therefore now posited, as the product, result, objective
form, external existence of surplus labour itself. Originally, by
contrast, the fact that instrument and necessaries were on hand in the
amounts which made it possible for living labour to realize itself not
only as _necessary,_ but also as _surplus_ labour – this appeared alien
to living labour itself, appeared as an act of capital.

_Thirdly:_ The independent, for-itself existence [_Fürsichsein_] of
value _vis-à-vis_ living labour capacity – hence its existence as
capital – the objective, self-sufficient indifference, the _alien
quality_ [_Fremdheit_] of the objective conditions of labour _vis-à-vis_
living labour capacity, which goes so far that these conditions confront
the person of the worker in the person of the capitalist – as
personification [53] with its own will and interest – this absolute
_divorce, separation_ of property, i.e. of the objective conditions of
labour from living labour capacity – that they confront him as _alien
property,_ as the reality of other juridical persons, as the absolute
realm of _their_ will – and that labour therefore, on the other side,
appears as _alien labour_ opposed to the value personified in the
capitalist, or the conditions of labour – this absolute separation
between property and labour, between living labour capacity and the
conditions of its realization, between objectified and living labour,
between value and value-creating activity – hence also the alien quality
of the content of labour for the worker himself – this divorce now
likewise appears as a product of labour itself, as objectification of
its own moments. For, in the new act of production itself – which merely
confirmed the exchange between capital and living labour which preceded
it – surplus labour, and hence the surplus product, the total product of
labour in general (of surplus labour as well as necessary labour), has
now been posited as capital, as independent and indifferent towards
living labour capacity, or as exchange value which confronts its mere
use value. Labour capacity has appropriated for itself only the
subjective conditions of necessary labour – the means of subsistence for
actively producing labour capacity, i.e. for its reproduction as mere
labour capacity separated from the conditions of its realization – and
it has posited these conditions themselves as _things, values,_ which
confront it in an alien, commanding personification. The worker emerges
not only not richer, but emerges rather poorer from the process than he
entered. For not only has he produced the conditions of necessary labour
as conditions belonging to capital; but also the value-creating
possibility, the realization [_Verwertung_] which lies as a possibility
within him, now likewise exists as surplus value, surplus product, in a
word as capital, as master over living labour capacity, as value endowed
with its own might and will, confronting him in his abstract,
objectless, purely subjective poverty. He has produced not only the
alien wealth and his own poverty, but also the relation of this wealth
as independent, self-sufficient wealth, relative to himself as the
poverty which this wealth consumes, and from which wealth thereby draws
new vital spirits into itself, and realizes itself anew. All this arose
from the act of exchange, in which he exchanged his living labour
capacity for an amount of objectified labour, except that this
objectified labour – these external conditions of his being, and the
independent externality [_Ausserihmsein_] (to him) of these objective
conditions – now appear as posited by himself, as _his own product,_ as
his own self-objectification as well as the objectification of himself
as a power independent of himself, which moreover rules over him, rules
over him through his own actions.

In _surplus capital,_ all moments are products of _alien labour – alien
surplus labour_ transformed into capital; means of subsistence for
necessary labour; the objective conditions – material and instrument –
whereby necessary labour can reproduce the value exchanged for it in
means of subsistence; finally the amount of material and instrument
required so that new surplus labour can realize itself in them, or a new
surplus value can be created.

It no longer seems here, as it still did in the first examination of the
production process, as if capital, for its part, brought with it any
value whatever from circulation. Rather, the objective conditions of
labour now appear as labour’s product – both to the extent that they are
value in general, and as use values for production. But while capital
thus appears as the product of labour, so does the product of labour
likewise appear as capital – no longer as a simple product, nor as an
exchangeable commodity, but as _capital;_ objectified labour as mastery,
command over living labour. The product of labour appears as _alien
property,_ as a mode of existence confronting living labour as
independent, as _value_ in its being for itself; the product of labour,
objectified labour, has been endowed by living labour with a soul of its
own, and establishes itself opposite living labour as an _alien power:_
both these situations are themselves the product of labour. Living
labour therefore now appears from its own standpoint as acting within
the production process in such a way that, as it realizes itself in the
objective conditions, it simultaneously repulses this realization from
itself as an alien reality, and hence posits itself as insubstantial, as
mere penurious labour capacity in face of this reality alienated
[_entfremdet_] from it, belonging not to it but to others; that it
posits its own reality not as a being for it, but merely as a being for
others, and hence also as mere other-being [_Anderssein_], or being of
another opposite itself. [54] This realization process is at the same
time the de-realization process of labour. It posits itself objectively,
but it posits this, its objectivity, as its own not-being or as the
being of its not-being – of capital. It returns back into itself as the
mere possibility of value-creation or realization [_Verwertung_];
because the whole of real wealth, the world of real value and likewise
the real conditions of its own realization [_Verwirklichung_] are
posited opposite it as independent existences. As a consequence of the
production process, the possibilities resting in living labour’s own
womb exist outside it as realities – but as _realities alien_ to it,
which form wealth in opposition to it.

In so far as the surplus product is realized anew as surplus capital,
enters anew into the process of production and self-realization, it
divides into (1) means of subsistence for the workers, to be exchanged
for living labour capacity; let this part of _capital_ be designated as
_labour fund;_ this labour fund, the part allotted for the maintenance
of living labour capacity – and for its progressive maintenance, since
surplus capital constantly grows – now likewise appears as the product
of _alien_ labour, labour alien to _capital,_ as well as (2) its other
component parts – the material conditions for the reproduction of a
value = to these means of subsistence + a surplus value.

Further, if we consider this surplus capital, then the division of
capital into a constant part – raw material and instrument with an
antediluvian existence before labour – and a variable part, i.e. the
necessary goods exchangeable for living labour capacity, appears as
purely formal, in so far as both of them are equally _posited_ by labour
and are equally posited by it as its own _presuppositions_. Now,
however, this internal division of capital appears in such a way that
labour’s own product – objectified surplus labour – splits into two
component parts – the objective conditions for new realization of labour
(1), and a labour fund for maintaining the possibility of this living
labour, i.e. of living labour capacity as alive (2), but in such a way
that labour capacity can only re-appropriate that part of its own result
– of its own being in objective form – which is designated as labour
fund, can appropriate and extract this part from the form of the alien
wealth which confronts it, only by reproducing not merely its own value,
but by also realizing that part of the new capital which represents the
objective conditions for the realization of new surplus labour and
surplus production, or production of surplus values. Labour has itself
created a new fund for the employment of new necessary labour, or, what
is the same, a fund for the maintenance of new living labour capacities,
of workers, but has created at the same time the condition that this
fund can be employed only if new surplus labour is employed on the extra
part of the surplus capital. Thus, the production by labour of this
surplus capital – surplus value – is at the same time the creation of
the real necessity of new surplus labour, and thus surplus capital is
itself at the same time the real possibility both of new surplus labour
and of new surplus capital. It here becomes evident that labour itself
progressively extends and gives an ever wider and fuller existence to
the objective world of wealth as a power alien to labour, so that,
relative to the values created or to the real conditions of
value-creation, the penurious subjectivity of living labour capacity
forms an ever more glaring contrast. The greater the extent to which
labour objectifies itself, the greater becomes the objective world of
values, which stands opposite it as alien – alien property. With the
creation of surplus capital, labour places itself under the compulsion
to create yet further surplus capital etc. etc.

In regard to the original not-surplus capital, the relation has changed,
as regards labour capacity, in so far as (1) the part of it which is
exchanged for necessary labour has been reproduced by this labour
itself, i.e. no longer comes to it out of circulation, but is its own
product; and (2) that part of the value which, as raw material and
instrument, represents the real conditions for the realization
[_Verwertung_] of living labour, has been maintained by it itself in the
production process; and, since every use value by its nature consists of
transitory material, but since exchange value is present, exists, only
in use value, therefore this maintenance = protection from decay and
ruin, or negation of the transitory nature of the values owned by the
capitalists; hence, this maintenance means to posit them as values
for-themselves, as _indestructible wealth._ Hence, this original sum of
values has been posited for the first time as capital in the production
process, by living labour.

_Formation of surplus capital I. – Surplus capital II. – Inversion of the law of appropriation. – Chief result of the production and realization process: the reproduction and new production of the relation of capital and labour itself, of capitalist and worker_

Now, from the standpoint of capital: As regards the _surplus capital,_
the capitalist represents value for-itself, money in its third moment,
wealth, by means of simple _appropriation of alien labour;_ since every
moment of surplus capital, material, instrument, necessaries, resolves
into _alien labour,_ which the capitalist does not appropriate by means
of _exchange_ for existing values, but has appropriated _without
exchange._ True, the exchange of a part of _values belonging to him,_ or
of _objectified labour_ possessed by him, for alien living labour
capacity, appears as the _original precondition_ for this _surplus
capital._ For the formation of _surplus capital I,_ if we give that name
to the surplus capital emerging from the original production process,
i.e. for the _appropriation of alien labour,_ of _objectified alien
labour,_ it appears as a condition that the capitalist should possess
_values,_ of which he _formally_ exchanges one part for living labour
capacity. We say formally, because living labour must replace and return
to him these _exchanged_ values as well. But be this as it may. In any
case, it appears as a condition for the formation of surplus capital I,
i.e. for the appropriation of alien labour or of the values in which it
is objectified, that there must be an exchange of values belonging to
the capitalist, thrown into circulation by him, and supplied to living
labour capacity by him – of values which do _not_ arise from his
_exchange_ with living labour, or not from his relation as _capital_ to
_labour._

But now let us think of this surplus capital as having been thrown back
into the production process, as realizing its surplus value anew in
exchange, and as appearing anew as new surplus capital at the beginning
of a third production process. This, _surplus capital II,_ has different
presuppositions from surplus capital I. The presupposition of surplus
capital I was the existence of values belonging to the capitalist and
thrown by him into circulation, or, more exactly, into the exchange with
living labour capacity. The presupposition of surplus capital II is
nothing more than the existence of surplus capital I; i.e. in other
words, the presupposition that the capitalist has already appropriated
alien labour without exchange. This puts him into a position where he is
able to begin the process again and again. True, in order to create
surplus capital II, he had to exchange a part of the value of surplus
capital I in the form of means of subsistence for living labour
capacity, but the values he gave in that exchange were not values which
he originally put into circulation out of his own funds; they were,
rather, objectified alien labour which he appropriated without giving
any equivalent whatever, and which he now re-exchanges for alien living
labour; in the same way, moreover, as the material etc. in which this
new labour realizes itself and in which it creates surplus value have
come into his hands without exchange, by mere appropriation. _The
previous appropriation of alien labour now appears as the simple
precondition for the new appropriation of alien labour;_ or, his
ownership of alien labour in objective (material) form, in the form of
existing values, appears as the condition of his ability to appropriate
new alien _living_ labour capacity, hence surplus labour, labour without
equivalent. The fact that he has previously confronted living labour as
capital appears as the only condition required in order that he may not
only maintain himself as capital, but also, as a growing capital,
increasingly _appropriate_ alien labour without equivalent; or, that he
may extend his power, his existence as capital opposite living labour
capacity, and on the other side constantly posit living labour capacity
anew in its subjective, insubstantial penury as living labour capacity.
Property – previous, or objectified, alien labour – appears as the only
condition for further appropriation of present or living alien labour.
In so far as surplus capital I was created by means of a simple exchange
between objectified labour and living labour capacity – an exchange
entirely based on the laws of the exchange of equivalents as measured by
the quantity of labour or labour time contained in them – and _in so far
as_ the legal expression of this exchange presupposed nothing other than
everyone’s right of property over his own products, and of free
disposition over them – but in so far as the relation of surplus capital
II to I is therefore a consequence of this first relation – we see that,
by a peculiar logic, the right of property undergoes a dialectical
inversion [_dialektischer Umschlag_], so that on the side of capital it
becomes the right to an alien product, or the right of property over
alien labour, the right to appropriate alien labour without an
equivalent, and, on the side of labour capacity, it becomes the duty to
relate to one’s own labour or to one’s own product as to _alien
property._ The right of property is inverted, to become, on the one
side, the right to appropriate alien labour, and, on the other, the duty
of respecting the product of one’s own labour, and one’s own labour
itself, as values belonging to others. The exchange of equivalents,
however, which appeared as the original operation, an operation to which
the right of property gave legal expression, has become turned round in
such a way that the exchange by one side is now only illusory, since the
part of capital which is exchanged for living labour capacity, firstly,
is itself _alien labour,_ appropriated without equivalent, and,
secondly, _has to be replaced with a surplus by living labour capacity,_
is thus in fact not consigned away, but merely changed from one form
into another. The relation of exchange has thus dropped away entirely,
or is a _mere semblance._ Furthermore, the right of property originally
appeared to be based on one’s own labour. Property now appears as the
right to alien labour, and as the impossibility of labour appropriating
its own product. The complete separation between property, and, even
more so, wealth, and labour, now appears as a consequence of the law
which began with their identity.

Finally, the result of the process of production and realization is,
above all, the reproduction and new production of the _relation of
capital and labour itself,_ of _capitalist and worker._ This social
relation, production relation, appears in fact as an even more important
result of the process than its material results. And more particularly,
within this process the worker produces himself as labour capacity, as
well as the capital confronting him, while at the same time the
capitalist produces himself as capital as well as the living labour
capacity confronting him. Each reproduces itself, by reproducing its
other, its negation. The capitalist produces labour as alien; labour
produces the product as alien. The capitalist produces the worker, and
the worker the capitalist etc.

Original accumulation of capital. _(The real accumulation). – Once developed historically, capital itself creates the conditions of its existence (not as conditions for its arising, but as results of its being). – (Performance of personal services, as opposed to wage labour.) – Inversion of the law of appropriation. Real alien relation_ [Fremdheit] _of the worker to his product. Division of labour. Machinery etc._

Once production founded on capital is presupposed – money has become
transformed into capital actually only at the _end of the first
production_ process, which resulted in its reproduction and in the new
production of surplus capital I; surplus capital I, however, is itself
_posited,_ realized as surplus capital, only when it has produced
surplus capital II, i.e. as soon as those presuppositions of money,
while it is in the process of passing over into capital, which still lie
outside the movement of _real_ capital have vanished, and when capital
has therefore itself posited, and posited in accordance with its
immanent essence, the conditions which form its point of departure in
production – [then] the condition that the capitalist, in order to posit
himself as capital, must bring values into circulation which he created
with his own labour – or by some other means, excepting only already
available, previous wage labour – belongs among the antediluvian
conditions of capital, belongs to its _historic presuppositions,_ which,
precisely as such _historic_ presuppositions, are past and gone, and
hence belong to the _history of its formation,_ but in no way to its
_contemporary_ history, i.e. not to the real system of the mode of
production ruled by it. While e.g. the flight of serfs to the cities is
one of the _historic_ conditions and presuppositions of urbanism, it is
not a _condition,_ not a moment of the reality of developed cities, but
belongs rather to their _past_ presuppositions, to the presuppositions
of their becoming which are suspended in their being. The conditions and
presuppositions of the _becoming,_ of the _arising,_ of capital
presuppose precisely that it is not yet in being but merely in
_becoming;_ they therefore disappear as real capital arises, capital
which itself, on the basis of its own reality, posits the conditions for
its realization. Thus e.g. while the process in which money or value
for-itself originally becomes capital presupposes on the part of the
capitalist an accumulation – perhaps by means of savings garnered from
products and values created by his own labour etc., which he has
undertaken as a _not-capitalist,_ i.e. while the presuppositions under
which money becomes capital appear as given, external _presuppositions_
for the arising of capital – [nevertheless,] as soon as capital has
become capital as such, it creates its own presuppositions, i.e. the
possession of the real conditions of the creation of new values _without
exchange –_ by means of its own production process. These
presuppositions, which originally appeared as conditions of its becoming
– and hence could not spring from its _action as capital –_ now appear
as results of its own realization, reality, as _posited by it – not as
conditions of its arising, but as results of its presence._ It no longer
proceeds from presuppositions in order to become, but rather it is
itself presupposed, and proceeds from itself to create the conditions of
its maintenance and growth. Therefore, the conditions which preceded the
creation of surplus capital I, or which express the becoming of capital,
do not fall into the sphere of that mode of production for which capital
serves as the presupposition; as the historic preludes of its becoming,
they lie behind it, just as the processes by means of which the earth
made the transition from a liquid sea of fire and vapour to its present
form now lie beyond its life as finished earth. That is, individual
capitals can continue to arise e.g. by means of hoarding. But the hoard
is transformed into capital only by means of the exploitation of labour.
The bourgeois economists who regard capital as an eternal and _natural_
(not historical) form of production then attempt at the same time to
legitimize it again by formulating the conditions of its becoming as the
conditions of its contemporary realization; i.e. presenting the moments
in which the capitalist still appropriates as not-capitalist – because
he is still becoming – as the very conditions in which he appropriates
_as capitalist._ These attempts at apologetics demonstrate a guilty
conscience, as well as the inability to bring the mode of appropriation
of capital as capital into harmony with the _general laws of property_
proclaimed by capitalist society itself. On the other side, much more
important for us is that our method indicates the points where
historical investigation must enter in, or where bourgeois economy as a
merely historical form of the production process points beyond itself to
earlier historical modes of production. In order to develop the laws of
bourgeois economy, therefore, it is not necessary to write the _real
history of the relations of production_. But the correct observation and
deduction of these laws, as having themselves become [55] in history,
always leads to primary equations – like the empirical numbers e.g. in
natural science – which point towards a past lying behind this system.
These indications [_Andeutung_], together with a correct grasp of the
present, then also offer the key to the understanding of the past – a
work in its own right which, it is to be hoped, we shall be able to
undertake as well. [56] This correct view likewise leads at the same
time to the points at which the suspension of the present form of
production relations gives signs of its becoming – foreshadowings of the
future. Just as, on one side the pre-bourgeois phases appear as _merely
historical,_ i.e. suspended presuppositions, so do the contemporary
conditions of production likewise appear as engaged in _suspending
themselves_ and hence in positing the _historic presuppositions_ for a
new state of society.

Now, if we initially examine the relation such as it has become, value
having become capital, and living labour confronting it as mere use
value, so that living labour appears as a mere means to realize
objectified, dead labour, to penetrate it with an animating soul while
losing its own soul to it – and having produced, as the end-product,
alien wealth on one side and [, on the other,] the penury which is
living labour capacity’s sole possession – then the matter is simply
this, that the process itself, in and by itself, posits the real
objective conditions of living labour (namely, material in which to
realize itself, instrument with which to realize itself, and necessaries
with which to stoke the flame of living labour capacity, to protect it
from being extinguished, to supply its vital processes with the
necessary fuels) and posits them as alien, independent existences – or
as the mode of existence of an _alien person,_ as self-sufficient values
for-themselves, and hence as values which form wealth alien to an
isolated and subjective labour capacity, wealth of and for the
capitalist. The objective conditions of living labour appear as
_separated, independent_ [_verselbständigte_] values opposite living
labour capacity as subjective being, which therefore appears to them
only as a value of _another kind_ (not as value, but different from
them, as use value). Once this separation is given, the production
process can only produce it anew, reproduce it, and reproduce it on an
expanded scale. How it does this, we have seen. The objective conditions
of living labour capacity are presupposed as having an existence
independent of it, as the objectivity of a subject distinct from living
labour capacity and standing independently over against it; the
reproduction and _realization_ [_Verwertung_], i.e. the expansion of
these _objective conditions,_ is therefore at the same time their own
reproduction and new production as the wealth of an alien subject
indifferently and independently standing over against labour capacity.
What is reproduced and produced anew [_neuproduziert_] is not only the
_presence_ of these objective conditions of living labour, _but also
their presence as independent values, i.e. values belonging to an alien
subject, confronting this living labour capacity._ The objective
conditions of labour attain a subjective existence _vis-à-vis_ living
labour capacity – capital turns into capitalist; on the other side, the
merely subjective presence of the labour capacity confronted by its own
conditions gives it a merely indifferent, objective form as against them
– it is merely a _value_ of a particular use value _alongside_ the
conditions of its own realization [_Verwertung_] as _values_ of another
use value. Instead of their being realized [_realisiert_] in the
production process as the conditions of its realization
[_Verwirklichung_], what happens is quite the opposite: it comes out of
the process as mere condition for _their_ realization [_Verwertung_] and
preservation as values for-themselves opposite living labour capacity.
The material on which it works is _alien_ material; the instrument is
likewise an _alien_ instrument; its labour appears as a mere accessory
to their substance and hence objectifies itself in things not _belonging
to it._ Indeed, living labour itself appears as _alien vis-à-vis_ living
labour capacity, whose labour it is, whose own life’s expression
[_Lebensäusserung_] it is, for it has been surrendered to capital in
exchange for objectified labour, for the product of labour itself.
Labour capacity relates to its labour as to an alien, and if capital
were willing to pay it _without_ making it labour it would enter the
bargain with pleasure. Thus labour capacity’s own labour is as alien to
it – and it really is, as regards its direction etc. – as are material
and instrument. Which is why the product then appears to it as a
combination of alien material, alien instrument and alien labour – as
_alien property,_ and why, after production, it has become poorer by the
life forces expended, but otherwise begins the drudgery anew, existing
as a mere subjective labour capacity separated from the conditions of
its life. The recognition [_Erkennung_] of the products as its own, and
the judgement that its separation from the conditions of its realization
is improper – forcibly imposed – is an enormous [advance in] awareness
[_Bewusstsein_], itself the product of the mode of production resting on
capital, and as much the knell to its doom as, with the slave’s
awareness that he _cannot be the property of another,_ with his
consciousness of himself as a person, the existence of slavery becomes a
merely artificial, vegetative existence, and ceases to be able to
prevail as the basis of production.

However, if we consider the original relation, before the entry of money
into the self-realization process, then various conditions appear which
have to have arisen, or been given historically, for money to become
capital and labour to become capital-positing, capital-creating labour,
wage labour. _(Wage labour,_ here, in the strict economic sense in which
we use it here, and no other – and we will later have to distinguish it
from other forms of labour for day-wages etc. – is capital-positing,
capital-producing labour, i.e. living labour which produces both the
objective conditions of its realization as an activity, as well as the
objective moments of its being as labour _capacity,_ and produces them
as alien powers opposite itself, as _values for-themselves, independent
of it.)_ The essential conditions are themselves posited in the relation
as it appears originally: (1) on the one side the presence of living
labour capacity as a merely _subjective_ existence, separated from the
_conditions_ of living labour as well as from the _means of existence,
the necessary goods,_ the means of self-preservation of living _labour
capacity;_ the living possibility of labour, on the one side, in this
complete abstraction; (2) the value, or objectified labour, found on the
other side, must be an accumulation of use values sufficiently large to
furnish the objective conditions not only for the production of the
products or values required to reproduce or maintain living labour
capacity, but also for the absorption of surplus labour – to supply the
objective material for the latter; (3) a free exchange relation – money
circulation – between both sides; between the extremes a relation
founded on exchange values – not on the master–servant relation – i.e.,
hence, production which does not directly furnish the producer with his
necessaries, but which is mediated through exchange, and which cannot
therefore usurp alien labour directly, but must buy it, exchange it,
from the worker himself; finally (4) one side – the side representing
the objective conditions of labour in the form of independent values
for-themselves – must present itself as _value,_ and must regard the
positing of value, self-realization, money-making, as the ultimate
purpose – not direct consumption or the creation of use value.

So long as _both_ sides exchange their labour with one another in the
form of _objectified_ labour, the relation is impossible; it is likewise
impossible if _living labour capacity_ itself appears as the property of
the other side, hence as not engaged in exchange. (The fact that slavery
is possible at individual points within the bourgeois system of
production does not contradict this. However, slavery is then possible
there only because it does not exist at other points; and appears as an
anomaly opposite the bourgeois system itself.)

The conditions under which the relation appears at the origin, or which
appear as the historic presuppositions of its becoming, reveal at first
glance a two-sided character – on one side, dissolution of lower forms
of living labour; on the other, dissolution of happier forms of the
same.

The first presupposition, to begin with, is that the relation of slavery
or serfdom has been suspended. Living labour capacity belongs to itself,
and has disposition over the expenditure of its forces, through
exchange. Both sides confront each other as persons. _Formally,_ their
relation has the equality and freedom of exchange as such. As far as
concerns the legal relation, the fact that this form is a mere
_semblance,_ and a _deceptive semblance,_ appears as an _external_
matter. What the free worker sells is always nothing more than a
specific, particular measure of force-expenditure [_Kraftäusserung_];
labour capacity as a totality is greater than every particular
expenditure. He sells the particular expenditure of force to a
particular capitalist, whom he confronts as an independent _individual._
It is clear that this is not his relation to the existence of capital as
capital, i.e. to the capitalist class. Nevertheless, in this way
everything touching on the individual, real person leaves him a wide
field of choice, of arbitrary will, and hence of formal freedom. In the
slave relation, he belongs to the _individual, particular_ owner, and is
his labouring machine. As a totality of force-expenditure, as labour
capacity, he is a thing [_Sache_] belonging to another, and hence does
not relate as subject to his particular expenditure of force, nor to the
act of living labour. In the serf relation he appears as a moment of
property in land itself, is an appendage of the soil, exactly like
draught-cattle. In the slave relation the worker is nothing but a living
labour-machine, which therefore has a value for others, or rather is a
value. The totality of the free worker’s labour capacity appears to him
as his property, as one of his moments, over which he, as subject,
exercises domination, and which he maintains by expending it. This to he
developed later under wage labour.

The exchange of objectified labour for living labour does not yet
constitute either capital on one side or wage labour on the other. The
entire class of so-called _services_ from the bootblack up to the king
falls into this category. Likewise the free day-labourer, whom we
encounter sporadically in all places where either the oriental community
[_Gemeinwesen_] or the western commune [_Gemeinde_] consisting of free
landowners dissolves into individual elements – as a consequence of
increase of population, release of prisoners of war, accidents by which
the individual is impoverished and loses the objective conditions of his
self-sustaining labour, owing to division of labour etc. If A exchanges
a value or money, i.e. objectified labour, in order to obtain a service
from B, i.e. living labour, then this can belong:

(1) _within the relation of simple circulation._ Both in fact exchange
only use values with one another; one exchanges necessaries, the other
labour, a service which the other wants to consume, either directly –
personal service – or he furnishes him the material etc. from which,
with his labour, with the objectification of his labour, he makes a use
value, a use value designed for A’s consumption. For example, when the
peasant takes a wandering tailor, of the kind that existed in times
past, into his house, and gives him the material to make clothes with.
Or if I give money to a doctor to patch up my health. What is important
in these cases is the service which both do for one another. _Do ut
facias_ here appears on quite the same level as _facio ut des,_ or _do
ut des._ [57] The man who takes the cloth I supplied to him and makes me
an article of clothing out of it gives me a use value. But instead of
giving it directly in objective form, he gives it in the form of
activity. I give him a completed use value; he completes another for me.
The difference between previous, objectified labour and living, present
labour here appears as a merely formal difference between the different
tenses of labour, at one time in the perfect and at another in the
present. It appears in fact as a merely formal difference, a difference
mediated by division of labour and by exchange, whether B himself
produces the necessaries on which he has to subsist, or whether he
obtains them from A and, instead of producing the necessaries himself,
produces an article of clothing, in exchange for which he obtains them
from A. In both cases he can take possession of the use value possessed
by A only by giving him an equivalent for it; which, in the last
analysis, always resolves itself into his own living labour, regardless
of the objective form it may adopt, whether before the exchange is
concluded, or as a consequence of it. Now, the article of clothing not
only contains a specific, form-giving labour – a specific form of
usefulness imparted to the cloth by the movement of labour – but it
contains also a certain quantity of labour – hence not only use value,
but _value_ generally, _value_ as such. But this value does not exist
for A, since he consumes the article, and is not a clothes-dealer. He
has therefore bought the labour not as _value-positing_ labour, but as
an activity which creates utility, use value. In the case of personal
services, this use value is consumed as such without making the
transition from the form of movement [_Bewegung_] into the form of the
object [_Sache_]. If, as is frequently the case in simple relations, the
performer of the service does not obtain _money,_ but direct use values
themselves, then it no longer even seems as if _value_ were being dealt
in on one or the other side; merely use values. But even given that A
pays money for the service, this is not a transformation of his money
into capital, but rather the positing of his money as mere medium of
circulation, in order to obtain an object for consumption, a specific
use value. This act is for that reason not an act which produces wealth,
but the opposite, one which consumes wealth. The point for A is not the
objectification in the cloth of labour as such, of a certain amount of
labour time, hence _value,_ but rather the satisfaction of a certain
need. Here A sees his money not _realized_ but _devalued_ in its
transposition from the form of value into that of use value. Labour is
here exchanged not as use value for value, but as itself a particular
use value, as value for use. The more frequently A repeats the exchange,
the poorer does he become. This exchange is not an _act of
wealth-getting_ for him, not an act of _value creation,_ but of
_devaluation_ of the values he has in hand, in his possession. The money
which A here exchanges for living labour – service in kind, or service
objectified in a thing – is not _capital_ but revenue, money as a medium
of circulation in order to obtain use value, money in which the form of
value is posited as merely vanishing, not money which will preserve and
realize itself as such through the acquisition of labour. Exchange of
_money as revenue,_ as a mere medium of circulation, for living labour,
can never posit money as capital, nor, therefore, labour as wage labour
in the economic sense. A lengthy disquisition is not required to show
that to consume (spend) money is not the same as to produce money. In
situations in which the greatest part of surplus labour appears as
agricultural labour, and where the owner of the land therefore appears
as owner both of surplus labour and of the surplus product, it is the
revenue of the owner of the land which forms the labour fund for the
free worker, for the worker in manufactures (here, hand crafts) as
opposed to the agricultural labourers. The exchange with them [58] is a
form of the consumption of the owner of the land – he divides another
part of his revenue directly – for personal services, often only the
illusion of services, with a heap of retainers. In Asiatic societies,
where the monarch appears as the exclusive proprietor of the
agricultural surplus product, whole cities arise, which are at bottom
nothing more than wandering encampments, from the exchange of his
revenue with the ‘free hands’, as Steuart calls them. [59] There is
nothing of wage labour in this relation, but it _can_ stand in
opposition to slavery and serfdom, though _need_ not do so, for it
always repeats itself under various forms of the overall organization of
labour. To the extent that _money_ mediates this exchange the
determination of prices will become important on both sides, but it will
do so for A only in so far as he does not want to pay too much for the
_use value_ of the labour; not in so far as he is concerned with its
_value._ The essence of the relation remains unchanged even if this
price, which begins as conventional and traditional, is thereafter
increasingly determined economically, first by the relation of demand
and supply, finally by the production costs at which the vendors
themselves of these living services can be produced; nothing is
essentially changed thereby, because the determination of prices remains
a merely formal moment for the exchange of mere use values, as before.
This determination itself, however, is created by other relations, by
the general laws and the self-determination of the ruling mode of
production, acting, as it were, behind the back of this particular act
of exchange. One of the forms in which this kind of pay [_Besoldung_]
first appears in the old communities is where an _army_ is maintained.
The pay [_Sold_] of the common soldier is also reduced to a minimum –
determined purely by the production costs necessary to procure him. But
he exchanges the performance of his services not for _capital,_ but for
the revenue of the state.

In bourgeois society itself, all exchange of personal services for
revenue – including labour for personal consumption, cooking, sewing
etc., garden work etc., up to and including all of the unproductive
classes, civil servants, physicians, lawyers, scholars etc. – belongs
under this rubric, within this category. All menial servants etc. By
means of their services – often coerced – all these workers, from the
least to the highest, obtain for themselves a share of the surplus
product, of the capitalist’s _revenue._ But it does not occur to anyone
to think that by means of the exchange of his revenue for such services,
i.e. through private consumption, the capitalist posits himself as
capitalist. Rather, he thereby spends the fruits of his capital. It does
not change the nature of the relation that the proportions in which
revenue is exchanged for this kind of living labour are themselves
determined by the general laws of production.

As we have already mentioned in the section on _money,_ [60] it is here
rather the performer of the service who actually posits _value;_ who
transposes a use value – a certain kind of labour, service etc. – into
_value, money._ Hence in the Middle Ages, those who are oriented towards
the production and accumulation of money proceed partly not from the
side of the consuming landed nobility, but quite the opposite, from the
side of living labour; they accumulate and thus become capitalists,
δυνάμει, for a later period. The emancipated serf becomes, in part, the
capitalist.

It thus does not depend on the general relation, but rather on the
natural, particular quality of the service performed, whether the
recipient of payment receives it as day-wages, or as an honorarium, or
as a sinecure – and whether he appears as superior or inferior in rank
to the person paying for the service. However, with the presupposition
of capital as the dominant power, all these relations become more or
less _dishonoured._ But this does not belong here yet – this
_demystification_ [_Entgötterung_] of personal services, regardless of
the lofty character with which tradition may have poetically endowed
them.

It is not, then, simply the exchange of _objectified labour_ for
_living_ labour – which appear, from this standpoint, as two different
aspects, as use values in different forms, the one objective, the other
subjective – which constitutes capital and hence wage labour, but
rather, the exchange of objectified labour as _value,_ as
self-sufficient value, for living labour as _its_ use value, a use value
not for a specific, particular use or consumption, but as use value for
_value._

In the exchange of money for labour or service, with the aim of direct
consumption, a real exchange always takes place; the fact that _amounts
of labour_ are exchanged on both sides is of merely _formal_ interest
for measuring the _particular_ forms of the utility of labour by
comparing them with each other. This concerns only the _form_ of the
exchange; but does not form its _content._ In the exchange of capital
for labour, _value_ is not a measure of the exchange of two use values,
but is rather the _content of the exchange_ itself.

(2) In periods of the dissolution of _pre-bourgeois_ relations, there
sporadically occur free workers whose services are bought for purposes
not of consumption, but of _production;_ but, _firstly,_ even if on a
large scale, for the production only of _direct_ use values, not of
_values;_ and _secondly,_ if a nobleman e.g. brings the free worker
together with his serfs, even if he re-sells a part of the worker’s
product, and the free worker thus creates _value_ for him, then this
exchange takes place only for the superfluous [product] and only for the
sake of superfluity, for _luxury consumption;_ is thus at bottom only a
veiled purchase of alien labour for immediate consumption or as use
value. Incidentally, wherever these free workers increase in number, and
where this relation grows, there the old mode of production – commune,
patriarchal, feudal etc. – is in the process of dissolution, and the
elements of real wage labour are in preparation. But these free servants
[_Knechte_] can also emerge, as e.g. in Poland etc., and vanish again,
without a change in the mode of production taking place.

<In order to express the relations into which capital and wage labour
enter as _property relations_ or _laws,_ we need do no more than express
the conduct of both sides in the _realization process_ as an
_appropriation process._ For example, the fact that surplus labour is
posited as surplus value of capital means that the worker does not
appropriate the product of his own labour; that it appears to him as
_alien property;_ inversely, that _alien labour_ appears as the property
of capital. This second law of bourgeois property, the inversion of the
first – which, through laws of inheritance etc., attains an existence
independent of the accidental transitoriness of individual capitalists –
becomes just as established in law as the first. The first is the
identity of labour with property; the second, labour as negated
property, or property as negation of the alien quality of alien labour.
In fact, in the production process of capital, as will be seen more
closely in its further development, labour is a totality – a combination
of labours – whose individual component parts are alien to one another,
so that the overall process as a totality is _not_ the _work_ of the
individual worker, and is furthermore the work of the different workers
together only to the extent that they are [forcibly] combined, and do
not [voluntarily] enter into combination with one another. The
combination of this labour appears just as subservient to and led by an
alien will and an alien intelligence – having its _animating unity_
elsewhere – as its material unity appears subordinate to the _objective
unity_ of the _machinery,_ of fixed capital, which, as _animated
monster,_ objectifies the scientific idea, and is in fact the
coordinator, does not in any way relate to the individual worker as his
instrument; but rather he himself exists as an animated individual
punctuation mark; as its living isolated accessory. Thus, combined
labour is combination _in-itself_ in a double way; not combination as a
mutual relation among the individuals working together, nor as their
predominance either over their particular or individual function or over
the instrument of labour. Hence, just as the worker relates to the
product of his labour as an alien thing, so does he relate to the
combination of labour as an alien combination, as well as to his own
labour as an expression of his life, which, although it belongs to him,
is alien to him and coerced from him, and which A. Smith etc. therefore
conceives is a _burden, sacrifice_ etc. [61] Labour itself, like its
product, is _negated as the labour of the particular, isolated worker._
This isolated labour, negated, is now indeed communal or combined
labour, posited. The _communal or combined labour_ posited in this way –
as activity and in the passive, objective form – is however at the same
time posited as an other towards the really existing individual labour –
as an _alien objectivity_ (alien property) as well as an _alien
subjectivity_ (of capital). Capital thus represents both labour and its
product as negated individualized labour and hence as the negated
property of the individualized worker. Capital therefore is the
existence of social labour – the combination of labour as subject as
well as object – but this existence as itself existing independently
opposite its real moments – hence itself a _particular_ existence apart
from them. For its part, capital therefore appears as the predominant
subject and owner of _alien labour_, and its relation is itself as
complete a contradiction as is that of wage labour.>

_Forms which precede capitalist production. (Concerning the process which precedes the formation of the capital relation or of original accumulation)_

A presupposition of wage labour, and one of the historic preconditions
for capital, is free labour and the exchange of this free labour for
money, in order to reproduce and to realize money, to consume the use
value of labour not for individual consumption, but as use value for
money. Another presupposition is the separation of free labour from the
objective conditions of its realization – from the means of labour and
the material for labour. Thus, above all, release of the worker from the
soil as his natural workshop – hence dissolution of small, free landed
property as well as of communal landownership resting on the oriental
commune. In both forms, the worker relates to the objective conditions
of his labour as to his property; this is the natural unity of labour
with its material [_sachlich_] presuppositions. The worker thus has an
objective existence independent of labour. The individual relates to
himself as proprietor, as master of the conditions of his reality. He
relates to the others in the same way and – depending on whether this
_presupposition_ is posited as proceeding from the community or from the
individual families which constitute the commune – he relates to the
others as co-proprietors, as so many incarnations of the common
property, or as independent proprietors like himself, independent
private proprietors – beside whom the previously all-absorbing and
all-predominant communal property is itself posited as a particular
_ager publicus_ [62] alongside the many private landowners.

In both forms, the individuals relate not as workers but as proprietors
– and members of a community, who at the same time work. The aim of this
work is not the _creation of value_ – although they may do surplus
labour in order to obtain _alien_, i.e. surplus products in exchange –
rather, its aim is sustenance of the individual proprietor and of his
family, as well as of the total community. The positing of the
individual as a _worker,_ in this nakedness, is itself a product of
_history._

In the first form of this landed property, an initial, naturally arisen
spontaneous [_naturwüchsiges_] community appears as first
presupposition. Family, and the family extended as a clan [_Stamm_],
[63] or through intermarriage between families, or combination of clans.
Since we may assume that _pastoralism,_ or more generally a _migratory_
form of life, was the first form of the mode of existence, not that the
clan settles in a specific site, but that it grazes off what it finds –
humankind is not settlement-prone by nature (except possibly in a
natural environment so especially fertile that they sit like monkeys on
a tree; else roaming like the animals) – then the _clan community,_ the
natural community, appears not as a _result_ of, but as a
_presupposition for the communal appropriation_ (temporary) _and
utilization of the land._ When they finally do settle down, the extent
to which this original community is modified will depend on various
external, climatic, geographic, physical etc. conditions as well as on
their particular natural predisposition – their clan character. This
naturally arisen clan community, or, if one will, pastoral society, is
the first presupposition – the communality [_Gemeinschaftlichkeit_] of
blood, language, customs – for the _appropriation of the objective
conditions_ of their life, and of their life’s reproducing and
objectifying activity (activity as herdsmen, hunters, tillers etc.). The
earth is the great workshop, the arsenal which furnishes both means and
material of labour, as well as the seat, the _base_ of the community.
They relate naïvely to it as the _property of the community,_ of the
community producing and reproducing itself in living labour. Each
individual conducts himself only as a link, as a member of this
community as _proprietor_ or _possessor._ The _real appropriation_
through the labour process happens under these _presuppositions,_ which
are not themselves the _product_ of labour, but appear as its natural or
_divine_ presuppositions. This form, with the same land-relation as its
foundation, can realize itself in very different ways. E.g. it is not in
the least a contradiction to it that, as in most of the _Asiatic_
land-forms, the _comprehensive unity_ standing above all these little
communities appears as the higher _proprietor_ or as the _sole
proprietor;_ the real communities hence only as _hereditary_ possessors.
Because the _unity_ is the real proprietor and the real presupposition
of communal property, it follows that this unity can appear as a
_particular_ entity above the many real particular communities, where
the individual is then in fact propertyless, or, property – i.e. the
relation of the individual to the _natural_ conditions of labour and of
reproduction as belonging to him, as the objective, nature-given
inorganic body of his subjectivity – appears mediated for him through a
cession by the total unity – a unity realized in the form of the despot,
the father of the many communities – to the individual, through the
mediation of the particular commune. The surplus product – which is,
incidentally, determined by law in consequence of the real appropriation
through labour – thereby automatically belongs to this highest unity.
Amidst oriental despotism and the propertylessness which seems legally
to exist there, this clan or communal property exists in fact as the
foundation, created mostly by a combination of manufactures and
agriculture within the small commune, which thus becomes altogether
self-sustaining, and contains all the conditions of reproduction and
surplus production within itself. A part of their surplus labour belongs
to the higher community, which exists ultimately as a _person,_ and this
surplus labour takes the form of tribute etc., as well as of common
labour for the exaltation of the unity, partly of the real despot,
partly of the imagined clan-being, the god. Now, in so far as it
actually realizes itself in labour, this kind of communal property can
appear either in the form where the little communes vegetate
independently alongside one another, and where, inside them, the
individual with his family work independently on the lot assigned to
them (a certain amount of labour for the _communal reserves, insurance_
so to speak, and to _meet the expenses of the community as such,_ i.e.
for war, religion etc.; this is the first occurrence of the lordly
_dominium_ in the most original sense, e.g. in the Slavonic communes, in
the Rumanian etc. Therein lies the transition to villeinage
[_Frondienst_] etc.); or the unity may extend to the communality of
labour itself, which may be a formal system, as in Mexico, Peru
especially, among the early Celts, a few clans of India. The communality
can, further, appear within the clan system more in a situation where
the unity is represented in a chief of the clan-family, or as the
relation of the patriarchs among one another. Depending on that, a more
despotic or a more democratic form of this community system. The
communal conditions of real appropriation through labour, _aqueducts,_
very important among the Asiatic peoples; means of communication etc.
then appear as the work of the higher unity – of the despotic regime
hovering over the little communes. Cities proper here form alongside
these villages only at exceptionally good points for external trade; or
where the head of the state and his satraps exchange their revenue
(surplus product) for labour, spend it as labour-fund.

The second form – and like the first it has essential modifications
brought about locally, historically etc. – product of more active,
historic life, of the fates and modifications of the original clans –
also assumes the _community_ as its first presupposition, but not, as in
the first case, as the substance of which the individuals are mere
accidents, or of which they form purely natural component parts – it
presupposes as base not the countryside, but the town as an already
created seat (centre) of the rural population (owners of land). The
cultivated field here appears as a _territorium_ belonging to the town;
not the village as mere accessory to the land. The earth in itself –
regardless of the obstacles it may place in the way of working it,
really appropriating it – offers no resistance to [attempts to] relate
to it as the inorganic nature of the living individual, as his workshop,
as the means and object of labour and the means of life for the subject.
The difficulties which the commune encounters can arise only from other
communes, which have either previously occupied the land and soil, or
which disturb the commune in its own occupation. War is therefore the
great comprehensive task, the great communal labour which is required
either to occupy the objective conditions of being there alive, or to
protect and perpetuate the occupation. Hence the commune consisting of
families initially organized in a warlike way – as a system of war and
army, and this is one of the conditions of its being there as
proprietor. The concentration of residences in the town, basis of this
bellicose organization. The clan system in itself leads to higher and
lower ancestral lineages [_Geschlechtern_], [64] a distinction which is
still further developed through intermixture with subjugated clans etc.
Communal property – as state property, _ager publicus –_ here separated
from private property. The property [_Eigentum_] of the individual is
here not, unlike the first case, itself directly communal property;
where it is, the individual has no property as distinct from the
commune, but rather is merely its possessor [_Besitzer_]. The less it is
the case that the individual’s property can in fact be realized solely
through communal labour – thus e.g. the aqueducts in the Orient – the
more the purely naturally arisen, spontaneous character of the clan has
been broken by historic movement, migration; the more, further, the clan
removes itself from its original seat and occupies _alien_ ground, hence
enters into essentially new conditions of labour, and develops the
energy of the individual more – its common character appearing,
necessarily, more as a negative unity towards the outside – the more,
therefore, are the conditions given under which the individual can
become a _private proprietor_ of land and soil – of a particular plot –
whose particular cultivation falls to him and his family. The commune –
as state – is, on one side, the relation of these free and equal private
proprietors to one another, their bond against the outside, and is at
the same time their safeguard. The commune here rests as much on the
fact that its members consist of working landed proprietors,
small-owning peasants, as the peasants’ independence rests on their
mutual relations as commune members, on protection of the _ager
publicus_ for communal needs and communal glory etc. Membership in the
commune remains the presupposition for the appropriation of land and
soil, but, as a member of the commune, the individual is a private
proprietor. He relates to his private property as land and soil, but at
the same time as to his being as commune member; and his own sustenance
as such is likewise the sustenance of the commune, and conversely etc.
The commune, although already a _product of history_ here, not only in
fact but also known as such, and therefore _possessing an origin,_ is
the presupposition of _property_ in land and soil – i.e. of the relation
of the working subject to the natural presuppositions of labour as
belonging to him – but this belonging [is] mediated by his being a
member of the state, by the being of the state – hence by a
_presupposition_ regarded as divine etc. [65] Concentration in the town,
with the land as _territorium;_ small agriculture working for direct
consumption; manufacture as domestic side occupation of wives and
daughters (spinning and weaving) or, independently, in individual
branches only _(fabri_ [66] etc.). The presupposition of the survival of
the community is the preservation of equality among its free
self-sustaining peasants, and their own labour as the condition of the
survival of their property. They relate as proprietors to the natural
conditions of labour; but these conditions must also constantly be
posited as real conditions and objective elements of the personality of
the individual, by means of personal labour. On the other side, the
tendency of this small bellicose community system drives beyond these
barriers etc. (Rome, Greece, Jews etc.). ‘When the auguries’, Niebuhr
says, ‘had assured Numa of the divine sanction of his election, the
pious king’s first concern was not worship at the temple, but a human
one. He divided the lands which Romulus had won in war and given over to
occupation: he endowed the order of Terminus. All the law-givers of
antiquity, Moses above all, founded their success in commanding virtue,
integrity and proper custom on landed property, or at least on secured,
hereditary possession of land, for the greatest possible number of
citizens.’ (Vol. I, 245, 2nd edition. _Röm. Gesch._) [67] The individual
is placed in such conditions of earning his living as to make not the
acquiring of wealth his object, but self-sustenance, his own
reproduction as a member of the community; the reproduction of himself
as proprietor of the parcel of ground, and, in that quality, as a member
of the commune. The survival of the commune is the reproduction of all
of its members as self-sustaining peasants, whose surplus time belongs
precisely to the commune, the work of war etc. The property in one’s own
labour is mediated by property in the condition of labour – the hide of
land, guaranteed in its turn by the existence of the commune, and that
in turn by surplus labour in the form of military service etc. by the
commune members. It is not cooperation in wealth-producing labour by
means of which the commune member reproduces himself, but rather
cooperation in labour for the communal interests (imaginary and real),
for the upholding of the association inwardly and outwardly. Property is
_quiritorium,_ [68] of the Roman variety; the private proprietor of land
is such only as a Roman, but as a Roman he is a private proprietor of
land.

A[nother] form of the property of working individuals, self-sustaining
members of the community, in the natural conditions of their labour, is
the _Germanic._ Here the commune member is neither, as such, a
co-possessor of the communal property, as in the specifically oriental
form (wherever property exists _only_ as communal property, there the
individual member is as such only _possessor_ of a particular part,
hereditary or not, since any fraction of the property belongs to no
member for himself, but to him only as immediate member of the commune,
i.e. as in direct unity with it, not in distinction to it. This
individual is thus only a possessor. What exists is only _communal_
property, and only _private possession._ The mode of this possession in
relation to the communal property may be historically, locally etc.
modified in quite different ways, depending on whether labour itself is
performed by the private possessor in isolation, or is in turn
determined by the commune or by the unity hovering above the particular
commune); nor is the situation such as obtains in the Roman, Greek form
(in short, the form of classical antiquity) – in this case, the land is
occupied by the commune, Roman land; a part remains to the commune as
such as distinct from the commune members, _ager publicus_ in its
various forms; the other part is divided up and each parcel of land is
Roman by virtue of being the private property, the domain of a Roman,
the part of the _laboratorium_ belonging to him; but, also, he is a
Roman only in so far as he possesses this sovereign right over a part of
the Roman earth. <In antiquity, urban occupation and trade little
esteemed, agriculture, however, highly; in the Middle Ages the contrary
appraisal.> <The right of _using_ the communal land through _possession_
originally appertained to the patricians, who then granted it to their
clients; the _transfer of property_ out of the _ager publicus_
appertained exclusively to the plebeians; all assignments in favour of
the plebeians and compensation for a share of the communal property.
_Actual property in land,_ excepting the area around the city walls,
originally only in the hands of the plebeians (rural communes included
later.)> <Basis of the Roman plebs as a totality of agriculturists, as
is indicated in their quiritary property. Antiquity unanimously esteemed
agriculture as the _proper occupation_ of the free man, the soldier’s
school. In it the ancestral stock of the nation sustains itself; it
changes in the cities, where alien merchants and dealers settle, just as
the indigenous move where gain entices them. Wherever there is slavery,
the freedman seeks his support in such dealings, in which he then often
gathers riches: thus these occupations were mostly in their hands in
antiquity, and were therefore not proper for a citizen: hence the
opinion that admission of the craftsmen to full citizenship rights would
be a risky undertaking (among the earlier Greeks they were as a rule
excluded). ‘ὀὐδενὶ γὰρ ἐξῆν ῾Ρωμαίων οὔτε ϰάπηλον οὔτε χειροτέχνην βίον
ἔχειν.’ [69] Antiquity had no inkling of a privileged guild-system such
as prevailed in the history of medieval cities; and already here the
martial spirit declined as the guilds defeated the aristocratic
lineages, and was finally extinguished altogether; and consequently,
with it, the cities’ external respect and freedom.> <The clans of the
ancient states were founded on two different principles, either on
_ancestry_ [_Geschlecht_] or on the _locality._ The _ancestral clans_
preceded the locality clans in time and are almost everywhere pushed
aside by the latter. Their most extreme, strictest form is the
caste-order, in which one is separated from the other, without the right
of intermarriage, quite different in [degree of] privilege; each with an
exclusive, irrevocable occupation. The _locality clans_ originally
corresponded to a partition of the countryside into districts and
villages; so that someone residing in a given village at the time of
this partition, in Attica under Cleisthenes, was registered as a
_demotes_ (villager) of that village, and as a member of the _phylon_
(tribe) of the village’s region. Now, his descendants, as a rule,
remained in the same _phylon_ and the same _demos_ without regard to
their residence; whereby this partition also took on an ancestral
appearance.> <These Roman _gens_ not blood relatives; to the communal
name, Cicero adds descent from free men as a sign. Communal _sacra_
(shrines) for the Roman gentiles; later ceased (already in Cicero’s
time). Practice of co-gentile inheritance, in cases without dependents
or will, survived longest of all. In the earliest periods, obligation of
all members of the _gens_ to help those of their own who require this,
to carry unaccustomed burdens. (This occurs originally everywhere among
the Germans, remains longest among the Dithmarschen.) The _gentes,_
corporations [_Innungen_]. There was in the world of antiquity no more
general institution than that of kin groups. Thus among the Gaels the
noble Campbells and their vassals forming one clan.> [70] Since the
patrician represents the community in a higher degree, he is the
_possessor_ of the _ager publicus_ and uses it through his clients etc.
(and also appropriates it little by little). The Germanic commune is not
concentrated in the town; by means of such a concentration – the town as
centre of rural life, residence of the agricultural workers, likewise
the centre of warfare – the commune as such would have a merely outward
existence, distinct from that of the individual. The history of
classical antiquity is the history of cities, but of cities founded on
landed property and on agriculture; Asiatic history is a kind of
indifferent unity of town and countryside (the really large cities must
be regarded here merely as royal camps, as works of artifice
[_Superfötation_] erected over the economic construction proper); the
Middle Ages (Germanic period) begins with the land as the seat of
history, whose further development then moves forward in the
contradiction between town and countryside; the modern [age] is the
urbanization of the countryside, not ruralization of the city as in
antiquity.


NOTEBOOK V

22 January – Beginning of February 1858



THE CHAPTER ON CAPITAL (CONTINUATION)


With its coming-together in the city, the commune possesses an economic
existence as such; the city’s mere _presence,_ as such, distinguishes it
from a mere multiplicity of independent houses. The whole, here,
consists not merely of its parts. It is a kind of independent organism.
Among the Germanic tribes, where the individual family chiefs settled in
the forests, long distances apart, the commune exists, already from
_outward_ observation, only in the periodic gathering-together
[_Vereinigung_] of the commune members, although their unity-_in-itself_
is posited in their ancestry, language, common past and history, etc.
The _commune_ thus appears as a _coming-together_ [_Vereinigung_], not
as a _being-together_ [_Verein_]; as a unification made up of
independent subjects, landed proprietors, and not as a unity. The
commune therefore does not in fact exist as a _state_ or _political
body,_ as in classical antiquity, because it does not exist as a _city._
For the commune to come into real existence, the free landed proprietors
have to hold a _meeting,_ whereas e.g. in Rome it _exists_ even apart
from these assemblies in the existence of the _city itself_ and of the
officials presiding over it etc. True, the _ager publicus,_ the communal
or people’s land, as distinct from individual property, also occurs
among the Germanic tribes. It takes the form of hunting land, grazing
land, timber land etc., the part of the land which cannot be divided if
it is to serve as means of production in this specific form. But this
_ager publicus_ does not appear, as with the Romans e.g., as the
particular economic presence of the state as against the private
proprietors, so that these latter are actually _private_ proprietors as
such, in so far as they are _excluded,_ deprived, like the plebeians,
from using the _ager publicus_. Among the Germanic tribes, the _ager
publicus_ appears rather merely as a complement to individual property,
and figures as property only to the extent that it is defended
militarily as the common property of one tribe against a hostile tribe.
Individual property does not appear mediated by the commune; rather, the
existence of the commune and of communal property appear as mediated by,
i.e. as a relation of, the independent subjects to one another. The
economic totality is, at bottom, contained in each individual household,
which forms an independent centre of production for itself (manufactures
purely as domestic secondary task for women etc.). In the world of
antiquity, the city with its territory is the economic totality; in the
Germanic world, the totality is the individual residence, which itself
appears as only a small dot on the land belonging to it, and which is
not a concentration of many proprietors, but the family as independent
unit. In the Asiatic form (at least, predominantly), the individual has
no property but only possession; the real proprietor, proper, is the
commune – hence property only as _communal property_ in land. In
antiquity (Romans as the most classic example, the thing in its purest,
most fully developed form), the form of state property in land and that
of private property in land [are] antithetical, so that the latter is
mediated by the former, or the former itself exists in this double form.
The private proprietor of land hence at the same time urban citizen.
Urban citizenship resolves itself economically into the simple form that
the agriculturist [is a] resident of a city. In the Germanic form, the
agriculturist not citizen of a state, i.e. not inhabitant of a city;
[the] basis [is] rather the isolated, independent family residence,
guaranteed by the bond with other such family residences of the same
tribe, and by their occasional coming-together [_Zusammnenkommen_] to
pledge each others’ allegiance in war, religion, adjudication etc.
Individual landed property here appears neither as a form antithetical
to the commune’s landed property, nor as mediated by it, but just the
contrary. The commune exists only in the interrelations among these
individual landed proprietors as such. Communal property as such appears
only as a communal accessory to the individual tribal seats and the land
they appropriate. The commune is neither the substance of which the
individual appears as a mere accident; nor is it a generality with a
_being and unity_ as such [_seiende Einheit_] either in the mind and in
the existence of the city and of its civic needs as distinct from those
of the individual, or in its civic land and soil as its particular
presence as distinct from the particular economic presence of the
commune member; rather, the commune, on the one side, is presupposed
in-itself prior to the individual proprietors as a communality of
language, blood etc., but it exists as a presence, on the other hand,
only in its _real assembly_ for communal purposes; and to the extent
that it has a particular economic existence in the hunting and grazing
lands for communal use, it is so used by each individual proprietor as
such, not as representative of the state (as in Rome); it is really the
common property of the individual proprietors, not of the union of these
proprietors endowed with an existence separate from themselves, the city
itself.

The main point here is this: In all these forms – in which landed
property and agriculture form the basis of the economic order, and where
the economic aim is hence the production of use values, i.e. the
_reproduction of the individual_ within the specific relation to the
commune in which he is its basis – there is to be found: (1)
Appropriation not through labour, but presupposed to labour;
appropriation of the natural conditions of labour, of the _earth_ as the
original instrument of labour as well as its workshop and repository of
raw materials. The individual relates simply to the objective conditions
of labour as being his; [relates] to them as the inorganic nature of his
subjectivity, in which the latter realizes itself; the chief objective
condition of labour does not itself appear as a _product_ of labour, but
is already there as _nature;_ on one side the living individual, on the
other the earth, as the objective condition of his reproduction; (2) but
this _relation_ to land and soil, to the earth, as the property of the
labouring individual – who thus appears from the outset not merely as
labouring individual, in this abstraction, but who has an _objective
mode of existence_ in his ownership of the land, an existence
_presupposed_ to his activity, and not merely as a result of it, a
presupposition of his activity just like his skin, his sense organs,
which of course he also reproduces and develops etc. in the life
process, but which are nevertheless presuppositions of this process of
his reproduction – is instantly mediated by the naturally arisen,
spontaneous, more or less historically developed and modified presence
of the individual as _member of a commune –_ his naturally arisen
presence as member of a tribe etc. An isolated individual could no more
have property in land and soil than he could speak. He could, of course,
live off it as substance, as do the animals. The relation to the earth
as property is always mediated through the occupation of the land and
soil, peacefully or violently, by the tribe, the commune, in some more
or less naturally arisen or already historically developed form. The
individual can never appear here in the dot-like isolation
[_Punktualität_] in which he appears as mere free worker. If the
objective conditions of his labour are presupposed as belonging to him,
then he himself is subjectively presupposed as member of a commune,
through which his relation to land and soil is mediated. His relation to
the objective conditions of labour is mediated through his presence as
member of the commune; at the same time, the real presence of the
commune is determined by the specific form of the individual’s property
in the objective conditions of labour. Whether this property mediated by
commune-membership appears as _communal property,_ where the individual
is merely the possessor and there is no private property in land and
soil – or whether property appears in the double form of state and
private property alongside one another, but so that the latter appears
as posited by the former, so that only the citizen is and must be a
private proprietor, while his property as citizen has a separate,
particular existence at the same time – or whether, finally, the
communal property appears only as a complement to individual property,
with the latter as the base, while the commune has no existence
for-itself except in the _assembly_ of the commune members, their
coming-together for common purposes – these different forms of the
commune or tribe members’ relation to the tribe’s land and soil – to the
earth where it has settled – depend partly on the natural inclinations
of the tribe, and partly on the economic conditions in which it relates
as proprietor to the land and soil in reality, i.e. in which it
appropriates its fruits through labour, and the latter will itself
depend on climate, physical make-up of the land and soil, the physically
determined mode of its exploitation, the relation with hostile tribes or
neighbour tribes, and the modifications which migrations, historic
experiences etc. introduce. The survival of the commune as such in the
old mode requires the reproduction of its members in the presupposed
objective conditions. Production itself, the advance of population (this
too belongs with production), necessarily suspends these conditions
little by little; destroys them instead of reproducing them etc., and,
with that, the communal system declines and falls, together with the
property relations on which it was based. The Asiatic form necessarily
hangs on most tenaciously and for the longest time. This is due to its
presupposition that the individual does not become independent
_vis-à-vis_ the commune; that there is a self-sustaining circle of
production, unity of agriculture and manufactures, etc. If the
individual changes his relation to the commune, he thereby changes and
acts destructively upon the commune; as on its economic presupposition;
on the other side, the alteration of this economic presupposition
brought about by its own dialectic – impoverishment etc. In particular,
the influence of warfare and of conquest, which e.g. in Rome belonged to
the essential conditions of the commune itself, suspends the real bond
on which it rests. In all these forms, the _reproduction of presupposed_
relations – more or less naturally arisen or historic as well, but
become traditional – of the individual to his commune, together with a
_specific, objective_ existence, _predetermined_ for the individual, of
his relations both to the conditions of labour and to his co-workers,
fellow tribesmen etc. – are the foundation of development, which is
therefore from the outset _restricted,_ but which signifies decay,
decline and fall once this barrier is suspended. Thus among the Romans,
the development of slavery, the concentration of land possession,
exchange, the money system, conquest etc., although all these elements
up to a certain point seemed compatible with the foundation, and in part
appeared merely as innocent extensions of it, partly grew out of it as
mere abuses. Great developments can take place here within a specific
sphere. The individuals may appear great. But there can be no conception
here of a free and full development either of the individual or of the
society, since such development stands in contradiction to the original
relation.

Do we never find in antiquity an inquiry into which form of landed
property etc. is the most productive, creates the greatest wealth?
Wealth does not appear as the aim of production, although Cato may well
investigate which manner of cultivating a field brings the greatest
rewards, and Brutus may even lend out his money at the best rates of
interest. [1] The question is always which mode of property creates the
best citizens. Wealth appears as an end in itself only among the few
commercial peoples – monopolists of the carrying trade – who live in the
pores of the ancient world, like the Jews in medieval society. Now,
wealth is on one side a thing, realized in things, material products,
which a human being confronts as subject; on the other side, as value,
wealth is merely command over alien labour not with the aim of ruling,
but with the aim of private consumption etc. It appears in all forms in
the shape of a thing, be it an object or be it a relation mediated
through the object, which is external and accidental to the individual.
Thus the old view, in which the human being appears as the aim of
production, regardless of his limited national, religious, political
character, seems to be very lofty when contrasted to the modern world,
where production appears as the aim of mankind and wealth as the aim of
production. In fact, however, when the limited bourgeois form is
stripped away, what is wealth other than the universality of individual
needs, capacities, pleasures, productive forces etc., created through
universal exchange? The full development of human mastery over the
forces of nature, those of so-called nature as well as of humanity’s own
nature? The absolute working-out of his creative potentialities, with no
presupposition other than the previous historic development, which makes
this totality of development, i.e. the development of all human powers
as such the end in itself, not as measured on a _predetermined
yardstick?_ Where he does not reproduce himself in one specificity, but
produces his totality? Strives not to remain something he has become,
but is in the absolute movement of becoming? In bourgeois economics –
and in the epoch of production to which it corresponds – this complete
working-out of the human content appears as a complete emptying-out,
this universal objectification as total alienation, and the tearing-down
of all limited, one-sided aims as sacrifice of the human end-in-itself
to an entirely external end. This is why the childish world of antiquity
appears on one side as loftier. On the other side, it really is loftier
in all matters where closed shapes, forms and given limits are sought
for. It is satisfaction from a limited standpoint; while the modern
gives no satisfaction; or, where it appears satisfied with itself, it is
_vulgar._

What Mr Proudhon calls the _extra-economic_ origin of property, by which
he understands just landed property, [2] is the _pre-bourgeois_ relation
of the individual to the objective conditions of labour, and initially
to the _natural_ objective conditions of labour – for, just as the
working subject appears naturally as an individual, as natural being –
so does the first objective condition of his labour appear as nature,
earth, as his inorganic body; he himself is not only the organic body,
but also the subject of this inorganic nature. This condition is not his
product but something he finds to hand – presupposed to him as a natural
being apart from him. Before we analyse this further, one more point:
the worthy Proudhon would not only be able to, but would have to, accuse
_capital_ and _wage labour –_ as forms of property – of having an
_extra-economic_ origin. For the encounter with the objective conditions
of labour as separate from him, as _capital_ from the worker’s side, and
the encounter with the _worker_ as propertyless, as an abstract worker
from the capitalist’s side – the exchange such as takes place between
value and living labour, presupposes a _historic process,_ no matter how
much capital and labour themselves reproduce this relation and work out
its objective scope, as well as its depth – a historic process, which,
as we saw, forms the history of the origins of capital and wage labour.
In other words: the _extra-economic origin_ of property means nothing
else than the _historic origin_ of the bourgeois economy, of the forms
of production which are theoretically or ideally expressed by the
categories of political economy. But the fact that pre-bourgeois
history, and each of its phases, also has its own _economy_ and an
_economic foundation_ for its movement, is at bottom only the tautology
that human life has since time immemorial rested on production, and, in
one way or another, on _social_ production, whose relations we call,
precisely, economic relations.

_The original conditions of production_ (or, what is the same, the
reproduction of a growing number of human beings through the natural
process between the sexes; for this reproduction, although it appears as
appropriation of the objects by the subjects in one respect, appears in
another respect also as formation, subjugation of the objects to a
subjective purpose; their transformation into results and repositories
of subjective activity) _cannot themselves_ originally _be products –_
results of production. It is not the _unity_ of living and active
humanity with the natural, inorganic conditions of their metabolic
exchange with nature, and hence their appropriation of nature, which
requires explanation or is the result of a historic process, but rather
the _separation_ between these inorganic conditions of human existence
and this active existence, a separation which is completely posited only
in the relation of wage labour and capital. In the relations of slavery
and serfdom this separation does not take place; rather, one part of
society is treated by the other as itself merely an _inorganic and
natural_ condition of its own reproduction. The slave stands in no
relation whatsoever to the objective conditions of his labour; rather,
_labour_ itself, both in the form of the slave and in that of the serf,
is classified as _an inorganic condition_ of production along with other
natural beings, such as cattle, as an accessory of the earth. In other
words: the original conditions of production appear as natural
presuppositions, _natural conditions of the producer’s existence_ just
as his living body, even though he reproduces and develops it, is
originally not posited by himself, but appears as the _presupposition of
his self;_ his own (bodily) being is a natural presupposition, which he
has not posited. These _natural conditions of existence,_ to which he
relates as to his own inorganic body, are themselves double: (1) of a
subjective and (2) of an objective nature. He finds himself a member of
a family, clan, tribe etc. – which then, in a historic process of
intermixture and antithesis with others, takes on a different shape;
and, as such a member, he relates to a specific nature (say, here, still
earth, land, soil) as his own inorganic being, as a condition of his
production and reproduction. As a natural member of the community he
participates in the communal property, and has a particular part of it
as his possession; just as, were he a natural Roman citizen, he would
have an ideal claim (at least) to the _ager publicus_ and a real one to
a certain number of _iugera_ [3] of land etc. His _property,_ i.e. the
relation to the natural presuppositions of his production as belonging
to him, as _his_, is mediated by his being himself the natural member of
a community. (The abstraction of a community, in which the members have
nothing in common but language etc., and barely that much, is obviously
the product of much later historical conditions.) As regards the
individual, it is clear e.g. that he relates even to language itself _as
his own_ only as the natural member of a human community. Language as
the product of an individual is an impossibility. But the same holds for
property.

Language itself is the product of a community, just as it is in another
respect itself the presence [_Dasein_] of the community, a presence
which goes without saying. <Communal production and common property as
they exist e.g. in Peru are evidently a _secondary_ form; introduced by
and inherited from conquering tribes, who, at home, had common property
and communal production in the older, simpler form such as is found in
India and among the Slavs. Likewise the form which we find among the
Celts in Wales e.g. appears as a transplanted, _secondary_ form,
introduced by conquerors among the lesser, conquered tribes. The
completion and systematic elaboration of these systems by a _supreme
central authority_ shows their later origin. Just as the feudalism
introduced into England was more perfect in form than that which arose
spontaneously in France.> <Among nomadic pastoral tribes – and all
pastoral peoples are originally migratory – the earth appears like other
natural conditions, in its elemental limitlessness, e.g. in the Asiatic
steppes and the high plateau. It is grazed etc., consumed by the herds,
from which the pastoral peoples in turn live. They relate to it as their
property, although they never stabilize this property. This is the case
too with the hunting grounds of the wild Indian tribes in America; the
tribe regards a certain region as its hunting domain, and asserts it by
force against other tribes, or tries to drive others off the domains
they assert. Among the nomadic pastoral peoples, the commune is indeed
constantly united; the travelling society, the caravan, the horde, and
the forms of supremacy and subordination develop out of the conditions
of this mode of life. What is in fact _appropriated_ and _reproduced_
here is not the earth but the herd; but the earth is always used
_communally_ at each halting place.> The only barrier which the
community can encounter in relating to the natural conditions of
production – the earth – as to _its own property_ (if we jump ahead to
the settled peoples) is _another community,_ which already claims it as
its own inorganic body. _Warfare_ is therefore one of the earliest
occupations of each of these naturally arisen communities, both for the
defence of their property and for obtaining new property. (We can indeed
content ourselves here with speaking of land and soil as original
property, for among the herding peoples property in natural products of
the earth – e.g. sheep – is at the same time property in the pastures
they wander through. In general, property in land and soil includes its
organic products.) <If human beings themselves are conquered along with
the land and soil as its organic accessories, then they are equally
conquered as one of the conditions of production, and in this way arises
slavery and serfdom, which soon corrupts and modifies the original forms
of all communities, and then itself becomes their basis. The simple
construction is thereby negatively determined.>

_Property_ thus originally means no more than a human being’s relation
to his natural conditions of production as belonging to him, as his, as
_presupposed_ along with _his own being;_ relations to them as _natural
presuppositions_ of his self, which only form, so to speak, his extended
body. He actually does not relate to his conditions of production, but
rather has a double existence, both subjectively as he himself, and
objectively in these natural non-organic conditions of his existence.
The forms of these _natural conditions of production_ are double: (1)
his existence as a member of a community; hence the existence of this
community, which in its original form is a _clan_ system, a more or less
modified _clan_ system; (2) the relation to _land and soil_ mediated by
the community, as _its own,_ as communal landed property, at the same
time _individual possession_ for the individual, or in such a way that
only the fruits are divided, but the land itself and the labour remain
common. (However, _residences_ etc., even if only the Scythians’ wagons,
always appear in individual possession.) A natural condition of
production for the living individual is his belonging to a _naturally
arisen, spontaneous society,_ clan etc. This is e.g. already a condition
for his language etc. His own productive existence is possible only on
this condition. His subjective existence is thereby conditioned as such,
just as it is conditioned by his relation to the earth as his workshop.
(Property is, it is true, originally _mobile,_ for mankind first seizes
hold of the ready-made fruits of the earth, among whom belong e.g. the
animals, and for him especially the ones that can be tamed. Nevertheless
even this situation – hunting, fishing, herding, gathering fruits from
trees etc. – always presupposes appropriation of the earth, whether for
a fixed residence, or for roaming, or for animal pasture etc.)

_Property_ therefore means _belonging to a clan_ (community) (having
subjective-objective existence in it); and, by means of the relation of
this community to the land and soil, [relating] to the earth as the
individual’s inorganic body; his relation to land and soil, to the
external primary condition of production – since the earth is raw
material, instrument and fruit all in one – as to a presupposition
belonging to his individuality, as modes of his presence. _We reduce
this property to the relation to the conditions of production._ Why not
to consumption, since the production of the individual is originally
restricted to the reproduction of his own body through the appropriation
of ready objects prepared by nature itself for consumption? Even where
the only task is to _find_ and to _discover,_ this soon requires
exertion, labour – as in hunting, fishing, herding – and production
(i.e. development) of certain capacities on the part of the subject.
Then also, situations in which it is possible to seize hold of the
things available without any instruments whatever (i.e. products of
labour destined for production), without alteration of form (which
already takes place for herding) etc., are themselves transitional and
in no case to be regarded as normal; nor as normal original situations.
The original conditions of production, incidentally, of course include
substances consumable directly, without labour; thus the consumption
fund appears as s component part of the _original production fund._

The fundamental condition of property resting on the clan system (into
which the community originally resolves itself) – to be a member of the
clan – makes the clan conquered by another clan _propertyless_ and
throws it among the _inorganic conditions_ of the conqueror’s
reproduction, to which the conquering community relates as its own.
Slavery and serfdom are thus only further developments of the form of
property resting on the clan system. They necessarily modify all of the
latter’s forms. They can do this least of all in the Asiatic form. In
the self-sustaining unity of manufacture and agriculture, on which this
form rests, conquest is not so necessary a condition as where _landed
property, agriculture_ are exclusively predominant. On the other hand,
since in this form the individual never becomes a proprietor but only a
possessor, he is at bottom himself the property, the slave of him in
whom the unity of the commune exists, and slavery here neither suspends
the conditions of labour nor modifies the essential relation.

It is now clear, further, that:

Property, in so far as it is only the conscious relation – and posited
in regard to the individual by the community, and proclaimed and
guaranteed as law – to the conditions of production as _his own,_ so
that the producer’s being appears also in the objective conditions
_belonging to him –_ is only realized by production itself. The real
appropriation takes place not in the mental but in the real, active
relation to these conditions – in their real positing as the conditions
of his subjective activity.

It is thereby also clear that _these conditions change._ Only when
tribes hunt upon it does a region of the earth become a hunting domain;
only cultivation of the soil posits the land as the individual’s
extended body. After the _city of Rome_ had been built and the
surrounding countryside cultivated by its citizens, the conditions of
the community were different from what they had been before. The aim of
all these communities is survival; i.e. _reproduction of the individuals
who compose it as proprietors, i.e. in the same objective mode of
existence as forms the relation among the members and at the same time
therefore the commune itself._ This _reproduction, however, is at the
same time necessarily new production and destruction of the old form._
For example, where each of the individuals is supposed to possess a
given number of acres of land, the advance of population is already
under way. If this is to be corrected, then colonization, and that in
turn requires wars of conquest. With that, slaves etc. Also, e.g.,
enlargement of the _ager publicus,_ and therewith the patricians who
represent the community etc. Thus the preservation of the old community
includes the destruction of the conditions on which it rests, turns into
its opposite. If it were thought that productivity on the same land
could be increased by developing the forces of production etc. (this
precisely the slowest of all in traditional agriculture), then the new
order would include combinations of labour, a large part of the day
spent in agriculture etc., and thereby again suspend the old economic
conditions of the community. Not only do the objective conditions change
in the act of reproduction, e.g. the village becomes a town, the
wilderness a cleared field etc., but the producers change, too, in that
they bring out new qualities in themselves, develop themselves in
production, transform themselves, develop new powers and ideas, new
modes of intercourse, new needs and new language. The older and more
traditional the mode of production itself – and this lasts a long time
in agriculture; even more in the oriental supplementation of agriculture
with manufactures – i.e. the longer the _real process_ of appropriation
remains constant, the more constant will be the old forms of property
and hence the community generally. Where there is already a separation
between the commune members as private proprietors [on one side,] and
they themselves as the urban commune and proprietors of the commune’s
_territorium_ [on the other], there the conditions already arise in
which the individual can _lose_ his property, i.e. the double relation
which makes him both an equal citizen, a member of the community, and a
_proprietor._ In the oriental form this _loss_ is hardly possible,
except by means of altogether external influences, since the individual
member of the commune never enters into the relation of freedom towards
it in which he could lose his (objective, economic) bond with it. He is
rooted to the spot, ingrown. This also has to do with the combination of
manufacture and agriculture, of town (village) and countryside. In
classical antiquity, manufacture appears already as a corruption
(business for _freedmen,_ clients, aliens) etc. This development of
productive labour (not bound in pure subordination to agriculture as a
domestic task, labour by free men for agriculture or war only, or for
religious observances, and manufactures for the community – such as
construction of houses, streets, temples), which necessarily develops
through intercourse with aliens and slaves, through the desire to
exchange the surplus product etc., dissolves the mode of production on
which the community rests, and, with it, the _objective individual,_
i.e. the individual defined as Roman, Greek, etc. Exchange acts in the
same way; indebtedness etc.

The original unity between a particular form of community (clan) and the
corresponding property in nature, or relation to the objective
conditions of production as a natural being, as an objective being of
the individual mediated by the commune – this unity, which appears in
one respect as the particular form of property – has its living reality
in a specific _mode of production_ itself, a mode which appears both as
a relation between the individuals, and as their specific active
relation to inorganic nature, a specific mode of working (which is
always family labour, often communal labour). The community itself
appears as the first great force of production; particular kinds of
production conditions (e.g. stock-breeding, agriculture), develop
particular modes of production and particular forces of production,
subjective, appearing as qualities of individuals, as well as objective
[ones].

In the last analysis, their community, as well as the property based on
it, resolves itself into a specific stage in the development of the
productive forces of working subjects – to which correspond their
specific relations amongst one another and towards nature. Until a
certain point, reproduction. Then turns into dissolution.

_Property,_ then, originally means – in its Asiatic, Slavonic, ancient
classical, Germanic form – the relation of the working (producing or
self-reproducing) subject to the conditions of his production or
reproduction as his own. It will therefore have different forms
depending on the conditions of this production. Production itself aims
at the reproduction of the producer within and together with these, his
objective conditions of existence. This relation as proprietor – not as
a result but as a presupposition of labour, i.e. of production –
presupposes the individual defined as a member of a clan or community
(whose property the individual himself is, up to a certain point).
Slavery, bondage etc., where the worker himself appears among the
natural conditions of production for a third individual or community
(this is _not_ the case e.g. with the general slavery of the Orient,
_only_ from the European point of view) – i.e. property no longer the
relation of the working individual to the objective conditions of labour
– is always secondary, derived, never original, although [it is] a
necessary and logical result of property founded on the community and
labour in the community. It is of course very simple to imagine that
some powerful, physically dominant individual, after first having caught
the animal, then catches humans in order to have them catch animals; in
a word, uses human beings as another naturally occurring condition for
his reproduction (whereby his own labour reduces itself to ruling) like
any other natural creature. But such a notion is stupid – correct as it
may be from the standpoint of some particular given clan or commune –
because it proceeds from the development of _isolated individuals._ But
human beings become individuals only through the process of history. He
appears originally as a _species-being_ [_Gattungswesen_], _clan being,
herd animal –_ although in no way whatever as a ζῶον πολιτιϰόν [4] in
the political sense. Exchange itself is a chief means of this
individuation [_Vereinzelung_]. It makes the herd-like existence
superfluous and dissolves it. Soon the matter [has] turned in such a way
that as an individual he relates himself only to himself, while the
means with which he posits himself as individual have become the making
of his generality and commonness. In this community, the objective being
of the individual as proprietor, say proprietor of land, is presupposed,
and presupposed moreover under certain conditions which chain him to the
community, or rather form a link in his chain. In bourgeois society, the
worker e.g. stands there purely without objectivity, subjectively; but
the thing which _stands opposite_ him has now become the _true
community_ [_Gemeinwesen_], [5] which he tries to make a meal of, and
which makes a meal of him.

All forms (more or less naturally arisen, spontaneous, all at the same
time however results of a historic process) in which the community
presupposes its subjects in a specific objective unity with their
conditions of production, or in which a specific subjective mode of
being presupposes the communities themselves as conditions of
production, necessarily correspond to a development of the forces of
production which is only limited, and indeed limited in principle. The
development of the forces of production dissolves these forms, and their
dissolution is itself a development of the human productive forces.
Labour begins with a certain foundation – naturally arisen, spontaneous,
at first – then historic presupposition. Then, however, this foundation
or presupposition is itself suspended, or posited as a vanishing
presupposition which has become too confining for the unfolding of the
progressing human pack.

In so far as classical landed property reappears in modern small-parcel
landownership, it itself belongs to political economy and we shall come
to it in the section on landed property.

(All this is to be returned to at greater depth and length.)

What we are here concerned with is this: the relation of labour to
capital, or to the objective conditions of labour as capital,
presupposes a process of history which dissolves the various forms in
which the worker is a proprietor, or in which the proprietor works. Thus
above all (1) _Dissolution_ of the relation to the earth – land and soil
– as natural condition of production – to which he relates as to his own
inorganic being; the workshop of his forces, and the domain of his will.
All forms in which this property appears presuppose a _community,_ whose
members, although there may be formal distinctions between them, are, as
members of it, _proprietors._ The original form of this property is
therefore itself _direct common property (oriental form,_ modified in
the Slavonic; developed to the point of antithesis, but still as the
secret, if antithetical, foundation in classical and Germanic property).
(2) _Dissolution of the relations_ in which he appears as _proprietor of
the instrument._ Just as the above form of landed property presupposes a
_real community,_ so does this property of the worker in the instrument
presuppose a particular form of the development of manufactures, namely
_craft, artisan work;_ bound up with it, the guild-corporation system
etc. (The manufacture system of the ancient Orient can be examined under
(1) already.) Here labour itself still half artistic, half end-in-itself
etc. Mastery. Capitalist himself still master-journeyman. Attainment of
particular skill in the work also secures possession of instrument etc.
etc. Inheritability then to a certain extent of the mode of work
together with the organization of work and the instrument of work.
Medieval cities. Labour still as his own; definite self-sufficient
development of one-sided abilities etc. (3) Included in both is the fact
that he has the means of consumption in his possession before
production, which are necessary for him to live as producer – i.e.
during production, _before_ its completion. As proprietor of land he
appears as directly provided with the necessary consumption fund. As
master in a craft he has inherited it, earned it, saved it up, and as a
youth he is first an _apprentice,_ where he does not appear as an actual
independent worker at all, but shares the master’s fare in a patriarchal
way. As journeyman (a genuine one) there is a certain communality in the
consumption fund possessed by the master. While it is not the
journeyman’s _property_ either, still, through the laws of the guild,
tradition etc., at least co-possession etc. (To be gone into further.)
(4) _Dissolution_ likewise at the same time of the relations in which
the _workers themselves,_ the _living labour capacities_ themselves,
still belong _directly among the objective conditions of production,_
and are appropriated as such – i.e. are slaves or serfs. For capital,
the worker is not a condition of production, only work is. If it can
make machines do it, or even water, air, so much the better. And it does
not appropriate the worker, but his labour – not directly, but mediated
through exchange.

These are, now, on one side, historic presuppositions needed before the
worker can be found as a free worker, as objectless, purely subjective
labour capacity confronting the objective conditions of production as
his _not-property,_ as _alien property,_ as _value_ for-itself, as
capital. But the question arises, on the other side, which conditions
are required so that he finds himself up against a _capital?_

<The formula of capital, where living labour relates to the raw material
as well as to the instrument and to the means of subsistence required
during labour, as negatives, as not-property, _includes,_ first of all,
_not-land-ownership,_ or, the negation of the situation in which the
working individual relates to land and soil, to the earth, as his own,
i.e. in which he works, produces, as proprietor of the land and soil. In
the best case he relates not only as worker to the land and soil, but
also as proprietor of the land and soil to himself as working subject.
Ownership of land and soil potentially also includes ownership of the
raw material, as well as of the primordial instrument, the earth itself,
and of its spontaneous fruits. Posited in the most original form, it
means relating to the earth as proprietor, and finding raw material and
instrument on hand, as well as the necessaries of life created not by
labour but by the earth itself. Once this relation is reproduced,
secondary instruments and fruits of the earth created through labour
itself appear as included with landed property in its primitive forms.
This historic situation is thus first of all negated as a full property
relation, in the worker’s relation to the conditions of labour as
capital. This is historic state No. I, which is negated in this relation
or presupposed as historically dissolved. Secondly, however, where there
is _ownership of the instrument_ on the part of the worker, i.e. the
worker relates to the instrument as his own, where the worker works as
owner of the instrument (which at the same time presupposes the
subsumption of the instrument under his individual work, i.e. a
particular, limited developmental stage of the productive force of
labour), where this form of the _worker as owner_ or of the _working
owner_ is already posited as an independent form beside and apart from
_landed property –_ the artisan-like and urban development of labour –
not, as in the first case, as accidental to landed property and subsumed
under it – hence where the raw material and the necessaries of life are
also _mediated_ as the craftsman’s property, mediated through his craft
work, through his property in the instrument – there a second historical
stage is already presupposed beside and apart from the first, which must
itself already appear significantly modified, through the _achievement
of independence by this second sort of property_ or by _working owners._
Since the instrument itself is already the product of labour, thus the
element which constitutes property already exists as posited by labour,
the community can no longer appear here in a naturally arisen,
spontaneous form as in the first case – the community on which this form
of property founded – but rather as itself already a produced, made,
derived and secondary community, produced by the worker himself. It is
clear that wherever ownership of the instrument is the relation to the
conditions of production as property, there, in the real labour process,
the instrument appears _only as a means_ of individual labour; the art
of really appropriating the instrument, of handling it as an instrument
of labour, appears as the worker’s particular skill, which posits him as
the owner of the instrument. In short, the essential character of the
guild-corporation system, of craft work as its subject, constituted by
owners – can be resolved into the relation to the instrument of
production – the instrument of labour as property – as distinct from the
relation to the earth, to land and soil (to the raw material as such) as
one’s own. That the relation to this one moment of the conditions of
production constitutes the working subject as owner, makes him into a
working owner, this [is] historic situation No. II, which by its nature
can exist only as antithesis to or, if one will, at the same time as
complement of a modified form of the first – likewise negated in the
first formula of capital. The third _possible form,_ in which the worker
relates as owner only to the necessaries of life, finding them on hand
as the natural condition of the working subject, without relating to the
land and soil, or to the instrument, or even (therefore) to labour
itself as his own, is at bottom the formula of slavery and bondage,
which is likewise negated, posited as a historically dissolved
condition, in the relation of the worker to the conditions of production
as capital. The original forms of property necessarily dissolve into the
relation to the different objective moments which condition production,
as one’s own; they form the economic foundation of different forms of
community, just as they for their part have specific forms of the
community as presupposition. These forms are essentially modified by the
inclusion of labour itself among the _objective conditions of
production_ (serfdom and slavery), through which the simply affirmative
character of all forms of property included under No. I is lost and
modified. They all contain, within themselves, slavery as possibility
and hence as their own suspension. As regards No. II, where the
particular kind of work – mastery of it, and, consequent upon that, an
identity between property in the instrument and property in the
conditions of production – while it excludes slavery and bondage, can
take on an analogous negative development in the form of the caste
system.> <The third form, ownership of the necessaries of life – if it
does not reduce itself to slavery and serfdom – cannot contain a
relation by the _working_ individual to the conditions of production and
hence of existence; it can therefore only be the relation of a member of
the original community based on land ownership who has lost his landed
property and not yet proceeded to variety No. II of property, such as
the Roman _plebs_ at the time of the bread and circuses.> <The relation
of personal servitude, or of the retainers to their lord, is essentially
different. For it forms, at bottom, only a mode of existence of the
land-proprietor himself, who no longer works, but whose property
includes, among the other conditions of production, the workers
themselves as bondsmen etc. Here the _master–servant relation_
[_Herrschaftsverhältnis_] as essential element of appropriation.
Basically the appropriation of animals, land etc. cannot take place in a
master–servant relation, although the animal provides service. The
presupposition of the master–servant relation is the appropriation of an
alien _will._ Whatever has no will, e.g. the animal, may well provide a
service, but does not thereby make its owner into a _master._ This much
can be seen here, however, that the _master–servant relation_ likewise
belongs in this formula of the appropriation of the instruments of
production; and it forms a necessary ferment for the development and the
decline and fall of all original relations of property and of
production, just as it also expresses their limited nature. Still, it is
reproduced – in mediated form – in capital, and thus likewise forms a
ferment of its dissolution and is an emblem of its limitation.>

<‘The power to sell one’s self and one’s own when in distress was a
grievous general right; it prevailed in the North as well as among the
Greeks and in Asia: the power of the creditor to take into servitude a
debtor who could not make payment, and to obtain payment through sale of
the debtor’s labour or of his person, was almost equally widespread.’
(Niebuhr, I, p. 600.)> <In one passage Niebuhr says that the Greek
writers writing in the period of Augustus had great difficulty with, and
misunderstood, the relation between patricians and plebeians, confusing
this relation with that between patrons and clients, because they ‘write
at a time when _rich and poor were the only true classes of citizens;_
where the needy person, no matter how noble his ancestry, required a
patron, and where the millionaire, even if he were a freed slave, was
sought out as a patron. They could hardly find a trace of inherited
dependency-relations any longer.’ (I, 620.)> <‘Craftsmen were to be
found in both classes – _Metoikoi_ [6] _and freedmen and their
descendants –_ and the plebeian who abandoned agriculture assumed the
limited civic rights to which these were restricted. They did not lack
the privilege of _legal corporations;_ and their guilds were so highly
esteemed, that Numa [7] was named as their founder: they were 9: pipers,
gold-smiths, carpenters, dyers, harness makers, tanners, copper-smiths,
potters, and the ninth guild, the miscellaneous remainder … Those among
them who were independent citizens; isopolites, [8] who belonged to no
patron – if there was such a right; and descendants of servitors, whose
bondage was dissolved by extinction of their patron’s line; all these
people without a doubt remained as distant from the wranglings of the
patricians and the commune as did the Florentine guilds from the feuds
of the Guelphs and the Ghibellines: the servitors probably still stood
entirely under the command of the patricians.’ (I, 623.)>

On one side, historic processes are presupposed which place a mass of
individuals in a nation etc. in the position, if not at first of real
free workers, nevertheless of such who are so δυνάμει, whose only
property is their labour capacity and the possibility of exchanging it
for values then present; individuals who confront all objective
conditions of production as _alien property,_ as their own
_not-property,_ but at the same time as _values,_ as exchangeable, hence
appropriable to a certain degree through living labour. Such historic
processes of dissolution are also the dissolution of the bondage
relations which fetter the worker to land and soil and to the lord of
land and soil; but which factually presuppose his ownership of the
necessaries of life – this is in truth the process of his release from
the earth; dissolution of the landed property relations, which
constituted him as a yeoman, as a free, working small landowner or
tenant _(colonus),_ a free peasant; * dissolution of the guild relations
which presuppose his ownership of the instrument of labour, and which
presuppose labour itself as a craftsmanlike, specific skill, as property
(not merely as the source of property); likewise dissolution of the
client-relations in the various forms in which _not-proprietors_ appear
in the retinue of their lord as co-consumers of the surplus product and
wear the livery of their master as an equivalent, participate in his
feuds, perform personal services, imaginary or real etc. It will be seen
on closer inspection that all these processes of dissolution mean the
dissolution of relations of production in which: use value predominates,
production for direct consumption; in which exchange value and its
production presupposes the predominance of the other form; and hence
that, in all these relations, payments in kind and services in kind
predominate over payment in money and money-services. But this only by
the way. It will likewise be found on closer observation that all the
dissolved relations were possible only with a definite degree of
development of the material (and hence also the intellectual) forces of
production.

* The dissolution of the still earlier forms of communal property and
real community goes without saying.

What concerns us here for the moment is this: the process of
dissolution, which transforms a mass of individuals of a nation etc.
into free wage labourers δυνάμει – individuals forced solely by their
lack of property to labour and to sell their labour – presupposes on the
other side _not_ that these individuals’ previous sources of income and
in part conditions of property have _disappeared,_ but the reverse, that
_only_ their utilization has become different, that their mode of
existence has changed, has gone over into other hands as a _free fund_
or has even in part remained _in the same_ hands. But this much is
clear: the same process which divorced a mass of individuals from their
previous relations to the _objective conditions of labour,_ relations
which were, in one way or another, affirmative, negated these relations,
and thereby transformed these individuals into _free workers,_ this same
process freed – δυνάμει – these _objective conditions of labour –_ land
and soil, raw material, necessaries of life, instruments of labour,
money or all of these – from their _previous state of attachment_ to the
individuals now separated from them. They are still _there on hand,_ but
in another form; as a _free fund,_ in which all political etc. relations
are obliterated. The objective conditions of labour now confront these
unbound, propertyless individuals only in the form of _values,_
self-sufficient values. The same process which placed the mass face to
face with the _objective conditions of labour_ as free workers also
placed these conditions, as _capital,_ face to face with the free
workers. The historic process was the divorce of elements which up until
then were bound together; its result is therefore not that one of the
elements disappears, but that each of them appears in a negative
relation to the other – the (potentially) free worker on the one side,
capital (potentially) on the other. The separation of the objective
conditions from the classes which have become transformed into free
workers necessarily also appears at the same time as the achievement of
independence by these same conditions at the opposite pole.

If the relation of capital and wage labour is regarded not as already
commanding and predominant over the whole of production, * but as
arising historically – i.e. if we regard the original transformation of
money into capital, the process of exchange between capital, still only
existing δυνάμει on one side and the free workers existing δυνάμει on
the other – then of course one cannot help making the simple
observation, out of which the economists make a great show, [9] that the
side which appears as capital has to possess raw materials, instruments
of labour and necessaries of life so that the worker can live during
production, before production is completed. This further takes the form
that there must have taken place on the part of the capitalist an
accumulation – an accumulation prior to labour and not sprung out of it
– which enables him to put the worker to work and to maintain his
effectiveness, to maintain him as living labour capacity. † This act by
capital which is independent of labour, not posited by labour, is then
shifted from the prehistory of capital into the present, into a moment
of its reality and of its present activity, of its self-formation. From
this is ultimately derived the eternal right of capital to the fruits of
alien labour, or rather its mode of appropriation is developed out of
the simple and just laws of equivalent exchange. [10]

* For in that case the capital presupposed as condition of wage labour
is wage labour’s own product, and is presupposed by it as its own
presupposition, created by it as its own presupposition.

† Once capital and wage labour are posited as their own presupposition,
as the basis presupposed to production itself, then what appears
initially is that the capitalist possesses, in addition to the fund of
raw materials and necessaries required for the labourer to reproduce
himself, to create the required means of subsistence, i.e. to realize
_necessary labour,_ a fund of raw material and means of labour in which
the worker realizes his surplus labour, i.e. the capitalist’s profit. On
further analysis this takes the form that the worker constantly creates
a double fund for the capitalist, or in the form of capital. One part of
this fund constantly fulfils the conditions of his own existence and the
other part fulfils the conditions for the existence of capital. As we
have seen, in the case of the surplus capital – and surplus capital in
relation to its antediluvian relation to labour – all _real, present
capital_ and each of its elements has equally been _appropriated_
without exchange, without an equivalent, as objectified, appropriated
_alien labour._

Wealth present in the form of money can be exchanged for the objective
conditions of labour only because and if these are separated from labour
itself. We saw that money can be piled up in part by way of the sheer
exchange of equivalents; but this forms so insignificant a source that
it is not worth mentioning historically – if it is presupposed that this
money is gained through the exchange of one’s own labour. The monetary
wealth which becomes transformed into capital in the proper sense, into
industrial capital, is rather the mobile wealth piled up through usury –
especially that practised against landed property – and through
mercantile profits. We shall have occasion below to speak further of
both of these forms – in so far as they appear not as themselves forms
of capital, but as earlier forms of wealth, as presuppositions for
capital.

It is inherent in the concept of capital, as we have seen – in its
origin – that it begins with _money_ and hence with wealth existing in
the form of money. It is likewise inherent in it that it appears as
coming out of circulation, as the _product_ of circulation. The
formation of capital thus does not emerge from landed property (here at
most from the _tenant_ [_Pächter_] in so far as he is a dealer in
agricultural products); or from the guild (although there is a
possibility at the last point); but rather from merchant’s and usurer’s
wealth. But the latter encounter the conditions where free labour can be
purchased only when this labour has been released from its objective
conditions of existence through the process of history. Only then does
it also encounter the possibility of buying these _conditions_
themselves. Under guild conditions, e.g., mere money, if it is not
itself guild money, masters’ money, cannot buy the looms to make people
work with them; how many an individual may operate etc. is prescribed.
In short, the instrument itself is still so intertwined with living
labour, whose domain it appears, that it does not truly circulate. What
enables money-wealth to become capital is the encounter, on one side,
with free workers; and on the other side, with the necessaries and
materials etc., which previously were in one way or another the
_property_ of the masses who have now become object-less, and are also
_free_ and purchasable. The other condition of labour, however – a
certain level of skill, instrument as means of labour etc. – is already
_available_ to it in this preliminary or first period of capital, partly
as a result of the urban guild system, partly as a result of domestic
industry, or industry which is attached to agriculture as an accessory.
This historic process is not the product of capital, but the
presupposition for it. And it is through this process that the
capitalist inserts himself as (historic) middle-man between landed
property, or property generally, and labour. History knows nothing of
the congenial fantasies according to which the capitalist and the
workers form an association etc., nor is there a trace of them in the
conceptual development of capital. _Manufactures_ may develop
sporadically, locally, in a framework which still belongs to a quite
different period, as e.g. in the Italian cities _alongside_ the guilds.
But as the sole predominant forms of an epoch, the conditions for
capital have to be developed not only locally but on a grand scale.
(Notwithstanding this, individual guild masters may develop into
capitalists with the dissolution of the guilds; but the case is rare, in
the nature of the thing as well. As a rule, the whole guild system
declines and falls, both master and journeyman, where the capitalist and
the worker arise.)

It goes without saying – and shows itself if we go more deeply into the
historic epoch under discussion here – that in truth the _period of the
dissolution_ of the earlier modes of production and modes of the workers
relation to the objective conditions of labour _is at the same time a
period_ in which _monetary wealth_ on the one side _has_ already
developed to a certain extent, and on the other side grows and expands
rapidly through the same circumstances as accelerate the above
dissolution. It is itself one of the agencies of that dissolution, while
at the same time that dissolution is the condition of its transformation
into capital. But the _mere presence of monetary wealth,_ and even the
achievement of a kind of supremacy on its part, is in no way sufficient
for this _dissolution into capital_ to happen. Or else ancient Rome,
Byzantium etc. would have ended their history with free labour and
capital, or rather begun a new history. There, too, the dissolution of
the old property relations was bound up with development of monetary
wealth – of trade etc. But instead of leading to industry, this
dissolution led in fact to the supremacy of the countryside over the
city. – The _original formation_ of capital does not happen, as is
sometimes imagined, with capital _heaping up_ necessaries of life and
instruments of labour and raw materials, in short, the _objective_
conditions of labour which have already been unbound from the soil and
animated by human labour. * Capital does not create the objective
conditions of labour. Rather, its _original formation_ is that, through
the historic process of the dissolution of the old mode of production,
value existing as money-wealth is enabled, on one side, _to buy_ the
objective conditions of labour; on the other side, to exchange money for
the _living labour_ of the workers who have been set free. All these
moments are present; their divorce is itself a historic process, a
process of dissolution, and it is _the latter_ which enables money to
transform itself into _capital._ Money itself, to the extent that it
also plays an active role, does so only in so far as it intervenes in
this process as itself a highly energetic solvent, and to that extent
assists in the creation of the _plucked,_ object-less _free workers;_
but certainly not by _creating_ the objective conditions of their
existence; rather by helping to speed up their separation from them –
their propertylessness. When e.g. the great English landowners dismissed
their retainers, who had, together with them, consumed the surplus
product of the land; when further their tenants chased off the smaller
cottagers etc., then, firstly, a mass of living labour powers was
thereby thrown onto the _labour market,_ a mass which was free in a
double sense, free from the old relations of clientship, bondage and
servitude, and secondly free of all belongings and possessions, and of
every objective, material form of being, _free of all property;_
dependent on the sale of its labour capacity or on begging, vagabondage
and robbery as its only source of income. It is a matter of historic
record that they tried the latter first, but were driven off this road
by gallows, stocks and whippings, onto the narrow path to the labour
market; owing to this fact, the _governments,_ e.g. of Henry VII, VIII
etc. appear as conditions of the historic dissolution process and as
makers of the conditions for the existence of capital. On the other
side, the necessaries of life etc., which the landowners previously ate
up together with their retainers, now stood at the disposal of any money
which might wish to buy them in order to buy labour through their
instrumentality. Money neither _created_ nor _stockpiled_ these
necessaries; they were there and were consumed and reproduced before
they were consumed and reproduced through its mediation. What had
changed was simply this, that these necessaries were now thrown on to
the _exchange market –_ were separated from their direct connection with
the mouths of the retainers etc. and transformed from use values into
exchange values, and thus fell into the domain and under the supremacy
of money wealth. Likewise with the instruments of labour. Money wealth
neither invented nor fabricated the spinning wheel and the loom. But,
once unbound from their land and soil, spinner and weaver with their
stools and wheels came under the command of money wealth. _Capital
proper does nothing but bring together the mass of hands and instruments
which it finds on hand. It agglomerates them under its command._ That is
its _real stockpiling;_ the stockpiling of workers, along with their
instruments, at particular points. This will have to be dealt with more
closely in the so-called _stockpiling_ of capital. Monetary wealth – as
merchant wealth – had admittedly helped to speed up and to dissolve the
old relations of production, and made it possible for the proprietor of
land for example, as A. Smith already nicely develops, [11] to exchange
his grain and cattle etc. for use values brought from afar, instead of
squandering the use values he himself produced, along with his
retainers, and to locate his wealth in great part in the mass of his
co-consuming retainers. It gave the _exchange value_ of his revenue a
higher significance for him. The same thing took place in regard to his
tenants, who were already semi-capitalists, but still very hemmed-in
ones. The development of exchange value – favoured by _money_ existing
in the form of the merchant estate – dissolves production which is more
oriented towards direct use value and its corresponding forms of
property – the relations of labour to its objective conditions – and
thus pushes forward towards the making of the _labour market_ (certainly
to be distinguished from the slave market). However, even this action of
money is only possible given the presupposition of an _urban artisanate_
resting _not_ on capital but on the organization of labour in guilds
etc. Urban labour itself had created means of production for which the
guilds became just as confining as were the old relations of
landownership to an improved agriculture, which was in part itself a
consequence of the larger market for agricultural products in the cities
etc. The other circumstances which e.g. in the sixteenth century
increased the mass of circulating commodities as well as that of money,
which created new needs and thereby raised the exchange value of
indigenous products etc., raised prices etc., all of these promoted on
one side the dissolution of the old relations of production, sped up the
separation of the worker or non-worker but able-bodied individual from
the objective conditions of his reproduction, and thus promoted the
transformation of money into capital. There can therefore be nothing
more ridiculous than to conceive this _original formation_ of capital as
if capital had stockpiled and created the _objective conditions of
production –_ necessaries, raw materials, instrument – and then offered
them to the worker, who was _bare_ of these possessions. Rather,
monetary wealth in part helped to _strip_ the labour powers of
able-bodied individuals from these conditions; and in part this process
of divorce proceeded without it. When the formation of capital had
reached a certain level, monetary wealth could place itself as mediator
between the objective conditions of life, thus liberated, and the
liberated but also _homeless_ and _empty-handed_ labour powers, and buy
the latter with the former. But now, as far as the _formation of
money-wealth_ itself is concerned, this belongs to the prehistory of the
bourgeois economy. Usury, trade, urbanization and the treasury rising
with it play the main roles here. So, too, _hoarding_ by tenants,
peasants etc.; although to a lesser degree. – This shows at the same
time that the development of exchange and of exchange value, which is
everywhere mediated through trade, or whose mediation may be termed
trade – money achieves an independent existence in the merchant estate,
as does circulation in trade – brings with it both the dissolution of
_labour’s relations of property in its_ conditions of existence, in one
respect, and at the same time the dissolution of _labour_ which is
itself _classed as one of the objective conditions of production;_ all
these are relations which express a predominance of use value and of
production directed towards use value, as well as of a real community
which is itself still directly present as a presupposition of
production. Production based on exchange value and the community based
on the exchange of these exchange values – even though they seem, as we
saw in the previous chapter on money, to posit property as the outcome
of _labour_ alone, and to posit private property over the product of
one’s own labour as condition – and labour as general condition of
wealth, all presuppose and produce the separation of labour from its
objective conditions. This exchange of equivalents proceeds; it is only
the surface layer of a production which rests on the appropriation of
alien labour _without exchange,_ but with the _semblance of exchange._
This system of exchange rests on _capital_ as its foundation, and, when
it is regarded in isolation from capital, as it appears on the surface,
as an _independent_ system, then it is a mere _illusion,_ but a
_necessary illusion._ Thus there is no longer any ground for
astonishment that the system of exchange values – exchange of
equivalents measured through labour – turns into, or rather reveals as
its hidden background, the _appropriation of alien labour without
exchange,_ complete separation of labour and property. For the
domination of exchange value itself, and of exchange-value-producing
production, _presupposes_ alien labour capacity itself as an exchange
value – i.e. the separation of living labour capacity from its objective
conditions; a relation to them – or to its own objectivity – as alien
property; a relation to them, in a word, as _capital._ Only in the
period of the decline and fall of the feudal system, but where it still
struggles internally – as in England in the fourteenth and first half of
the fifteenth centuries – is there a golden age for labour in the
process of becoming emancipated. In order for labour to relate to its
objective conditions as its property again, another system must take the
place of the system of private exchange, which, as we saw, posits the
exchange of objectified labour for labour capacity, and therefore the
appropriation of living labour without exchange. – The way in which
money transforms itself into capital often shows itself quite tangibly
in history; e.g. when the merchant induces a number of weavers and
spinners, who until then wove and spun as a rural, secondary occupation,
to work for him, making their secondary into their chief occupation; but
then has them in his power and has brought them under his command as
wage labourers. To draw them away from their home towns and to
concentrate them in a place of work is a further step. In this simple
process it is clear that the capitalist has prepared neither the raw
material, nor the instrument, nor the means of subsistence for the
weaver and the spinner. All that he has done is to restrict them little
by little to one kind of work in which they become dependent on selling,
on the _buyer,_ the _merchant,_ and ultimately produce only _for_ and
_through_ him. He bought their labour originally only by buying their
product; as soon as they restrict themselves to the production of this
exchange value and thus must directly produce _exchange values,_ must
exchange their labour entirely for money in order to survive, then they
come under his command, and at the end even the illusion that they
_sold_ him products disappears. He buys their labour and takes their
property first in the form of the product, and soon after that the
instrument as well, or he leaves it to them as _sham property_ in order
to reduce his own production costs. – The original historic forms in
which capital appears at first sporadically or _locally, alongside_ the
old modes of production, while exploding them little by little
everywhere, is on one side _manufacture_ proper (not yet the factory);
this [12] springs up where mass quantities are produced for export, for
the external market – i.e. on the _basis of large-scale overland and
maritime commerce,_ in its emporiums like the Italian cities,
Constantinople, in the Flemish, Dutch cities, a few Spanish ones, such
as Barcelona etc. Manufacture seizes hold initially not of the so-called
_urban trades,_ but of the _rural secondary occupations,_ spinning and
weaving, the two which least requires guild-level skills, technical
training. Apart from these great emporiums, where the external market is
its basis, where production is thus, so to speak, _naturally_ oriented
towards exchange value – i.e. manufactures directly connected with
shipping, shipbuilding itself etc. – it takes up its first residence not
in the cities, but on the land, in villages lacking guilds etc. The
rural subsidiary occupations have the broad basis [characteristic] of
manufactures, while the urban trades demand great progress in production
before they can be conducted in factory style. Likewise certain branches
of production – such as glassworks, metal works, sawmills etc., which
demand a higher concentration of labour powers from the outset, apply
more natural energy from the outset, demand mass production, likewise
concentration of the means of labour etc. Likewise paper mills. On the
other side the rise of the tenant and the transformation of the
agricultural population into free day-labourers. Although this
transformation in the countryside is the last to push on towards its
ultimate consequences and its purest form, its beginnings there are
among the earliest. Classical antiquity, which could never get beyond
the urban artisanate proper, could therefore never get to large
industry. The first presupposition of the latter is to draw the land in
all its expanse into the production not of use values but of exchange
values. Glass factories, paper mills, iron works etc. cannot be operated
on guild principles. They demand mass production; sales to a general
market; _monetary wealth_ on the part of their entrepreneur – not that
he creates the conditions, neither the subjective nor the objective
ones; but under the old relations of property and of production these
conditions cannot be brought together. – The dissolution of relations of
serfdom, like the rise of manufacture, then little by little transforms
all branches of work into branches operated by capital. – The cities
themselves, it is true, also contain an element for the formation of
wage labour proper, in the non-guild day-labourers, unskilled labourers
etc.

* The first glance shows what a nonsensical circle it would be if on the
one hand the _workers_ whom capital has to put to work in order to posit
itself as capital had first to be _created,_ to be brought to life
through its _stockpiling_ if they waited for its command, _Let There Be
Workers!;_ while at the same time it were itself incapable of
_stockpiling_ without alien labour, could at most stockpile _its own
labour,_ i.e. could itself exist in the form of _not-capital_ and
_not-money;_ since labour, before the existence of capital, can only
realize itself in forms such as craft labour, petty agriculture etc., in
short, all forms which can _not stockpile,_ or only sparingly; in forms
which allow of only a small surplus product and _eat up_ most of it. We
shall have to examine this notion of _stockpiling_ [_Aufhäufung_] still
more closely later on.

While, as we have seen, the transformation of money into capital
presupposes a historic process which divorces the objective conditions
of labour from the worker and makes them independent of him, it is at
the same time the effect of capital and of its process, once arisen, to
conquer all of production and to develop and complete the divorce
between labour and property, between labour and the objective conditions
of labour, everywhere. It will be seen in the course of the further
development how capital destroys craft and artisan labour, working
small-landownership etc., together with itself in forms in which it does
_not_ appear in opposition to labour – in _small capital_ and in the
intermediate species, the species between the old modes of production
(or their renewal on the foundation of capital) and the classical,
adequate mode of production of capital itself.

The only stockpiling presupposed at the origin of capital is that of
_monetary wealth,_ which, regarded in and for itself, is altogether
unproductive, as it only springs up out of circulation and belongs
exclusively to it. Capital rapidly forms an internal market for itself
by destroying all rural secondary occupations, so that it spins, weaves
for everyone, clothes everyone etc., in short, brings the commodities
previously created as direct use values into the form of exchange
values, a process which comes about by itself through the separation of
the workers from land and soil and from property (even in the form of
serf property) in the conditions of production.

With the urban crafts, although they rest essentially on exchange and on
the creation of exchange values, the direct and chief aim of this
production is _subsistence as craftsmen,_ as _master-journeymen,_ hence
use value; not _wealth,_ not _exchange value as exchange value._
Production is therefore always subordinated to a given consumption,
supply to demand, and expands only slowly.

The _production of capitalists and wage labourers is thus a chief
product of capital’s realization process._ Ordinary economics, which
looks only at the things produced, forgets this completely. When
objectified labour is, in this process, at the same time posited as the
worker’s _non-objectivity,_ as the objectivity of a subjectivity
antithetical to the worker, as _property_ of a will alien to him, then
capital is necessarily at the same time the _capitalist,_ and the idea
held by some socialists that we need capital but not the capitalists is
altogether wrong. It is posited within the concept of capital that the
objective conditions of labour – and these are its own product – take on
a _personality_ towards it, or, what is the same, that they are posited
as the property of a personality alien to the worker. The concept of
capital contains the capitalist. Still, this error is in no way greater
than that of e.g. all philologists who speak of _capital_ in antiquity,
of Roman, Greek capitalists. This is only another way of expressing that
labour in Rome and Greece was _free,_ which these gentlemen would hardly
wish to assert. The fact that we now not only call the plantation owners
in America capitalists, but that they _are_ capitalists, is based on
their existence as anomalies within a world market based on free labour.
If the concern is the word, capital, which does not occur in antiquity *
then the still migrating hordes with their herds on the Asiatic high
plateau are the biggest capitalists, since capital originally means
cattle, which is why the _métairie_ contract still frequently drawn up
in southern France, for lack of capital, just as an exception, is
called: _Bail de bestes à cheptel._ [14] If one wants to descend to bad
Latin, then our capitalists or _Capitales Homines_ would be those ‘_qui
debent censum de capite_’. [15]

* Although ἀρχεῖα among the Greeks, corresponding to the _principalis
summa rei creditae_. [13]

The conceptual specification of capital encounters difficulties which do
not occur with money; capital is essentially _capitalist;_ but at the
same time again as an element of his existence distinct from him, or
production in general, _capital._ We shall likewise find later that many
things are subsumed under _capital_ which do not seem to belong within
it conceptually. E.g. capital is lent out. It is stockpiled etc. In all
these designations it appears to be a mere thing, and to coincide
entirely with the matter in which it is present. But this and other
questions will be cleared up in the course of the development. (Noted
incidentally as a joke: the good Adam Müller, who takes all figurative
ways of speaking as very mystical, has also heard of _living capital_ in
ordinary life as opposed to _dead_ capital, and now rationalizes this
theosophically. [16] King Aethelstan could teach him a lesson here:
_Reddam de meo proprio decimas Deo tam in Vivente Capitale_ (livestock),
_quam in mortis fructuis terrae_ (dead fruits of the earth).) [17] Money
always remains the same form in the same substratum; and can thus be
more easily conceived as a mere thing. But one and the same commodity,
money etc., can represent capital or revenue etc. Thus it is clear even
to the economists that money is not something tangible; but that one and
the same thing can be subsumed sometimes under the title capital,
sometimes under another and contrary one, and correspondingly _is_ or
_is not_ capital. It is then evident that it is a _relation, and can
only be a relation of production._

We have seen that the true nature of capital emerges only at the _end of
the second cycle._ What we have to examine now is this cycle itself, or
the _circulation of capital._ Production originally appeared to lie
beyond circulation, and circulation beyond production. The circulation
of capital – circulation posited as the circulation of capital – spans
both moments. Production appears in it as the conclusion and the point
of departure of circulation, and vice versa. The independence of
circulation is here reduced to a mere semblance, as is the
otherworldliness of production.

 

_Exchange of labour for labour rests on the worker’s propertylessness_

<But one more remark on the topic above: The exchange of equivalents,
which seems to presuppose ownership of the products of one’s own labour
– hence seems to posit as identical: _appropriation through labour,_ the
real economic process of making something one’s own [_Zueigen-Machen_],
and _ownership of objectified_ labour; what appeared previously as a
real process is here recognized as a legal relation, i.e. as a general
condition of production, and therefore recognized by law, posited as an
expression of the general will – turns into, reveals itself through a
necessary dialectic as absolute divorce of labour and property, and
appropriation of alien labour without exchange, without equivalent.
Production based on exchange value, on whose surface this free and equal
exchange of equivalents proceeds, is at its base the exchange of
_objectified labour_ as exchange value for living labour as use value,
or, to express this in another way, the relating of labour to its
objective conditions – and hence to the objectivity created by itself –
as alien property: _alienation_ [_Entäusserung_] _of labour._ At the
same time, the condition of exchange value is its measurement by labour
time, and hence living labour – not its value – as measure of values.
The notion that production and hence society depended in all states of
production on the _exchange of mere_ _labour for labour_ is a delusion.
In the various forms in which labour relates to the conditions of
production as its own property, the reproduction of the worker is by no
means posited through _mere labour,_ for his property relation is not
the result but the presupposition of his labour. In landed property this
is clear; it must also become clear in the guild system that the
particular kind of property which labour creates does not rest on labour
alone or on the exchange of labour, but on an objective connection
between the worker and a community and conditions which are there before
him, which he takes as his basis. These too are products of labour, of
the labour of world history; of the labour of the community – of its
historic development, which does not proceed from the labour of
individuals nor from the exchange of their labours. Therefore, mere
labour is also not the presupposition of realization [_Verwertung_]. A
situation in which labour is merely exchanged for labour – whether in
the direct, living form, or in the form of the product – presupposes the
separation of labour from its original intertwinement with its objective
conditions, which is why it appears as mere labour on one side, while on
the other side its product, as objectified labour, has an entirely
independent existence as value opposite it. _The exchange of labour for
labour –_ _seemingly the condition of the worker’s property – rests on
the_ _foundation of the worker’s propertylessness._>

(It will be shown later that the _most extreme form of alienation,_
wherein labour appears in the relation of capital and wage labour, and
labour, productive activity appears in relation to its own conditions
and its own product, is a necessary point of transition – and therefore
already contains in _itself,_ in a still only inverted form, turned on
its head, the dissolution of all _limited presuppositions of
production,_ and moreover creates and produces the unconditional
presuppositions of production, and therewith the full material
conditions for the total, universal development of the productive forces
of the individual.)

_Circulation of capital and circulation of money. – Presupposition of value within each single capital (instrument etc.). – Production process and circulation process moments of production. – The productivity of the different capitals (branches of industry) determines that of the individual capital. – Circulation period. Velocity of circulation substitutes for volume of capital. Mutual dependence of capitals in the velocity of their circulation. Circulation a moment of production. Production process and its duration. Transformation of the product into money. Duration of this operation. Retransformation of money into the conditions of production. Exchange of part of the capital with living labour. – Transport costs_

The circulation of money began at an infinite number of points and
returned to an infinite number of points. The point of return was in no
way posited as the point of departure. In the circulation of capital,
the point of departure is posited as the terminal point and the terminal
point as the point of departure. The capitalist himself is the point of
departure and of return. He exchanges money for the conditions of
production, produces, realizes the product, i.e. transforms it into
money, and then begins the process anew. The circulation of money,
regarded for itself, necessarily becomes extinguished in money as a
static thing. The circulation of capital constantly ignites itself anew,
divides into its different moments, and is a _perpetuum mobile._ The
positing of prices on the side of money circulation was purely formal,
in so far as _value_ is presupposed independently of money circulation.
The circulation of capital _posits prices,_ not only formally but
really, in so far as it posits value. If value itself appears within it
as presupposition, this can only be as _value posited_ by another
capital. The breadth of the path for money circulation has been measured
in advance, and the circumstances which accelerate or retard it are
external impulses. In its circulation, capital expands itself and its
path, and the speed or slowness of its circulation itself forms one of
its intrinsic moments. It becomes qualitatively altered in circulation
and the totality of the moments of its circulation are themselves the
moments of its production – its reproduction as well as its new
production.

<We saw how at the end of the second cycle, i.e. the second cycle of
surplus value which has been realized as surplus capital, the illusion
disappears that the capitalist exchanges anything at all with the worker
other than a part of the latter’s own objectified labour. [18] However,
within the mode of production already founded on capital, the part of
capital which represents raw materials and instrument appears to the
individual capital as a value _presupposed_ to it and likewise
presupposed to the _living labour_ which it buys. These two headings
turn out to have been posited by _alien capital,_ hence again by
_capital,_ but another one. One capitalist’s raw material is another’s
product. One’s product is the other’s raw material. One capitalist’s
_instrument_ is another’s product, and may even serve as raw material
for the production of another instrument. Thus, what we called the
constant value which appeared as a presupposition in the case of the
individual capital is nothing but the presupposition of capital by
capital, i.e. the fact that the different capitals in the different
branches of industry posit one another reciprocally as presupposition
and condition. Each of them regarded for itself can be resolved into
dead labour which, as _value,_ has _become independent vis-à-vis_ living
labour. None of them in the last analysis contains anything other than
labour – apart from the natural material from which value is absent. The
introduction of _many_ capitals must not interfere with the
investigation here. The relation of the _many_ will, rather, be
explained after what they all have in common, the quality of being
capital, has been examined.>

The circulation of capital is at the same time its becoming, its growth,
its vital process. If anything needed to be compared with the
circulation of the blood, it was not the formal circulation of money,
but the content-filled circulation of capital.

Since circulation presupposes production at all points – and is the
circulation of products, whether money or commodity, while the latter
always arise from the production process, which is itself the process of
capital – it follows that the circulation of money itself now appears as
determined by the circulation of capital, whereas previously it seemed
to run _side by side with_ the production process. We shall return to
this point.

If we now consider circulation, or the circulation of capital as a
whole, then the great distinction within it appears to be that between
the production process and circulation itself, both as moments of its
circulation. How long capital remains within the sphere of the
production process depends on the latter’s technological conditions, and
the time it spends in this phase directly coincides – even though the
duration is necessarily different depending on the type of production,
its object etc. – with the development of the productive forces. The
duration is here nothing but the labour time necessary for the making of
the product (false!). [19] The smaller this labour time, the greater, as
we have seen, the relative surplus value. If less labour time is
required to make a given quantity of products, it is the same thing as
if more finished products can be supplied in a given amount of labour
time. The abbreviation of the time during which a given amount of
capital remains within the production process and is withdrawn from
circulation, ‘embarked’, [20] coincides with the abbreviation of the
labour time required to make the product – [therefore coincides] with
the development of the forces of production, the utilization of the
forces of nature, of machinery, and of the natural powers of social
labour – the agglomeration of the workers, the combination and division
of labour. Thus no new moment seems to enter in from this side. However,
when it is recalled that, as far as the individual capital is concerned,
the part of it which constitutes raw material and instrument (means of
labour) is itself the product of an alien capital, then it may be seen
that the speed with which it can repeat the production process anew is
at the same time determined by the development of the productive forces
in all other branches of industry. This becomes quite clear if one
supposes the same capital to produce its own raw materials, instruments
and final products. The length of time during which capital remains in
the phase of the production process becomes itself a moment of
circulation, if we presuppose _various_ capitals. But we are not yet
concerned with _many_ capitals here. This moment therefore does not
belong here.

The second moment is the space of time running from the completed
transformation of capital into the product until when it becomes
transformed into money. The frequency with which capital can repeat the
production process, self-realization, in a given amount of time,
evidently depends on the speed with which this space of time is run
through, or on its duration. If a capital – say originally a capital of
100 thalers – turns over 4 times in one year; let the gain be 5% of
itself each time, if the new value is not capitalized; this is the same
as if a capital 4 times as large, say 400, at the same percentage, were
to turn over _once_ in one year; each time 20%. The velocity of turnover
therefore – the remaining conditions of production being held constant –
substitutes for the _volume_ of capital. Or, if a value 4 times smaller
realizes itself as capital 4 times in the same period in which a 4 times
greater value realizes itself as capital only once, then the smaller
capital’s gain – production of surplus value – is _at least as great_ as
the larger’s. We say at least. It can be greater, because the surplus
value can itself again be employed as surplus capital. For example,
assume that a capital of 100 has a profit (here anticipating _this form_
of surplus value for the calculation’s sake) of 10% each time, no matter
how often it turns over. Then, at the end of the first 3 months, it
would be 110, at the end of the second 121, at the end of the third 133
1/10, and at the end of the last turnover 146 41/100, while a capital of
400 with one annual turnover would be only 440. In the first case the
gain = 46 41/100, in the second only = 40. (The fact that the
presupposition is wrong, in as much as capital does not bring the _same_
rate of profit with each increase in its size, is beside the point as
far as the example is concerned, for the issue here is not how much more
than 40 it brings, but the very fact that in the first case it does –
and it does – bring in more than 40.) We have already encountered the
law of the substitution of velocity for mass, and mass for velocity, in
money circulation. It holds in production just as in mechanics. It is a
circumstance to return to when we consider the equalization of the rate
of profit, price etc. The question which interests us here is this: Does
not a moment of value-determination enter in independently of labour,
not arising directly from it, but originating in circulation itself?
<The fact that _credit_ equalizes the differences in capital turnover
does not belong here yet. But the question itself belongs here, because
it arises out of the simple concept of capital – regarded in general.>
The more frequent turnover of capital in a given period of time
resembles the more frequent harvests during the natural year in the
southerly countries compared with the northerly. As already stated
above, we here abstract entirely from the different amounts of time
which capital must spend in the phase of production – in the productive
realization process itself. Just as grain when it is put in the soil as
seed loses its immediate use value, is _devalued_ as immediate use
value, so is capital _devalued_ from the completion of the production
process until its retransformation into money and from there into
capital again. <This velocity with which it can transpose itself from
the form of money back into the conditions of production – unlike in
slavery, it is not the worker himself who appears among these conditions
of production, but rather the exchange with him – depends on the
production speed and continuity of the remaining capitals, which supply
him with raw material and instrument, as well as on the availability of
workers, and in this last respect a relative surplus population is the
best condition for capital.> <Quite apart from capital A’s production
process, the speed and continuity of production process B appears as a
moment which conditions the retransformation of capital A from the form
of money into the form of industrial capital. The duration of the
_production process_ of capital B thus appears as a moment in the
_velocity of the circulation process_ of capital A. The duration of one
capital’s production phase determines the velocity of the other’s
circulation phase. Their _simultaneity_ is a condition required so that
A’s circulation is not obstructed – the fact that its own elements, for
which it has to exchange and be exchanged, are thrown into production
and circulation simultaneously. For example. In the final third of the
eighteenth century, the hand-spinning system was incapable of supplying
the required amounts of raw material for weaving – or, what is the same
– spinning could not put the flax or cotton through its production
process with the required simultaneity – simultaneous velocity. The
consequence was the invention of the spinning machine, which supplied a
greater product in the same labour time, or, what is the same thing,
required less labour time for the same product – less time delay in the
spinning process. All moments of capital which appear involved in it
when it is considered from the point of view of its general concept
obtain an independent reality, and, further, only show themselves when
it appears as real, as many capitals. The inner, living organization,
which takes place in this way within and through competition, thus
develops all the more extensively.>

If we examine the entire turnover of capital, then four moments appear,
or, each of the two great moments of the production process and the
circulation process appears again in a duality: we can take either
circulation or production as the point of departure here. This much has
now been said, that circulation is itself a moment of production, since
capital becomes capital only through circulation; production is a moment
of circulation only in so far as the latter is itself regarded as the
totality of the production process. The moments are: (I) The real
production process and its duration. (II) Transformation of the product
into money. Duration of this operation. (III) Transformation of the
money in the proper proportions into raw material, means of labour and
labour, in short, into the elements of productive capital. (IV) The
exchange of a part of the capital for living labour capacity can be
regarded as a particular moment, and must be so regarded, since the
labour market is ruled by other laws than the product market etc. Here
population is the main thing, not in absolute but in relative terms.
Moment I does not come into consideration here, as stated, since it
coincides with the conditions of realization generally. Moment III can
be considered only when the theme is not capital generally, but many
capitals. Moment IV belongs in the section on wages etc.

We are concerned here only with Moment II. In money circulation there
was a merely formal alternation of exchange value as money and as
commodity. Here _money, commodity, are conditions of production,_
ultimately of the production process. The moments here are different;
they are filled with content. The differences in capital turnover as
posited in II – since it depends neither on greater difficulty in the
exchange with labour, nor on delays resulting from the fact that raw
material [_Rohstoff_] and raw material [_Rohmaterial_] [21] are not
present simultaneously in circulation, nor in the different durations of
the production process – could therefore arise only from increased
difficulties in realization. This is obviously not an immanent case
arising from the relation itself, but rather coincides here, where we
are examining capital in general, with what we have said about the way
in which realization simultaneously results in devaluation. [22] No
business will be founded on the principle that it can sell its products
with _greater difficulty_ than another. If this resulted from the
smaller size of the market, then not a larger – as presupposed – but a
smaller capital would be employed there than in the business with a
larger market. It could be connected, however, with the _greater
distance of the market in space_ and hence the delayed return. The
longer time required by capital A to realize itself would be due here to
the greater spatial distance it has to travel after the production
process in order to exchange as C for M. But cannot e.g. the product
produced for China be regarded in such a way that the product is
completed, its production process completed, only when it has reached
the Chinese market? Its realization costs would rise by the costs of
transport from England to China. (We cannot yet speak about the
compensation for the longer fallow period of capital here, because the
secondary and derived forms of surplus value – interest – would already
have to have been presupposed.) The costs of production would resolve
into the labour time objectified in the direct production process + the
labour time contained in transport. Now the question is initially this:
Given the basic principles we have so far asserted, can a surplus value
be extracted from the transport costs? Let us deduct the constant part
of the capital consumed in transport, ship, vehicle etc. and everything
which falls under the heading of their application, since this element
contributes nothing to the question, and it is irrelevant whether this
is posited as = 0 or = _x._ Is it possible, then, that there is surplus
labour in these transport costs, and that capital can therefore squeeze
a surplus value out of them? The question is simple to answer if we ask
a further question, where and which is the necessary labour or the value
in which it objectifies itself? The product must pay (1) its own
exchange value, the labour objectified in itself; (2) the surplus time,
which the shipper, carter etc. employs on its transportation. Whether he
can or cannot extract the surplus value depends on the wealth of the
country into which he brings the product and on its needs etc., on the
use value of the product for this land. In direct production, it is
clear that all the surplus labour which the manufacturer makes the
worker do is surplus value for him, in that it is labour objectified in
new use values, which costs him nothing. But he can obviously not employ
him during transport for a longer time than is required for the
transporting. Otherwise he would throw labour time away instead of
realizing it, i.e. he would not objectify it in a use value. If the
sailor, the carter etc. require only half a year of labour time to live
a full year (if this is generally the proportion of labour necessary for
subsistence), then the capitalist employs him for a whole year and pays
him a half. By adding a whole year’s labour time to the value of the
transported products, but paying only 1/2, he gains a surplus value of
100% on necessary labour. The case is entirely the same as indirect
production, and the original surplus value of the transported product
can come about only because the workers are _not paid_ for a part of the
transportation time, because it is surplus time, time _over and above_
the labour necessary for them to live. That an individual product might
be made so much more expensive, owing to the transport costs, that it
could not be sold – on account of the disproportion between the value of
the product and its surplus value as a transported product, a quality
which becomes extinguished in it as soon as it has arrived at its
destination – does not affect the matter. If a manufacturer were to set
his entire machinery into motion in order to spin 1 lb. of twist, then
the value of this lb. would likewise rise so that it would hardly find a
market. The rise in the prices of imported products, as well as the
smaller consumption of them in the Middle Ages etc., stem precisely from
this cause. Whether I extract metals from mines, or take commodities to
the site of their consumption, both movements are equally spatial. The
improvement of the means of transport and communication likewise falls
into the category of the development of the productive forces generally.
The fact that it can depend on the value of the products whether or not
they are able to bear transport costs; that, further, commercial traffic
in mass quantities is required to reduce transport costs – a ship with a
loading capacity of 100 tons can carry 2 or 100 tons with the same
transport costs etc. – and in order to make means of communication pay
etc., all this does not belong here. (Nevertheless, it will be necessary
to devote a special section to the means of communication, since they
make up a form of fixed capital which has its own laws of realization.)
If one imagines the same capital both producing and transporting, then
both acts fall within direct production, and circulation as we have
considered it so far, i.e. transformation into money as soon as the
product has achieved its final form for consumption, would begin only
when the product had been brought to its point of destination. This
capitalist’s delayed return compared to that of another, who gets rid of
his product on the spot, would resolve into another form of greater use
of fixed capital, with which we are not yet concerned here. Whether A
requires 100 thalers more for instrument, or whether he needs 100
thalers more in order to bring his product to its destination, to
market, is the same thing. In both cases more fixed capital is used;
more _means_ of production, which is consumed in direct production. In
this respect, then, no immanent case would be posited here; it would
fall under the examination of the difference between fixed capital and
circulating capital.

_Circulation costs. – Means of communication and transport. (Division of the branches of labour.) (_Concentration _of many workers. Productive force of this concentration.) (_Mass _production.)_ – General as distinct from particular conditions of production

Still, an additional moment enters here: the _costs of circulation,_
which are not contained in the simple concept of circulation and do not
concern us yet. Only in connection with interest and particularly with
credit can we speak of the _costs of circulation_ arising from
circulation as an economic act – as a relation of production, not as a
direct moment of production, as was the case with the _means of
transport and communication._ Circulation as we regard it here is a
process of transformation, a qualitative process of value, as it appears
in the different form of money, production (realization) process,
product, retransformation into money and surplus capital. [We are
concerned here] in so far as new aspects are created within this process
of transformation as such – in this transition from one form to another.
The costs of circulation are not necessarily included e.g. in the
transition from product to money. They can be = 0.

However, in so far as circulation itself creates costs, itself requires
surplus labour, it appears as itself included within the production
process. In this respect circulation appears as a moment of the direct
production process. Where production is directly oriented towards use,
and only the excess product is exchanged, the costs of circulation
appear only for the excess product, not for the main product. [23] The
more production comes to rest on exchange value, hence on exchange, the
more important do the physical conditions of exchange – the means of
communication and transport – become for the costs of circulation.
Capital by its nature drives beyond every spatial barrier. Thus the
creation of the physical conditions of exchange – of the means of
communication and transport – the annihilation of space by time –
becomes an extraordinary necessity for it. Only in so far as the direct
product can be realized in distant markets in mass quantities in
proportion to reductions in the transport costs, and only in so far as
at the same time the means of communication and transport themselves can
yield spheres of realization for labour, driven by capital; only in so
far as commercial traffic takes place in massive volume – in which more
than necessary labour is replaced – only to that extent is the
production of cheap means of communication and transport a condition for
production based on capital, and promoted by it _for that reason._ All
labour required in order to throw the finished product into circulation
– it is in economic circulation only when it is present on the market –
is from capital’s viewpoint a barrier to be overcome – as is all labour
required as a _condition_ for the production process (thus e.g. expenses
for the security of exchange etc.). The sea route, as the route which
moves and is transformed under its own impetus, is that of trading
peoples ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν. [24] On the other side, highways originally fall to
the community, later for a long period to the governments, as pure
deductions from production, deducted from the common surplus product of
the country, but do not constitute a source of its wealth, i.e. do not
cover their production costs. In the original, self-sustaining communes
of Asia, on one side no need for roads; on the other side the lack of
them locks them into their closed-off isolation and thus forms an
essential moment of their survival without alteration (as in India).
Road construction by means of the _corvée,_ or through taxes, which is
another form, is a forced transformation of a part of a country’s
surplus labour or surplus product into roads. If an individual capital
is to undertake this – i.e. if it is to create the conditions of the
production process which are not included in the _production_ process
directly – then the work must provide a profit.

Presupposing a certain road between A and B (let land cost nothing),
then this contains no more than a definite quantity of labour, hence
value. Whether the capitalist or the state has it built is the same
thing. Does the capitalist make a gain here, then, by creating surplus
labour and hence surplus value? First, strip off what is puzzling about
the road, which arises from its nature as fixed capital. Imagine that
the road could be sold at once, like a coat or a ton of iron. If the
production of the road cost say 12 months, then its value = 12 months.
If the general standard of labour is such that a worker can live from
say 6 months of objectified labour, then, if he built the entire road,
he would create surplus value for himself to the amount of 6 months
labour; or if the commune built the road, and the worker wanted to work
only the necessary time, then another worker would have to be drawn in
to work 6 months. The capitalist, however, forces the one worker to work
12 months, and pays him 6. The part of the value of the road which
contains his surplus labour forms the capitalist’s profit. The material
form in which the product appears must absolutely not interfere in
laying the foundations of the theory of value through objectified labour
time. But the question is precisely: can the capitalist realize the road
[_den Weg verwerten_], can he realize [_realisieren_] its value through
exchange? This question naturally arises with every product, but it
takes a special form with the general conditions of production. Suppose
the value of the road is not realized. But it is built anyway, because
it is a necessary use value. How does the matter stand then? It has to
be built and has to be paid for – in so far as its cost of production
must be exchanged for it. It comes into existence only through a certain
consumption of labour, means of labour, raw materials etc. Whether it is
built by _corvée_ or through taxes is the same. But it is built only
because it is a necessary use value for the commune, because the commune
requires it at any price. This is certainly a surplus labour which the
individual must perform, whether in the form of forced labour, or in the
indirect form of taxes, over and above the direct labour necessary for
his subsistence. But to the extent that it is necessary for the commune,
and for each individual as its _member,_ what he performs is not surplus
labour, but a part of his _necessary_ labour, the labour necessary for
him to reproduce himself as _commune member_ and hence to reproduce the
community, which is itself a general condition of his productive
activity. If the labour time were entirely consumed in direct production
(or, expressed indirectly, if it were impossible to raise surplus tax
revenue for this specific purpose), then the road would have to remain
unbuilt. If the whole society is regarded as one individual, then
necessary labour would consist of the sum of all the particular labour
functions which the division of labour separates off. This one
individual would have to spend e.g. so much time for agriculture, so
much for industry, so much for trade, so much for making instruments, so
much, to return to our subject, for road building and means of
communication. All these necessities resolve into so much labour time
which must be directed towards different aims and expended in particular
activities. How much labour time could be employed would depend on the
amount of labour capacity (= the mass of individuals capable of labour
who constitute the society) and on the development of the productive
force of labour (the mass of products (use values) which it can create
in a given span of time). Exchange value, which presupposes a more or
less developed division of labour, depending on the level of exchange
itself, presupposes that, instead of one individual (the society) doing
different kinds of labour and employing his labour time in different
forms, each and every individual’s labour time is devoted exclusively to
the necessary particular functions. If we speak of _necessary labour
time,_ then the particular separate branches of labour appear _as
necessary._ Where exchange value is the basis, this reciprocal necessity
is mediated through exchange, and shows itself precisely in the fact
that every particular [piece of] objectified labour, every particularly
specified and materialized [piece of] labour time exchanges for the
product and symbol of labour time in general, of objectified labour time
pure and simple, for money, and can thus be exchanged again for every
particular labour. This necessity is itself subject to changes, because
needs are produced just as are products and the different kinds of work
skills. Increases and decreases do take place within the limits set by
these needs and necessary labours. The greater the extent to which
historic needs – needs created by production itself, social needs –
needs which are themselves the offspring of social production and
intercourse, are posited as _necessary,_ the higher the level to which
real wealth has become developed. Regarded _materially,_ wealth consists
only in the manifold variety of needs. The crafts themselves do not
appear _necessary_ ALONGSIDE self-sustaining agriculture, where
spinning, weaving etc. are done as a secondary domestic occupation. But
e.g. if agriculture itself rests on scientific activities – if it
requires machinery, chemical fertilizer acquired through exchange, seeds
from distant countries etc., and if rural, patriarchal manufacture has
already vanished – which is already implied in the presupposition – then
the machine-making factory, external trade, crafts etc. appear as
_needs_ for agriculture. Perhaps guano can be procured for it only
through the export of silk goods. Then the manufacture of silk no longer
appears as a luxury industry, but as a necessary industry for
agriculture. It is therefore chiefly and essentially because, in this
case, agriculture no longer finds the natural conditions of its own
production within itself, naturally, arisen, spontaneous, and ready to
hand, but these exist as an independent industry separate from it – and,
with this separateness the whole complex set of interconnections in
which this industry exists is drawn into the sphere of the conditions of
agricultural production – it is because of this, that what previously
appeared as a luxury is now necessary, and that so-called luxury needs
appear e.g. as a necessity for the most naturally necessary and
down-to-earth industry of all. This pulling-away of the natural ground
from the foundations of every industry, and this transfer of its
conditions of production outside itself, into a general context – hence
the transformation of what was previously superfluous into what is
necessary, as a historically created necessity – is the tendency of
capital. The general foundation of all industries comes to be general
exchange itself, the world market, and hence the totality of the
activities, intercourse, needs etc. of which it is made up. _Luxury_ is
the opposite of the _naturally necessary._ Necessary needs are those of
the individual himself reduced to a natural subject. The development of
industry suspends this natural necessity as well as this former luxury –
in bourgeois society, it is true, it does so only in _antithetical
form,_ in that it itself only posits another specific social standard as
necessary, opposite luxury. These questions about the _system of needs_
and _system of labours –_ at what point is this to be dealt with? Will
be seen in due course.

Now back to our road. If it can be built at all, it proves that the
society possesses the labour time (living labour and objectified labour)
required for its construction. * Why, then, as soon as production based
on exchange value and division of labour appears does road building not
become the business of individuals? (And it does not so become where it
is conducted through taxes by the state.) First of all: the society, the
united individuals, may possess the surplus time to build the road, but
only in concentration. Concentration is always the addition of the part
of labour capacity which each individual can employ on road building,
apart from his particular work; but it is _not only_ addition. The
unification of their forces increases their _force of production;_ but
this is by no means the same as saying that all of them added together
numerically would possess the same labour capacity if they did not _work
together,_ hence if to the sum of their labour capacities were not added
the _surplus_ existing only in and through their _united, combined_
labour. Hence the violent rounding-up of the people in Egypt, Etruria,
India etc. for forced construction and compulsory public works. Capital
effects the same concentration in _another_ way, through the manner of
its exchange with free labour. † _Secondly_: On one side, the population
may be developed far enough, and the support which it finds in the
employment of machinery etc. may be far enough advanced on the other
side, so that the power arising only from the material, _massive
concentration_ of labour – and in antiquity it is always this _massive_
effect of forcibly concentrated labour – may be superfluous, and a
_relatively_ smaller _mass of living labour_ may be required. ‡ A
special class of road-workers may form, employed by the state, § or a
part of the occasionally unemployed population is used for it, together
with a number of superintendents etc., who do not work as capitalists,
however, but as more highly educated _menials._ (About the relation of
this skilled labour etc. later.) The workers are then wage workers, but
the state employs them not as such, but as menial servants.

* It is here presupposed of course that it follows a correct instinct.
It could eat up the seed grain, let the field lie fallow, and build
roads. But it would thereby not have accomplished the _necessary
labour,_ because it would not _reproduce_ itself, not maintain itself as
living labour capacity through this labour. Alternatively the living
labour capacities may be directly murdered, as e.g. by Peter I, to build
Petersburg. This sort of thing does not belong here.

† That capital has to do not with isolated, individual labour but with
combined labour, just as it is in and for itself already a social,
combined force, is a point which should perhaps be treated already in
the general history of the rise of capital.

‡ The greater the extent to which production still rests on mere manual
labour, on use of muscle power etc., in short on physical exertion by
individual labourers, the more does the increase of the _productive
force_ consist in their collaboration _on a mass scale._ The opposite
features, particularization and individualization, are displayed by the
semi-artistic crafts; the skilfulness of individual, but uncombined
labour. Capital, in its true development, combines mass labour with
skill, but in such a way that the former loses its physical power, and
the skill resides not in the worker but in the machine and in the
scientific combination of both as a whole in the factory. The social
spirit of labour obtains an objective existence separate from the
individual workers.

§ _Among the Romans, the army constituted a mass –_ but already divorced
from the whole people – which was disciplined to labour, whose surplus
time also belonged to the state; who sold their entire labour time for
pay to the state, exchanged their entire labour capacity for a wage
necessary for the maintenance of their life, just as does the worker
with the capitalist. This holds for the period when the Roman army was
no longer a citizen’s army but a mercenary army. This is here likewise a
free sale of labour on the part of the soldier. But the state does not
buy it with the production of values as aim. And thus, although the wage
form may seem to occur originally in armies, this pay system is
nevertheless essentially different from wage labour. There is some
similarity in the fact that the state uses up the army in order to gain
an increase in power and wealth.

Now, for the capitalist to undertake road building as a business, at his
expense, * various conditions are required, which all amount to this,
that the mode of production based on capital is already developed to its
highest stage. _Firstly: Large capital_ is itself presupposed, a large
capital concentrated in his hands, in order that he may be able to
undertake work of such dimensions and of such slow turnover, [and hence]
realization. Hence mostly _share-capital,_ the form in which capital has
worked itself up to its final form, in which it is posited, not only _in
itself,_ in its substance, but is posited also in its _form,_ as social
power and product. _Secondly_: It must bring _interest,_ but not
necessarily _profit_ (it may bring more than interest, but this is not
required). We do not yet need to examine this point any further here.
_Thirdly_: As presupposition, such a volume of traffic – commercial,
above all – that the road pays for itself, i.e. that the price demanded
for the use of the road _is worth_ that much exchange value for the
producers, or supplies a productive force for which they can pay that
much. _Fourthly_: A portion of idle wealth which can lay out its revenue
for these articles of locomotion. But these two presuppositions are what
remains essential: (1) Capital in the required mass, employable for this
object, at attractive interest; (2) it has to be worth it for the
productive capitals, for industrial capital, to pay the price of
passage. Thus e.g. the first railway between Liverpool and Manchester
had become a necessity of production for the Liverpool cotton brokers
and even more for the Manchester manufacturers. † Capital as such – its
being posited with the necessary scope – will produce roads only when
the production of roads has become a necessity for the producers,
especially for productive capital itself; a condition for the
capitalist’s _profit-making_. Then the road will pay for itself. But in
this case, a large volume of traffic is already presupposed. It is the
same presupposition _doubly_: On one side, the wealth of the country
sufficiently concentrated and transformed into the form of capital, to
allow it to undertake such works as realization processes for capital;
on the other side the volume of traffic sufficient, and the barrier
formed by the lack of means of communication sufficiently felt as such,
to allow the capitalist to realize the value of the road (in instalments
over time) as road (i.e. its use). All _general conditions_ of
_production_, such as roads, canals, etc., whether they facilitate
circulation or even make it possible at all, or whether they increase
the force of production (such as irrigation works etc. as in Asia and,
incidentally, as still built by governments in Europe), presuppose, in
order to be undertaken by capital instead of by the government which
represents the community as such, the highest development of production
founded on capital. The separation of _public works_ from the state, and
their migration into the domain of the works undertaken by capital
itself, indicates the degree to which the real community has constituted
itself in the form of capital. A country, e.g. the United States, may
feel the need for railways in connection with production; nevertheless
the direct advantage arising from them for production may be too small
for the investment to appear as anything but _sunk capital._ Then
capital shifts the burden on to the shoulders of the state; or, where
the state traditionally still takes up a position superior to capital,
it still possesses the authority and the will to force the society of
capitalists to put a part of their _revenue,_ not of their capital, into
such generally useful works, which appear at the same time as _general_
conditions of production, and hence not as _particular_ conditions for
one capitalist or another – and, so long as capital does not adopt the
form of the joint-stock company, it always looks out only for its
_particular_ conditions of realization, and shifts the _communal_
conditions off on to the whole country as national requirements. Capital
undertakes only _advantageous_ undertakings, advantageous in its sense.
True, it also speculates unsoundly, and, as we shall see, _must_ do so.
It then undertakes _investments_ which do not pay, and which pay only as
soon as they have become to a certain degree _devalued._ Hence the many
undertakings where the first _investment_ is sunk and lost, the first
entrepreneurs go bankrupt – and begin to realize themselves only at
second or third hand, where the invested capital has become smaller
owing to _devaluation._ Incidentally, the state itself and everything
connected with it belongs with these deductions from _revenue,_ belongs
so to speak to the _consumption costs_ for the individual, the
production costs for society. A road itself may so increase the force of
production that it creates new traffic which then makes the road
profitable. There are works and investments which may be necessary
without being productive in the capitalist sense, i.e. without the
realization of the _surplus labour_ contained in them through
circulation, through exchange, as _surplus value._ If a worker works
e.g. 12 hours per day for a year building a road, and if the generally
necessary labour time is = 6 hours on the average, then he works a
surplus time of 6 hours. But if the road cannot be sold for 12 hours,
perhaps only for 6, then this road construction is not an undertaking
for capital, and road building is not productive labour for it. Capital
must be able to sell the road (the timing and mode of the sale are
beside the point here) in such a way that both the necessary and the
surplus labour are realized, or in such a way that it obtains out of the
general fund of profits – of surplus values – a sufficiently large share
to make it the same as if it had created surplus value. _This relation_
is to be examined _later in connection with profit and necessary
labour._ The highest development of capital exists when the general
conditions of the process of social production are not paid out of
_deductions from the social revenue_, the state’s taxes – where revenue
and not capital appears as the labour fund, and where the worker,
although he is a free wage worker like any other, nevertheless stands
economically in a different relation – but rather out of _capital as
capital._ This shows the degree to which capital has subjugated all
conditions of social production to itself, on one side; and, on the
other side, hence, the extent to which social reproductive wealth has
been _capitalized,_ and all needs are satisfied through the exchange
form; as well as the extent to which the _socially posited_ needs of the
individual, i.e. those which he consumes and feels not as a single
individual in society, but communally with others – whose mode of
consumption is social by the nature of the thing – are likewise not only
consumed but also produced through exchange, individual exchange. In the
case of the above road, road building must be so advantageous that the
transformation of a given amount of labour time into the road must
reproduce the worker’s labour capacity to the same degree as if he
transformed it into cultivated fields. Value is determined by
objectified labour time, whatever form it may take. But it does depend
now on the use value in which it is realized, whether this _value is_
realizable. It is presupposed here that the road is a requirement for
the commune, hence the use value is presupposed. For capital, on the
other side, if it is to undertake the building of the road, it must be
presupposed that not only the _necessary labour time_ but also the
_surplus labour time_ worked by the worker can be paid for – this is
where his profit comes from. (The capitalist often compels this payment
by means of protective tariffs, monopoly, state coercion; while the
individuals engaged in exchange, under conditions of free exchange,
would _at most_ pay the necessary labour.) It is very possible that
surplus labour time is present but not paid for (which can after all
happen to every capitalist). _Where capital rules_ (just as where there
is slavery and bondage or serfdom of any sort), _the worker’s absolute
labour time is posited for him as condition of being allowed to work the
necessary labour time, i.e. of being allowed to realize the labour time
necessary for the maintenance of his labour capacity in use values for
himself._ Competition then has the result, in every kind of work, that
he must work the full time – i.e. surplus labour time. But it may be the
case that this surplus labour time, although present in the product, is
not exchangeable. For the worker himself – compared with the other wage
workers – it is surplus labour. For the employer, it is labour which,
while it has a use value for him, like e.g. his cook, has no exchange
value, hence the entire distinction between _necessary and surplus
labour time_ does not exist. Labour may be necessary without being
productive. All _general, communal_ conditions of production – so long
as their production cannot yet be accomplished by capital as such and
under its conditions – are therefore paid for out of a part of the
country’s revenue – out of the government’s treasury – and the workers
do not appear as productive workers, even though they increase the
productive force of capital.

* If the state lets this sort of matter be conducted through
_state-contractors,_ then this still always takes place indirectly
through the _corvée_ or taxes.

† _Competition_ is better suited to create the necessity of e.g. the
railway in a country where the previous development of its forces of
production would not yet push so far. The effect of _competition among
nations_ belongs in the section on _international intercourse._ The
civilizing influences of capital particularly show themselves here.

The result of our digression is, incidentally, that the production of
the means of communication, of the physical conditions of circulation,
is put into the category of the production of fixed capital, and hence
does not constitute a special case. Meanwhile, and incidentally, there
opened up for us the prospect, which cannot be sharply defined yet at
this point, _of a specific relation of capital to the communal, general
conditions of social production,_ as distinct from the conditions of a
_particular capital_ and its _particular production_ process.

_Transport to market (spatial condition of circulation) belongs in the production process. Credit, the temporal moment of circulation. – Capital is circulating capital. – Money circulation a mere illusion. – Sismondi. Cherbuliez. (Capital. Its various component parts)_

_Circulation proceeds in space and time._ Economically considered, the
spatial condition, the bringing of the product to the market, belongs to
the production process itself. The product is really finished only when
it is on the market. The movement through which it gets there belongs
still with the cost of making it. It does not form a necessary moment of
circulation, regarded as a particular value-process, since a product may
be bought and even consumed at the point of its production. But this
spatial moment is important in so far as the expansion of the market and
the exchangeability of the product are connected with it. The reduction
of the costs of this _real_ circulation (in space) belongs to the
development of the forces of production by capital, the reduction of the
costs of its realization. In certain respects, as an external condition
for the existence of the economic process of circulation, this moment
may also be reckoned as part of the _production costs_ of circulation,
so that, with respect to this moment, circulation itself appears as a
moment not only of the production process in general, but also of the
direct production process. In any case, what appears here is the
determination of this moment by the general degree of development of the
productive forces, and of production based on capital generally. This
locational moment – the bringing of the product to market, which is a
necessary condition of its circulation, except when the point of
production is itself a market – could more precisely be regarded as the
transformation of the product _into a commodity._ Only on the market is
it a _commodity._ (Whether or not this forms a particular moment is a
matter of chance. If capital produces to order, then neither this moment
nor the transformation into money exists as a particular moment for it.
_Work done to order,_ i.e. supply corresponding to a prior demand, as a
_general or predominant situation,_ is not characteristic of large
industry and in no way arises from the nature of capital as a
condition.)

_Secondly, the temporal moment._ This is an essential part of the
concept of circulation. Suppose the act of making the transition from
commodity to money is fixed by contract, then this still requires time –
calculating, weighing, measuring. The abbreviation of this moment is
likewise development of productive force. However, this is time still
conceived only as an _external_ condition for the transition from the
state of money into that of commodity; the transition itself is
presupposed; the question is the time which _elapses during this
presupposed act._ This belongs to the _cost of production._ Quite
different is the time which generally passes before the commodity makes
its transition into money; or the time during which it remains a
_commodity,_ only a potential but not a real value. This is pure loss.

It is clear from everything said above that circulation appears as an
essential process of capital. The production process cannot be begun
anew before the transformation of the commodity into money. The
_constant continuity_ of the process, the unobstructed and fluid
transition of value from one form into the other, or from one phase of
the process into the next, appears as a fundamental condition for
production based on capital to a much greater degree than for all
earlier forms of production. On another side, while the necessity of
this continuity is given, its phases are separate in time and space, and
appear as particular, mutually indifferent processes. It thus appears as
a matter of chance for production based on capital whether or not its
essential condition, the continuity of the different processes which
constitute its process as a whole, is actually brought about. The
suspension of this chance element by capital itself is _credit._ (It has
other aspects as well; but this aspect arises out of the direct nature
of the production process and is hence the foundation of the necessity
of credit.) Which is why _credit_ in any developed form appears in no
earlier mode of production. There was borrowing and lending in earlier
situations as well, and usury is even the oldest of the antediluvian
forms of capital. But borrowing and lending no more constitute _credit_
than working constitutes _industrial labour_ or _free wage labour._ And
credit as an essential, developed relation of production appears
_historically_ only in circulation based on capital or on wage labour.
_(Money_ itself is a form for suspending the unevenness of the times
required in different branches of production, to the extent that this
obstructs exchange.) Although _usury_ is itself a form of credit in its
_bourgeoisified_ form, the form _adapted to capital,_ in its
pre-bourgeois form it is rather the _expression of lack of credit._

(The retransformation of money into objective moments or conditions of
production presupposes the latters’ _availability._ It constitutes the
various _markets_ where the producer encounters them as commodity – in
the hands of a merchant – markets which (alongside the labour market)
are essentially distinct from the markets for direct, individual, final
consumption.)

Money became transformed into commodity through circulation, and in the
exchange of M–C, consumption completed the process; or, the commodity
was exchanged for money – and in the exchange C–M, M was either a
vanishing moment itself to be exchanged for C again, in which case the
process ended with consumption again, or the money withdrew from
circulation and transformed itself into dead treasure, merely symbolic
wealth. At no point did the process ignite from within, but rather the
presuppositions of money circulation lay outside it, and it constantly
required a new push from the outside. In so far as both moments were
exchanged, their change of form within circulation was merely formal.
But in so far as content entered in, it dropped out of the economic
process; content did not form a part of it. The commodity did not
sustain itself as money, nor the money as commodity; each was either one
or the other. Value as such did not sustain itself in and through
circulation as predominant over the process of its transformation, its
metamorphosis; nor was the _use value_ itself (as is the case in the
capital production process) produced by the _exchange value._ With
capital the consumption of the commodity is itself not final; it falls
within the production process; it itself appears as a moment of
production, i.e. of _value-positing_ [_Wertsetzen_].

Capital is now posited, however, as not merely sustaining itself
formally, but as _realizing itself as value,_ as value relating to
itself as value in every one of the moments of its metamorphosis, in
which it appears at one time as money, at another time as commodity,
then again as exchange value, then again as use value. The passage from
one moment to the other appears as a particular process, but each of
these processes is the transition to the other. Capital is thus posited
as value-in-process, which is capital in every moment. [25] It is thus
posited as _circulating capital;_ in every moment capital, and
circulating from one form into the next. The point of return is at the
same time the point of departure and vice versa – namely the
_capitalist._ All capital is originally circulating capital, product of
circulation, as well as producing circulation, tracing in this way its
own course. From the present standpoint, money circulation now appears
as itself merely a moment of the circulation of capital, and its
independence is posited as a mere _semblance._ It appears as determined
on all sides by the circulation of capital, to which we shall return. In
so far as it forms an independent motion alongside that of capital, this
independence is posited only by the _continuity_ of the circulation of
capital, so that this one moment may be held constant and regarded for
itself.

<‘Capital a permanent, _self-multiplying_ value which never decays. This
_value_ tears itself loose from the commodity which created it; remains,
like a _metaphysical, insubstantial quality,_ always in the possession
of the same farmer,’ (e.g.), ‘for whom it cloaks itself in different
forms.’ (Sism. VI.) [26] ‘In the exchange of labour for capital, the
worker demands subsistence _in order to live;_ the capitalist demands
_work in order to make a profit.’_ (Sism. loc. cit.) ‘The master of the
workshop gains, makes a profit from every _increase in the powers of
production_ which the _division of labour_ brings about.’ (loc. cit.)
[27] ‘Sale of labour = renunciation of all fruits of labour.’
(Cherbuliez, ch. XXVIII.) [28] ‘The three component parts of capital do
not grow evenly’ (i.e. _matière première,_ instrument,
_approvisionnement_), [29] ‘nor are they in the _same relation_ in the
different stages of society. The _approvisionnement_ remains the same
for a certain period, regardless of how quickly the _speed of
production_ and consequently the _quantity of products_ may increase.
Thus an increase of _productive capital_ does not necessarily entail an
increase of the _approvisionnement_ which is destined to form the price
of labour; it can be accompanied by a reduction of it.’ (loc. cit.)
[30]>

_Influence of circulation on the determination of value. – Circulation time = time of devaluation. – Difference between the capitalist mode of production and all earlier ones (universality etc.). Propagandistic nature of capital. – Abbreviation of circulation (credit). – Storch. – What the capitalist advances is labour. (Malthus.) – Barriers to capitalist production. (Thompson)_ [31]

<In as much as the renewal of production depends on the sale of the
finished products; transformation of the commodity into money and
retransformation of money into the conditions of production – raw
material, instrument, wages; in as much as the circuits which capital
travels in order to go from one of these forms into the other constitute
sections of circulation, and these sections are travelled in specific
_amounts of time_ (even spatial distance reduces itself to time; the
important thing e.g. is not the market’s distance in space, but the
speed – the amount of time – with which it can be reached), by that much
the velocity of circulation, the _time_ in which it is accomplished, is
a determinant of how many products can be produced in a given period of
time; how often capital can be realized in a given period of time, how
often it can _reproduce_ and _multiply_ its value. Thus a moment enters
_into value-determination_ which indeed does not come out of the direct
relation of labour to capital. The frequency with which the same capital
can repeat the production process (creation of new value) in a given
period of time is evidently a condition not posited directly by the
production process itself. Thus, while circulation does not itself
produce a moment of _value-determination,_ for that lies exclusively in
labour, its speed does determine the speed with which the production
process is repeated, values are created – thus, if not _values,_ at
least to a certain extent the mass of values. Namely, the values and
surplus values posited by the production process, multiplied by the
number of repetitions of the production process in a given period of
time. When we speak of the velocity of the circulation of capital, we
postulate that delays in the transition from one phase to the next arise
only from _external barriers,_ not such as arise from the production
process and circulation itself (such as crises, overproduction etc.).
Thus, in addition to the labour time realized in production, the
_circulation time_ of capital enters in as a moment of value creation –
of productive labour time itself. While labour time appears as
value-positing activity, this circulation time of capital appears as the
_time of devaluation._ The difference shows itself simply in this: if
the totality of the labour time commanded by capital is set at its
maximum, say infinity, ∞, so that necessary labour time forms an
infinitely small part and surplus labour time an infinitely large part
of this [infinity], then this would be the maximum realization of
capital, and this is the tendency towards which it strives. On the other
side, if the _circulation time of capital_ were = 0, if the various
stages of its transformation proceeded as rapidly in reality as in the
mind, then that [32] would likewise be the maximum of the factor by
which the production process could be repeated, i.e. the number of
capital realization processes in a given period of time. The repetition
of the production process would be restricted only by the amount of time
which it lasts, the amount of time which elapses during the
transformation of raw material into product. _Circulation time_ is
therefore not a positive value-creating element; if it were = to 0, then
value-creation would be at its maximum. But if either surplus labour
time or necessary labour time = 0, i.e. if necessary labour time
absorbed all time, or if production could proceed altogether _without_
labour, then neither value, nor capital, nor value-creation would exist.
_Circulation time_ therefore determines value only in so far as it
appears as a _natural barrier_ to the realization of labour time. It is
therefore in fact a deduction from _surplus labour time,_ i.e. an
increase of _necessary labour time._ It is clear that necessary labour
time has to be paid for, whether the circulation process proceeds slowly
or quickly. E.g. in trades where specific workers are required, who can,
however, only be employed for a part of the year because the products
are, say, saleable only in a given season, [in those trades] the workers
would have to be paid for the entire year, i.e. surplus labour time is
decreased in exact proportion to the reduction in their possibilities of
employment during a given period of time, but still they must be paid in
one way or another. (For example in the form that their wages for 4
months suffice to maintain them for a year.) If capital could utilize
them for 12 months, it would pay them no higher, and would have gained
that much surplus labour. _Circulation time thus appears as a barrier to
the productivity of labour =_ an increase in necessary labour time = a
decrease in surplus labour time = a decrease in surplus value = an
obstruction, a barrier to the self-realization process
[_Selbstverwertungsprozess_] of capital. Thus, while capital must on one
side strive to tear down every spatial barrier to intercourse, i.e. to
exchange, and conquer the whole earth for its market, it strives on the
other side to annihilate this space with time, i.e. to reduce to a
minimum the time spent in motion from one place to another. The more
developed the capital, therefore, the more extensive the market over
which it circulates, which forms the spatial orbit of its circulation,
the more does it strive simultaneously for an even greater extension of
the market and for greater annihilation of space by time. (If labour
time is regarded not as the working day of the individual worker, but as
the indefinite working day of an indefinite number of workers, then all
_relations of population_ come in here; the basic doctrines of
population are therefore just as much contained in this first chapter on
capital as are those of profit, price, credit etc.) There appears here
the universalizing tendency of capital, which distinguishes it from all
previous stages of production. Although limited by its very nature, it
strives towards the universal development of the forces of production,
and thus becomes the presupposition of a new mode of production, which
is founded not on the development of the forces of production for the
purpose of reproducing or at most expanding a given condition, but where
the free, unobstructed, progressive and universal development of the
forces of production is itself the presupposition of society and hence
of its reproduction; where advance beyond the point of departure is the
only presupposition. This tendency – which capital possesses, but which
at the same time, since capital is a limited form of production,
contradicts it and hence drives it towards dissolution – distinguishes
capital from all earlier modes of production, and at the same time
contains this element, that capital is posited as a mere point of
transition. All previous forms of society – or, what is the same, of the
forces of social production – foundered on the development of wealth.
Those thinkers of antiquity who were possessed of consciousness
therefore directly denounced wealth as the dissolution of the community.
The feudal system, for its part, foundered on urban industry, trade,
modern agriculture (even as a result of individual inventions like
gunpowder and the printing press). With the development of wealth – and
hence also new powers and expanded intercourse on the part of
individuals – the economic conditions on which the community rested were
dissolved, along with the political relations of the various
constituents of the community which corresponded to those conditions:
religion, in which it was viewed in idealized form (and both [religion
and political relations] rested in turn on a given relation to nature,
into which all productive force resolves itself); the character, outlook
etc. of the individuals. The _development of science alone –_ i.e. the
most solid form of wealth, both its product and its producer – was
sufficient to dissolve these communities. But the _development of
science,_ this ideal and at the same time practical wealth, is only one
aspect, one form in which the _development of the human productive
forces,_ i.e. of wealth, appears. Considered _ideally,_ the dissolution
of a given form of consciousness sufficed to kill a whole epoch. In
reality, this barrier to consciousness corresponds to a _definite degree
of development of the forces of material production_ and hence of
wealth. True, there was not only a development on the old basis, but
also a _development of this basis itself._ The highest development of
this _basis_ itself (the flower into which it transforms itself; but it
is always _this_ basis, _this_ plant as flower; hence wilting _after_
the flowering and as consequence of the flowering) is the point at which
it is itself worked out, developed, into the form in which it is
compatible with the _highest development of the forces of production,_
hence also the richest development of the individuals. As soon as this
point is reached, the further development appears as decay, and the new
development begins from a new basis. We saw earlier that property in the
conditions of production was posited as identical with a limited,
definite form of the community; hence of the individual with the
characteristics – limited characteristics and limited development of his
productive forces – required to form such a community. This
presupposition was itself in turn the result of a limited historic stage
of the development of the productive forces; of wealth as well as of the
mode of creating it. The purpose of the community, of the individual –
as well as the condition of production – [is] _the reproduction of these
specific conditions of production_ and of the individuals, both singly
and in their social groupings and relations – as living carriers of
these conditions. Capital posits the _production of wealth_ itself and
hence the universal development of the productive forces, the constant
overthrow of its prevailing presuppositions, as the presupposition of
its reproduction. Value excludes no use value; i.e. includes no
particular kind of consumption etc., of intercourse etc. as absolute
condition; and likewise every degree of the development of the social
forces of production, of intercourse, of knowledge etc. appears to it
only as a barrier which it strives to overpower. Its own presupposition
– value – is posited as product, not as a loftier presupposition
hovering over production. The barrier to _capital_ is that this entire
development proceeds in a contradictory way, and that the working-out of
the productive forces, of general wealth etc., knowledge etc., appears
in such a way that the working individual _alienates_ himself [_sich
entäussert_]; relates to the conditions brought out of him by his labour
as those not of his _own_ but of an _alien wealth_ and of his own
poverty. But this antithetical form is itself fleeting, and produces the
real conditions of its own suspension. The result is: the tendentially
and potentially general development of the forces of production – of
wealth as such – as a basis; likewise, the universality of intercourse,
hence the world market as a basis. The basis as the possibility of the
universal development of the individual, and the real development of the
individuals from this basis as a constant suspension of its _barrier,_
which is recognized as a barrier, not taken for a _sacred limit._ Not an
ideal or imagined universality of the individual, but the universality
of his real and ideal relations. Hence also the grasping of his own
history as a _process,_ and the recognition of nature (equally present
as practical power over nature) as his real body. The process of
development itself posited and known as the presupposition of the same.
[33] For this, however, necessary above all that the full development of
the forces of production has become the _condition of production;_ and
not that specific _conditions of production_ are posited as a limit to
the development of the productive forces. –

If we now return to the _circulation time_ of capital, then its
abbreviation (except for development of the means of communication and
transport required to bring the product to market) [means] in part the
_creation_ of a continuous and hence an ever more extensive market; and
in part the development of _economic_ relations, development of forms of
capital, by means of which it _artificially_ abbreviates the circulation
time. _(All forms of credit.)_ <It may be further remarked at this point
that, since capital alone possesses the conditions of the production of
capital, hence satisfies and strives to realize [them], [it is] a
general tendency of capital at all points which are presuppositions of
circulation, which form its productive centres, to assimilate these
points into itself, i.e. to transform them into capitalizing production
or production of capital. This propagandistic (civilizing) tendency a
property exclusively of capital – as distinct from the earlier
conditions of production.> The modes of production where circulation
does not form the immanent, dominant condition of production, naturally
[do] not [meet] the specific circulation requirements of capital and
hence also do not [provide for] the working-out of the economic forms as
well as of the real forces of production corresponding to them. –
Production based on capital originally came out of circulation; we now
see that it posits circulation as its own condition, and likewise the
production process in its immediacy as moment of the circulation
process, as well as the circulation process as one phase of the
production process in its totality. – In so far as different capitals
have different circulation times (e.g. one a more distant market, the
other a near one; one a guaranteed transformation into money, the other
a risky one; one more fixed capital, the other more circulating
capital), this makes for differences among them in realization. But this
happens only in the secondary realization process. Circulation time in
itself is a _barrier_ to realization (_necessary labour time_ is of
course also a barrier; but at the same time an element, since value and
capital would vanish without it); [it is a] deduction from surplus
labour time or an increase in _necessary labour time_ in relation to
_surplus labour time._ The circulation of capital _realizes value,_
while living labour _creates value._ Circulation time is only a barrier
to this realization of value, and, to that extent, to value creation; a
barrier arising not from production generally but specific to production
of capital, the suspension of which – or the struggle against which –
hence also belongs to the specific economic development of capital and
gives the impulse for the development of its forms in credit etc.
<Capital itself is the contradiction [, in] that, while it constantly
tries to suspend _necessary labour time_ (and this is at the same time
the reduction of the worker to a minimum, i.e. his existence as mere
living labour capacity), _surplus labour time_ exists only in antithesis
with necessary labour time, so that capital posits necessary labour time
as a _necessary_ condition of its reproduction and realization. At a
certain point, a development of the forces of material production –
which is at the same time a development of the forces of the working
class – _suspends capital itself._>

<‘The entrepreneur can resume production only after he has sold the
completed product, and has employed the price for the purchase of new
materials and wages: thus, the more prompt circulation is in bringing
about these two effects, the more is he capable of beginning his
production anew, and the more products does the capital supply in a
given period of time.’ (Storch, 34.) [34]> <‘The specific _advances of
the capitalist_ do not consist of cloth etc., but of labour.’ (Malthus,
IX, 26.) [35]> <‘The accumulation of the general capital of the
community in other hands [than] those of the operative labourers,
necessarily retards the progress of all industry save that of the usual
remuneration of capital, which the time and circumstances afford to the
holders of the capital … In the previous systems, the _force of
production regarded in reference to and subordinate to actual
accumulations,_ and to the perpetuating of the existing modes of
distribution. Actual accumulation and distribution are subordinate to
the power of producing.’ (Thompson, 3.) [36]>

_Circulation and creation of value. (Equalization between different capitals in the conditions of circulation.) Capital not a source of value-creation. – Circulation costs. – Continuity of production presupposes suspension of circulation time_

It follows from the relation of circulation time to the production
process that the sum of values produced, or the total realization of
capital in a given epoch, is determined not simply by the new value
which it creates in the production process, or by the surplus time
realized in the production process, but rather by this surplus time
(surplus value) multiplied by the number which expresses how often the
production process of capital can be repeated within a given period of
time. The number which expresses this frequency of repetition may be
regarded as the coefficient of the production process or of the surplus
value created through it. However, this coefficient is not positively
but negatively determined by the velocity of circulation. I.e. if the
velocity of circulation were absolute, i.e. if no interruption in
production resulting from circulation occurred at all, then this
coefficient would be at its maximum. If the real conditions of e.g.
wheat production in a given country permit only one harvest, then no
velocity of circulation can make two harvests out of it. But if an
obstruction in the circulation occurred, if the farmer could not sell
his wheat soon enough e.g. to hire workers again, then production would
be delayed. The maximum of the coefficient of the production process or
the realization process in a given period of time is determined by the
absolute time taken up by the production phase itself. With circulation
completed, capital is able to begin its production process anew. Thus if
circulation caused no delay at all, if its velocity were absolute and
its duration = 0, i.e. if it were accomplished in no time, then this
would only be the same as if _capital_ had been able to begin its
production process anew directly it was finished; i.e. circulation would
not have existed as a limiting barrier for production, and the
repetition of the production process in a given period of time would be
absolutely dependent on, identical with, the duration of the production
process. Thus if the development of industry allowed _x_ lb. of twist to
be produced in 4 months with a capital of 100, then with that capital
the production process could be repeated only 3 times per year, and only
3_x_ lb. of twist could be produced. No velocity of circulation could
increase the reproduction of capital, or rather the repetition of its
realization process, beyond that point. That could occur only in
consequence of an _increase in the forces of production._ Circulation
time in itself is not a _productive force_ of capital, but a _barrier to
its productive force_ arising from its nature as exchange value. The
passage through the various phases of circulation here appears as a
_barrier to production,_ a barrier posited by the specific nature of
capital itself. All that can happen through the acceleration and
abbreviation of _circulation time –_ of the circulation process – is the
reduction of the barrier posited by the nature of capital. The natural
barriers to the repetition of the production process e.g. in agriculture
coincide with the duration of one cycle of the production phase. The
barrier posited by capital is the lag not between seeding and harvest,
but between harvest and the transformation of the harvest into money,
and retransformation of the money into say e.g. purchase of labour. The
circulation-artists who imagine that they can do something with the
velocity of circulation other than lessen the obstacles to reproduction
posited by capital itself are on the wrong track. (Even madder, of
course, are those circulation-artists who imagine that credit institutes
and inventions which abolish the lag of circulation time will not only
do away with the delays and interruptions in production caused by the
transformation of the finished product into capital, but will also make
the capital, with which productive capital exchanges, itself
superfluous; i.e. they want to produce on the basis of exchange value
but to remove at the same time, by some witchcraft, the necessary
conditions of production on this basis.) The most that credit can do in
this respect – as regards _mere_ circulation – is maintain the
continuity of the production process, _if_ all other conditions of this
continuity are present, i.e. if the capital to be exchanged with
actually exists etc.

It is posited in the circulation process that the transformation of the
capital into money is posited as a condition for the realization of
capital through production, for the exploitation of labour by capital;
or, the exchange of capital for capital * is posited as barrier to the
exchange of capital for labour and vice versa.

* For from the present standpoint we still only have labour or capital
at all points of circulation.

Capital exists as capital only in so far as it passes through the phases
of circulation, the various moments of its transformation, in order to
be able to begin the production process anew, and these phases are
themselves phases of its realization – but at the same time, as we saw,
of its _devaluation._ As long as capital remains frozen in the form of
the finished product, it cannot be active as capital, it is _negated_
capital. Its realization process is delayed in the same degree, and its
value-in-process [_prozessierender Wert_] negated. This thus appears as
a loss for capital, as a relative loss of its value, for its value
consists precisely in its realization process. This loss of capital
means in other words nothing else but that time passes it by unseized,
time during which it could have been appropriating alien labour,
_surplus labour time_ through exchange with living labour, if the
deadlock had not occurred. Now let us imagine _many_ capitals in
particular branches of business, all of which are _necessary_ (which
would become evident if, in the eventuality of a massive flight of
capital from a given branch, supply falling below demand, the market
price would therefore rise above the natural price in that branch), and
let a single branch of business require e.g. that capital A remain
longer in the form of devaluation, i.e. that the time in which it passes
through the various phases of circulation is longer than in all other
branches of business, in which case this capital A would regard the
smaller new value which it could produce as a positive loss, just as if
it had so many more outlays to make in order to produce the same value.
It would thus charge relatively more exchange value for its products
than the other capitals, in order to share the same rate of gain. But
this could take place in fact only if the loss were distributed among
the other capitals. If A demands more exchange value for the product
than there is labour objectified in it, then it can obtain this _more_
only if the others obtain less than the real value of their products.
That is, the less favourable conditions under which A has produced would
be borne in proportional shares by all the capitalists who exchange with
it, and in this way an equal average level would come out. But the sum
of the surplus value created by all these capitals together would be
lessened exactly by the amount of capital A’s lesser realization in
relation to the other capitals; only, instead of this reduction falling
exclusively on capital A, it is borne as a general loss, as a loss
shared proportionally by all the capitals. Nothing can therefore be more
ridiculous than the notion (see e.g. Ramsay) [37] that, apart from the
exploitation of labour, capital forms an _original_ source, separately
from labour, of _value-creation,_ because the distribution of surplus
labour among the capitals takes place not in proportion to the surplus
labour time achieved by the individual capital, but in proportion to the
_total surplus labour_ which the totality of capitals achieved, and
hence a higher value-creation can be attributed to the _individual
capital_ than is directly explicable from its _particular_ exploitation
of labour power. But this _more_ on one side has to be compensated by a
_less_ on the other. This is what _average_ means, if it means anything
at all. The question how the relation of capital to alien capital, i.e.
the competition of capitals, distributes the surplus value among them
obviously has nothing to do with the absolute amount of this surplus
value. Nothing more absurd, then, than to conclude that, because one
capital obtains a compensation for its _exceptional_ circulation time,
i.e. puts its relatively lesser realization to account as positively
greater realization, now all _capitals_ combined, _capital_ can make
something out of nothing, make a plus out of a minus, make a
plus-surplus value out of a minus-surplus value or out of minus-surplus
labour time, and that it possesses, therefore, a _mystical_ wellspring
of value independent of the appropriation of alien labour. The manner in
which the capitals among other things compute their proportional share
of the _surplus value –_ not only according to the surplus labour time
which they set in motion, but also _in accordance with the time which
their capital has worked as such,_ i.e. lain fallow, found itself in the
phase of devaluation – does of course not alter in the least the total
sum of the surplus value which they have to distribute among themselves.
This sum itself cannot grow by being smaller than it would have been if
capital A, instead of lying fallow, had created surplus value; i.e. by
having created less surplus value in the same time as the other
capitalists. And this _lying-fallow_ is made good for capital A only in
so far as it arises necessarily out of the conditions of the particular
branch of production, and hence appears in respect to _capital as such_
as a burden on realization, as a _necessary barrier_ to its realization
generally. The division of labour leaves this barrier as a barrier only
as regards the production process of this particular capital. If the
production process is regarded as conducted by capital as such, this
lying-fallow is a _general barrier_ to capital’s realization. If one
imagines all production carried out by labour alone, then all the larger
advances which it requires during its realization appear as what they
are – _deductions from surplus value._

Circulation can _create value_ only in so far as it requires fresh
employment – of _alien labour –_ in addition to that directly consumed
in the production process. This is then the same as if more _necessary
labour_ were used in the direct production process. Only the actual
_circulation costs_ increase the _value_ of the product, but decrease
the surplus value.

To the extent that the circulation of capital (the product etc.) does
not merely express the phases necessary to begin the production process
anew, this circulation (see Storch’s example) does not form a moment of
production in its totality – is hence not circulation posited by
production, and, in so far as it creates expenses, these are _faux frais
de production._ [38] The costs of circulation generally, in so far as
their merely economic moments, circulation proper, are concerned
(bringing the product to market gives it a _new use value),_ are to be
regarded as deduction from _surplus value,_ i.e. as an increase of
necessary labour in relation to surplus labour.

The continuity of production presupposes that circulation time has been
suspended. If it has not been suspended, then time must pass between the
different metamorphoses through which capital must travel; its
circulation time _must_ appear as deduction from its production time. On
the other hand, the nature of capital presupposes that it travels
through the different phases of circulation not as it does in the mind,
where one concept turns into the next at the speed of thought, in no
time, but rather as situations which are separate in time. It must spend
some time as a cocoon before it can take off as a butterfly. Thus the
conditions of production arising out of the nature of capital itself
contradict each other. The contradiction can be suspended and overcome
only * in two ways:

_Firstly, credit_: A pseudo-buyer B – i.e. someone who really _pays_ but
does not really buy – mediates the transformation of capitalist A’s
product into money. But B himself is paid only after capitalist C has
bought A’s product. Whether the money which this credit-man, B, gives to
A is used by A to buy labour or to buy raw material and instrument,
before A can replace either of them from the sale of his product, does
not alter the case. Given our presupposition, he must basically give him
both – i.e. all the conditions of production (these represent, however,
a greater value than the original ones with which A began the production
process). In this case capital B replaces capital A; but they are not
realized at the same time. Now B takes the place of A; i.e. his capital
lies fallow, until it is exchanged with capital C. It is frozen in the
product of A, who has made his product liquid in capital B.

* Except if one imagines that all capitals produce to order for each
other, and that the product is therefore always immediately money, a
notion which contradicts the nature of capital and hence also the
practice of large-scale industry.

_Ramsay. Circulation time. Concludes therefore that capital is its own source of profit. – Ramsay. Confusion about surplus value and profit and law of values. (No surplus value according to Ricardo’s law.) – Ricardo. Competition. – Quincey. [39] Ricardo’s theory of value. Wages and profit._ Quincey. – Ricardo. – Wakefield. _Conditions of capitalist production [in] colonies_

The economists’ absolute confusion in respect of Ricardo‘s determination
of value through labour time – something which is founded on a basic
defect of his own development – emerges very clearly with Mr Ramsay. He
says (after having previously drawn, from the influence of the
circulation time of capitals on their _relative realization,_ i.e. their
relative share of the general surplus value, the nonsensical conclusion
that: ‘This shows how capital may regulate value independently of
labour’ (IX, 84. R, 43) [40] or ‘that capital is a source of value
independent of labour’ [41]) – he says, literally: ‘A circulating
capital _(approvisionnement)_ will always maintain more labour than that
formerly bestowed upon itself. Because, could it employ no more than had
been previously bestowed upon itself, _what advantage_ could arise to
the owner from the use of it _as such?’_ (loc. cit. 49.) ‘Given two
capitals of equal value, each produced through the labour of 100 men
operating for a given time, of which the one is entirely circulating,
the other entirely fixed, and may perhaps consist of wine kept to
improve. Now, this circulating capital, _raised by the labour of 100
men, will set 150 men in motion._ Therefore the product at the end of
the coming year will in this case be the result of the labour of 150
men. But still it will be of no more value than the wine at the
termination of the same period, although only 100 men employed upon the
latter.’ (50.) ‘Or is it asserted that the quantity of labour which
every circulating capital _will employ_ is no more than equal to the
[quantity] previously bestowed upon it? That would mean, that the _value
of the capital expended =_ that of the product.’ (52.) Great confusion
between the labour bestowed upon capital and that which it will employ.
The capital which is exchanged for labour capacity, the
_approvisionnement –_ and this he here calls _circulating capital –_ can
never employ more labour than has been bestowed upon it. (The reaction
of a development of the productive forces on present capital is beside
the point here.) But there has been more labour bestowed upon it than it
has paid for – _surplus labour,_ which is converted into _surplus value
and surplus produce,_ enabling the capital to renew this profitable
bargain, where the mutuality is all on one side, on a more enlarged
scale. It is enabled to employ more new living labour, because during
the process of production a portion of fresh labour has been bestowed
upon it beyond the accumulated labour of which it consisted before
entering that process.

Mr Ramsay seems to imagine that, if a capital is the product of 20
working days (necessary and surplus together), this product of 20
working days can employ 30 working days. But this is by no means the
case. Say that 10 days of necessary labour and 10 surplus days were
employed on the product. Then the surplus value = 10 surplus days. If
the capitalist then exchanges these again for raw material, instrument
and labour, then he can set new _necessary labour_ into motion with the
_surplus product._ The point is not that he employed more labour time
than is present in the product, but that he exchanges the surplus labour
time, which costs him nothing, for new necessary labour time – in other
words, precisely, that he employs the _entire labour time_ bestowed upon
the product, while he has paid only part of that labour. Mr Ramsay’s
conclusion, that if the quantity of labour which every circulating
capital will employ was no more than equal to that previously bestowed
upon it, the value of the capital expended would be equal to that of the
produce, i.e. no surplus value would be left, would be correct only if
the quantity of labour bestowed upon the capital _were wholly paid for,_
i.e. if capital did not appropriate a part of the labour _without
equivalent._ These misunderstandings on Ricardo’s part [42] obviously
arise from the fact that he himself was not clear about the process,
nor, as a bourgeois, could he be. Insight into this process is = to the
statement that capital is not only, as A. Smith thinks, [43] command
over alien labour, in the sense that every exchange value is that, since
it gives its possessor _buying power,_ but that it is the power to
appropriate alien labour _without exchange, without equivalent,_ but
with the semblance of exchange. Ricardo knows no argument to refute
those, like A. Smith and others, who fall into the same error regarding
value as determined by labour, and value as determined by the price of
labour (wages), other than to say: with the product of the same quantity
of labour one can set sometimes more and sometimes less living labour
into motion, i.e. he regards the product of labour in respect of the
worker only as _use value –_ only the part of the product which he needs
to be able to live as worker. But how it comes about that the worker
suddenly only represents _use value_ in the exchange, or only draws use
value from the exchange, is by no means clear to him, as is already
proved by his arguments against A. Smith, which are never in general
terms, but always about particular examples. But why is it, then, that
the share of the worker in the value of the product is determined not by
the value, but rather by the use value of the product, thus not by the
labour time employed on it, but by its quality of maintaining living
labour capacity? If he tries to explain this with, say, competition
among the workers, then the answer which would have to be given is the
same as that which he gives A. Smith about competition among
capitalists, i.e. that competition may well even out, equalize the level
of profit, but in no way creates the measure of this level. [44]
Likewise, competition among the workers could press down a higher wages
level etc., but the general standard of wages, or as Ricardo puts it the
natural price of wages, could not be explained by the competition
between worker and worker, but only by the original relation between
capital and labour. Competition generally, this essential locomotive
force of the bourgeois economy, does not establish its laws, but is
rather their executor. Unlimited competition is therefore not the
presupposition for the truth of the economic laws, but rather the
consequence – the form of appearance in which their necessity realizes
itself. For the economists to presuppose, as does Ricardo, that
unlimited competition exists [45] is to presuppose the full reality and
realization of the bourgeois relations of production in their specific
and distinct character. Competition therefore does not _explain_ these
laws; rather, it lets them be _seen,_ but does not produce them. Then
Ricardo says, too: the production costs of living labour depend on the
production costs of making the values required to reproduce it. [46]
While he previously regarded the product in relation to the worker only
as a use value, he now regards the worker only as an _exchange value_ in
relation to the product. The historic process through which product and
living labour come into this mutual relation is none of his concern. He
is just as vague about the way in which this relation is perpetuated.
Capital, with him, is the _result of saving;_ this already shows that he
misunderstands the process of its origins and reproduction. He therefore
also imagines that production is impossible without capital, although he
can very well imagine capital possible without ground rent. The
distinction between _profit_ and _surplus value_ does not exist for him,
proof that he is clear about the nature of neither one. His procedure
already shows this from the very beginning. Originally, he makes workers
exchange with workers – and their exchange is then determined by the
equivalent, by the labour time reciprocally expended in production. Then
comes the real problem of his economics, to demonstrate that this
determination of value is not altered by the accumulation of capitals –
i.e. by the presence [_Dasein_] of capital. Firstly, he has no inkling
that his first spontaneous relation is itself only a relation abstracted
from the mode of production resting on capital. Secondly, what he has
available is a _definite amount of objective labour time,_ which may of
course increase, and he asks himself, how is it _distributed?_ The
question is rather how is it created, and there it is precisely the
specific nature of the relation of capital and labour, or the specific
and distinct character of capital, which explains this. As Quincey (X,
5) puts it, modern economics (the economics of Ricardo) is in fact
concerned only with the dividends, while the total product is regarded
as fixed, determined by the quantity of labour employed on it – its
value appraised in accordance with that. [47] Accordingly, Ricardo has
rightly been accused of not understanding _surplus value,_ although his
opponents understand it even less. Capital is represented as
appropriating a certain part of the ready and available value of labour
(of the product); the creation of this value, which it appropriates
above and beyond the reproduced capital, is not presented as the
_source_ of the surplus value. This creation is identical with the
appropriation of alien labour _without exchange,_ and for that reason
the bourgeois economists are never permitted to understand it clearly.
Ramsay accuses Ricardo of forgetting that the fixed capital (which
consists of capital not included in _approvisionnement,_ with Ramsay the
_raw material_ at the same time along with the _instrument_) is a
deduction from the sum total available for distribution among capitalist
and worker. ‘Ricardo forgets that the whole product is divided not only
between wages and profits, but that another part is necessary for
replacing fixed capital.’ (IX, p. 88. R. 174, note.) Indeed, since
Ricardo does not grasp the relation between objectified and living
labour in its living movement – [a relation] not to be deduced from the
dividends of a given quantity of labour, but from the positing of
surplus labour – and does not, therefore, grasp the relation among the
different component parts of capital, it therefore seems with him as if
the entire product were divided into wages and profits, so that the
reproduction of capital is itself counted as part of profit. Quincey
(loc. cit. Notebook X, 5) gives this exposition of the Ricardian
doctrine: ‘If the price is 10s. then wages and profit as a whole cannot
exceed 10s. But do not the wages and profits as a whole, themselves, on
the contrary, predetermine the price? No, that is the old superannuated
doctrine.’ (p. 204). ‘The new economics has shown that all price is
governed by _proportional quantity of the producing labour,_ and by that
only. Being itself once settled, then ipso facto, _price settles the
fund_ out of which both wages and profits must derive their _separate
dividends.’_ (loc. cit. 204.) [48] Capital here appears not as positing
surplus value, i.e. surplus labour, but only as making deductions from a
given quantity of labour. The fact that instrument and raw material
appropriate these _dividends_ then has to be explained by their _use
value_ in production, which then presupposes the absurdity that raw
material and instrument create use value through their _separation_ from
labour. For this _separation_ makes them into capital. Considered for
themselves, they are themselves labour, accumulated labour. Besides,
this clashes with sound common sense, because the capitalist knows very
well that he counts wages and profit among the production costs and
regulates the _necessary price_ accordingly. This contradiction in the
determination of the product by relative labour time, and the limitation
of the sum of profit and wages by the sum of this labour time, and the
_real determination of prices_ in practice, comes about only because
profit is not grasped as itself a derivative, secondary form of _surplus
value;_ the same is true of what the capitalist justly regards as _his
production costs._ His profit arises simply from the fact that a part of
the cost of production costs him nothing, hence does not enter into
_his_ outlays, _his_ production costs.

 


NOTEBOOK VI

February 1858



THE CHAPTER ON CAPITAL (CONTINUATION)


‘Any change that can disturb the existing relations between wages and
profits must originate in wages.’ (Quincey. loc. cit. (X, 5) p. 205.)
This is true only in so far as any variations in the mass of surplus
labour must be derived from a variation in the relation between
necessary and surplus labour. But this can likewise come about if
necessary labour becomes less productive and hence a greater part of the
total labour falls to it, or if the total labour becomes more
productive, hence necessary labour time is reduced. It is nonsense to
say that this productive force of labour arises from _wages._ The
relative reduction of wages is rather its result. But it arises (1) from
the appropriation by capital of the growth in the productive forces
resulting from division of labour, trade which brings cheaper raw
materials, science etc.; (2) but this increase of the productive forces
has to be regarded as being initiated by capital in so far as it is
realized through the employment of a greater capital etc. Further:
profit and wages, although determined by the relation of necessary and
surplus labour, do not coincide with it, are only secondary forms of the
same. The point, however, is this: the Ricardians presuppose a definite
quantity of labour; this determines the price of the product, out of
which labour, in wages, and capital, in profits, then draw their
dividends; the workers’ dividend = the price of the necessaries of life.
Hence in the ‘existing relations between wages and profits’, the rate of
profit is at its maximum and that of wages at its minimum. Competition
among capitals can change only the relation in which they share the
total profit, but cannot alter the relation between total profit and
total wages. The general standard of profit is this relation of the
total profit to the total wages, and this is not altered through
competition. Hence, where does the alteration come from? Certainly not
because the profit rate voluntarily declines, and it would have to do so
voluntarily since competition does not have this result. Hence it is due
to an alteration in wages, whose necessary costs may rise (theory of the
progressive deterioration of the soil in agriculture; theory of rent) in
consequence of a decrease in the productive force of labour due to
natural causes. Carey etc. replies, correctly, to this (but, in the way
he explains it, incorrectly again) that the rate of profit falls, as a
result not of a decrease but rather of an increase in the productive
force. [1] The solution of the whole matter is simply that the rate of
profit is not the same as the absolute surplus value, but is rather the
surplus value in relation to the capital employed, and that the growth
of productive force is accompanied by the decrease of that part of
capital which represents _approvisionnement_ in relation to that part
which represents invariable capital; hence, when the relation between
total labour and the capital which employs it falls, then the part of
labour which appears as surplus labour or surplus value necessarily
falls too. This inability to explain one of the most striking phenomena
of modern production is the source of Ricardo’s failure to understand
his own principle. But the difficulties in which he thereby entangles
his disciples may be seen in this quotation among others from Quincey:
‘It is the common paralogism, that if upon the same farm you have always
kept 5 men, and in 1800 their produce was 25 qrs, but in 1845 50 qrs,
you are apt to view the _produce only as variable,_ and the _labour as
constant:_ whereas _virtually_ both have varied. In 1800 each qr must
have cost 1/5 part of a man; in 1845 each has cost no more than 1/10
part of a man.’ (loc. cit. 214.) In both cases the absolute labour time
was the same, 2 days; but in 1845 the productive force of labour had
doubled in comparison with 1800, and therefore the cost of producing
necessary labour was less. The labour bestowed upon 1 quarter was less,
but the total labour was the same. Mr Quincey should, however, have
learned from Ricardo that the productive force of labour does not
determine the value of the product – although it determines the surplus
value, albeit not in step with the increase of the productive force.
These arguments _against_ Ricardo, as well as the desperate sophistries
of his disciples (e.g. Mr MacCulloch, who cites surplus labour as the
source of the surplus value of old wine compared with new wine). [2] Nor
is value to be determined by the labour which the unit cost, i.e. the
_price_ of the single quarter. _Rather, the_ _price multiplied by the
number constitutes the value._ The 50 quarters in 1845 had _the same
value_ as the 25 in 1800, because they objectified the same amount of
labour. The price of each single quarter, the unit, _must_ have been
different, and the _total price_ (expressed in money) may have been
different, for very different reasons. (What Quincey says about the
machine holds for the worker: ‘A machine, as soon as its secret is
known, will not sell for the labour produced, but for the labour
producing … it will no longer be viewed as a _cause equal to certain
effects,_ but _as an effect certainly reproducible_ by a known cause _at
a known cost.’_ (84.) De Quincey says about Malthus: ‘Malthus in his
Political Economy refuses to see, nay he positively denies, that if two
men produce a variable result of ten and five, then in one case each
unit of the result has cost double the labour which it has cost in the
other. On the contrary, because there are always two men, Mr Malthus
obstinately insists that the _cost in labour_ is constant.’ (loc. cit.
215, note.) In fact: _the cost in labour is constant,_ because, by
presupposition, just as much labour is contained in ten as in five. But
the _cost of labour_ is not constant, because in the first case, where
the productive force of labour [is] double, the time belonging to
necessary labour [is] in a certain proportion less. We shall go into
Malthus’s view immediately after this. Here, before we go further in the
development of the circulation time of capital and its relation to
labour time, it is proper first to examine Ricardo’s whole doctrine
about this matter, in order to establish the difference between our own
conception and his more sharply. (The quotations from Ricardo in
Notebook VIII.) [3]

First presupposition with him, _‘competition without restriction’,_ and
unhampered increase of products through industry. (19. R. 5.) [4] This
means in other words nothing other than that the laws of capital are
completely realized only within _unlimited competition_ and _industrial
production._ Capital develops adequately on the latter productive basis
and in the former relation of production; i.e. its immanent laws enter
completely into reality. Since this is so, it would have to be shown how
this _unlimited competition_ and _industrial production_ are conditions
of the realization of capital, conditions which it must itself little by
little produce (instead of the hypothesis appearing here as merely that
of the theoretician, who places free competition and the productive mode
of capital’s existence externally and arbitrarily into the relation of
capital to itself as capital, not as developments of capital itself, but
as imaginary presuppositions of capital for the sake of purity.) This by
the way the only place in Ricardo where a faint notion of the _historic_
nature of the laws of bourgeois economy. With this presupposition, the
_relative value_ of commodities (this word meaningless, since absolute
value is nonsense) is determined by the different quantity which can be
produced in the same labour time, or by the quantity of labour
relatively realized in different commodities. (p. 4.) (Notebook, 19.)
(Henceforth the first number for the page in the notebook; the second
for the page in Ricardo.) [5] Now, how one gets from value as equivalent
determined by labour to the non-equivalent, i.e. to the value which
posits surplus value through exchange, i.e. how one gets from value to
capital, from one aspect to its apparent opposite, this does not
interest Ricardo. The only question for him: how the _value relation_
between the commodities can remain the same and can and must be
determined by relative quantities of labour, _although_ the owners of
accumulated labour … do not exchange labour _equivalents_ in living
labour, i.e. despite the relation of capital and labour. It is then a
very simple arithmetical proof that commodity A and commodity B can
exchange in relation to the labour realized in them, although the
producers of A or B _distribute_ product A, or the product B exchanged
for it, in different ways among themselves. But since all _distribution_
here proceeds on the basis of exchange, it appears in fact altogether
impossible to explain why one of the exchange values – living labour –
is exchanged according to the amount of labour time realized in it,
while the other exchange value – accumulated labour, capital – is not
exchanged according to the standard of the labour time realized in it.
Bray e.g. therefore believes that he is the first to draw the true
conclusion from Ricardo with his equal exchange between living and dead
labour. [6] That from the standpoint of exchange alone, the _worker’s
pay_ would have to = _the value of the product,_ i.e. the amount of
labour in objective form which the worker obtains in pay, = the amount
of labour in subjective form which he expends in labour, is so necessary
a conclusion that A. Smith falls into it. [7] Ricardo, by contrast,
avoids this fallacy, but how? ‘The _value_ of labour, and the quantity
of commodities which a specific quantity of labour can buy, are not
identical.’ Why not? _‘Because_ the worker’s product or an equivalent of
this product is not = to the worker’s pay.’ I.e. the identity does not
exist, _because_ a difference exists. ‘Therefore’ (because this is not
the case) ‘it is not the value of labour which is the measure of value,
but the quantity of labour bestowed on the commodity.’ (19, 3.) [8]
Value of labour is not identical with wages of labour. _Because_ they
are different. _Therefore_ they are not identical. This is a strange
logic. There is basically no reason for this other than that it is _not_
so in practice. But it ought to be so, according to the theory. For the
exchange of values [is] determined by the labour time realized in them.
Hence equivalents are exchanged. Thus a specific quantity of labour time
in living form would have to exchange for the same quantity of labour
time in accumulated form. What would have to be demonstrated is
precisely that the law of exchange turns into its precise opposite. Not
even a faint suspicion that it does so is expressed here. Or the
suspicion would have to lie in the frequently repeated admonition
against mixing them up; that the distinction between past and living
labour cannot do the job either is readily admitted: ‘The comparative
quantity of commodities which a given quantity of labour will produce
determines their past and present value’ (19, 9) where living labour
thus even determines the value of past labour retroactively. Why then is
capital not also exchanged for living labour in proportion to the labour
realized in the capital? Why is it that a quantity of living labour is
not itself = the quantity of labour in which it has objectified itself?
‘Labour is by nature of different quality, and it is difficult to
compare different hours of labour in different branches of business. But
this scale is very soon established in practice.’ (19, 13.) ‘For short
periods, at least from year to year, the variation in this inequality is
insignificant, and is _therefore_ left out of account.’ (19, I 5.) This
is nothing. If Ricardo had applied his own principle, the amounts of
(simple) labour to which the different _labour capacities_ are
reducible, then the matter would have been simple. Generally, he is
concerned straight away with the hours of labour. What the capitalist
acquires through exchange is _labour capacity:_ this is the exchange
value which he pays for. Living labour is the use value which this
exchange value has for him, and out of this use value springs the
surplus value and the suspension of exchange as such. Because Ricardo
allows exchange with living labour – and thus falls straight into the
production process – it remains an insoluble antinomy in his system that
a certain quantity of living labour does not = the commodity which it
creates, in which it objectifies itself, although the value of the
commodity = to the amount of labour contained in it. The value of the
commodity ‘includes also the labour of bringing the commodity to
market’. (19, 18.) We shall see that circulation time, in so far as it
appears as determining value with Ricardo, is only the labour required
to bring the commodities to market. ‘The principle of
value-determination by the relative amounts of labour contained in the
commodity is considerably modified by the employment of machinery and
other fixed and durable capital. A rise or fall in wages differently
affects two capitals of which one is almost entirely circulating, the
other almost entirely fixed; likewise the unequal duration of the fixed
capital employed. Namely, there is added the _profit on fixed capital_
(interest), as well as the compensation for the greater length of time
which must elapse before the more valuable of the two commodities can be
brought to market.’ (19, 29, 30.) The latter moment concerns only the
duration of the production process, i.e. labour time directly employed,
at least in Ricardo’s example of the farmer and the baker. (If one
farmer’s wheat becomes ready for the market later than another’s, then
this so-called _compensation_ already presupposes _interest;_ thus
already something derivative, not an original aspect.)

‘Profit and wages are only _portions_ in which the two classes, of
capitalists and workers, partake in the original commodity, i.e. also in
that exchanged for it.’ (p. 31.) The very great extent to which the
production of _the original commodity,_ its origin, is itself determined
by these _portions,_ the extent to which, therefore, it _precedes_ these
portions as basic determinant, proves that the _original commodity_
[would] not be produced at all, if it did not contain surplus labour for
capital. ‘Commodities on which the same quantity of labour has been
bestowed vary in relative value if they cannot be brought to market in
the same amount of time. With a _greater fixed capital,_ too, the higher
value of a commodity is due to the greater length of time which must
elapse before it can be brought to market … The difference arises in
both cases from the profits being accumulated as capital, and is only a
compensation for the _time during which profits were withheld.’_ (34,
35.) This means absolutely nothing other than that capital lying fallow
is _reckoned in and up_ as if it were not lying fallow, but were being
exchanged with surplus labour time. This has nothing to do with the
determination of value. It belongs with price. (In the case of fixed
capital it [enters] into the determination of value only as _another
method_ of paying for the objectified labour, abstracted from the
profit.)

‘There is another principle of labour which nothing points out to the
economic inquirer in old countries, but of which every colonial
capitalist has been made conscious in his own person. By far the greater
part of the operations of industry, and especially those of which the
_produce is great in proportion to the capital and labour employed,_
require _a considerable time for_ [_their_] _completion._ As to most of
them, it is not worth while to make a commencement without the certainty
of being able to carry them on for several years. A large portion of the
capital employed in them is _fixed, inconvertible, durable._ If anything
happens to stop the operation, all this capital is lost. _If the harvest
cannot be gathered, the whole outlay in making it grow_ has been thrown
away … This shows that _constancy_ is a no less important principle than
combination of labour. The importance of the principle of constancy is
not seen here, because rarely indeed does it happen, that the labour
which carries on a business, is stopped against the will of the
capitalists … But in the _colonies_ just the opposite. Here capitalists
are so much afraid of it that they avoid its occurrence as much as they
can, by avoiding, as much as possible, operations which require much
time for their completion.’ (Wakefield, 169, XIV, 71.) [9] ‘There are
numerous _operations of so simple a kind_ as not to admit a _division
into parts,_ which cannot be performed without the cooperation of many
pairs of hands. For example, the lifting of a large tree on to a wain,
keeping down weeds in a large field of growing crops, shearing a large
flock of sheep at the same time, gathering a harvest of corn at the time
when it is ripe enough and not too ripe, moving any great weight;
everything, in short, which cannot be done unless a good many pairs of
hands help together in the same undivided employment, and at the same
time.’ (168 loc. cit.) _‘Combination and constancy_ _of labour_ are
provided for in old countries, without an effort or thought on the part
of the capitalist, merely by the _abundance of labourers for hire._ The
scarcity of labourers for hire is the universal complaint of
colonies.’(170 loc. cit.) ‘Only the _cheapest land_ in a colony is that
whose price affects the _labour market. The price of this land, as of
all bare land, and of everything else which it costs nothing to
produce,_ depends of course on the _relation between the demand and
supply.’_ (p. 332.) … ‘In order that _the price of waste land_ should
accomplish its objects’ (namely of making the worker into a
non-landowner), ‘it must be _sufficient_ for the purpose. Hitherto the
price has been everywhere insufficient.’ (338 loc. cit.) This
‘sufficient’ price: ‘In founding a colony the price might be so low as
to render the quantity of land appropriated by settlers practically
unlimited: it might be high enough to occasion a proportion between land
and people similar to that of old countries, in which case, if this very
high price did not prevent emigration, the cheapest land in the colony
might be as dear, and the superabundance of labourers as deplorable as
in England: or it might be a just medium between the two, occasioning
neither superabundance of people nor superabundance of land, but so
limiting the quantity of land as to give the cheapest land a market
value that would have the effect of compelling labourers to work some
considerable time for wages before they could become landowners.’ (339
loc. cit.) (Notebook XIV, 71.) (These excerpts here quoted from
Wakefield’s _Art of Colonization_ belong with the ones given above about
the necessary separation of the worker from the conditions of property.)

_Surplus value and profit._ Example _(Malthus). – Profit and surplus value._ Malthus – _Difference between labour and labour capacity. – The peculiar assertion that the introduction of capital in no way changes the payment of labour. – Carey’s theory of the cheapening of capital for the worker. – (Decline of the profit rate.) – Wakefield on the contradiction between Ricardo’s theories of wage labour and of value_

(The calculation of profit as distinct from the calculation of the real
surplus value which capital posits in the exchange with living labour,
made clear e.g. in the following example. It is a statement in the
_first Report of the Factory Commissioners._ (Malthus’s _Princip. of
Polit. Economy,_ 1836, 2nd ed. (Notebook X, p. 42).)

  ---------------------------------------- ---------
  Capital sunk in building and machinery   £10,000
  Floating capital                         £7,000
  ---------------------------------------- ---------

+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| £500                              | interest on £10,000 fixed capital |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 350                               | floating capital                  |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 150                               | Rents, taxes, rates               |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 650                               | Sinking fund of 6 1/2% for wear   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
|                                   | and tear of the fixed capital     |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| -------------------------------   |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| £1,650                            |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| £1,100                            | Contingencies, carriage, coal,    |
|                                   | oil                               |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| -------------------------------   |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 2,750                             |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 2,600                             | Wages and salaries                |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| -------------------------------   |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 5,350                             |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 10,000                            | for about 400,000 lb. raw cotton  |
|                                   | at 6d.                            |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| -------------------------------   |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 15,350                            |                                   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 16,000                            | for 363,000 lb. twist spun. Value |
|                                   | £16,000                           |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+

The capital laid out in labour is 2,600; the surplus value = 1,650 (850
interest + 150 rents etc., makes 1,000 + 650 profit).

But 2,000:1,650 = 100:63 6/13. Thus the rate of surplus value is 63
6/13%. According to the profit calculation it would have to be 850
interest, 150 rents and 650 profit, or 1,650:15,350; nearly 10.1%.

In the above example, the floating capital turns over 167/70 times per
year; the fixed capital turns over once in 15 5/13 years; once in 200/13
year.

_Profit:_ 650 or about 4.2. [10] The wages of the operatives 1/6. The
profit is indicated here as 4.2; say it were only 4%. This 4% figured on
an outlay of 15,350. But then we also have 5% interest on £10,000 and 5%
on 7,000; £850 = 5% of 17,000. From the actual annual advances made, we
must deduct (1) the part of the fixed capital which does not figure in
the sinking fund; (2) that which is figured as interest. (It is possible
that capitalist A does not pocket the interest, but capitalist B. In any
case they are revenue, not capital; surplus value.) From the £15,350
outlays thus deduct 850; leaves: £14,500. Of the £2,600 for wages and
salaries there were £183 1/3 in the form of salary, since 1/6 of 14,500
is not 2,600 but 2,416 2/3, and 14,500 divided by this is 6.

Thus, he sells the 14,500 at 16,000 or a profit of 1,500; makes 10 2/3%;
but let us ignore these 2/3 and say 10%; 1/6 of 100 is 16 2/3. Thus, out
of 100, he would give: 83 1/3 for advances, 16 2/3 wages and 10 profit.
In detail:

 

_Advances_

_Wages_

_Sum_

_Reproduces_

_Profit_

£ St.:

83 1/3

16 2/3

100

110

10

10 of 16 2/3 or of 50/3 is exactly 60%. Thus, in order that, in the
capitalist’s calculation, an annual profit of 10% (it was slightly more)
be made on a capital of £17,000, wherein labour makes up only 1/6 of the
annual advances of 14,500, the worker (or capital, as you like) has to
create a surplus value of 60%. Or, of the total labour time 40% are for
necessary and 60 for surplus labour; they relate as 4:6 or = 2:3 or
1:3/2. If, however, the advances on capital had been 50, the advances on
wages also 50, then only 20% surplus value would have to be created in
order that the capitalist should have 10%; 50 50 10 = 110. But 10 to 50
= 20:100 or 20%. If necessary labour in the second case posited as much
surplus labour as in the first, then the capitalist’s profit would
amount to £30; on the other hand if the rate of real value-creation, the
positing of surplus labour, in the first case, were only as great as in
the second, then the profit would amount to only £3 1/3, and if the
capitalist had to pay 5% interest to another capitalist, then he would
have to carry an actual loss. This much arises simply from the formula,
(1) that, in order to determine the size of the real surplus value, one
must calculate the profit on the advance made for wages; the percentage
which expresses the proportion between the so-called profit and wages;
(2) the relatively smaller percentage made up by the proportion between
the outlay in living labour and the total outlay presupposes a greater
outlay in fixed capital, machinery etc.; greater division of labour.
Thus, although the percentage of labour is smaller than in the capital
working with more labour, the mass of labour really set in motion must
be significantly greater; i.e. a greater capital generally has to be
worked with. The proportional part of labour out of the total advance is
smaller; but the absolute sum of labour set in motion is larger for the
individual capital; i.e. it must itself be larger. (3) If it is a case
not of larger machinery etc., but of an instrument which does not set
more labour into motion and itself represents no greater fixed capital
(e.g. manual lithography) but merely replaces labour, then the profit of
the capital working with the machine is absolutely smaller than that of
the capital working with living labour. (But the latter can make a
percentage profit higher than the former, and thus throw him out of the
market.) (etc.) The examination of how far the rate of profit can
decrease as capital grows, while the gross profit nevertheless
increases, belongs to the doctrine of profit _(competition)._

In his _Principles of Political Economy,_ 2nd ed., 1836, Malthus has an
inkling that profit, i.e. not profit, but _real surplus value,_ has to
be calculated not in respect of capital advanced, but of living labour
advanced, whose value is expressed objectively in wages; but this leads
him into playing games which become absurd if they are to serve as a
basis for any determination of value, or for reasoning about the
relation of labour to the determination of value.

For example, if I take the total value of the finished product, then I
can compare every part of the product advanced with the part of the
outlay corresponding to it; and the percentage of profit in relation to
the whole product is naturally the same percentage for any fractional
part of the product. Say e.g. that 100 thalers brought 110; thus 10% the
whole product; 75%, say, for the invariable part of capital, 25 for
labour, i.e. 3/4 for the former, 1/4 for living labour. Now if I take
1/4 of the total product, i.e. of 110, then I obtain 27 2/4 or 27 1/2.
On an outlay of 25 for labour, the capitalist would have a gain of 2
1/2, i.e. 10%. Likewise Malthus could have said that if I take 3/4 of
the total product, i.e. 75, then these 3/4 are represented in the total
product by 82 1/2; then 7 1/2 out of 75 is exactly 10%. This obviously
means nothing other than that if I gain 10% on 100 then the gain on
every part of 100 amounts to as much as, when added together, will be
10% on the total sum. If I have gained 10 on 100, then on 2 × 50 I have
gained 5 each time etc. The fact that, if I gain 10 on 100, I gain 2 1/2
on 1/4 of 100 and 7 1/2 on 3/4 takes us not a single step further. If I
have gained 10 on 100, how much have I then won on 1/4 of 100 or on 3/4?
Malthus’s insight can be reduced to this childishness. The advance for
labour amounted to 1/4 of the 100, and the gain on it amounted to 10%.
10% of 25 is 2 1/2. Or the capitalist, if he has gained 10 on 100, has
gained 1/10 on every part of his capital, i.e. 10%. This gives the parts
of the capital no qualitative character whatever, and it therefore holds
for fixed capital etc. just as well as for the part advanced in labour.
Moreover, this only expresses the illusion that each part of the capital
is involved to an equal degree in the newly created value. Nor has the
1/4 of the capital advanced for wages created the surplus value; rather,
the unpaid living labour has done so. However, from the relation of the
total value – here the 10 thalers – to wages we can see what percentage
of labour was not paid, or, how much surplus labour there was. In the
above relation, the necessary labour is objectified in 25 thalers, the
surplus labour in 10; thus they relate as 25:10 = 100:40; 40% of the
labour was surplus labour, or, what is the same, 40% of the value it
produced was surplus value. It is quite true that the capitalist can
make this reckoning: if I make 10 on 100, then, on wages, = 25, I have
made 2 1/2. It is impossible to see what use this calculation is. But
what Malthus wants to do with it will be seen shortly when we go into
his determination of value. However, it is clear from the following that
he indeed believes that his simple arithmetical example contains a real
determination:

‘Suppose the capital be expended only for wages, £100 expended in
immediate labour. The returns at the end of the year 110, 120, or 130;
it is evident that in each case the profits will be determinated by the
proportion of the _value of the whole produce_ which is required to pay
the labour employed. If the value of the produce in the market = 110,
the proportion required to pay the labourers = 10/11 of the value of the
produce, or the profits = 10%.’ (Here Mr Malthus does nothing more than
to express the original advance, £100, as a relation to the total
product. 100 is 10/11 of 110. Whether I say I gain 10 on 100, i.e. 1/10
of 100, or I say 1/11 of the 110 are gain, it is the same.) ‘If the
value of the product is 120, the proportion for labour = 10/12 and the
gain 20%; if 130, the proportion required to pay the labour = 10/13 and
the gain = 30%.’ (Instead of saying: I gain 10 on 100, I can also say
that 10/11 of the 110 were the advances; or, 20 on the 100, the advances
amount only to 10/12 of 120 etc. The character of these advances,
whether in labour or otherwise, has absolutely nothing to do with this
other arithmetic form of expressing the matter. If a capital of 100 has
brought in 110, then either I can start with the capital and say I
gained 10 on it, or I can start with the product, with 110, and say that
I advanced only 10/11 on it beforehand. The relation is, of course, the
same.) ‘Now assume that the capitalist’s advances do not consist
entirely of labour. The capitalist _expects an equal benefit on all
parts of the capital he advances’_ (that means simply that he
distributes the benefit he has made, and whose origin may be quite
obscure to him, among all parts of his outlays equally, entirely
abstracting away their qualitative difference). ‘Suppose 1/4 of the
advances, for labour’ (direct), ‘3/4 consisting of accumulated labour
and profits, with any additions which may arise of rents, taxes and
other outgoings. _Then strictly true that the profits of the capitalist
will vary with the varying value of this 1/4 of the produce compared
with the quantity of labour employed.’_ (Not quantity with Mr Malthus,
but rather compared with the salary paid.) (Thus strictly true that his
profits will vary with the varying value of the 3/4 of his profits
compared with the advances in accumulated labour, i.e. the gain relates
to the total capital advanced (10:100) as every part of the total
product (110) does to the part of the advance corresponding to it.) ‘For
example,’ Malthus continues, ‘a farmer employs £2,000 in cultivation, of
which 1,500 in seed, keep of horses, wear and tear of his fixed capital,
etc., and £500 on immediate labour, and the returns at the end are
2,400. His profit 400, on 2,000 = 20%. And it is immediately obvious
that if we took 1/4 of the value of the produce, namely £600, and
compared it with the amount paid in the wages of the immediate labour,
the result would show exactly the same rate of profits.’ (loc. cit. 267,
268. Notebook X, 41, 42.) (It is equally obvious that if we took 3/4 of
the value of the produce, namely 1,800, and compared it with the amount
paid in the advances on accumulated labour, namely with 1,500, the
result would show exactly the same rate of profits. 1,800:1,500 = 18:15
= 6:5. And 6 is 1/5 more than 5, hence 20%.) (Malthus here has two
different arithmetic formulae in mind and gets them mixed up: _firstly,_
if I make 10 on 100, then on every part of the 100 my gain is not 10 but
10%: i.e. 5 on 50, 2 1/2 on 25 etc.; to gain 10 on 100 means to gain
1/10 on each part of the 100, and consequently the profit has to show up
also as 1/10 profit on wages, and if the profit is distributed evenly
among all parts of the capital, then I can say that the rate of profit
on the total capital varies with the rate of profit on each of its
parts, including e.g. the part advanced as wages; _secondly_ if I gained
10% on 100, then the total product 110. Now, if wages formed 1/4 of the
advances = 25, then they form only a 4 2/5 part of 110; i.e. they form a
fraction that is smaller by 2/5, and it will form an ever smaller part
of the total product in proportion as the latter has risen in comparison
with the original. This is again only another way of calculating. 10 is
1/10 of 100 but only 1/11 of 110. I can therefore say that as the total
product grows larger, each of the fractional parts of the original
capital forms a relatively smaller part of it. Tautology.)

In his work _The Measure of Value Stated and Illustrated,_ London, 1823
(Notebook IX), Malthus asserts that the _‘value of labour’_ is
_‘constant’_ and is hence the true Measure of Value generally. ‘Any
given quantity of labour must be of the _same value_ as the wages which
command it, or for which it actually exchanges.’ (p. 5, loc. cit.) (IX,
29.) He is speaking here, of course, about wage labour. The truth is
rather: any given quantity of labour is = the same quantity of labour
expressed in a product; or, each product is only a specific quantity of
labour, objectified in the value of the product, which is measured with
respect to other products by this quantity. Wages, however, express the
value of living labour capacity, but in no way the _value_ of living
labour, which is expressed, rather, in wages + profit. Wages are the
price of _necessary labour._ If the worker had to work 6 hours in order
to live, and if he produced for himself as mere worker, then he would
daily receive the commodity of 6 hours of labour, say 6d. Now the
capitalist makes him work 12 hours, and pays him 6d. He pays him 1/2d.
per hour, i.e. a given quantity of 12 hours of labour has the value of
12d., and 12d. is indeed the value for which the product exchanges, when
it gets sold. On the other hand, the capitalist commands with this
value, if he could re-invest it in mere labour, 24 hours. The wages
command, therefore, a much greater quantity of labour than they consist
of, and a given quantity of living labour actually exchanges for a much
smaller one of accumulated labour. The only thing that is sure is that
the price of labour, wages, must always express the quantity of labour
which the labourers want in order to keep soul and body together. The
wages of any quantity of labour must be equal to the quantity of labour
which the labourer must expend upon his own reproduction. In the above
instance a man would set to work two men for 12 hours each – together 24
hours – with the quantity of labour afforded by one man. In the case
above, the product would be exchanged for another product with a value
of 12d., or for 12 hours of labour, and this would be the source of its
profit of 6d. (its surplus value for the capitalist). The value of
products is determined by the labour contained in them, not by that part
of the labour in them which the employer pays for. _The value of the
product is constituted by labour done, including that not paid for;_ but
wages _only_ express _paid labour,_ never all labour _done._ The measure
of this payment itself depends on the productivity of labour, for the
latter determines the amount of necessary labour time. And since these
wages constitute the _value of labour_ (labour itself posited as
commodity), this value is constantly variable, and is the opposite of
constant. The amount of labour which the worker works is very different
from the amount of labour that is worked up into his labour capacity, or
which is required to reproduce his labour capacity. But he does not sell
as commodity the use made of him, he sells himself not as cause but as
effect. Let us listen how Mr Malthus exerts himself to get the matter
clear:

‘The conditions of the supply of commodities do not require that they
should retain always the same relative values, but that each should
retain its proper _natural_ value, or the means of obtaining those
objects which will continue to the producer _the same power of
production_ AND accumulation … profits are calculated upon the advances
necessary to production … _the specific advances of capitalists do not
consist of cloth, but of labour;_ AND _as no other object whatever can
represent a given quantity of labour,_ it is clear that it is the
_quantity of labour which a commodity will command,_ and not the
quantity of any other commodity, which can represent the condition of
its supply, or its _natural value.’_ (17, 18.) (IX, 29.) Already, from
the fact that the capitalist’s _advances_ consist of _labour,_ Malthus
could have seen that the matter has not become clear. Posit that the
necessary labour time is 6 hours; also A, B, two men each of whom works
for himself but who exchange with one another. Let A work 6 hours, B 12
hours. Now if A wants to eat up the 6 extra hours worked by B, if he
wants to consume the product of B’s 6 surplus hours, there is nothing he
can give him other than 6 hours of living labour, say the next day. B
now has a product of 6 hours of labour more than A. Now posit that under
these circumstances he begins to fancy himself a capitalist and stops
working altogether. Then on the third day, the only thing he could give
in exchange for A’s 6 hours is his own accumulated product of 6 hours,
and, as soon as this exchange was accomplished, he would have to begin
working again himself, or starve. But if he continues to work 12 hours
for A, and A continues to work 6 hours for himself and 6 for B, then
they exchange exactly 12 hours with one another. The _natural value_ of
the commodity, says Malthus, consists in its giving back to its
possessor through exchange _the same power of_ _production_ AND
_accumulation._ His commodity consists of 2 quantities of labour, one
quantity of accumulated labour + one quantity of immediate labour. Thus
if he exchanges his commodity for another which contains exactly the
same total quantity of labour, then his power of production and
accumulation has remained at least the same, equal. But it grew, because
a part of the immediate labour has cost him _nothing,_ while he sells it
nevertheless. Yet Malthus comes to the conclusion that the quantity of
labour of which the product consists is paid labour _only,_ hence = to
the sum of the wages, or, that _wages_ are the measuring rod of the
value of the commodity. If every amount of labour contained in the
commodity were paid for, then Mr Malthus’s doctrine would be correct,
but it would be equally true that his capitalist would have no ‘advances
of labour’ to make, and his ‘powers of accumulation would become totally
forfeited’. Where is the profit to come from, if no unpaid labour is
performed? Well, thinks Mr Malthus, [from] the wages for accumulated
labour. But since labour _done_ has ceased to work, it also ceases to
draw wages. True, the product in which it exists could now be again
exchanged for living labour, but posit that this product = 6 hours of
labour; then the worker would give 6 hours of living labour and would
receive the advances, the capitalist’s 6 hours of done labour, in
return; so that the capitalist would not have budged a single step
forward. Living labour would very soon be in possession of his dead
labour. The reason Malthus gives, however, is that because ‘no other
object whatsoever can represent a given quantity of labour’, the natural
value of a commodity consists of ‘the quantity of labour which a
commodity will command, and not the quantity of any other commodity’.
That means a given quantity of labour can be represented only by a
quantity of living (immediate) labour. Not ‘no other object whatsoever’
but rather ‘every object whatsoever’ can represent a given quantity of
labour, namely every object in which the same quantity of labour is
contained. But Malthus wants the quantity of labour contained in the
commodity to be measured by, to be equal to, not the _quantity of living
labour_ which it can set in motion, but the _quantity of paid labour_
which it sets in motion. Posit that the commodity contains 24 hours of
labour; he thinks, then, that the capitalist can buy 2 working days with
it; and if the capitalist paid all of this labour, or if the quantity of
labour done = the quantity of paid living labour, then he could buy
_only_ 24 hours of living labour with his 24 hours of done labour, and
his ‘powers of accumulation’ would have gone to the wall. But the
capitalist does not pay the worker the labour time, the amount of
labour, but rather pays him only the necessary labour, while forcing him
to work the rest free of charge. Thus, with the 24 hours of done labour
he may perhaps set 48 hours of living labour into motion. Thus he in
fact pays 1 hour of done labour for 2 hours of living labour, and thus
gains 100% on the exchange. The value of his commodity now = 48 hours,
but is in no way equal to the wages exchanged for them, nor equal to the
wages for which it then in turn exchanges. If he continues in the same
way, his 48 hours of done labour will buy 96 hours of living labour.

Posit that no capitalists exist at all, but that the independent and
mutually exchanging workers worked more than necessary to live, because
they want to accumulate too, etc. Call that part of the work which the
worker does in order to live, _wages;_ and the surplus time he works in
order to accumulate, _profit._ Then the value of his commodity would be
= to the total amount of labour contained in it, = to the total sum of
living labour time; but in no way = to the wages he paid himself, or
equal to the part of the commodity which he would have to reproduce in
order to live. Because the value of a commodity = a specific quantity of
labour, Malthus says it is = to the quantity of necessary labour (i.e.
wages) contained in it, and not = to the total sum of labour contained
in it; its totality is = to a fraction of it. But the worker’s ‘powers
of accumulation’ evidently would arise only because he has worked more
than necessary to pay himself his wages. If a specific quantity of
living labour time were = to the time required for the worker to live,
then a specific quantity of living labour would be = to the wages which
he produces, or the wages would be exactly equal to the living labour
which they set in motion. If such were the case, capital would of course
be impossible. If the worker, in the whole of his working time, can
produce not a farthing more than his wages, then with the best of wills
he cannot squeeze out a farthing for the capitalist. Property is the
offspring of the productivity of labour. ‘If one can produce only for
one, everyone a worker; there can be no property. If one man’s labour
can maintain 5, there will be 4 idle men for 1 employed in production.’
(Ravenstone.) [11] We saw above how Malthus’s fantasizing profundity
expressed itself in a purely childish kind of calculation. What lay
behind this, by the way, was the doctrine that the value of labour was
constant and that wages constituted price. Because the rate of profit on
a total capital can be expressed as the same rate on the fraction of the
capital made up by wages, he asserts that this fractional part
constitutes and determines the price. Exactly the same _profundity_ as
here. If commodity A = an amount of _x_ commodity, he thinks that this
can mean nothing else than that it = _x_ living labour, for only labour
can represent labour. From this he concludes that commodity A = the
amount of _wage labour_ which it can command, and that therefore the
value of labour is constant, because always = to the commodity by which
it is set in motion. The nub of it is simply that the amount of living
labour and the amount of wage labour are identical for him, and that he
believes that every fractional part of wage labour is really paid for.
But _x_ living labour can be (and, as wage labour, always is) = _x_ −
_y_ necessary labour (wages) + _y_ surplus labour. _x_ dead labour can
therefore set in motion _x − y_ necessary labour (wages) + _y_ surplus
labour time; i.e. it always sets in motion as many additional hours of
living labour time as there are hours of surplus labour time over and
above necessary labour time contained within _x_ hours of labour.

Wage labour always consists of paid and unpaid labour.

_The value of labour_ is constant, thus means nothing other than that
all labour time is necessary, i.e. wage-producing labour time. There is
no surplus labour time but – nevertheless – there are ‘powers of
accumulation’ and capital. Since wages are always equal to a given
quantity of labour, namely the quantity of living labour which they set
in motion, and since this is the same quantity of labour contained in
the wages, therefore the _value of labour_ is constant, for it is always
= to the quantity of objectified labour. The rise and fall in the price
of commodities, not of the _value of labour._ If a worker gets 8s.
silver per week or 16, this comes about only because the price of
shillings has risen or fallen, but the value of labour has remained the
same. In both cases he obtains a week of done labour for a week of
living labour. Mr M. proves this as follows:

‘If labour alone, without capital, were employed in procuring the fruits
of the earth, the greater facility of procuring one sort of them
compared with another would not, it is acknowledged, alter the value of
labour, or the exchangeable value of the whole produce obtained by a
given quantity of exertion.’ [12]

This means nothing but that each of the commodities, regardless of their
quantity, would be determined by the labour contained in it, despite the
fact that, depending on the degree of its productivity, it would express
itself in one case in more, in another in fewer, use values. ‘_We
should, without hesitation, allow that the difference was in the
cheapness or dearness of the produce, not of the labour.’_ [13] We would
say labour is more productive in one branch than in the other, or,
alternatively, the product costs more or less labour. We could not speak
of cheapness or dearness of labour, since no _wage labour_ existed, and
hence an hour of immediate labour would always command an hour of
objectified labour, which would naturally not prevent one hour from
being more productive than another. But still, to the extent that we
distinguish the part of labour necessary for subsistence from the part
that is surplus labour – and if any hours of the day are at all worked
as surplus time, then it is the same as if every fractional part of
labour time consisted of a part necessary and a part surplus labour –
done by the immediate labourers, it could still not be said that the
_value of labour,_ i.e. _wages_ (the part of the product exchanged for
necessary labour, or the part of the total labour which is employed for
the necessary product), are _constant._ The fractional part of labour
time which reproduces wages would vary with productivity; thus, with the
productivity of labour, the _value of labour,_ i.e. wages, would
constantly vary. Wages would be measured both before and after by a
definite _use value,_ and since the latter constantly varies in its
exchange value depending on the productivity of labour, wages would
change, or [in other words] the _value of labour. Value of labour_
presupposes in principle that living labour is _not_ equal to its
product, or, what is the same, that it is sold not as an acting cause,
but as itself a produced effect. ‘The value of labour is constant’ means
nothing further than that it is constantly measured by the quantity of
labour contained in it. A product may contain more or less labour.
Therefore sometimes a greater, sometimes a lesser portion of product A
may exchange for product B. But the quantity of living labour which the
product buys can never be greater or smaller than the done labour which
it represents, for a given quantity of labour is always a given quantity
of labour, whether it exists in the form of objectified or in the form
of living labour. Thus if more or less of a product is given for a
specific quantity of living labour, i.e. if wages rise and fall, then
this comes about not because the value of labour rose or fell, for the
value of a specific quantity of labour is always equal to the same
specific quantity of labour, but rather because the products have cost
more or less labour, because a greater or lesser quantity of the
products thus represents the same quantity of labour. _Thus the value of
labour remains constant. Only the value of the products changes,_ i.e.
the productivity of labour changes, not its values. This is the pith of
the theory of Malthus, if you can call such a shallow fallacy a theory.
First of all, a product which has cost only half a working day may
suffice for me to live and work a whole day. Whether or not the product
possesses this quality depends not on its _value,_ i.e. the labour time
bestowed on it, but rather on its _use value,_ and the exchange which
takes place in this regard between living labour and the product of
labour is not an exchange between both as use values, but rather their
relation lies on the one side in the use value of the product, on the
other side in the conditions of the existence of living labour capacity.
Now, if objectified labour were exchanged for living labour, then
according to the laws of exchange value the product which = half a day
of work could only buy half a day of living labour, even though the
worker could live from it for a whole day of work; and if his entire
working day were to be bought, then he would have to obtain a whole
working day in the product, with which, according to the assumption, he
could live for two working days. But on the basis of capital, living
labour and done labour do not exchange with one another as exchange
values, as identical quantities: the same quantity of labour in
objectified form as _value_ being equivalent to the same quantity of
labour in living form. Rather, what is exchanged is a product, and
labour capacity, which is itself a product. Labour capacity is not = to
the living labour which it can do, = to the quantity of labour which it
can get done – this is its _use value._ It is equal to the quantity of
labour by means of which _it must itself be produced_ and can be
reproduced. The product is thus in fact exchanged not for living labour,
but for objectified labour, labour objectified in labour capacity.
Living labour itself is a use value possessed by the exchange value [,
labour capacity,] which the possessor of the product [, the capitalist,]
has acquired in trade, and whether he has acquired less or more of this
living labour than he has spent in the form of the product [, wages,]
for labour capacity depends on the amount of living labour paid to the
worker in the product. If an amount of labour were exchanged for an
amount of labour, regardless of whether it were living or objectified,
then of course every amount of labour would be equal to itself and its
value equal to its amount. The product of half a working day thus could
buy only half a working day. But then in fact no _wages_ would exist,
and no _value of labour._ Labour would have no _value distinct_ from
that of its product or the equivalent of its product, no _specific_
value, and it is precisely the latter which constitutes the _value of
labour,_ wages.

From the fact, therefore, that a specific quantity of labour = a
specific quantity of labour, or also that a specific quantity = itself,
from the great discovery that a specific quantity is a specific
quantity, Mr Malthus concludes that wages are constant, that the value
of labour is constant, namely = to the same amount of labour
objectified. This _would be_ correct if living labour and stored-up
labour were exchanged for one another as _exchange values._ But then
there would exist neither _value of labour,_ nor _wages,_ nor _capital,_
nor _wage labour,_ nor Malthus’s inquiries. All of these are based on
the fact that living labour appears as a _use value_ and living labour
capacity as an _exchange value_ opposite the labour stored up in
capital. Malthus calmly proceeds: ‘_The same holds_ if _capital and
profits enter into the computation of value and the demand for labour
varies.’_ [14] Here we have the whole profundity. As soon as capital and
profits are introduced, living labour capacity begins to be bought, and
therefore a smaller portion of stored-up labour is exchanged for a
larger portion of living labour. It is a general characteristic of this
profundity that the entry of capital, which posits wage labour and which
for the first time transforms labour into wage labour and labour
capacity into a commodity, introduces no _change_ whatever, either into
the realization of labour or into the realization of stored-up labour.
_Capital, a specific form of the relation of labour to its product and
to its value, is, according to Malthus, ‘entering’ without changing
anything._ It is just as if he allowed of no change in the constitution
of the Roman Republic other than the introduction, the ‘entering of
emperors’. He continues: ‘If an increased reward of the labourers takes
place without an increase in the produce, this is possible only with a
fall of profits … To obtain any given portion of the produce the same
quantity of labour is necessary as before, but profit being diminished,
the value of the produce is decreased; while this diminution of profits
in reference to the value of wages is just counterbalanced by the
increased quantity of labour necessary to procure the increased produce
awarded to the labourer, leaving the value of labour the same as
before.’ (p. 33, 34 loc. cit. Notebook IX, 29.) According to the
presupposition, the product contains the same quantity of labour. But
its value is supposed to have diminished because profits have fallen.
However, if the labour time contained in the product has remained the
same, how can profits fall? If wages rise while total labour time
remains the same – not for momentary causes such as e.g. that
competition has become favourable for the workers – then this means
nothing other than that the productivity of labour has fallen, that a
greater amount of time is necessary to reproduce labour capacity; that,
therefore, a larger part of the living labour set in motion by capital
falls to necessary labour and a smaller part to surplus labour. Let us
leave these trivia for later. Only the following final quotation now for
the sake of completeness: ‘Inversely in the opposite case. A smaller
quantity of the produce would be awarded to the labourer and profits
would rise. A given quantity of produce, which had been obtained by the
same quantity of labour as before, would rise in value on account of the
rise of profits; while this rise of profits, in reference to the wages
of the labourer, would be balanced by the smaller quantity of labour
necessary to obtain the diminished produce awarded to the labourer.’ (M.
p. 35) (loc. cit. IX, 29.) What he says on this occasion about _money
prices in different countries,_ proceeding from his principles, to be
looked at later. <For example, commodity A can buy one working day; it
pays only a half (the necessary half), but it exchanges for the whole.
The amount of the total labour purchased by the commodity is then equal
to necessary + surplus time. Thus if I know the price of necessary
labour = _x,_ then the price of the whole labour = 2_x_, and I could in
this way appraise the newly created commodity in terms of wages, and
thus establish the prices of all commodities in wages. But this would
indeed be anything but a _constant value._ Through the confusion that in
civilized countries an average time must indeed be worked for wages, say
12 hours, regardless of the wages and regardless of how many of these 12
hours are necessary or surplus labour time, Mr Carey as well – who
reduces the amount of labour to working days (and indeed they can be
reduced to living work days) – is led to make the assertion that,
because the same capital costs constantly less labour time to reproduce,
a machine of £100 will, for example, cost after a time only £50 owing to
the growth of the productive forces, and hence will be the result of
half as much labour time, working days or hours, whichever you like.
From this Mr Carey concludes that _the worker_ can buy, can obtain _this
machine,_ with half as many working days as before. [15] He commits the
little mistake of regarding the growth of surplus labour time as if it
had been gained _for_ the worker, whereas the whole matter comes down to
just the opposite, namely that the worker spends less of his whole
working day working for himself, and more for capital, hence that the
objective power of capital grows rapidly over against him, in a specific
relation with the increase of the productive forces. Mr Carey lets the
worker buy or borrow the machine; in short, he transforms him into a
capitalist. And he is supposed to achieve this increased power over
capital precisely because the reproduction of a specific quantity of
capital costs less necessary labour, i.e. less paid labour, thus wages
fall in relation to profit. In America, as long as the worker there
still appropriates a part of his surplus labour for himself, he may
accumulate enough to become e.g. a farmer etc. (although that too is
already coming to a halt now). In places where wage labour in America
can still get somewhere rapidly, this happens through the reproduction
of earlier modes of production and property on the foundation of capital
(e.g. the independent peasantry). In short, he regards the working days
as working days belonging to the worker, and _instead of concluding that
he has to produce more capital in order to be employed for the same
labour time, he concludes that he has to work less in order to buy the
capital_ (to appropriate the conditions of production for himself). [16]
If he produced 20 machines and can now produce 40 owing to increased
productivity, then indeed the single machine becomes cheaper, but,
because a smaller part of the working day is necessary in order to
produce a given quantity of it, it does not follow that the product of
the working day rose for the worker, but rather the reverse, that less
living labour is employed for the production of a given quantity of
machinery. By the way, Mr Carey, whose aim is _harmony,_ himself finds
that if the rate of profit declines, then the gross profit rises,
because an ever larger capital is required in proportion to employed
living labour, and it _therefore_ becomes ever more impossible for the
worker to appropriate the necessary sum of capital, the minimum of
capital required for the productive employment of labour at the new
stage of production. A fractional part of the capital requires less
labour time for its reproduction, but a larger mass of capital is
required in order to realize the lesser labour time. The growth of the
productive forces expresses itself in a continuous decline of the part
of capital consisting of labour compared with that laid out in advances,
machinery etc. Carey’s entire bad joke, which was of course grist to
Bastiat’s mill, rests on his transformation of the labour time or
working days necessary for production into labour time _belonging_ to
the worker, whereas this time belongs in fact to capital, and an ever
smaller portion of it remains for the worker in proportion to the growth
in the productive force of labour. _The less living labour time a given
capital has to buy –_ or, the greater the total sum of the capital and
the less the living labour employed by it relative to its size – the
greater, according to Mr Carey, the chance for the worker to become
owner of capital, _because_ capital is _reproduced by less living
labour._ The greater the capital and the smaller the number of workers
it employs, relatively, the greater the chance these workers have of
becoming capitalists, for has not capital now been reproduced with fewer
working days? Cannot it _therefore_ also be bought, gained with fewer
working days? Take a capital of £100, employing 50 on advances, 50 on
labour, and making 50% profit, for the decline of the rate of profit is
Carey’s chief hobby horse and belongs with his theory. Let each £ in
wages be equal to 1 working day = 1 worker. Now take another capital of
£16,000, which uses 14,500 in advances, 1,500 in wages (let this also =
1,500 workers) and makes only 20% profit. In the first case the product
= 150; in the second (for convenient calculation’s sake let the fixed
capital turn over in one year) = 19,200 (3,200 profit). Here we have the
most advantageous case for Mr Carey. The rate of profit has declined
from 50% to 20, i.e. by 3/5 or by 60%. In the one case, a product of 50
is the result of 50 living work days. In the other case, a product of
3,200 by 1,500 workers. In the first case the result of 1 working day a
product of 1; in the second the result of 1 working day a product of 2
2/15. In the second case less than half the labour time is necessary to
produce a value of 1 as in the first. Now, does this mean that in the
second case half the worker’s day produces 1/15 for himself, while the
other produces only 1 in twice the time, i.e. that he is on the high
road to becoming a capitalist? He would first have to acquire a capital
of £16,000, and buy alien labour instead of working himself, before this
decrease in necessary labour time would aid him in the least. All it has
done this way is created an infinite gap between his labour and _the
conditions of_ its employment, and decreased the rate of _necessary
labour,_ thus, in proportion to the first relation, thrown more than 6
times as many workers into the street. These workers thrown into the
street are now supposed to console themselves with the thought that if
they had the conditions to work independently, or rather to work as
capitalists, then they themselves would have to hire fewer workers. In
the first case the entire capital necessary is £100, and there is more
of a chance here for the individual worker in an exceptional case to
save up enough, and, with a special combination of luck, himself become
a _capitalist_ at the same level as capitalist A. The labour time which
the worker works is the same with A and B, although the total sum of
working days needed by the capitalists is essentially different. For
every 6 workers needed by the first capitalist, the second needs not
quite 1. The remainder therefore have to work just as much and more
surplus time. That capital needs fewer living work days at the stage of
production to which it has risen along with the forces of production is
the same thing, according to Carey, as that the worker needs fewer
working days to appropriate capital for himself; probably with the
working days of the un-‘occupied’ workers.> Because the capitalist needs
fewer workers to realize his immense capital, the worker employed by him
can, with less labour, make the greater capital his own. Such is the
logic of Mr Carey, the harmonizer.

In connection with Ricardo’s theory, Wakefield says (Notebook VII, p.
74) loc. cit. p. 231 note:

‘Treating labour as a commodity, and capital, the produce of labour, as
another, then, if the value of these two commodities were regulated by
equal quantities of labour, a given amount of labour would, under all
circumstances, exchange for that quantity of capital which had been
produced by the same amount of labour; _antecedent_ labour would always
exchange for the same amount as _present_ labour … But the value of
labour, in relation to other commodities, in so far, at least, as wages
depend upon share, is determined, not by equal quantities of labour, but
by the proportion between supply and demand.’ [17]

Dormant capital. Increase of production without previous increase of capital. _Bailey_

<Bailey: _Money and its Vicissitudes in Value etc.,_ London, 1837
(Notebook V, p. 26 seq.), has remarks about _dormant capital_ which can
be set in motion through faster circulation (according to him, through a
greater volume of currency; he should have said _money)_ and tries to
demonstrate that if capital were always fully employed in a country,
then no increase of demand could bring about an increase of supply. The
concept of _dormant capital_ belongs within circulation, since capital
which is not in circulation is asleep. The relevant quotations are:
‘Much capital and productive skill may exist in an inert state. Those
economists are wrong who believe that the number of labourers and the
quantity of capital are certain definitive powers who ought inevitably
to produce a determinate result in any country where they exist.’ (p.
54.) ‘Far from the amount of commodities which the existing producers
and the existing capital bring to market, being fixed and determined, it
is subject to a wide range of variation.’ (p. 55.) Thus ‘not essential
to an increase of production that new capital or new labourers should
arise’ (e.g. in a country where there is a want of precious metals) …
‘Some commodities or, what is the same, the _power to produce them,_ may
be in excess at one place, other commodities at another place likewise,
and the holder of each wishing to exchange their articles for those held
by the other, but kept in a state of non-intercourse for want of a
common medium of exchange, and in a state of inaction because they have
no motive for production.’ (55, 56.) In the circulation of capital,
money appears doubly, as the transformation of capital into money as
well as realization of the price of the commodity; but here this
positing of prices is not a formality. The transformation of the product
into money is here the retransformation of capital into _value_ as such,
independently existing value; capital as money or money as realized
capital. Secondly, in the role of mere medium of circulation; this is
where it serves merely to retransform capital into the conditions of
production. In this second moment, a definite amount of money has to be
present at once in the form of wages, as medium of circulation, means of
payment. Now the fact that money plays this double role in the
circulation of capital makes it appear in all crises as if money were
lacking as medium of circulation, whereas capital lacks _value_ and
hence cannot _monetize_ itself. The mass of circulating money may even
increase at the same time. A particular section must be made for the new
aspects of money when posited as moment of the circulation of capital,
partly as the medium of its circulation, partly as _capital’s realized
value,_ as itself _capital;_ when we speak of interest etc.> <Bailey
continues: ‘The labour made active by no means depends on a country’s
available capital alone. It depends on whether food, tools and raw
materials are distributed slowly or rapidly to those parts where it is
wanted; whether it circulates with difficulty or not, whether it exists
for long intervals in inert masses, and so as a result does not furnish
sufficient employment to the population.’ (56, 57.) (Gallatin’s example,
loc. cit. 68, of the western counties of Pennsylvania.) [18] ‘Political
economists are inclined to regard a given quantity of capital and a
given number of workers as production instruments of a uniform power or
operating with a certain uniform intensity … The producer who employs a
certain capital may have his products on hand a long time or a short,
and while he waits for the occasion to exchange them, his power of
producing is stopped or retarded, so that in a given period, such as one
year e.g., he may produce only half of what he would, had a prompt
demand been present. This remark is equally appropriate to the labourer
who is his instrument. The adjustment of the various occupations of men
in society to each other must, at least imperfectly, be effected. But
there is a wide distance between the stages in which it is realized –
every expedient that facilitates traffic is a step towards this
adjustment. The more unimpeded and easy the interchange of commodities
becomes, the shorter will be those unproductive intervals, in which men,
eager for work, seem separated by an impassable barrier from the capital
… which, although close at hand, is condemned to barren inertness.’ (p.
59–60.) ‘General principle, that a new demand will be met by fresh
exertions; by the active employment of capital and labour before
dormant, and not by the diversion of productive power from other
objects. The latter possible only if the employment of capital and
labour in a country were capable of no further growth. The exportation
of the goods perhaps does not directly set new labour in motion, but it
does then absorb commodities on hand as dead stock, and sets at liberty
capital tied up in an unproductive state.’ (p. 65.) ‘Those who assert
that an influx of money cannot promote the production of other
commodities, since these commodities are the sole agents of production,
prove that production cannot be enlarged at all, for it is required for
such an enlargement that food, raw materials, and tools should be
previously augmented, which in fact is maintaining _that no increase of
production can take place without a previous increase’_ (but is this not
the economic theory of accumulation?) ‘or in other words, that an
increase is impossible.’ (p. 70.) ‘Now it is admittedly argued that if
the buyer goes to market with an increased quantity of money and if he
does not raise the prices of the commodities he finds there, then he
gives no additional encouragement to production: if he raises the
prices, however, then if prices are proportionally enhanced, the
purchasers have no greater power of demand than before.’ (73.) ‘It is to
be denied as a general principle that a purchaser cannot give additional
encouragement to production, _unless his demand raise prices …_ Apart
from the circumstance that the preparation of a larger quantity admits
of a more effective division of labour and the employment of superior
machinery, there is in this matter that sort of latitude, arising from a
quantity of labour and capital lying unemployed, _and ready to furnish
additional commodities at the same rate._ Thus does it happen that a
considerable increase of demand often takes place without raising
prices.’(73.)>

Wade’s _explanation of capital. [19] Labour as mere agency of capital._ Capital, collective force. _Civilization, together with my remarks about it. (All social powers of labour as powers of capital. Manufacture. Industry._ Division of labour. _Formal unification of different branches of labour etc. by capital. Accumulation of capital. Transformation of money into capital. Science. Original accumulation and concentration the same. Free and coerced association. Capital as distinct from earlier forms)_

<John Wade: _History of the Middle and Working Classes_ etc., 3rd ed.,
Lond., 1835 (Notebook p. 20) says: ‘Labour is the agency by which
capital is made _productive of wages, profit, or revenue.’_ (p. 161.)
‘Capital is stored up industry, provided to develop itself in new and
equivalent forms; it is _collective force.’_ (p. 162.) ‘Capital is only
another name for _civilization.’_ (164.) Like all productive powers of
labour, i.e. those which determine the degree of its intensity and hence
of its extensive realization, the association of the workers – the
cooperation and division of labour as fundamental conditions of the
productivity of labour – appears as the _productive power of capital._
The collective power of labour, its character as social labour, is
therefore the _collective power_ of capital. Likewise _science._
Likewise the division of labour, as it appears as division of the
occupations and of exchange corresponding to them. All social powers of
production are productive powers of capital, and it appears as itself
their subject. The association of the workers, as it appears in the
factory, is therefore not posited by them but by capital. Their
combination is not _their_ being, but the _being_ [_Dasein_] of capital.
_Vis-à-vis_ the individual worker, the combination appears accidental.
He relates to his own combination and cooperation with other workers as
_alien,_ as modes of capital’s effectiveness. Unless it appears in an
inadequate form – e.g. small, self-employed capital – capital already,
at a certain greater or lesser stage, presupposes concentration both in
objective form, i.e. as concentration in one hand, which here still
coincides with accumulation, of the necessaries of life, of raw material
and instruments, or, in a word, of money as the general form of wealth;
and on the other side, in subjective form, the accumulation of labour
powers and their concentration at a single point under the command of
the capitalist. There cannot be one capitalist for every worker, but
rather there has to be a certain quantity of workers per capitalist, not
like one or two journeymen per master. Productive capital, or the mode
of production corresponding to capital, can be present in only two
forms: manufacture and large-scale industry. In the former, the division
of labour is predominant; in the second, the combination of labour
powers (with a regular mode of work) and the employment of scientific
power, where the combination and, so to speak, the communal spirit of
labour is transferred to the machine etc. In the first situation the
mass of (accumulated) workers must be large in relation to the amount of
capital; in the second the fixed capital must be large in relation to
the number of the many cooperating workers. But the concentration of
many, and their distribution among the machinery as so many cogs (why it
is different in agriculture does not belong here), is, however, already
presupposed here. Case II therefore does not need to be specially
examined here, but only case I. The development proper to manufacture is
the _division of labour._ But this presupposes the (preliminary)
gathering-together of many workers under a single command, just as the
_process through which money becomes capital presupposes the previous
liberation of a certain amount of necessaries of life, raw materials and
instruments of labour._ The division of labour is therefore also to be
abstracted away here as a later moment. Certain branches of industry,
e.g. mining, already presuppose cooperation from the beginning. Thus, so
long as capital does not exist, this labour takes place as forced labour
(serf or slave labour) under an overseer. Likewise road building etc. In
order to take over these works, capital does not create but rather takes
over the accumulation and concentration of workers. Nor is this in
question. The simplest form, a form independent of the division of
labour, is that capital employs different hand weavers, spinners etc.
who live independently and are dispersed over the land. (This form still
exists alongside industry.) _Here, then, the mode of production is not
yet determined by capital, but rather found on hand by it._ The point of
unity of all these scattered workers lies only in their mutual relation
with capital, which accumulates the product of their production in its
hands and, likewise, the surplus values which they created above and
beyond their own revenue. The coordination of their work exists only _in
itself,_ in so far as each of them works for capital – hence possesses a
centre in it – without working together. Their unification by capital is
thus merely _formal,_ and concerns only the product of labour, not
labour itself. Instead of exchanging with many, they exchange only with
the one capitalist. This is therefore a _concentration of exchanges_ by
capital. Capital engages in _exchange_ not as an individual, but as
representing the consumption and the needs of many. It _no longer
exchanges_ as individual exchanger, but rather, in the act of exchange,
represents society. _Collective exchange_ and _concentrative exchange_
on the part of capital with the scattered working weavers etc., whose
products are collected, united through this exchange, and whose labours
are thereby also united, although they proceed independently of one
another. The unification of their labours appears as a particular act,
alongside which the independent fragmentation of their labours
continues. This is the _first condition_ necessary for _money_ to be
exchanged as capital for free labour. The second is the suspension of
the independent fragmentation of these many workers., so that the
_individual capital_ no longer appears towards them merely as _social
collective power in the act of exchange,_ uniting many exchanges, but
rather gathers them in one spot under its command, into one manufactory,
and no longer leaves them in the _mode of production found already in
existence,_ establishing its power on that basis, but rather creates a
mode of production corresponding to itself, as its basis. It posits the
_concentration_ of the workers in production, a unification which will
occur initially only in a common location, under overseers,
_regimentation, greater discipline, regularity and the_ POSITED
_dependence in production itself on capital._ Certain _faux frais de
production_ are thereby saved from the outset. (On this whole process
compare Gaskell, where special regard is had to the development of large
industry in England.) [20] Now capital appears as the collective force
of the workers, their social force, as well as that which ties them
together, and hence as the unity which creates this force. Afterwards as
before, and at every stage of the development of capital, this all
continues to be mediated through the many exchanging with it as the one,
so that exchange itself is concentrated in it; the social character of
exchange; it exchanges socially with the workers, but they individually
with it. With craft production, the main concern is the quality of the
product and the particular skill of the individual worker; the master,
as master, is supposed to have achieved mastery in this skill. His
position as master rests not only on his ownership of the conditions of
production, but also on his own skill in the particular work. With the
production of capital, and from the very outset, the point is not this
half-artistic relation to labour – which corresponds generally with the
development of the use value of labour, the development of particular
abilities of direct manual work, the formation of the human hand etc.
The point from the outset is mass, because the point is exchange value
and surplus value. The principle of developed capital is precisely to
make special skill superfluous, and to make manual work, directly
physical labour, generally superfluous both as skill and as muscular
exertion; to transfer skill, rather, into the dead forces of nature.
Now, with the presupposition of the rise of manufacture as the rise of
the mode of production of capital (slaves are combined in themselves,
because under a single master), it is presupposed that the productive
force of labour, still to be brought to life by capital, does not yet
exist. It is a presupposition, therefore, that necessary labour still
takes up a great portion of the entire available labour time in
manufacture, hence that surplus labour per individual worker is still
relatively small. Now, this is compensated on one side, and the progress
of manufactures is correspondingly accelerated, by the fact that the
rate of profit is higher, hence that capital accumulates more rapidly in
relation to its already existing amount, than it does in big industry.
If out of 100 thalers 50 go for labour and surplus time = 1/5, then the
value created = 110 or 10%. If out of 100 only 20 went for labour and
surplus time = 1/4, then the value created = 105 or 5%. On the other
side, manufacture obtains this higher profit rate only through the
employment of many workers at once. The greater surplus time can be
gained only by collecting together the surplus time of many workers in
relation to capital. Absolute, not relative surplus time predominates in
manufacture. This is even more the case originally where the scattered,
independent workers still realize a part of their own surplus labour for
themselves. For capital to exist as capital, to be able to live off
profit, as well as to accumulate, its gain must = the sum of the surplus
time of many simultaneous living work days. In agriculture, the soil
itself with its chemical etc. action is already a machine which makes
direct labour more productive, and hence gives a surplus _earlier,_
because work is done here at an _earlier_ stage with a machine, namely a
_natural_ one. This the only correct basis of the doctrine of the
Physiocrats, which in this respect considers agriculture in comparison
with a still quite undeveloped system of manufacture. If the capitalist
employed one worker in order to live from that one’s surplus time, then
he would obviously gain doubly if he himself also worked, with his own
funds, for then he would gain, in addition to the surplus time, the wage
paid the worker. He would lose in the process. I.e. he would not yet be
in the situation of working as a capitalist, or the worker would only be
his helper, and thus he would not stand in relation to him as capital.

Thus, in order that money may become transformed into capital, it is
necessary not only that it should be able to set surplus labour in
motion, but also that there should be a _certain quantity of surplus
labour,_ the surplus labour of a given mass of necessary labour, i.e. of
_many workers_ at once, so that their combined sum is sufficient for it
not only to lead an existence as _capital,_ i.e. to represent wealth in
consumption in contrast to the worker’s life, but also to set aside
surplus labour for accumulation. From the outset, capital does not
produce for use value, for immediate subsistence. Surplus labour must
therefore be large enough from the beginning to allow a part of it to be
re-employed as capital. Thus, whenever the stage is reached where a
certain mass of social wealth is already concentrated in one hand, which
is objectively capable of appearing as capital, first as the exchange
with many workers, later as production by many workers in combination,
and is capable of setting a certain quantity of living labour capacities
to work simultaneously, then, at that point, production by capital
begins, which thus from the outset appears as the _collective force,_
the social force, the suspension of individual isolation, first that of
exchange with the workers, then that of the workers themselves. The
workers’ individual isolation still implies their relative independence.
Hence their regroupment around the individual capital as the exclusive
base of their subsistence implies full dependence on capital, complete
dissolution of the ties between the workers and the conditions of
production. The result will be the same – or it is the same in another
form – when the point of departure is the particular form of exchange
which is presupposed for capital to exchange as capital, where money
must already _represent many exchangers_ or possess a _buying power_
surpassing that of the individual and his individual surplus, one which,
while belonging to an individual, is already more than individual, and
belongs to him as a social function, in his capacity as representative,
within exchange, of the social wealth – and it arises on the other side
from the conditions of _free labour._ The detachment of the individual
from the production conditions of labour = the regroupment of many
around one capital. *>

* Merchant capital also from the outset the concentration of many
exchanges in one hand. It already represents a mass of exchangers both
as M and as C.

_‘This continual progression of knowledge and of experience,’_ says
Babbage, ‘is our great power.’ [21] This progression, this social
progress belongs [to] and is exploited by capital. All earlier forms of
property condemn the greater part of humanity, the slaves, to be pure
instruments of labour. Historical development, political development,
art, science etc. take place in higher circles over their heads. But
only capital has subjugated historical progress to the service of
wealth.

<Before accumulation by capital, there is presupposed an accumulation
which constitutes capital, which is a part of its conceptual
determination; we can hardly call it _concentration_ yet, because this
takes place in distinction to many capitals; but if one still speaks
only of capital _generally,_ then concentration still coincides with
accumulation or with the concept of capital. I.e. it does not yet form a
particular aspect. However, capital does indeed exist from the outset as
One or Unity as opposed to the workers as Many. And it thus appears as
the concentration of workers as distinct from that of work, as a unity
falling outside them. In this respect, concentration is contained in the
concept of capital – the concentration of many living labour capacities
for one purpose; a concentration which does not in any way need to have
been established in production, or penetrated production, at the origin.
Centralizing effect of capital on labour capacities, or positing of
itself as the independent and external unity of these many available
existences.>

<Rossi says in his _Cours d’économie politique_ [22] (Notebook, p. 26):
‘Social progress cannot consist in the dissolution of all association,
but in the replacement of the forced and oppressive associations of
times past by voluntary and equitable associations. The highest degree
of isolation is the condition of the savage; the highest degree of
forced, oppressive association is barbarism. Apart from these extremes,
history shows us a great diversity of varieties and shadings. Perfection
is found in voluntary associations, which by their union multiply the
forces, without taking away the energy, the morality and the
responsibility of individual authority.’ (p. 354.) Under capital, the
_association_ of workers is not compelled through direct physical force,
forced labour, statute labour, slave labour; it is compelled by the fact
that the conditions of production are alien property and are themselves
present as _objective association,_ which is the same as accumulation
and concentration of the conditions of production.>

Rossi. _What is capital? Is raw material capital? Wages necessary for it? (Approvisionnement, capital?)_

<The way of conceiving capital in its physical attribute only, as
instrument of production, while entirely ignoring the economic form
which makes the instrument of production into capital, entangles the
economists in all manner of difficulties. Thus Rossi asks, loc. cit.
(Notebook, 27): ‘Is the raw material truly an instrument of production?
Is it not rather the object on which the productive instruments must
act?’ (p. 367.) Thus capital is entirely identical for him here with the
instrument of production in the technological sense, according to which
every savage is a capitalist. (Which Mr Torrens in fact asserts in the
case of the savage who throws a _stone_ at a bird.) [23] Incidentally,
even from the standpoint of the purely physical abstraction – i.e. of
abstraction from the economic category itself – Rossi’s remark is
one-sided and shows only that he has not understood his teachers in
England. Accumulated labour used as instrument for new production; or
produce pure and simple applied to production; the raw material is
employed for production, i.e. submitted to transformation, just as well
as the instrument, which is also a product. _The finished result of
production in turn becomes a moment of the production process._ The
statement means nothing more than that. Within the production process it
may figure as raw material or as instrument. But it is an instrument of
production not in so far as it serves as an instrument within the direct
production process, but rather in so far as it is a means of the renewal
of the production process itself – one of its presuppositions. More
important and more to the point is the question whether the
_approvisionnement_ forms a part of capital, i.e. wages, and here the
entire confusion of the economists is revealed. ‘It is said that the
worker’s payment is capital, because the capitalist advances it him. If
all workers’ families had enough to live for a year, there would be no
wages. The worker could say to the capitalist: you advance the capital
for our common project, and I contribute the labour; the product will be
divided among us in such-and-such proportions. As soon as it is
realized, each will take his share.’ (p. 369.) ‘Then there would be no
advance to the workers. They would nevertheless consume even if the work
stood still. What they would consume would belong to the consumption
fund, and not at all to capital. Therefore: the advances to the workers
are not necessary. _Hence wages is not a constituent element of
production. It is an accident, a form of our state of society._ Capital,
labour, land, by contrast, are necessary in order to produce.
_Secondly_: the word wages is used in a double sense: one says that
wages are a capital, but what do wages represent? Labour. He who says
wages says labour and vice versa. Thus if the wages advanced are a
component of capital, then there would be only two instruments of
production to speak of: capital and land.’ (p. 370.) And further:
_‘Basically the worker consumes not the capitalist’s possessions but his
own; what is given to him as reward of labour is his proportional share
of the product.’_ (p. 370.) ‘The capitalist’s contract with _the worker
is not among the phenomena of production …_ The entrepreneur lends
himself to this agreement, since it may facilitate production. But this
agreement is nothing but a _second operation,_ an operation of a quite
different nature, grafted onto a productive operation. _In another
organization of labour it may disappear._ Even today there are kinds of
production where it has no place. The part of the fund which the
entrepreneur devotes to the payment of wages does not make up a part of
capital … It is a separate operation, which undoubtedly may speed the
course of production, but which cannot be termed a _direct_ instrument
of production.’ (370.) ‘To conceive labour power, while abstracting from
the workers’ means of subsistence during production, is to conceive a
being existing only in the mind. He who says labour, who says labour
power, thereby says worker and means of subsistence, labourer and wages
… _the same element reappears under the name of capital; as if the same
thing could be simultaneously part of two different instruments of
production.’_ (370, 371.) Now here there is a great deal of confusion,
legitimate because Rossi takes the economists at their word and equates
the _instrument of production_ as such with capital. First of all he is
quite right that wage labour is not an absolute form of labour, but he
forgets in the process that capital is not an absolute form of the means
and materials of labour either, and that these two forms are two
different moments of one and the same form, and hence rise and fall
together; that it is nonsensical, therefore, for him to speak of
capitalists without wage labourers. [Note] his example of the workers’
families who can live for a year without the capitalists, hence are
owners of their conditions of production, who perform their necessary
labour without the permission of Mr Capitalist. The capitalist whom
Rossi has approaching the workers with his proposal thus is no other
than a producer of instruments of production – the solicitation means
nothing more than a division of labour mediated through exchange with
the outside. The two then divide up the common product among themselves
even without any agreement – through simple exchange. The exchange is
the act of division. A further agreement is not necessary. What these
worker families would then exchange would be surplus labour, absolute or
relative, made possible for them by the instrument – either new
secondary labour in addition to their old labour, from which they could
live year after year before the appearance of the c[apitalist], or
through the application of the instrument in their old branch of work.
Here Mr Rossi makes the worker the owner and vendor of his surplus
labour, and has thereby happily extinguished the last trace which might
brand him a wage labourer, but has also thereby wiped out the last trace
which makes the instrument of production into capital. It is true that
the worker ‘basically does not consume the capitalist’s possessions, but
his own’, but not exactly as Mr Rossi means, because it is only a
_proportional_ part of _the_ product, but rather because it is a
_proportional_ part of _his_ product, and because, if the semblance of
exchange is stripped away, the payment consists of the fact that he
works a part of the day for himself and another part for the capitalist,
but _only so long as he obtains permission to work at all,_ as his work
permits this division. The _act of exchange_ itself, as we have seen, is
not a moment of the direct production process, but rather one of its
conditions. Within the total production process of capital, which
includes the different moments of its exchanges, its circulation, this
exchange is, however, posited as a moment of the total process. But,
says Rossi: wages appear twice in the account: once as capital, the
other time as labour; thus the wage represents two distinct instruments
of production. If the wage represents the instrument of production which
is labour, then it cannot represent the instrument of production which
is capital. Here another muddle, arising because Rossi takes the
orthodox economic distinctions seriously. Wages figure only once in
production, as a fund destined to be transformed into wages, as
_virtual_ wages. As soon as they have become real wages, they are paid
out, and then only figure in consumption as the worker’s revenue. But
what is exchanged for wages is labour capacity, and this does not figure
in production at all, but only in the use made of it – _labour._ Labour
appears as the instrument of the production of value because it is not
paid for, hence not represented by wages. As the activity which creates
use values, it likewise has nothing to do with itself as paid labour. In
the hand of the worker, the wage is no longer a wage, but a consumption
fund. It is wages only in the hand of the capitalist, i.e. the part of
capital destined to be exchanged for labour capacity. It has reproduced
a saleable labour capacity for the capitalist, so that in this regard
even the worker’s consumption takes place in the service of the
capitalist. He does not pay for labour itself at all, only for labour
capacity. This he can do, however, only if this capacity is set to work.
If the wage appears twice, it is not because it represents two different
instruments of production, but because it appears the first time from
the viewpoint of production, the second time from the viewpoint of
distribution. This specific form of distribution, however, is not an
arbitrary arrangement which could be different; it is, rather, posited
by the form of production itself, is only one of its own moments
considered from another angle. The value of the machine certainly forms
a part of the capital laid out in it; but the machine does not produce,
as value, although it brings the manufacturer income. The wage does not
represent labour as an instrument of production, any more than value
represents the machine as instrument of production. It represents only
labour capacity, and, since the latter’s value exists separately from it
as capital, a part of the capital. In so far as the capitalist
appropriates _alien_ labour and buys new alien _labour_ with it, the
wage – i.e. the representative of labour – does, if Mr Rossi wishes to
put it this way, appear doubly, (1) as the property of capital, (2) as
representative of labour. What actually worries Rossi is that the wage
appears as the representative of _two instruments of production,_ of
_capital_ and of _labour;_ he forgets that labour as a productive force
is incorporated in capital, and that, as _labour in esse,_ not _in
posse,_ [24] it is in no way an _instrument of production_ distinct from
capital, but is, rather, that without which capital would not be an
instrument of production. As for the distinction between wages as
forming a part of capital and at the same time the worker’s revenue, we
will come to that in the section on profit, interest, with which we
shall conclude this first chapter on capital.>

Malthus. Theory of value and of wages. (_Capital to do with proportion, labour only with portion. See my remarks on_ surplus value _and_ profit.) Ricardo’s _theory. (Carey contra Ricardo.) Malthus: the wage [has] nothing to _[do]_ with proportion. Malthus’s theory of value_

<In connection with the above-mentioned work, _The Measure of Value_
etc., Malthus returns to the theme again in his _Definitions in
Political Economy_ etc., London, 1827. He remarks in the latter: ‘No
writer that I have met with, anterior to Mr Ricardo, ever used the term
_wages_ or real wages, as implying _proportions._ Profits, indeed, imply
proportions; and the _rate of profits_ had always justly been estimated
by a _percentage upon the value of the advances._ But wages had
uniformly been considered as rising and falling, not _according to any
proportion_ which they might bear to the whole produce obtained by a
certain quantity of labour, but by the greater or smaller quantity of
any particular produce received by the labourer, or by the greater or
smaller power which such produce would carry of commanding the
necessaries and conveniences of life.’ (M. 29, 30.) (Notebook X, p. 49.)
The only value produced by capital in a given production is that added
by the new amount of labour. This value, however, consists of necessary
labour, which reproduces wages – the advances made by capital in the
form of wages – and of surplus labour, hence surplus value above and
beyond the necessary. The advances made in the form of material and
machine are merely transposed from one form into another. The instrument
passes into the product just as much as does the raw material, and its
wearing-out is at the same time the product’s formation. If raw material
and instrument cost nothing, as in some extractive industries where they
are still almost = 0 (the _raw material_ always, in every extractive
industry, metal and coal mining, fishing, hunting, lumbering in virgin
forests etc.), then they also add absolutely nothing to the value of the
production. Their value is the result of previous production, not of the
immediate production in which they serve as instrument and material.
_Surplus value_ can therefore be estimated only in proportion to
necessary labour. _Profits_ is only a secondary, derivative and
transformed form of the surplus value, the bourgeois form, in which the
traces of its origin are extinguished. Ricardo himself never grasped
this, because he (1) always speaks only of the division of an available,
_ready_ amount, not of the original positing of this difference; (2)
because this understanding would have forced him to see that there is a
relation between capital and labour which is entirely different from
that of exchange; and he was not allowed the insight that the bourgeois
system of equivalents turns into appropriation without equivalent and is
based on that; (3) his statement about proportionate profits and wages
means only that [if] a certain total value is divided into two portions,
any quantity at all is divided in two, then the magnitude of the two
parts is necessarily in inverse relation. [25] And then his school
justly reduced the matter to this triviality. His aim in asserting the
proportionality of wages and profits was not to get to the bottom of the
creation of surplus value – for since he begins with the presupposition
that a given value is to be divided between wages and profit, between
labour and capital, he thereby presupposes this division as self-evident
– but rather, firstly, it was to counter the common determination of
prices by asserting the correct one, of value, in that he showed that
the limit of value is itself not affected by its distribution, different
division among profits and wages; _secondly_: to explain not the merely
transitory, but rather the continuing decline in the rate of profit,
which was inexplicable to him on the presupposition that a fixed portion
of value goes to labour; _thirdly_: in explaining the decline of profit
by the rise of wages, and the latter in turn by the rise in _value_ of
agricultural products, i.e. the rising difficulty of their production,
thereby at the same time to explain _ground rent_ as not being in
conflict with his determination of value. This at the same time
furnished a polemical weapon for industrial capital, against the
exploitation of the progress of industry by landed property. But at the
same time, driven by simple logic, he had thereby proclaimed the
contradictory nature of profit, of labour and of capital, despite his
efforts to convince the worker afterwards that this contradictory
character of profit and wages does not influence his real income, and
that a proportional (_not_ absolute) rise of wages is _harmful_ to him,
because it hinders accumulation, and the development of industry then
benefits only the lazy landowner. Still, the contradictory form had been
proclaimed, and Carey, who does not understand Ricardo, could therefore
abuse him as the father of the communists etc., where he is again right
in a sense he himself does not understand. [26] But the other
economists, who, like Malthus, want to have absolutely nothing to do
with the proportional (and hence contradictory) nature of wages,
_desire_ on the one hand to hush up the contradiction; on the other hand
they cling to the notion that the worker simply exchanges a specific use
value, his labour capacity, for capital, and hence gives up the
productive force, the power of labour to create new value, and that he
_has nothing to do with the product,_ and hence the exchange between
capitalists and workers, wages, is concerned, like every simple exchange
where economic _equivalents_ are presupposed, only with _quantity,_ the
quantity of use value. As correct as this is in one regard, it also
introduces the apparent form of barter, of exchange, so that when
competition permits the worker to bargain and to argue with the
capitalists, he measures his demands against the capitalists’ profit and
demands a certain share of the surplus value created by him; so that the
_proportion_ itself becomes a real moment of economic life itself.
Further, in the struggle between the two classes – which necessarily
arises with the development of the working class – the measurement of
the distance between them, which, precisely, is expressed by wages
itself as a proportion, becomes decisively important. The _semblance of
exchange_ vanishes in the course [_Prozess_] of the mode of production
founded on capital. This course itself and its repetition posit what is
the case in itself, namely that the worker receives as wages from the
capitalist what is only a part of his own labour. This then also enters
into the consciousness of the workers as well as of the capitalists. The
_question for Ricardo is actually only what proportion of the total
value do necessary wages form in the course of development?_ It always
remains only the _necessary wage;_ hence its proportional nature does
not interest the worker, who always obtains the same minimum, but only
the capitalist, whose deductions from the total income vary, without the
workers obtaining a greater amount of use values. But the fact that
Ricardo formulated the contradictory nature of profit and wages, even if
for quite different purposes, already shows by itself that the mode of
production founded on capital had, by his time, taken on a form more and
more adequate to its nature. In the cited _Definitions_ (Notebook IX, p.
49, 50), Malthus remarks in regard to Ricardo’s theory of value:
‘Ricardo’s assertion, that as the value of wages rises, profits
proportionally fall and vice versa, is true only on the presupposition
that commodities in which the same amount of labour is contained, are
always of the same value, and this is true in 1 case out of 500, and
necessarily so, because with the progress of civilization and
improvement, the quantity of fixed capital employed steadily grows, and
makes more various and unequal the times of the returns of the
circulating capital.’ (loc. cit. 31, 32.) (This concerns _prices,_ not
_value_.) Malthus remarks in connection with his own discovery of the
true standard of value: _‘Firstly_: I had nowhere seen it stated, that
the ordinary _quantity of labour which a commodity will command_ must
represent and measure the _quantity of labour worked up in it, with the
addition of profits …_ By representing the labour worked up in a
commodity, with the addition of profits, labour represents the natural
and necessary conditions of its supply, or the elementary costs of its
production … _Secondly_: I had nowhere seen it stated that, however the
fertility of the soil might vary, the elementary costs of producing the
wages of a given quantity of labour must always necessarily be the
same.’ (196, 197.) Means only: wages always equal to the labour time
necessary for their production, which varies with the productivity of
labour. The quantity of commodities remains the same. ‘If one regards
value as the general power of purchase of a commodity, then this relates
to the purchase of all commodities, of the general mass of commodities.
But this is quite unmanageable. … Now, if any one [should] object, it
cannot for a moment be denied that labour best represents an average of
the general mass of productions.’ (205.) ‘A large class of commodities,
like raw produce, rise with the progress of society, compared with
labour, while the manufactured articles fall. Thus not far from truth to
say that the average mass of commodities which a given quantity of
labour will command in the same country, during the course of some
century, may not very essentially vary.’ (206.) ‘Value must always be
value in exchange for labour.’ (224, note, loc. cit.) In other words,
the doctrine is: the value of a commodity, the labour worked up in it,
is represented by the living work days which it commands, for which it
may be exchanged, and hence by _wages._ Living work days contain both
time and surplus time. Let us do for Malthus the biggest favour we can
do for him. Let us namely assume that the relation of surplus labour to
necessary labour, hence the relation of wages to profit, always remains
constant. To begin with, the fact that Mr Malthus speaks of the labour
worked up in the commodity _with the addition_ _of profits_ already
demonstrates his confusion, since these profits can form nothing other
than a part of the labour worked up. What he has in mind with this _is
profits above and beyond labour worked up, which_ are supposed to come
_out of fixed capital_ etc. This can only affect the distribution of the
total profit among the different shareholders, but not its total
quantity, for if everyone obtained for his commodity the labour worked
up in it + profits, then where would these latter come from, Mr Malthus?
If one person obtains the labour worked up in his commodity + profit,
then the other has to obtain labour worked up − profit, profit here
regarded as the excess quantity of real surplus value. This is therefore
null and void. Now posit that the labour worked up = 3 working days,
and, if the proportion of surplus labour time is as 1:2, then these have
been obtained in payment for 1 1/2 working days. The workers indeed
worked 3 days, but each of them was paid only half a day. Or, the
commodity which they obtain for their 3 days of labour had only 1 1/2
days worked up in it. Thus, all other relations being the same, the
capitalist would obtain 6 working days for the 3 working days worked up
in his commodity. (The matter is correct only because surplus labour
time is posited as = to necessary labour time, hence in the second case
_only_ the first is repeated.) _(Relative surplus value obviously
restricted not only by the relation cited earlier, but also by the
degree to which the product enters into the worker’s consumption._ If
the capitalist could obtain twice the number of _cashmere shawls,_ owing
to an increase in the productive forces, and if he sold them at their
_value,_ then he would have created no relative surplus value because
the workers do not consume such shawls, and thus the time necessary for
the reproduction of their labour capacity would remain the same as
before. But this not so in practice, because in such cases the price
rises above the value. At this point in the theory it does not concern
us yet because capital is here regarded in itself, not in a particular
branch.) That means, he will pay the wages of 3 days and get 6 days of
work; with each 1/2 day he buys a day; hence with 6/2 days, = 3 days, 6
days. To assert, then, that the working days a commodity commands, or
the wages it pays, express its value is to understand absolutely nothing
of the nature of capital and wage labour. It is the pith of all
value-creation and of capital-creation that objectified working days
command a greater number of living ones. It would have been correct if
Malthus had said that the living labour time a commodity commands
expresses the measure of its _realization,_ the measure of the _surplus
labour_ it posits. But this would only be the tautology that it posits
more labour to the extent that it posits more, or it would be the
expression of the opposite of what Malthus wants, that surplus value
arises because the living labour time a commodity commands never
represents the labour worked up in it. (Now we have finally done with
Malthus.)>

 

_Aim of capitalist production value (money), not commodity, use value etc._ Chalmers. [27] – _Economic cycle. – Circulation process._ Chalmers

<We have demonstrated above, in the development of the concept of
capital, that it is value as such, _money,_ which both preserves itself
through circulation and also increases itself through exchange with
living labour. That, hence, the aim of producing capital is _never use
value,_ but rather the general form of wealth as wealth. The cleric Th.
Chalmers, in the otherwise in many respects ridiculous and repulsive
work: _On Political Economy in Connection with the Moral State and Moral
Prospects of Society,_ 2nd. ed., Lond., 1832, has correctly struck upon
this point, without at the same time falling into the asininity of types
like Ferrier etc., who confuse money as the value of capital with the
really available metallic money. [28] In crises, capital (as commodity)
is not exchangeable, not because _too few_ means of circulation are
available; but, rather, it does not circulate because it is _not
exchangeable._ The importance assumed by cash in times of crisis arises
only because, while capital is not exchangeable for its value – and only
for that reason does its value appear opposite it in the money form –
there are obligations to pay off; alongside the interrupted circulation
a _forced circulation_ takes place. Chalmers says (Notebook IX, p. 57):
‘When a consumer refuses certain commodities, it is not always, as is
assumed by the new economists, because he wants to purchase others in
preference, but because he wants to reserve entire the general power of
purchasing. And when a _merchant_ brings commodities to market, it is
generally not in quest of other commodities to be given in return for
them … he will extend his _general power of purchase of all
commodities._ It is useless to say that money is also a _commodity._ The
real metallic money for which a merchant has any use does not amount to
more than a small _fraction of his capital,_ even of _his monied
capital;_ all of which, though estimated in money, can be made, on the
strength of written contracts, to describe its orbit, and be effective
for all its purposes, with the aid _of coin amounting to an
insignificant proportion of the whole. The great object of the monied
capitalist,_ in fact, is to add to the _nominal amount of his fortune._
It is that, if expressed pecuniarily this year by £20,000 e.g., it
should be expressed pecuniarily next year by £24,000. _To advance his
capital, as estimated in money,_ is the only way in which he can advance
his interest as a merchant. The importance of these objects for him is
not affected by fluctuations in the currency or by a change in the real
value of money. For example, in one year he comes from 20 to 24,000
pounds; through a fall in the value of money he may not have increased
his command over the comforts etc. Nevertheless, this is his interest
just as much as if money had not fallen; for else his monied fortune
would have remained stationary and his real wealth would have declined
in the proportion of 24 to 20 … _Commodities’_ (i.e. use value, real
wealth) ‘thus not the terminating object of the trading capitalist.’
(The illusion of the Monetary System, however, was that it regarded real
metallic money (or paper, would change nothing), in short, the _form_ of
value, as _real money,_ as the _general form of wealth_ and of
self-enrichment, whereas precisely as _money_ increases as the
accumulation of general power of purchase, it undergoes a relative
decline in its specific form as medium of exchange or also as _realized
hoard.)_ As _assignation_ in real wealth or productive power [the
capitalist’s money] gains a thousand forms, _‘quite apart from
expenditure of his revenue in purchases for the sake of consumption._ In
the _outlay of his capital,_ and _when he purchases for the sake of
production,_ money is his terminating object’ (not _coin, nota bene)._
(164–6.)

‘Profit,’ says the same Chalmers, ‘has the effect of attaching the
services of the disposable population to other masters, besides the mere
landed proprietors, … while their expenditure reaches higher than the
necessaries of life.’ (78. Notebook IX, p.53.)>

In the book just referred to, Chalmers calls the whole _circulation
process_ the economic cycle: ‘The world of trade may be conceived to
revolve in what we shall call an economic cycle, which accomplishes one
revolution by business coming round again, through its successive
transactions, to the point from which it set out. Its commencement may
be dated from the point at which the capitalist has obtained those
returns by which his capital is replaced to him: whence he proceeds anew
to engage his workmen; to distribute among them, in wages, their
maintenance, or rather the power of lifting it; to obtain from them in
finished work, the articles in which he specially deals; to bring these
articles to market, and there terminate the orbit of one set of
movements, by effecting a sale, and receiving in its proceeds, a return
for the whole outlays of the period. The intervention of money alters
nothing in the real character of this operation … ’ (85 loc. cit.)
(Notebook, p. 54, 55.)

Difference in return. _Interruption of the production process (or rather its failure to coincide with the labour process). Total duration of the production process. (Agriculture. Hodgskin.)_ Unequal periods of production

_The difference in the return,_ in so far as it depends on the phase of
the circulation process which coincides with the direct production
process, depends not only on the longer or shorter labour time required
to complete the article (e.g. canal building etc.), but also, in certain
branches of industry – agriculture – on the interruptions of the work
which are due to the nature of the work itself, where on the one hand
the capital lies fallow, and, on the other, labour stands still. Thus
the example given by A. Smith, that wheat is a crop taking 1 year, the
ox a crop taking 5 years, etc. [29] Therefore 5 years of labour are
employed on the latter, only 1 on the former. Little labour is employed
e.g. on cattle raised on pasture. At the same time, in agriculture, the
labour applied e.g. during the winter is also little. In agriculture
(and to a greater or lesser degree in many another branch of production)
there are interruptions given by the conditions of the production
process itself, pauses in labour time, which must be begun anew at the
given point in order to continue or to complete the process; the
constancy of the production process here does not coincide with the
continuity of the labour process. This is one moment of the difference.
_Secondly_: the product generally requires a longer time to be
_completed,_ to be put into its finished state; this is the total
duration of the production process, regardless of whether interruptions
take place in the operations of labour or not; the different duration of
the production phase generally. _Thirdly_: after the product is
finished, it may be necessary for it to lie idle for some time, during
which it needs relatively little labour, in order to be left in the care
of natural processes, e.g. wine. (This will be, conceptually,
approximately the same case as I.) _Fourthly_: a longer time to be
brought to market, because destined for a more distant market. (This
coincides conceptually with case II.) _Fifthly_: The shorter or longer
period of the total return of a capital (its total reproduction), in so
far as it is determined by the relation of fixed capital and circulating
capital, is concerned obviously not with the _immediate production
process_ and its duration, but rather takes its character from
circulation. The total capital’s period of reproduction is determined by
the total process, circulation included.

‘Inequality in the periods necessary for production.’ [30]

‘The _difference of time_ required to complete the products of
agriculture, and of other species of labour, is the main cause of the
great dependence of the agriculturists. They cannot bring their
commodities to market in less time than a year. For that whole period
they are obliged to borrow from the shoemaker, the tailor, the smith,
the wheelwright and the various other labourers, whose products they
need and which are completed in a few days or weeks. Owing to this
natural circumstance, and owing to the more rapid increase of the wealth
produced by other labour than that of agriculture, the monopolizers of
all the land, although they have also monopolized the legislation, are
unable to save themselves and their servants, the farmers, from being
the most dependent class in the community.’ (Thomas Hodgskin, _Popular
Polit. Econ._ Four lectures etc. London, 1827, p. 147 note.) (Notebook
IX, p. 44.) ‘The natural circumstance of all commodities being produced
in unequal periods, while the wants of the labourer must be supplied
daily … This inequality in the time necessary to complete different
commodities, would in the savage state cause the hunter etc. to have a
surplus of game etc., before the maker of bows and arrows etc. had any
commodity completed to give for the surplus game. No exchange could be
made; the bow-maker must be also a hunter and division of labour
impossible. This difficulty contributed to the invention of money.’
(179, 180.) (loc. cit.)

The concept of the free labourer contains the pauper. _Population and overpopulation etc._

<It is already contained in the concept of the _free labourer,_ that he
is a _pauper:_ virtual pauper. According to his economic conditions he
is merely a _living labour capacity,_ hence equipped with the
necessaries of life. Necessity on all sides, without the objectivities
necessary to realize himself as labour capacity. If the capitalist has
no use for his surplus labour, then the worker may not perform his
necessary labour; not produce his necessaries. Then he cannot obtain
them through exchange; rather, if he does obtain them, it is only
because alms are thrown to him from revenue. He can live as a worker
only in so far as he exchanges his labour capacity for that part of
capital which forms the labour fund. This exchange is tied to conditions
which are accidental _for him,_ and indifferent to his _organic_
presence. He is thus a virtual pauper. Since it is further the condition
of production based on capital that he produces ever more surplus
labour, it follows that ever more _necessary labour_ is set free. Thus
the chances of his pauperism increase. To the development of surplus
labour corresponds that of the surplus population. In different modes of
social production there are different laws of the increase of population
and of overpopulation; the latter identical with pauperism. These
different laws can simply be reduced to the different modes of relating
to the conditions of production, or, in respect to the living
individual, the conditions of his reproduction as a member of society,
since he labours and appropriates only in society. The dissolution of
these relations in regard to the single individual, or to part of the
population, places them outside the reproductive conditions of this
specific basis, and hence posits them as overpopulation, and not only
lacking in means but incapable of appropriating the necessaries through
labour, hence as paupers. Only in the mode of production based on
capital does pauperism appear as the result of labour itself, of the
development of the productive force of labour. Thus, what may be
overpopulation in one stage of social production may not be so in
another, and their effects may be different. E.g. the colonies sent out
in antiquity were overpopulation, i.e. their members could not continue
to live in the same space with the material basis of property, i.e.
conditions of production. The number may appear very small compared with
the modern conditions of production. They were, nevertheless, very far
from being paupers. Such was, however, the Roman plebs with its bread
and circuses. The overpopulation which leads to the great migrations
presupposes different conditions again. Since in all previous forms of
production the development of the forces of production is not the basis
of appropriation, but a specific relation to the conditions of
production (forms of property) appears as _presupposed barrier_ to the
forces of production, and is merely to be reproduced, it follows that
the development of population, in which the development of all
productive forces is summarized, must even more strongly encounter an
_external barrier_ and thus appear as something to be restricted. The
conditions of the community [were] consistent only with a specific
amount of population. On the other side, if the barriers to population
posited by the elasticity of the specific form of the conditions of
production _change in consequence of the latter, if they contract or
expand_ – thus overpopulation among hunting peoples was different from
that among the Athenians, in turn different among the latter from that
among the Germanic tribes – then so does the absolute rate of population
increase, and hence the rate of overpopulation and population. The
amount of overpopulation posited on the basis of a specific production
is thus just as determinate as the adequate population. Overpopulation
and population, taken together, are _the_ population which a specific
production basis can create. The extent to which it goes beyond its
barrier is given by the barrier itself, or rather by the same base which
posits the barrier. Just as necessary labour and surplus labour together
[are] the whole of labour on a given base.

Malthus’s theory, which incidentally not his invention, but whose fame
he appropriated through the clerical fanaticism with which he propounded
it – actually only through the weight he placed on it – is significant
in two respects: (1) because he gives brutal expression to the brutal
viewpoint of capital; (2) because he _asserted_ the fact of
overpopulation in all forms of society. Proved it he has not, for there
is nothing more uncritical than his motley compilations from historians
and travellers’ descriptions. His conception is altogether false and
childish (1) because he regards _overpopulation_ as being _of the same
kind_ in all the different historic phases of economic development; does
not understand their specific difference, and hence stupidly reduces
these very complicated and varying relations to a single relation, two
equations, in which the natural reproduction of humanity appears on the
one side, and the natural reproduction of edible plants (or means of
subsistence) on the other, as two natural series, the former geometric
and the latter arithmetic in progression. In this way he transforms the
historically distinct relations into an abstract numerical relation,
which he has fished purely out of thin air, and which rests neither on
natural nor on historical laws. There is allegedly a natural difference
between the reproduction of mankind and e.g. grain. This baboon thereby
implies that the _increase of humanity_ is a purely natural process,
which requires _external restraints, checks,_ to prevent it from
proceeding in geometrical progression. This _geometrical reproduction_
is the natural reproduction process of mankind. He would find in history
that population proceeds in very different relations, and that
overpopulation is likewise a historically determined relation, in no way
determined by abstract numbers or by the absolute limit of the
productivity of the necessaries of life, but by limits posited rather by
_specific conditions of production._ As well as restricted numerically.
How small do the numbers which meant overpopulation for the Athenians
appear to us! Secondly, restricted according to character. An
overpopulation of free Athenians who become transformed into colonists
is significantly different from an overpopulation of workers who become
transformed into workhouse inmates. Similarly the begging overpopulation
which consumes the surplus produce of a monastery is different from that
which forms in a factory. It is Malthus who abstracts from these
specific historic laws of the movement of population, which are indeed
the history of the nature of humanity, the _natural_ laws, but natural
laws of humanity only at a specific historic development, with a
development of the forces of production determined by humanity’s own
process of history. Malthusian man, abstracted from historically
determined man, exists only in his brain; hence also the geometric
method of reproduction corresponding to this natural Malthusian man.
Real history thus appears to him in such a way that the reproduction of
his natural humanity is not an abstraction from the historic process of
real reproduction, but just the contrary, that real reproduction is an
application of the Malthusian theory. Hence the inherent conditions of
population as well as of overpopulation at every stage of history appear
to him as a series of _external checks_ which have _prevented_ the
population from developing in the Malthusian form. The conditions in
which mankind historically produces and reproduces itself appear as
_barriers_ to the reproduction of the Malthusian natural man, who is a
Malthusian creature. On the other hand, the production of the
necessaries of life – as it is checked, determined by human action –
appears as a _check_ which it posits to itself. The ferns would cover
the entire earth. Their reproduction would stop only where space for
them ceased. They would obey no arithmetic proportion. It is hard to say
where Malthus has discovered that the reproduction of voluntary natural
products would stop for intrinsic reasons, without _external checks._ He
transforms the immanent, historically changing limits of the human
reproduction process into _outer barriers;_ and the _outer barriers_ to
natural reproduction into _immanent limits_ or _natural laws_ of
reproduction.

(2) He stupidly relates a specific quantity of people to a specific
quantity of necessaries. [31] Ricardo immediately and correctly
confronted him with the fact that the quantity of grain available is
completely irrelevant to the worker if he has no _employment;_ that it
is therefore the means of employment and not of subsistence which put
him into the category of surplus population. [32] But this should be
conceived more generally, and relates to the _social mediation_ as such,
through which the individual gains access to the means of his
reproduction and creates them; hence it relates to the _conditions of
production_ and his relation to them. There was no barrier to the
reproduction of the Athenian slave other than the producible
necessaries. And we never hear that there were _surplus slaves_ in
antiquity. The call for them increased, rather. There was, however, a
surplus population of non-workers (in the immediate sense), who were not
too many in relation to the necessaries available, but who had lost the
conditions under which they could appropriate them. The invention of
surplus labourers, i.e. of propertyless people who work, belongs to the
period of capital. The beggars who fastened themselves to the
monasteries and helped them eat up their surplus product are in the same
class as the feudal retainers, and this shows that the surplus produce
could not be eaten up by the small number of its owners. It is only
another form of the retainers of old, or of the menial servants of
today. The overpopulation e.g. among hunting peoples, which shows itself
in the warfare between the tribes, proves not that the earth could not
support their small numbers, but rather that the condition of their
reproduction required a great amount of territory for few people. Never
a relation to a _non-existent_ absolute mass of means of subsistence,
but rather relation to the conditions of reproduction, of the production
of these means, including likewise the _conditions of reproduction of
human beings,_ of the total population, of relative surplus population.
This surplus purely relative: in no way related to the _means of
subsistence as_ such, but rather to the mode of producing them. Hence
also only a _surplus_ at this state of development.

(3) What is not actually proper to Malthus at all, the introduction of
the theory of rent – at bottom only a formula for saying that in the
stage of industry familiar to Ricardo etc., agriculture remained behind
industry, which incidentally inherent in bourgeois production although
in varying relations – does not belong here.>

Necessary labour. Surplus labour. Surplus population. Surplus capital

<As to production founded on capital, the greatest absolute mass of
necessary labour together with the greatest relative mass of surplus
labour appears as a condition, regarded absolutely. Hence, as a
fundamental condition, maximum growth of population – of living labour
capacities. If we further examine the conditions of the development of
the productive forces as well as of exchange, division of labour,
cooperation, all-sided observation, which can only proceed from many
heads, science, as many centres of exchange as possible – all of it
identical with growth of population. On another side, it is also
inherent in the condition of the appropriation of alien surplus labour
that, in addition to the necessary population – i.e. that which
represents necessary labour, labour necessary for production – there
should be a _surplus population,_ which does not work. The further
development of capital shows that besides the industrial part of this
surplus population – the industrial capitalist – a purely consuming part
branches off: idlers, whose business it is to consume alien products and
who, since crude consumption has its limits, must have the products
furnished to them partly in refined form, as luxury products. This idle
surplus population is not what the economists have in mind when they
speak of surplus population. On the contrary, it – and its business of
consuming – is treated by the population fanatics as precisely the
necessary population, and justly (logically) so. The expression, surplus
population, concerns exclusively labour capacities, i.e. the _necessary
population;_ surplus of _labour capacities._ But this arises simply from
the nature of capital. Labour capacity can perform its necessary labour
only if its surplus labour has value for capital, if it can be realized
by capital. Thus, if this realizability is blocked by one or another
barrier, then (1) _labour capacity_ itself appears _outside the
conditions of the reproduction of its existence;_ it exists without the
_conditions of its existence,_ and is therefore a mere encumbrance;
needs without the means to satisfy them; (2) necessary labour appears as
superfluous, because the superfluous is not necessary. It is necessary
only to the extent that it is the condition for the realization of
capital. Thus the relation of necessary and surplus labour, as it is
posited by capital, turns into its opposite, so that a part of necessary
labour – i.e. of the labour reproducing labour capacity – is
superfluous, and this labour capacity itself is therefore used as a
_surplus_ of the necessary working population, i.e. of the portion of
the working population whose necessary labour is not superfluous but
necessary for capital. Since the necessary development of the productive
forces as posited by capital consists in increasing the relation of
surplus labour to necessary labour, or in decreasing the portion of
necessary labour required for a given amount of surplus labour, then, if
a definite amount of labour capacity is given, the relation of
_necessary_ labour needed by capital must necessarily continuously
decline, i.e. part of these labour capacities must become superfluous,
since a portion of them suffices to perform the quantity of surplus
labour for which the whole amount was required previously. The positing
of a specific portion of labour capacities as superfluous, i.e. of the
labour required for their reproduction as superfluous, is therefore a
necessary consequence of the growth of surplus labour relative to
necessary. The decrease of relatively necessary labour appears as
increase of the relatively superfluous labouring capacities – i.e. as
the positing of surplus population. If the latter is supported, then
this comes not out of the labour fund but out of the revenue of all
classes. It takes place not through the labour of the labour capacity
itself – no longer through its normal reproduction as worker, but rather
the worker is maintained as a living being through the mercy of others;
hence becomes a tramp and a pauper; because he no longer sustains
himself through his necessary labour; hence, through the exchange with a
part of capital; he has fallen out of the conditions of the relation of
apparent exchange and apparent independence; secondly: society in its
fractional parts undertakes for Mr Capitalist the business of keeping
his virtual instrument of labour – its wear and tear – intact as reserve
for later use. He shifts a part of the reproduction costs of the working
class off his own shoulders and thus pauperizes a part of the remaining
population for his own profit. At the same time, capital has the
tendency both to posit and equally to suspend this pauperism, because it
constantly reproduces itself as surplus capital. It acts in opposite
directions, so that sometimes one, sometimes the other is predominant.
Finally, the positing of surplus capital contains a double moment: (1)
It requires a growing population in order to be set into motion; if the
relative population it requires has become smaller, then it has itself
become correspondingly larger; (2) it requires a part of the population
which is unemployed (at least relatively); i.e. a relative surplus
population, in order to find the readily available population for the
growth of surplus capital; (3) at a given stage of the productive
forces, the surplus value may be present, but not yet in the proportions
sufficient to be employed as capital. Not only a minimum of the stage of
production, but posited for its expansion. In this case surplus capital
and surplus population. Likewise, a surplus population may be present,
but not enough, not in the proportions required for more production. In
all these investigations, the variations in sales, contraction of the
market etc., in short, everything which presupposes the _process of many
capitals,_ has been intentionally abstracted away.>

A. Smith. _Work as sacrifice. (Senior’s theory of the capitalist’s sacrifice.) (Proudhon’s surplus.)_ – A. Smith. Origin of profit. _Original accumulation_. Wakefield. – _Slave and free labour_. – Atkinson. – _Profit_. – _Origin of_ profit. MacCulloch.

<A. Smith’s view, [is] that _labour never changes its value,_ in the
sense that a _definite amount of labour_ is always a definite _amount of
labour for the worker,_ i.e., with A. Smith, a sacrifice of the _same
quantitative magnitude._ Whether I obtain much or little for an hour of
work – which depends on its productivity and other circumstances – I
have _worked_ one hour. What I have had to pay for the result of my
work, my wages, is always the same _hour of work,_ let the result vary
as it may. ‘Equal quantities of labour must at all times and in all
places have the same value for the worker. In his normal state of
health, strength and activity, and with the common degree of skill and
facility which he may possess, he must always give up the _identical
portion of his tranquillity, his freedom,_ and his _happiness._ Whatever
may be the quantity or composition of the commodities he obtains in
reward of his work, the _price he pays_ is always the same. Of course,
this price may buy sometimes a lesser, sometimes a greater quantity of
these commodities, but only because their value changes, not the value
of the labour which buys them. Labour alone, therefore, never changes
its own value. It is therefore the _real price_ of commodities, money is
only their nominal value.’ (ed. by Garnier, Vol. I, pp. 64–6.)
(Notebook, p. 7.) [33] In the sweat of thy brow shalt thou labour! was
Jehovah’s curse on Adam. [34] And this is labour for Smith, a curse.
‘Tranquillity’ appears as the adequate state, as identical with
‘freedom’ and ‘happiness’. It seems quite far from Smith’s mind that the
individual, ‘in his normal state of health, strength, activity, skill,
facility’, also needs a normal portion of work, and of the suspension of
tranquillity. Certainly, labour obtains its measure from the outside,
through the aim to be attained and the obstacles to be overcome in
attaining it. But Smith has no inkling whatever that this overcoming of
obstacles is in itself a liberating activity – and that, further, the
external aims become stripped of the semblance of merely external
natural urgencies, and become posited as aims which the individual
himself posits – hence as self-realization, objectification of the
subject, hence real freedom, whose action is, precisely, labour. He is
right, of course, that, in its historic forms as slave-labour,
serf-labour, and wage-labour, labour always appears as repulsive, always
as _external forced labour;_ and not-labour, by contrast, as ‘freedom,
and happiness’. This holds doubly: for this contradictory labour; and,
relatedly, for labour which has not yet created the subjective and
objective conditions for itself (or also, in contrast to the pastoral
etc. state, which it has lost), in which labour becomes attractive work,
the individual’s self-realization, which in no way means that it becomes
mere fun, mere amusement, as Fourier, with _grisette-_like [35] naïveté,
conceives it. [36] Really free working, e.g. composing, is at the same
time precisely the most damned seriousness, the most intense exertion.
The work of material production can achieve this character only (1) when
its social character is posited, (2) when it is of a scientific and at
the same time general character, not merely human exertion as a
specifically harnessed natural force, but exertion as subject, which
appears in the production process not in a merely natural, spontaneous
form, but as an activity regulating all the forces of nature. A. Smith,
by the way, has only the slaves of capital in mind. For example, even
the semi-artistic worker of the Middle Ages does not fit into his
definition. _But_ what _we_ want _here initially_ is not to go into his
view on labour, his philosophical view, but into the economic moment.
Labour regarded merely as a _sacrifice,_ and hence value-positing, as a
_price_ paid for things and hence giving them price depending on whether
they cost more or less labour, is a purely _negative_ characterization.
This is why Mr Senior, for example, was able to make capital into a
source of production in the same sense as labour, a source _sui generis_
of the production of _value,_ because the capitalist too brings a
_sacrifice,_ the sacrifice of _abstinence,_ in that he grows wealthy
instead of eating up his product directly. [37] Something that is merely
negative creates nothing. If the worker should, e.g. enjoy his work – as
the miser certainly enjoys Senior’s _abstinence –_ then the product does
not lose any of its value. Labour _alone_ produces; it is the only
_substance_ of products as _values._ * Its measure, labour time –
presupposing equal intensity – is therefore the measure of values. The
qualitative difference between workers, in so far as it is not natural,
posited by sex, age, physical strength etc. – and thus basically
expresses not the qualitative value of labour, but rather the division
and differentiation of labour – is itself only a product of history, and
is in turn suspended for the great mass of labour, in that the latter is
itself simple; while the qualitatively higher takes its economic measure
from the simple. The statement that _labour time,_ or the amount of
labour, is the measure of values means nothing other than that the
measure of labour is the measure of values. Two things are only
commensurable if they are of the _same nature._ Products can be measured
with the measure of labour – labour time – only because they are, by
their nature, _labour._ They are objectified labour. As objects they
assume forms in which their being as labour may certainly be apparent in
their form (as a purposiveness posited in them from outside; however,
this is not at all apparent with e.g. the ox, or with reproduced natural
products generally), but in which this being has, apart from itself, no
other features in common. They exist as equals as long as they exist as
activity. The latter is measured by time, which therefore also becomes
the measure of objectified labour. We will examine elsewhere to what
extent this _measurement_ is linked with exchange, not with organized
social labour – a definite stage of the social production process. Use
value is not concerned with human activity as the source of the product,
with its having been posited by human activity, but with its being for
mankind. In so far as the product has a measure for itself, it is its
natural measure as natural object, mass, weight, length, volume etc.
Measure of utility etc. But as effect, or as static presence of the
force which created it, it is measured only by the measure of this force
itself. The measure of labour is time. Only because products ARE labour
can they be measured by the measure of labour, by labour time, the
amount of labour consumed in them. The negation of tranquillity, as mere
negation, ascetic sacrifice, creates nothing. _Someone may castigate and
flagellate himself all day long like the monks etc., and this quantity
of sacrifice he contributes will remain totally worthless._ The _natural
price_ of things is not the sacrifice made for them. This recalls,
rather, the pre-industrial view which wants to achieve wealth by
sacrificing to the gods. There has to be something besides sacrifice.
The sacrifice of tranquillity can also be called the sacrifice of
laziness, unfreedom, unhappiness, i.e. negation of a negative state. A.
Smith considers labour psychologically, as to the fun or displeasure it
holds for the individual. But it is something else, too, in addition to
this _emotional_ relation with his activity – firstly, for others, since
A’s mere sacrifice would be of no use for B; secondly, a definite
relation by his own self to the thing he works on, and to his own
working capabilities. It is a _positive, creative activity._ The measure
of labour – time – of course does not depend on labour’s productivity;
its measure is precisely nothing but a unit of which the proportional
parts of labour express a certain multiple. It certainly does not follow
from this that the _value_ of labour is constant; or, follows only in so
far as equal quantities of labour are of the same measured magnitude. It
is then found upon further examination that the values of products are
measured not by the labour employed in them, but by the labour necessary
for their production. Hence not sacrifice, but labour as a condition of
production. The equivalent expresses the condition of the products’
reproduction, as given to them through exchange, i.e. the possibility of
repeating productive activity anew, as posited by its own product.> <By
the way, Smith’s view of labour as a _sacrifice,_ which incidentally
correctly expresses the _subjective relation of the wage worker to his
own activity,_ still does not lead to what he wants – namely the
determination of value by labour time. An hour of work may always be an
equal sacrifice for the worker. But the value of commodities in no way
depends on his feelings; nor does the value of his hour of work. Since
A. Smith admits that one can buy this sacrifice sometimes more cheaply,
sometimes more dearly, it becomes distinctly peculiar that it is
supposed always to be _sold_ for the same price. And he is indeed
inconsistent. Later he makes _wages_ the measure of value, not the
amount of labour. _The slaughter of the ox is always the same sacrifice,
for the ox. But this does not mean that the value of beef is constant.>_
<’Now, although equal quantities of labour always have the same value as
regards the worker, they appear sometimes of smaller, sometimes of
larger value for him who employs the worker. He purchases them sometimes
with a smaller, sometimes a larger quantity of commodities. For him,
therefore, the price of labour varies like that of any other thing,
although in reality it is only the commodities which are sometimes
dearer, sometimes cheaper.’ (p. 66 A. Smith, loc. cit. Vol. I.)
(Notebook, p. 8.)>

* Proudhon’s lack of understanding of this matter is evident from his
axiom that every labour leaves a surplus. [38] What he denies for
capital, he transforms into a natural property of labour. The point is,
rather, that the labour time necessary to meet absolute needs leaves
_free_ time (different at the different stages of the development of the
productive forces), and that therefore a surplus product can be created
if _surplus labour_ is worked. The aim is to suspend the relation
itself, so that the surplus product itself appears as necessary.
Ultimately, material production leaves everyone surplus time for other
activity. There is no longer anything mystical in this. Originally, the
free gift of nature abundant, or at least merely to be appropriated.
From the outset, naturally arisen association (family) and the division
of labour and cooperation corresponding to it. For needs are themselves
scant at the _beginning_. They too develop only with the forces of
production.

<The way in which A. Smith lets profit arise is very naïve. ‘In the
primitive state, the product of labour belongs wholly to the worker. The
quantity’ (including also the greater difficulty etc.) ‘of labour
employed to obtain or to produce an exchangeable object is the _only
circumstance_ which governs the quantity of labour which this object can
on the average buy, command or obtain in exchange … BUT _as soon as a
stock_ accumulates in the hands of _private persons, the value which the
workers add to the object dissolves into two parts,_ of which one pays
their wages, the other the profit which the entrepreneur makes on the
sum of the stock which has served him to advance these wages and the
materials of labour. He would have _no interest_ in employing these
workers if he did not expect from the sale of their works something more
than is necessary to replace this fund, and he would have no interest in
employing a larger in preference over a small amount of funds if his
profit did not stand in some proportion to the volume of the funds
employed.’ (loc. cit. p. 96, 97.) (N., p. 9.) (See A. Smith’s peculiar
view that _before the division of labour,_ ‘where every one produced
everything necessary, no stock was necessary’. As if, in this state,
while he finds no stock in nature, he would not have to find the
objective conditions of life, in order to work. Even the savage, even
animals, set aside a reserve. Smith can at most have in mind a situation
in which the impulse to labour is still a direct, momentary instinct,
and then a _stock_ still has to be present in nature in one way or
another _without labour._ (Notebook, p. 19.) (Smith is confused here.
_Concentration of the stock_ in a single hand then not necessary.)>

<In Vol. III of his edition of A. Smith, Wakefield remarks: ‘The labour
of slaves being combined, is more productive than the much divided
labour of freemen. The labour of freemen is more productive than that of
slaves, only when it comes to be combined _by means of greater dearness
of land, and the system of hiring for wages.’_ (Note to p. 18.)
(Notebook VIII, p. 1.) ‘In countries where land remains very cheap,
either all the people are in a state of barbarism, or some of them are
in a state of slavery.’ (Note to p. 20.)>

<_‘Profit_ is a term signifying the increase of capital or wealth; so,
failing to find the laws which govern the rate of profit, is failing to
find the laws of the formation of capital.’ (p. 55. Atkinson (W.),
_Principles of Political Economy,_ London, 1840.) (Notebook, p. 2.)>

<’Man is as much the _produce of labour_ as any of the machines
constructed by his agency; and it appears to us that in all economical
investigations he ought to be considered in precisely the same point of
view. Every individual who has arrived at maturity … may, with perfect
propriety, be viewed as a machine which it has cost 20 years of
assiduous attention and the expenditure of a considerable capital to
construct. And if a further sum is laid out for his education or
qualification for the exercise of a business etc., his value is
proportionally increased, just as a machine is made more valuable
through the expenditure of additional capital or labour in its
construction, in order to give it new powers.’ (McCulloch, _The
Principles of Pol. Econ.,_ London, 1825, p. 115.) (Notebook, p. 9.)>
<’In point of fact, a commodity will always exchange for more’ labour
(than it was produced by): ‘and it _is this excess that constitutes
profits.’_ (p. 221, McCulloch loc. cit.) (Notebook, p. 13.) The same
gentle McCulloch, about whom Malthus rightly says that he sees it as the
proper task of science to equate everything with everything else, [39]
says: ‘_the profits of capital_ are only another name for the wages of
_accumulated labour’_ (p. 291) (loc. cit. Notebook, 14) and hence no
doubt the wages of labour are only another name for the profits of
living capital. ‘Wages … really consist of a _part of the produce of the
industry of the labourer;_ consequently, they have a high real value if
the labourer receives a comparatively high share of the product of his
industry, and vice versa.’ (295 loc. cit.) (Notebook, p. 15.)>

Surplus labour. Profit. Wages. _Economists. Ramsay. Wade_

The positing of _surplus labour_ through capital has on the whole been
so little understood by the economists that they present striking
phenomena of its occurrence as something _special,_ as a curiosity. Thus
Ramsay, with night work. Likewise John Wade e.g., in _History of the
Middle and Working Classes,_ 3rd ed., London, 1835 (p. 241) (Notebook,
p. 21) says: ‘The standard of wages is _also_ connected with the hours
of work and rest periods. It was the policy of the masters in recent
years’ (before 1835) ‘to usurp on operatives in this respect, by cutting
or abridging holidays and mealtimes and gradually stretching the hours
of work; knowing that an increase of 1/4 in the time of work is
equivalent to a reduction in wages by the same amount.’

Immovable capital. _Return of capital. Fixed capital._ John St. Mill

John St. Mill: _Essays on Some Unsettled Questions of Political
Economy,_ London, 1844. (The few original ideas of Mill Junior are
contained in this narrow little volume, not in his fat, pedantic _magnum
opus.)_

‘Whatever is destined to be employed reproductively, be it in its
existing form, or indirectly by a previous (or even subsequent)
exchange, is _capital._ Suppose I have laid out all my money in wages
and machinery, and the article I produce is just finished: in the
interval, before I can sell these articles, realize the gain, and lay it
out again in wages and tools, will it be said that I have _no capital?_
Certainly not: I have the same capital as before, perhaps a larger one,
but it is tied down, and is not disposable.’ (p. 55.) (Notebook, p. 36.)
‘At all times a very large part of the capital in a country lies idle.
The annual product of a country never achieves in height what it could,
if all resources were devoted to reproduction, if, in short, all the
country’s capital were in full employment. _If every commodity on the
average remained unsold for a length of time equal to that required for
its production, then it is clear that at any one time not more than a
half of the productive capital of the country would in reality perform
the function of capital. The employed half is a fluctuating portion,_
composed of various elements; but the result would be that every
producer would be capable of producing each year only half the supply of
commodities which he could produce if he were sure of selling them at
the moment of their completion.’ (loc. cit. p. 55, 56.) ‘This, or
something similar, is, however, the usual state of a very great part of
all capitalists in the world.’ (p. 56.) ‘The number of producers or
vendors who turn over their capital in the very shortest time is very
small. Few have so rapid a sale of their commodities that all goods
which their own or borrowed capital can supply them can be _cleared out_
as quickly as supplied. The majority do not have an _extent of business_
at all adequate to the amount of capital they dispose of. It is true
that in communities where industry and trade are practised with the
greatest success, the contrivances of banking enable the owner of a
capital greater than he can himself employ, to apply it productively and
to derive a revenue from it. Still, even then, there is a great quantity
of capital which remains _fixed_ in the form of implements, machinery,
buildings etc., whether only half employed or in complete employment:
and every dealer keeps a _stock in trade,_ to be ready for a possible
sudden demand, although he may not be able to dispose of it for an
indefinite period.’ (p. 56.) ‘_This constant non-employment of a large
part of capital_ is the _price we pay for the division of labour. The
purchase is worth what it costs; but the price is considerable.’_ (56.)
If I have 1,500 thalers in the shop and take in 10%, while 500 lie idle
to ornament the shop, it is the same as if I invest 1,000 thalers at 7
1/2% … ‘In many trades there are a few dealers who sell articles of
equal quality at a lower price than other dealers. This is not a
voluntary sacrifice of profits; from the consequent overflow of
customers they expect to turn over their capital more rapidly, and to be
the winners by keeping the whole of their capital in more constant
employment, although on a given operation their gains are smaller.’ (p.
56, 57.) ‘It is questionable whether there are any dealers for whom one
additional buyer is of no use; and for the great majority, this
hypothesis altogether inapplicable. An additional customer is for most
dealers equivalent to a growth of their productive capital. It enables
them to transform a part of their capital, which lay idle (and perhaps
would never have become productive in their hands until a customer had
been found), into wages and instruments of production … A country’s
aggregate product for the following year is hence increased; not through
pure exchange, but by _calling into activity_ a portion of the national
capital which, had it not been for the exchange, would have remained
unemployed for some time longer.’ (57, 58.) ‘The advantages gained from
a _new customer_ are, for the producer or dealer: (1) say, a part of his
capital lies in the form of unsold goods, producing (during a longer or
shorter time) nothing at all; then a part thereof is _called into
greater activity_ and _becomes more constantly productive._ (2) If the
additional demand exceeds what can be supplied through liberation of
capital existing as unsold goods, and if the dealer has additional
resources (e.g. in government bonds), but not in his own trade, then he
is enabled to obtain on a portion of these, no longer interest, but
profit, and thus to gain the difference between the rate of interest and
of profits. (3) If all his capital is employed in his own business and
no part stored up as unsold goods, then he can conduct a surplus
business with borrowed capital and gain the difference between interest
and profit.’ (59.)

Turnover of capital. _Circulation process. Production process. Turnover. Capital circulates. Likewise fixed capital. Circulation costs. Circulation time and labour time. (Capitalist’s free time.) (Transport costs)_

Now back to our subject.

The phases through which capital travels, which form one turnover of
capital, begin conceptually with the transformation of money into the
conditions of production. Now, however, that we begin not with capital
in the process of becoming, but capital which has become, [we can see
that] it travels through the following phases: (1) Creation of surplus
value, or immediate production process. Its result, the product. (2)
Bringing the product to market. Transformation of product into
commodity. (3) (α) Entry of the commodity into ordinary circulation.
Circulation of the commodity. Its result: transformation into money.
This appears as the first moment of ordinary circulation. (β)
Retransformation of money into the conditions of production: money
circulation; in ordinary circulation, the circulation of commodities and
the circulation of money always appear distributed among two different
subjects. Capital circulates first as a commodity, then as money, and
vice versa. (4) Renewal of the production process, which appears here as
reproduction of the original capital, and production process of surplus
capital.

The costs of circulation break down into costs of movement; costs to
bring the product to market; the labour time required to effect the
transformation from one state to the other; all of which actually come
down to accounting operations and the time they cost (this is the
foundation of a special, technical money trade). (Whether the latter
costs are to be considered deductions from the surplus value or not will
be seen later.)

If we examine this movement, we find that the circulation of capital,
through the operation of exchanges, opens up at one point to release the
product into general circulation, and to constitute itself out of the
latter as equivalent in money. What happens to this product, which has
in this way fallen out of the circulation of capital and into ordinary
circulation, is here beside the point. On the other side, capital throws
its form as money out of its circulation process again (partially, that
is, in so far as it is not wages), or, after having realized itself as
value in ordinary circulation and at the same time posited itself as the
measure of its own realization, it then moves in the money form only as
medium of circulation, and thus sucks into itself out of general
circulation the commodities necessary for production (conditions of
production). As commodity, capital throws itself out of its own
circulation into general circulation; and, again as commodity, capital
leaves general circulation and enters its own course, issuing into the
production process. The circulation of capital thus contains a relation
to general circulation, of which its own circulation forms a moment,
while the latter likewise appears as posited by capital. This to be
examined later.

The total production process of capital includes both the circulation
process proper and the actual production process. These form the two
great sections of its movement, which appears as the totality of these
two processes. On one side, labour time, on the other, circulation time.
And the whole of the movement appears as unity of labour time and
circulation time, as unity of production and circulation. This unity
itself is motion, process. Capital appears as this unity-in-process of
production and circulation, a unity which can be regarded both as the
totality of the process of its production, as well as the specific
completion of _one_ turnover of the capital, _one_ movement returning
into itself.

The condition, for capital, of circulation time is – besides labour time
– only the same as the condition of production based on division of
labour and exchange, in adequate form, in the highest form. The costs of
circulation are costs of the division of labour and of exchange, which
are necessarily found in every previous, pre-capitalist form of
production resting on this basis.

As the subject predominant [_übergreifend_] over the different phases of
this movement, as value sustaining and multiplying itself in it, as the
subject of these metamorphoses proceeding in a circular course – as a
spiral, as an expanding circle – capital is _circulating capital._
Circulating capital is therefore initially not a _particular_ form of
capital, but is rather _capital_ itself, in a further developed aspect,
as subject of the movement just described, which it, itself, is as its
own realization process. In this respect, therefore, every capital is
_circulating capital._ In simple circulation, circulation itself appears
as the subject. One commodity is thrown out of it, another enters into
it. But the same commodity is within it only fleetingly. Money itself,
in so far as it ceases to be a medium of circulation and posits itself
as independent value, withdraws from circulation. Capital, however,
exists as the subject of circulation; circulation is posited as its own
life’s course. But while capital thus, as the whole of circulation, is
_circulating capital,_ is the process of going from one phase into the
other, it is at the same time, within each phase, posited in a specific
aspect, restricted to a particular form, which is the negation of itself
as the subject of the whole movement. Therefore, capital in each of its
particular phases is the negation of itself as the subject of all the
various metamorphoses. Not-circulating capital. _Fixed capital,_
actually _fixated_ capital, fixated in one of the different particular
aspects, phases, through which it must move. As long as it persists in
one of these phases – [as long as] the phase itself does not appear as
fluid transition – and each of them has its duration, [then] it is not
circulating, [but] fixated. As long as it remains in the production
process it is not capable of circulating; and it is virtually devalued.
As long as it remains in circulation, it is not capable of producing,
not capable of positing surplus value, not capable of engaging in the
process as capital. As long as it cannot be brought to market, it is
fixated as product. As long as it has to remain on the market, it is
fixated as commodity. As long as it cannot be exchanged for conditions
of production, it is fixated as money. Finally, if the conditions of
production remain in their form as conditions and do not enter into the
production process, it is again fixated and devalued. As the subject
moving through all phases, as the moving unity, the unity-in-process of
circulation and production, capital is _circulating_ capital; capital as
restricted into any of these phases, as posited in its _divisions,_ is
_fixated_ capital, _tied-down_ capital. As circulating capital it
fixates itself, and as fixated capital it circulates. The distinction
between _circulating capital_ and _fixed capital_ thus appears initially
as a formal characteristic of capital, depending on whether it appears
as the unity of the process or as one of its specific moments. The
concept of _dormant capital,_ capital lying fallow, can refer only to
its barren existence in one of these aspects, and it is a condition of
capital that part of it always lies fallow. This takes the visible form
that a part of the national capital is always stuck in one of the phases
through which capital has to move. _Money_ itself, to the extent that it
forms a particular part of the nation’s capital, but always remains in
the form of medium of circulation, i.e. never goes through the other
phases, is therefore regarded by A. Smith as a subordinate form of fixed
capital. [40] Capital can likewise lie fallow, be fixated in the form of
money, of value withdrawn from circulation. During crises – _after_ the
moment of panic – during the standstill of industry, money is
immobilized in the hands of bankers, billbrokers etc.; and, just as the
stag cries out for fresh water, money cries out for a field of
employment where it may be realized as capital.

Much confusion in political economy has been caused by this, that the
aspects of circulating and fixed are initially nothing more than capital
itself posited in the two aspects, first as the unity of the process,
then as a particular one of its phases, itself in _distinction_ to
itself as unity – not as two particular kinds of capital, not capital of
two particular kinds, but rather as different _characteristic forms of
the same capital._ While some held fast to the aspect of a material
product in which it was supposed to be circulating capital, others had
no difficulty in pointing out the opposite aspect, and vice versa.
Capital as the unity of circulation and production is at the same time
the division between them, and a division whose aspects are separated in
space and time, at that. In each moment it has an indifferent form
towards the other. For the individual capital, the transition from one
into the other appears as chance, as dependent on external,
uncontrollable circumstances. _One and the same_ capital therefore
always appears in both states; this is expressed by the appearance of
one part of it in one [phase], another in another; one part tied down,
another part circulating; circulating, here, not in the sense that it is
in the _circulatory phase proper_ as opposed to the _production phase,_
but rather in the sense that in the phase in which it finds itself it is
in a _fluid_ phase, a phase in-process, a phase in transition to the
next phase; not stuck in one of them as such and hence delayed in its
total process. For example: the industrialist uses only a part of the
capital at his disposal (whether borrowed or owned is beside the point
here, nor, if we consider capital as a whole, does it affect the
economic process) in production, because another part requires a certain
amount of time before it comes back out of circulation. The part moving
[_prozessierend_] within production is then the circulating part; the
part in circulation is the immobilized part. His total productivity is
thereby restricted; the reproduced part restricted, hence also the part
thrown on to the market restricted. Thus the merchant; a part of his
capital is tied down as _stock in trade,_ the other part moves. To be
sure, sometimes one and sometimes another part is in this phase, as with
the industrialist, but his total capital is always posited in both
aspects. Then again, since this limit arising out of the nature of the
realization process itself is not fixed, but changes with circumstances,
and since capital can approach its adequate character as that which
circulates, to a greater or lesser degree; since the decomposition into
these two aspects, in which the realization process appears at the same
time as the devaluation process, contradicts the tendency of capital
towards maximum realization, it therefore invents contrivances to
abbreviate the phase of fixity; and at the same time also, instead of
the simultaneous coexistence of both states, _they alternate._ In one
period the process appears as altogether fluid – the period of the
maximum realization of capital; in another, a reaction to the first, the
other moment asserts itself all the more forcibly – the period of the
maximum devaluation of capital and congestion of the production process.
The moments in which both aspects appear alongside one another
themselves only form interludes between these violent transitions and
turnings-over. It is extremely important to grasp these aspects of
circulating and fixated capital as _specific characteristic forms_ of
capital generally, since a great many phenomena of the bourgeois economy
– the period of the economic cycle, which is essentially different from
the single turnover period of capital; the effect of new demand; even
the effect of new gold- and silver-producing countries on general
production – [would otherwise be] incomprehensible. It is futile to
speak of the stimulus given by Australian gold or a newly discovered
market. If it were not in the nature of capital to be never completely
occupied, i.e. always partially _fixated,_ devalued, unproductive, then
no stimuli could drive it to greater production. At the same time,
[note] the senseless contradictions into which the economists stray –
even Ricardo – when they presuppose that capital is always fully
occupied; hence explain an increase of production by referring
exclusively to the creation of new capital. Every increase would then
presuppose an earlier increase or growth of the productive forces.

These barriers to production based on capital are even more strongly
inherent in the earlier modes of production, in so far as they rest on
exchange. But they do not form a law of production pure and simple;
[and,] as soon as exchange value no longer forms a barrier to material
production, as soon as its barrier is rather posited by the total
development of the individual, the whole story with its spasms and
convulsions is left behind. As we saw earlier that money suspends the
barriers of barter only by generalizing them – i.e. separating purchase
and sale entirely – so shall we see later that _credit_ likewise
suspends these barriers to the realization of capital only by raising
them to their most general form, positing one period of overproduction
and one of underproduction as two periods.

The value which capital posits in one cycle, one revolution, one
_turnover,_ is = to the value posited in the production process, i.e. =
to the value reproduced + the new value. Whether we regard the turnover
as completed at the point where the commodity is transformed into money,
or at the point where the money is transformed back into conditions of
production, the result, whether expressed in money or in conditions of
production, is always absolutely equal to the value posited in the
production process. We count the physical bringing of the product to
market as = to 0; or, rather, we include it in the direct production
process. The economic circulation of the product begins only when it is
on the market as a commodity – only then does it circulate. We are
dealing here only with the economic differences, aspects, moments of
circulation; not with the physical conditions for bringing the finished
product into the second phase, that of circulation as commodity; nor are
we concerned with the technological process by which the raw material is
transformed into product. The greater or lesser distance of the market
from the producer etc. does not concern us here yet. What we want to
determine here first of all is that the costs arising from the motion
through the different economic moments as such, the _costs of
circulation_ as such, do not add anything to the value of the product,
are not value-positing costs, regardless of how much labour they may
involve. They are merely _deductions from the created_ value. If, of two
individuals, each one were the producer of his own product, but their
labour rested on division of labour, so that they exchanged with each
other, and the realization of their product depended on the satisfaction
of their needs through this exchange, then obviously the time which this
exchange would cost them, e.g. the mutual bargaining, calculating before
closing the deal, would make not the slightest addition either to their
products or to the latter’s exchange values. If A were to argue that the
exchange takes up so much time, then B would respond in kind. Each of
them loses just as much time in the exchange as the other. The exchange
time is their common time. If A demanded 10 thalers for the product –
its equivalent – and 10 thalers for the time it costs him to get the 10
thalers from B, then the latter would declare him a candidate for the
madhouse. This loss of time arises from the division of labour and the
necessity of exchange. If A produced everything himself, then he would
lose no part of his time in exchanging with B, or in transforming his
product into money and the money into product again. The _costs of
circulation_ proper (and they achieve a significant independent
development in the money trade) are not reducible to productive labour
time. But they are also by nature restricted to the time it necessarily
costs to transform the commodity into money and the money back into
commodity; i.e. to the time it costs to transpose capital from one form
into the other. B and A might now find that they could save time by
inserting a third person C as middleman between them, who consumed his
time in this _circulation process –_ circumstances which would arise
e.g. if there were enough exchangers, enough subjects of the circulation
processes, so that the time needed by each pair of them alternately over
a year = one year; each individual, say, had to spend 1/50 of a year
alternately in circulation, and there are 50 of them, then 1 individual
could spend his entire time in this occupation. For this individual, if
only his necessary labour time were paid him, i.e. if he had to give up
his entire time in exchange for the necessaries of life, then the reward
which he would obtain would be wages. But if it amounted to his entire
time, then the wage he would obtain would be an equivalent, objectified
labour time. This individual then, would have added nothing to the
value, but would, rather, have obtained a share of the surplus value
belonging to capitalists A, B, etc. They would have gained, since,
according to the presupposition, a lesser deduction from their surplus
value would have taken place. (Capital is not a quantity simply, nor an
operation simply; but both at the same time.) _Money_ itself, to the
extent that it consists of precious metals, or its production generally
– e.g. in paper circulation – creates expense, to the extent that it
also costs labour time, adds no value to the exchanged objects – to the
exchange values; rather, its costs are a deduction from these values, a
deduction which must be borne in proportional parts by the exchangers.
The preciousness of the instrument of circulation, of the instrument of
exchange, expresses only the _costs of exchange._ Instead of adding to
value, they subtract from it. Gold money and silver money, e.g., are
themselves values, _like others_ (not in the sense of money), in so far
as labour is objectified in them. But that these values serve as _medium
of circulation_ is a deduction from disposable wealth. The same relation
holds for the production costs of the circulation of capital. This adds
nothing to the values. The _costs of circulation_ as such _do not posit
value,_ they are _costs of the realization of values –_ deductions from
them. _Circulation as a series of transformations,_ in which capital
posits itself; but, as regards value, circulation does not add to it,
but posits it, rather, in the _form_ of value. The potential value which
is transformed into money through circulation is presupposed as a result
of the production process. In so far as this series of processes takes
place in time and involves costs, costs labour time, or objectified
labour time, these _circulation costs_ are deductions from the sum of
value. When circulation costs are posited = 0, then the result of _one_
turnover of capital, as regards value, = the value posited in the
production process. That is, the value presupposed to circulation is the
same as emerges from it. The most that can happen is that – owing to the
circulation costs – a smaller value can come out than went in. In this
respect, circulation time adds nothing to value; circulation time does
not appear as value-positing time, the same as labour time. If
production has created a commodity = to the value of £10, then
circulation is necessary in order to equate this commodity to the £10,
its value, which exists as money. The costs involved in this process,
caused by this change of form, are a deduction from the value of the
commodity. _The circulation of capital is the change of forms by means
of which value passes through different phases._ The _time_ which this
process lasts or costs to bring about belongs among the _production
costs of circulation, of the division of labour, of production based on
exchange._

This holds for _one turnover of capital,_ i.e. for the single course of
capital through this, its different moments. The process of capital as
value has its point of departure in money and ends in money, but in a
greater quantity of money. The difference is only quantitative. M–C–C–M
has thus obtained a content. If we examine the cycle up to this point,
we stand at the point of departure again. Capital has become money
again. But it is now at the same time posited, it has now become a
condition for this money that it becomes capital again, money which
preserves and multiplies itself through the purchase of labour, by
passing through the production process. Its form as money is posited as
mere form; one of the many forms through which it moves in its
metamorphosis. If we regard this point now not as a terminal point, but
rather – as we must now regard it – as transition point, or new point of
departure, itself posited by the production process as a vanishing
terminal point and only a seeming point of departure, then it is clear
that the retransformation of value, posited as money, into
value-in-process, into value entering into the production process, can
only proceed – that the _renewal of the production process_ can only
take place – when the part of the circulation process which is distinct
from the production process has been completed. The _second turnover_ of
capital – the retransformation of money into capital as such, or the
renewal of the production process – depends on the time capital requires
to complete its circulation; i.e. on its _circulation time,_ the latter
here as distinct from production time. But since we have seen that the
total value created by capital (reproduced value as well as newly
created), which is realized in circulation as such, is exclusively
determined by the production process, it follows that the sum of values
which can be created in a given period of time depends on the number of
repetitions of the production process within this period. The repetition
of the production process, however, is determined by circulation time,
which is equal to the velocity of circulation. The more rapid the
circulation, the shorter the circulation time, the more often can the
same capital repeat the production process. Hence, in a specific cycle
of turnovers of capital, the sum of values created by it (hence surplus
values as well, for it posits necessary labour always merely as labour
necessary for surplus labour) is _directly proportional to the labour
time and inversely proportional to the circulation time._ In a given
cycle, the total value (consequently also the sum of newly posited
surplus values) = labour time multiplied by the number of turnovers of
the capital. Or, the surplus value posited by capital now no longer
appears as simply determined by the surplus labour appropriated by it in
the production process, but rather [it is determined] by the coefficient
of the production process; i.e. the number which expresses how often it
is repeated in a given period of time. This coefficient, in turn, is
determined by the circulation time required by the capital for one
turnover. The sum of values (surplus values) is thus determined by the
value posited in one turnover multiplied by the number of turnovers in a
given period of time. One turnover of capital is = to the production
time + the circulation time. If circulation time is presupposed as
given, then the total time required for one turnover depends on the
production time. If production time is given, the duration of the
turnover depends on the circulation time. Hence, to the extent that
circulation time determines the total mass of production time in a given
period of time, and to the extent that the repetition of the production
process, its renewal in a given period depends on the circulation time,
to that extent is it itself a moment of production, or rather appears as
a limit of production. This is the nature of capital, of production
founded on capital, that circulation time becomes a determinant moment
for labour time, for the creation of value. The independence of labour
time is thereby negated, and the production process is itself posited as
determined by exchange, so that immediate production is socially linked
to it and dependent on this link – not only as a material moment, but
also as an _economic_ moment, a determinant, characteristic form. The
maximum of circulation – the limit of the renewal of the production
process through it – is obviously determined by the duration of
production time during one turnover. Suppose the production process of a
specific capital, i.e. the time it needs to reproduce its value and to
posit surplus value, lasts 3 months. (Or, the time required to complete
a quantity of product = to the total value of the producing capital +
the surplus value.) Then this capital could under no circumstances renew
the production or realization process more often than 4 times a year.
The maximum turnover of this capital would be 4 turnovers per year; i.e.
if no interruptions took place between the completion of one production
phase and the renewal. The maximum number of turnovers would be = to the
continuity of the production process, so that, as soon as the product
was finished, new raw material would be worked up into product again.
This continuity would extend not only to the continuity within a single
production phase, but to the _continuity of these phases themselves._
But supposing now that this capital required one month of circulation
time at the end of each phase – time to return to the form of conditions
of production – then it could effect only 3 turnovers. In the first case
the number of turnovers was = 1 phase × 4; or 12 months divided by 3.
The maximum value-creation by capital in a given space of time is this
space of time divide d by the duration of the production process (by
production time). In the second case, the capital would effect only 3
turnovers a year; it would repeat the realization process only 3 times.
The sum of its realization process would be, then, = 12/4 = 3. The
divisor here is the total circulation time it requires: 4 months; or the
circulation time required for one circulation phase, multiplied by the
number of times this circulation time is contained in a year. In the
first case, the number of turnovers = 12 months, a year, a given time,
divided by the time of one production phase, or by the duration of
production time itself; in the second case, it equals the same time
divided by circulation time. The maximum realization of capital, as also
the maximum continuity of the production process, is circulation time
posited as = 0; i.e. then, the conditions under which capital produces,
its restriction by circulation time, the necessity of going through the
different phases of its metamorphosis, are suspended. It is the
necessary tendency of capital to strive to equate circulation time to 0;
i.e. to suspend itself, since it is capital itself alone which posits
circulation time as a determinant moment of production time. It is the
same as to suspend the necessity of exchange, of money, and of the
division of labour resting on them, hence capital itself. If we ignore
for a moment the transformation of surplus value into surplus capital,
then a capital of 100 thalers, which produced a surplus value of 4% on
the total capital in the production process, would, in the first case,
reproduce itself 4 times and would at the end of the year have posited a
surplus value of 16. At the end of the year, the capital would be = 116.
It would be the same as if a capital of 400 had turned over once a year,
likewise with a surplus value of 4%. As regards the total production of
commodities and values, these would have quadrupled. In the other case,
a capital of 100 thalers only created a surplus value of 12; the total
capital at the end of the year = 112. As regards total production – in
respect of either values or use values – the difference still more
significant. In the first case e.g. a capital of 100 transformed 400
thalers of leather into boots, in the second only 300 thalers of
leather.

The total realization of capital is hence determined by the duration of
the production phase – which we posit as identical with labour time, for
the moment – multiplied by the number of turnovers, or renewals of this
production phase in a given period of time. If the turnovers were
determined only by the duration of one production phase, then the total
realization would be simply determined by the number of production
phases contained in a given period of time; or, the turnovers would be
absolutely determined by production time itself. This would be the
_maximum of realization._ It is clear, therefore, that circulation time,
regarded absolutely, is a deduction from the maximum of realization, is
< absolute realization. It is therefore impossible for any velocity of
circulation or any abbreviation of circulation to create a realization >
that posited by the production phase itself. The maximum that the
velocity of circulation could effect, if it rose to ∞, would be to posit
circulation time = 0, i.e. to abolish itself. It can therefore not be a
positive, value-creating moment, since its abolition – circulation
without circulation time – would be the maximum of realization; its
negation = to the highest position of the productivity of capital. * The
total productivity of capital is = the duration of one production phase
multiplied by the number of times it is repeated in a certain period of
time. But this number is determined by circulation time.

* The productivity of capital as capital is not the productive force
which increases use values; but rather its capacity to create value; the
degree to which it produces value.

Let us assume a capital of 100 turned over 4 times a year; posited the
production process 4 times; then, if the surplus value = 5% each time,
at the end of the year the surplus value created by the capital of 100
would = 20; then, for a capital of 400, which turned over once a year at
the same percentage, would likewise = 20. So that a capital of 100,
circulating 4 times, would give a gain of 20% a year, while a 4 times
greater capital with a single turnover would give a profit of only 5%.
(We shall see shortly, in more detail, that the surplus value is exactly
the same.) It seems, therefore, that the magnitude of the capital can be
replaced by the velocity of turnover, and the velocity of turnover by
the magnitude of the capital. This is how it comes to appear as though
circulation time were in itself productive. We must therefore clarify
the matter by discussing this case.

Another question which arises: If the turnover of 100 thalers 4 times a
year brings 5% each time, say, then at the beginning of the second
turnover, the production process could be begun with 105 thalers, and
the product would be 110 1/4; at the beginning of the third _turnover,_
110 1/4, of which the product would be 115 61/80 at the beginning of the
fourth turnover, 115 61/80, and at its end, 121 881/1600. The number
itself here is beside the point. The point is that, in the case of a
capital of 400 which turns over once a year at 5%, the total gain can
only be 20; while, by contrast, a 4 times smaller capital turning over 4
times at the same percentage makes a gain of 1 + 881/1600 more. In this
way it appears as if the mere moment of turnover – repetition – i.e. a
moment determined by circulation time, or rather a moment determined by
_circulation,_ not only realized value, but brought about an absolute
growth of value. This also to be examined.

Circulation time only expresses the velocity of circulation; the
velocity of circulation only the barrier to circulation. _Circulation_
_without circulation time –_ i.e. the transition of capital from one
phase to the next at the speed of thought – would be the maximum, i.e.
the identity of the renewal of the production process with its
termination.

The act of exchange – and the economic operations through which
circulation proceeds are reducible to a succession of acts of exchange –
up to the point at which capital does not relate as commodity to money
or as money to commodity, but as value to its specific use value, labour
– the act of the exchange of value in one form for value in the other,
money for commodity, commodity for money (and these are the moments of
simple circulation), posits the value of one commodity in the other, and
thus realizes it as exchange; or, also, posits the commodities as
equivalents. The act of exchange is thus _value-positing_ in so far as
values are presupposed to it; it realizes the value-_character_ of the
subjects of exchange. [41] But an act which posits a commodity as
_value,_ or, what is the same, which posits another commodity as its
_equivalent –_ or, again the same, posits the _equivalence_ of both
commodities, obviously for its part adds nothing to value, as little as
the sign ± increases or decreases the number coming after it. If I posit
4 as plus or as minus – through this operation, 4, independently of the
sign, remains equal to itself, 4, becomes neither 3 nor 5. Likewise, if
I exchange a lb. of cotton with an exchange value of 6d. for 6d., then
it is posited as value; and it can equally be said that the 6d, are
posited as value in the lb. of cotton; i.e. the labour time contained in
the 6d. (here 6d. regarded as _value)_ is now expressed in another
materialization of the same amount of labour time. But, since through
this act of exchange the lb. of cotton as well as the 6d. of copper are
each posited at = to their value, it is impossible that through this
exchange the value either of the cotton, or of the 6d. or of the sum of
both values should increase quantitatively. As the positing of
equivalents, exchange only changes the form; realizes the potentially
existing values; realizes the prices, if you like. To posit equivalents,
e.g. A and B as equivalents, cannot raise the value of A, for it is the
act in which A is posited as = to its own value, hence not as unequal to
it; unequal only where the form is concerned, in so far as it was
previously not posited as value; it is at the same time the act by means
of which the value of A is posited as = to the value of B, and the value
of B as = the value of A. The sum of the values transposed in the
exchange = value A + value B. Each remains = to its own value; hence
their sum remains equal to the sum of their values. Exchange as the
_positing of equivalents_ cannot therefore by its nature increase the
sum of values, nor the value of the commodities exchanged. (The fact
that it is different with the exchange with labour arises because the
use value of labour is itself _value-positing,_ but is not directly
connected with its exchange value.) And if a single operation of
exchange cannot increase the value of the thing exchanged, neither can a
sum of exchanges do it. * Whether I repeat an act which creates no value
once or an infinite number of times, the repetition cannot change its
nature. The repetition of a non-value-creating act can never become an
act of value-creation. E.g. 1/4 expresses a specific proportion. If I
transform this 1/4 into a decimal fraction, i.e. posit it = 0.25, then
its form has been changed. This transformation leaves the value the
same. Similarly, when I transform a commodity into the form of money, or
money into the form of the commodity, then the value remains the same,
but the form is changed. It is clear, therefore, that circulation –
since it consists of a series of exchange operations with equivalents –
cannot increase the value of circulating commodities. Therefore, if
labour time is required to undertake this operation, i.e. if values have
to be consumed, for all consumption of values reduces itself to the
consumption of labour time or of objectified labour time, products; i.e.
if circulation entails costs, and if circulation time costs labour time,
then this is a deduction from, a relative suspension of the circulating
values; their devaluation by the amount of the circulation costs. If one
imagines two workers who exchange with each other, a fisherman and a
hunter; then the time which both lose in exchanging would create neither
fish nor game, but would be rather a deduction from the time in which
both of them can create values, the one fish, the other hunt, objectify
their labour time in a use value. If the fisherman wanted to get
compensation for this loss from the hunter: demand more game, or give
him fewer fish, then the latter would have the same right to
compensation. The loss would be common to both of them. These costs of
circulation, costs of exchange, could appear only as a deduction from
the total production and value-creation of both of them. If they
commissioned a third, C, with these exchanges, and thus lost no labour
time directly, then each of them would have to cede a proportional share
of his product to C. What they could gain thereby would only be a
greater or lesser loss. But if they worked as joint proprietors, then no
exchange would take place, only communal consumption. The costs of
exchange would therefore vanish. Not the division of labour; but the
division of labour founded on exchange. It is wrong, therefore, for J.
St. Mill to regard the cost of circulation as _necessary price of the
division of labour._ [42] It is the cost only of the [not-] spontaneous
division of labour resting not on community of property, but on private
property.

* It is altogether necessary to make this clear; because the
distribution of the surplus value among the capitals, the _calculation_
of the total surplus value among the individual capitals – this
_secondary_ economic operation – gives rise to phenomena which are
confused, in the ordinary economics books, with the primary ones.

Circulation costs as such, i.e. the consumption of labour time or of
objectified labour time, of values, in connection with the operation of
exchange and a series of exchange operations, are therefore a deduction
either from the time employed on production, or from the values posited
by production. They can never increase the value. They belong among the
_faux frais de production,_ and these _faux frais de production_ belong
to the inherent costs of production resting on capital. The merchant’s
trade and still more the money trade proper – in so far as they do
nothing but carry on the operations of circulation as such, e.g. the
determination of prices (measurement of values and their calculation),
these exchange operations generally, as a function which has gained
independence through the division of labour, in so far as they represent
this function of the total process of capital – represent merely the
_faux frais de production_ of capital. In so far as they reduce these
_faux frais,_ they add to production, not by creating value, but by
reducing the negation of created values. If they operate purely as such
a function, then they would always only represent the minimum of _faux
frais de production._ If they enable the producers to create more values
than they could without this division of labour, and, more precisely, so
much more that a surplus remains after the payment of this function,
then they have in fact increased production. Values are then increased,
however, not because the operations of circulation have created value,
but because they have absorbed less value than they would have done
otherwise. But they are a necessary condition for capital’s production.

The time a capitalist loses during exchange is as such not a deduction
from labour time. He is a capitalist – i.e. representative of capital,
personified capital, only by virtue of the fact that he relates to
labour as alien labour, and appropriates and posits alien labour for
himself. The costs of circulation therefore do not exist in so far as
they _take away the capitalist’s time._ His time is posited as
_superfluous time: not-labour time, not-value-creating time,_ although
it is capital which realizes the created value. The fact that the worker
must work surplus labour time is identical with the fact that the
capitalist does not need to work, and his time is thus posited as
not-labour time; that he does not work the _necessary_ time, either. The
worker must work surplus time in order to be allowed to objectify, to
realize the labour time necessary for his reproduction. On the other
side, therefore, the _capitalist’s necessary labour time_ is _free_
time, not time required for direct subsistence. Since all _free time_ is
time for free development, the capitalist usurps the _free time_ created
by the workers for society, i.e. civilization, and Wade is again correct
in this sense, in so far as he posits capital = civilization. [43]

Circulation time – to the extent that it takes up the time of the
capitalist as such – concerns us here exactly as much as the time he
spends with his mistress. If time is money, then from the standpoint of
capital it is only alien labour time, which is of course in the most
literal sense the capitalist’s money. In regard to capital as such,
circulation time can coincide with labour time only in so far as it
interrupts the time during which capital can appropriate alien labour
time, and it is clear that this relative devaluation of capital cannot
add to its realization, but can only detract from it; or, in so far as
circulation costs capital objectified alien labour time, values. (For
example because it has to pay someone who takes over this function.) In
both cases, circulation time is of interest only in so far as it is the
suspension, the negation of alien labour time; either because it
interrupts capital in the process of its appropriation; or because it
forces it to consume a part of the created value, to consume it in order
to accomplish the operations of circulation, i.e. to posit itself as
capital. (Very much to be distinguished from the private consumption of
the capitalist.) Circulation time is of interest only in its relation –
as barrier, negation – to the production time of capital; this
production time, however, is the time during which it appropriates alien
labour, the alien labour time posited by it. To regard the time the
capitalist spends in circulation as value-creating time or even
surplus-value-creating time is to fall into the greatest confusion.
Capital as such has no labour time apart from its production time. The
capitalist absolutely does not concern us here except as capital. And he
functions as such only in the total process we are examining. Otherwise,
it could still be imagined that the _capitalist draws compensation for
the time during which he does not earn money as another capitalist’s
wage labourer –_ or that he _loses this time._ [Or] that it belongs
together with the costs of production. The time which he employs or
loses as capitalist is _lost time_ altogether, sunk and unrecoverable
from this standpoint. We will later look at the _capitalist’s_ so-called
_labour time_ as distinct from the worker’s labour time, which former is
alleged to form the basis of his _profits,_ as a wage of its own type.

Nothing is more common than to bring transport etc., to the extent that
they are connected with trade, into the pure circulation costs. In so
far as trade brings a product to market, it gives it a new form. True,
all it does is change the location. But the mode of the transformation
does not concern us. It gives the product a new use value (and this
holds right down to and including the retail grocer, who weighs,
measures, wraps the product and thus gives it a form for consumption),
and this new use value costs labour time, is therefore at the same time
exchange value. Bringing to market is part of the production process
itself. The product is a commodity, is in circulation only when it is on
the market.

_Circulation._ Storch. – _Metamorphosis of capital and metamorphosis of the commodity. – Capital’s change of form and of substance. Different forms of capital. – Turnover in a given period. – Circulating capital as general character of capital._ – Year _the measure of turnovers of circulating capital._ Day _the measure of labour time_

<’In every species of industry, the entrepreneurs become sellers of
products, while the entire remainder of the nation and often even other
nations are the buyers of these products … the constant and incessantly
repeated path which _circulating capital_ describes in order to take
leave of the entrepreneur and in order to return to him in the first
form is comparable to a circle; hence the name _circulant_ given to this
capital, and the use of the word circulation for its movement.’ (p.
[404,] 405.) (Storch. _Cours d’économie politique,_ Paris, 1823, Vol. I,
p. 405, Notebook, p. 34.) ‘In the broad sense, circulation includes the
motion of every commodity exchanged.’ (p. 405, loc. cit.) ‘Circulation
proceeds by exchanges … from the instant of [the introduction of]
currency, they [the commodities] are no longer exchanged but sold.’ (p.
406, loc. cit.) ‘For a commodity to be in circulation, it is sufficient
that it be in supply … Wealth in circulation: _commodity.’_ (p. 407,
loc. cit.) ‘Commerce only a part of circulation; the former includes
only merchants’ purchases and sales; the latter, those of all
entrepreneurs and even of all … inhabitants.’ (p. 408, loc. cit.) ‘Only
so long as the _costs_ of circulation are indispensable to allow the
_commodities to reach the consumers_ is circulation real, and does _its
value_ increase the annual product. From the instant when it exceeds
this degree, circulation is artificial and no longer contributes
anything to the wealth of the nation.’ (p. 409.) ‘In recent years we saw
examples of artificial circulation in St Petersburg in Russia. The slack
state of foreign trade had led the merchants to realize their unemployed
capitals in another way; no longer being able to employ them to bring in
foreign commodities and to export domestic ones, they decided to take
advantage of this by buying and reselling the commodities on hand.
Monstrous quantities of sugar, coffee, hemp, iron etc. rapidly passed
from one hand to the other, and a commodity often changed proprietors
twenty times, without leaving the warehouse. This kind of circulation
offers the dealers all manner of speculative opportunities; but while it
enriches some, it ruins the others, and the nation’s wealth gains
nothing thereby. Likewise with the circulation of money … This kind of
artificial circulation, based simply on a variation of prices, is termed
_agiotage.’_ (p. 410, 411.) ‘Circulation brings no profit for society
except in so far as it is indispensable to bring the commodity to the
consumer. Every detour, delay, intermediate exchange which is not
absolutely necessary for this purpose, or which does not contribute _to
diminishing the circulation costs,_ harms the national wealth, by
uselessly raising the prices of commodities.’ (p. 411.) ‘Circulation is
the more productive the more rapid it is; i.e. the less time it requires
to relieve the entrepreneur of the finished product and bring it to
market, and to bring the capital back to him in its first form.’ (p.
411.) ‘The entrepreneur can begin production again only after he has
sold the completed product and has employed the price in purchasing new
materials and new wages: hence, the more promptly circulation acts to
bring about these two effects, the sooner is he in a position to begin
his production anew, and the more profits does his capital bring in a
given period of time.’ (p. 412.) ‘The nation whose capital circulates
with a proper speed, so as to return several times a year to him who set
it into motion, is in the same situation as the labourer of the happy
climates who can raise three or four harvests in succession from the
same soil in one year.’ (p. 412, 413.) ‘A slow circulation makes the
objects of consumption more expensive (1) indirectly, through diminution
of the mass of commodities which can exist; (2) directly because, as
long as a product is in circulation, _its value progressively_ increases
by the interest of capital employed on its production; the slower the
production, the more do these interest charges accumulate, which
uselessly elevates the price of commodities.’ ‘Means for the
abbreviation and acceleration of circulation: (1) the separating-out of
a class of workers occupied exclusively with trade; (2) ease of
transport; (3) currency; (4) credit.’ (p. 413.)>

Simple circulation consisted of a great number of simultaneous or
successive exchanges. Their unity, regarded as circulation, was actually
present only from the observer’s standpoint. (The exchange can be
accidental, and it more or less has this character where it is
restricted to the exchange of the excess product, and has not seized
upon the totality of the production process.) In the circulation of
capital we have a series of exchange operations, acts of exchange, each
of which represents a qualitatively different moment towards the other,
a moment in the reproduction and growth of capital. A system of
exchanges, changes of substance, from the standpoint of value as such.
Changes of form, from the standpoint of use value. The product relates
to the commodity as use value to exchange value; thus the commodity to
money. Here one series attains its peak. Money relates to the commodity
into which it is retransformed as exchange value to use value; even more
so, money to labour.

In so far as capital in every moment of the process is itself the
possibility of going over into its other, next phase, and is thus the
possibility of the whole process, which expresses capital’s act of life,
to that extent each of the moments appears potentially as capital –
hence commodity capital, money capital – along with the value positing
itself in the production process as capital. The commodity can represent
money as long as it can transform itself into money, i.e. can buy wage
labour (surplus labour); this in respect of the _formal side,_ which
emerges from the circulation of capital. On the material, physical side,
it remains capital as long as it consists of raw material (proper or
semi-fabricated), instrument, or necessaries for the workers. Each of
these forms is potential capital. Money is in one respect the realized
capital, capital as realized value. In this respect (regarded as a
terminal point of circulation, where it then has to be regarded as a
point of departure as well), it is capital, ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν. It is then
especially capital again in regard to the part of the production process
in which it exchanges itself for living labour. By contrast, in its
exchange for the commodity (new purchase of raw material etc.) by the
capitalist, it appears not as capital, but as medium of circulation;
merely a vanishing mediation, through which the capitalist exchanges his
product for the latter’s original elements.

Circulation is not merely an external operation for capital. Just as it
only becomes capital through the production process, in that value
immortalizes and increases itself through that process, so does it
become retransformed into the pure _form_ of value – in which the traces
of its becoming, as well as its specific presence in use value, have
been extinguished —only through the first act of circulation; while the
repetition of this act, i.e. the life process [of capital] is made
possible only through the second act of circulation, which consists of
the exchange of money for the conditions of production and forms the
introduction to the act of production. Circulation therefore belongs
_within_ the concept of capital. Just as, originally, money or
stockpiled labour appeared as presupposition _before_ the exchange with
free labour; the seeming independence of the objective moment of capital
towards labour, however, was suspended, and objectified labour, become
independent as value, appeared on all sides as the _product of alien
labour,_ the _alienated product_ of labour itself; so does capital only
now appear as presupposed to its circulation (capital as money was
presupposed to its becoming capital; but capital as the result of value
which has absorbed and assimilated living labour appeared as the point
of departure not of circulation generally, but of the _circulation_ of
capital), so that it would exist independently and indifferently, even
_without_ this process. _However, the movement of the metamorphoses
through which it must pass now appears as a condition of the production
process_ itself; just as much as its result. Capital, in its reality,
therefore appears as a series of turnovers in a given _period._ It is no
longer merely _one turnover,_ one circulation; but rather the positing
of turnovers; positing of the whole process. Its value-positing
therefore appears as conditioned (and value is capital only as
self-immortalizing and self-multiplying value) (1) _qualitatively;_ in
that it cannot renew the production phase without passing through the
phases of circulation; (2) _quantitatively;_ in that the mass of the
values it posits depends on the number of its turnovers in a given
period; (3) in that circulation time appears in both respects as
limiting principle, as barrier of production time, and vice versa.
Capital is therefore essentially _circulating capital._ While in the
workshop of the production process capital appears as proprietor and
master, in respect of circulation it appears as dependent and determined
by social connections, which, from our present standpoint, make it enter
into and figure in simple circulation alternately as C towards M and M
towards C. But this circulation is a haze under which yet another whole
world conceals itself, the world of the interconnections of capital,
which binds this quality originating in circulation – in social
intercourse – to itself, and robs it of the independence of
self-sustaining property, as well as of its character. Two vistas into
this presently still distant world have already opened up, at the two
points at which the circulation of capital pushes the value posited and
circulated by it in the form of the product out of its path, and,
secondly, the point at which it pulls another product out of circulation
into its own orbit; transforms this product itself into one of the
moments of its presence _[Dasein]._ At the second point it presupposes
production; not its own immediate production; at the first point it may
presuppose production, if its product is itself raw material for other
production; or consumption if it has obtained the final form for
consumption. This much is clear, that consumption need not enter into
its circle _directly._ The actual circulation of capital, as we shall
see later, is still circulation between dealers and dealers. The
circulation between dealers and consumers, identical with the retail
trade, is a second circle which does not fall within the immediate
circulation sphere of capital. An orbit which it describes after the
first is described, and simultaneously alongside it. _The simultaneity
of the different orbits of capital,_ like that of its different aspects,
becomes clear only after many capitals are presupposed. Likewise, the
course of human life consists of passing through different ages. But at
the same time all ages exist side by side, distributed among different
individuals.

Considering that the production process of capital is at the same time a
technological process – production process absolutely – namely [the
process] of the production of specific use values through specific
labour, in short, in a manner determined by this aim itself; considering
that the most fundamental of these production processes is that through
which the body reproduces its necessary metabolism, i.e. creates the
necessaries of life in the physiological sense; considering that this
production process coincides with agriculture; and the latter also at
the same time directly (as with cotton, flax etc.) or indirectly,
through the animals it feeds (silk, wool, etc.), furnishes a large part
of the raw materials for industry (actually all except those belonging
to the extractive industries); considering that reproduction in
agriculture in the temperate zone (the home of capital) is bound up with
general terrestrial circulation; i.e. harvests are mostly _annual;_ it
follows that the _year_ (except that it is figured differently for
various productions) has been adopted as the general period of time by
which the sum of the turnovers of capital is calculated and measured;
just as the _natural working day_ provided such a natural unit as
measure of labour time. In the calculation of profit, and even more of
interest, we consequently see the unity of circulation time and
production time – capital – posited as such, and as its own measure.
Capital itself as _in process –_ hence, as accomplishing one turnover –
is regarded as _working capital,_ and the fruits, which it is supposed
to yield, are calculated according to its working time – the total
circulation time of one turnover. The mystification which thereby takes
place lies in the nature of capital.

Fixed _(tied down) capital and circulating capital. – (Surplus. Proudhon. Bastiat.) – Mill. Anderson. Say. Quincey. Ramsay. – Difficulty with interest on interest. – Creating market through trade._ – Fixed and circulating capital. Ricardo. Money and capital. _Eternity of value. – Necessity of rapid or less rapid reproduction._ Sismondi. _Cherbuliez. Storch. – Capital’s advance to labour_

Now, before we go more closely into the above-mentioned considerations,
we want to see what distinctions the economists draw between _fixed
capital_ and _circulating capital._ We have already found, above, a new
moment which enters with the calculation of profit as distinct from
surplus value. Likewise already at this point a new moment has to arise
between profit and interest. Surplus value in connection with
_circulating capital_ obviously appears as profit, in distinction to
_interest_ as the surplus value in connection with _fixed capital._
Profit and interest are both forms of the surplus value. Profit
contained in the _price._ Hence, profit comes to an end and is realized
as soon as capital has come to the point of its circulation where it is
retransformed into money or passes from its form as commodity into the
form of money. The striking ignorance on which Proudhon’s polemic
against interest rests, later. (Here one more time, so as not to forget,
in regard to Proudhon: the surplus value which causes all Ricardians and
anti-Ricardians so much worry is solved by this fearless thinker simply
by mystifying it, ‘all work leaves a surplus’, ‘I posit it as an axiom …
‘ [44] The actual formulation to be looked up in the notebook. The fact
that _work goes on beyond_ necessary labour is transformed by Proudhon
into a mystical quality of labour. This not to be explained by the mere
growth of the productive force of labour; this may increase the products
of a given labour time; but it cannot give a surplus value. It enters
only in so far as it liberates surplus time, time for labour beyond the
necessary. The only _extra-economic_ fact in this is that the human
being does not need his entire time for the production of the
necessaries, that he has free time at his disposal above and beyond the
labour time necessary for subsistence, and hence can also employ it for
surplus labour. But this is in no way something mystical, since his
necessaries are small to the same degree that his labour power is in a
primitive state. But wage labour as such enters only where the
development of the productive force has already advanced so far that a
significant amount of time has become free; this liberation is here
already a historic product. Proudhon’s ignorance only equalled by
Bastiat’s decreasing rate of profit which is supposed to be the
equivalent of a rising rate of wages. [45] Bastiat expresses this
nonsense, borrowed from Carey, in a double way: first, the _rate_ of
profit falls (i.e. the proportion of surplus value in relation to the
employed capital); secondly: prices decline, but value, i.e. the total
sum of prices, rises, which is only another way of saying that the gross
profit rises, not the rate of profit.)

Firstly, in the sense used by us above, of _fixated_ capital, John St.
Mill _(Essays on some Unsettled Questions of Political Econ.,_ Lond.,
1844, p. 55), [speaks of it] as tied-down, not disposable, not available
capital. Stuck in one phase of its total circulation process. In this
sense he says correctly, like Bailey in the above quotations, that a
great part of the capital of a nation always lies idle.

‘The difference between fixed and circulating capital is more apparent
than real; e.g. gold is fixed capital; floating only in so far as it is
consumed for gilding etc. Ships are fixed capital, although literally
floating. Foreign railway shares are articles of commerce in our
markets; so may our railways be in the markets of the world; and so far
they are floating capital, on a par with gold.’ (Anderson, _The Recent
Commercial Distress etc.,_ London, 1847, p. 4.) (Notebook I, 27.) [46]

According to Say: capital ‘so much involved in one _kind of production_
that it can no longer be diverted from it to be devoted to _another kind
of production’._ [47] The identification of capital with a specific use
value, use value for the production process. This quality of capital,
_being tied down_ as value to a particular use value – use value within
production – is, however, an important aspect. This expresses more than
the inability to circulate, which actually only says that fixed capital
is the opposite of circulating capital.

In his _Logic of Political Economy_ (p. 114) (Notebook X, 4), de Quincey
says: _‘Circulating capital,_ in its normal idea, means _any agent
whatever’_ (beautiful logician) ‘used productively which perishes in the
very act of being used.’ (According to this, coal would be _circulating
capital,_ and _oil,_ but not cotton etc. It cannot be said that cotton
perishes by being transformed into twist or calico, and such
transformation certainly means using it productively); ‘capital is
_fixed_ when the thing serves repeatedly always for the same operation,
and by how much larger has been the range of iterations, by so much more
intensely is the _tool, engine,_ or _machinery_ entitled to the
denomination of fixed.’ (p. 114.) (Notebook X, 4.) According to this,
the circulating capital would die out, be consumed in the act of
production; the fixed capital – which, for greater clarity, is
characterized as _tool, engine,_ or _machinery_ (thus improvements
incorporated in the soil are, for instance, excluded) – would serve
repeatedly, always for the same operation. The distinction here concerns
only technological differences in the act of production, not in the
least the form-relation; circulating and fixed capital, in the
differences here indicated, do have distinguishing features by means of
which one particular agent is fixed and the other circulating, but
neither of them any qualification which would entitle it to the
_‘denomination’_ of _capital._

According to Ramsay (IX, 84) [48] only ‘the _approvisionnement_ is
_circulating capital,_ because the capitalist must part with it
immediately, and it _does not enter into the reproduction process at
all,_ but is rather exchanged directly for living labour, for
consumption. All other capital (including raw material) remains in the
possession of its owner or employer until the _produce is completed.’_
(loc. cit. p. 21.) _‘Circulating capital_ consists only of subsistence
and other necessaries advanced to the workman, previous to the
completion of the produce of his labour.’ (loc. cit. p. 23.) In regard
to _approvisionnement_ he is correct in so far as it is the only part of
capital which circulates during the production phase itself, and which
is in this respect circulating capital _par excellence._ In another
respect it is false to say that fixed capital remains in the possession
of its owner or employer ‘until the produce is completed’ and no longer
than that. He consequently also later explains fixed capital as ‘any
portion of that labour (bestowed upon any commodity) _in a form_ in
which, though assisting to raise the future commodity, it does not
_maintain labour’._ (But how many commodities do not maintain labour!
I.e. do not belong among the workers’ articles of consumption. These,
according to Ramsay, are all _fixed capital.)_

(If the interest on £100 at the end of the first year or of the first 3
months is £5, then the capital at the end of the first year 105 or 100(1
+ 0.05); at the end of the 4th year = 100(1 + 0.05)⁴ = £121. £55/100 and
£1/1600 = £121 11s. 3/20 farthing or £121 11s. 0.15 farthing. Hence £1
11s. 3/20 farthing more than 20.)

(In the question posed above, assume that a first capital of 400 turns
over only once a year, a second [capital of 100,] 4 times, both at 5%.
In the first case the capital would make 5% once a year, = 20 on 400; in
the second case 4 × 5%, likewise = 20 per year on 100. The velocity of
turnover would substitute for the size of the capital; just as in simple
money circulation 100,000 thalers which circulate 3 times a year =
300,000, while 3,000 which circulate 100 times = 300,000 also. But if
the capital circulates 4 times a year, then it is _possible_ that the
surplus gain itself is ploughed into the capital for the second
turnover, and turned over with it, producing thereby the difference of
£1 11s. 0.15 farthing. But this difference in no way follows from the
presupposition. All that is there is the _abstract_ possibility. What
would follow, rather, from the presupposition is that 3 months are
required for the turnover of a capital of £100. E.g. therefore, if the
month = 30 days, then for £105 – with the same turnover relation, with
the same relation between the turnover time and the size of the capital
– not 3 months are required, * but rather 105:_x_ = 100:90; _x_ = (90 ×
105)/100 = 9450/100 = 94 5/10 days = 3 months, 4 1/2 days. With that,
the first difficulty is completely solved.)

* Otherwise it could also be assumed, alternatively, that, if the
production process is continuous, the obtained surplus is re-transformed
into capital every 3 months.

(From the fact that a larger capital with a slower turnover does not
create more surplus value than a smaller with a relatively more rapid
turnover, it does not in the least automatically follow that a smaller
capital turns over more rapidly than a larger. This is indeed the case
in so far as the larger capital consists of more fixed capital and in so
far as it has to search out more distant markets. The size of the market
and the velocity of turnover are not necessarily inversely related. This
occurs only as soon as the present, physical market is not the economic
market; i.e. as the economic market becomes more and more distant from
the place of production. To the extent, by the way, that [this relation]
does not arise purely from the distinction between fixed and circulating
capital, the moments which determine the circulation of different
capitals cannot be at all developed yet here. An incidental remark: to
the extent that trade posits new points of circulation, i.e. brings
different countries into intercourse, discovers new markets etc., this
is something entirely different from the mere costs of circulation
required to carry out a given mass of exchange operations; it is the
positing not of the operations of exchange, but of the exchange itself.
Creation of markets. This point will have to be examined in particular
before we have done with circulation.)

Now let us continue with our review of the opinions about ‘fixed’ and
‘circulating capital’. ‘Depending on whether _capital_ is more or less
_transitory,_ hence _must be more or less frequently reproduced in a
given time,_ it is called _circulating or fixed capital._ Furthermore,
capital circulates or returns to its employer in _very_ unequal times;
e.g. wheat which the farmer buys to sow is _relatively fixed_ capital
compared to the wheat a baker buys to make bread.’ (Ricardo VIII, 19.)
Then he remarks also: ‘Different _proportions of fixed capital and
circulating capital_ in different trades; different _durability of fixed
capital_ itself.’ (Ricardo, loc. cit.) [49] ‘Two kinds of commerce can
employ a capital of equal value, but which may be divided in a very
different way as regards the fixed part and the circulating part. They
may even employ an equal value of fixed capital and circulating capital,
but the durability of the fixed capital may be very unequal. For
example, one a steam engine of £10,000, the other, ships.’ (This out of
Say’s translation of Ricardo, Vol. I, p. 29, 30.) The error from the
outset is that, according to Ricardo, capital is supposed to be _‘more
or less transitory’._ Capital as capital – _value –_ is not transitory.
But the use value in which the value is fixated, in which it exists, is
‘more or less transitory’, and must therefore be _‘more or less
frequently reproduced_ in a _given time’._ The difference between fixed
capital and circulating capital is therefore reduced here to the
_greater or lesser necessity for reproducing the given capital in a
given time._ This is one distinction made by Ricardo. The other
distinction concerns the different _degrees of durability,_ or
_different degrees of fixed capital,_ i.e. _different degrees, relative
durability of the relatively fixed._ So that fixed capital is itself
more or less fixed. _The same capital_ appears in the same business in
the two different forms, the _particular modes of existence_ of _fixed
and circulating,_ hence exists doubly. To be fixed or circulating
appears as a _particular_ aspect of capital apart from that of being
capital. It must, however, proceed to this particularization. Finally,
as for the third distinction, ‘that capital circulates or returns in
very _unequal times’,_ what Ricardo means by this, as his example of the
baker and the farmer shows, is nothing more than the difference in the
time during which capital is _fixed, tied up_ in the _production phase_
as distinct from the circulation phase, in different branches of
business. Hence, _fixed capital_ occurs here in the same way as we had
it previously, as being fixated in each phase; except that the
specifically longer or shorter fixation in the production phase, this
phase in particular, is regarded as a peculiarity, particularity of
capital [as value-] positing. Money attempted to posit itself as
_imperishable value,_ as eternal value, by relating negatively towards
circulation, i.e. towards the exchange with real wealth, with transitory
commodities, which, as Petty describes very prettily and very naïvely,
dissolve in fleeting pleasures. [50] Capital posits the permanence of
value (to a certain degree) by incarnating itself in fleeting
commodities and taking on their form, but at the same time changing them
just as constantly; alternates between its eternal form in money and its
passing form in commodities; permanence is posited as the only thing it
can be, a passing passage – process – life. But capital obtains this
ability only by constantly sucking in living labour as its soul,
vampire-like. The permanence – the duration of value in its form as
capital – is posited only through reproduction, which is itself double,
reproduction as commodity, reproduction as money, and unity of both
these reproduction processes. In its reproduction as commodity, capital
is fixated in a particular form of use value, and is thus not _general
exchange value,_ even less realized _value,_ as it is supposed to be.
The fact that it has posited itself as such in the act of reproduction,
the production phase, is proved only through circulation. The greater or
lesser perishability of the commodity in which value exists requires a
slower or faster reproduction; i.e. repetition of the labour process.
The _particular nature of use value,_ in which the value exists, or
which now appears as capital’s body, here appears as itself a
_determinant_ of the _form_ and of the action of capital; as giving one
capital a particular property as against another; as particularizing it.
As we have already seen in several instances, nothing is therefore more
erroneous than to assert [51] that the distinction between use value and
exchange value, which falls outside the characteristic economic form in
simple circulation, to the extent that it is _realized_ there, falls
outside it in general. We found, rather, that in the different stages of
the development of economic relations, exchange value and use value were
determined in different relations, and that this determination itself
appeared as a different determination of value as such. Use value itself
plays a role as an economic category. Where it plays this role is given
by the development itself. Ricardo, e.g., who believes that the
bourgeois economy deals only with exchange value, and is concerned with
use value only exoterically, derives the most important determinations
of exchange value precisely from use value, from the relation between
the two of them: for instance, _ground rent, wage minimum, distinction
between fixed capital and circulating capital,_ to which he imputes
precisely the most significant influence on the determination of prices
(through the different reaction produced upon them by a rise or fall in
the rate of wages); likewise in the relation of demand and supply etc.
One and the same relation appears sometimes in the form of use value and
sometimes in that of exchange value, but at different stages and with a
different meaning. To use is to consume, whether for production or
consumption. Exchange is the mediation of this act through a social
process. Use can be posited as, and be, a mere consequence of exchange;
then again, exchange can appear as merely a moment of use, etc. From the
standpoint of capital (in circulation), exchange appears as the positing
of its use value, while on the other side its use (in the act of
production) appears as positing for exchange, as positing its exchange
value. Likewise with production and consumption. In the bourgeois
economy (as in every economy), they are posited in specific distinctions
and specific unities. The point is to understand precisely these
specific, distinguishing characteristics. Nothing is accomplished by the
[assertions of] Mr Proudhon or of the social sentimentalists that they
are _the same._

The good thing in Ricardo’s explanation is that it begins by emphasizing
the moment of the necessity of _quicker or slower reproduction;_ hence
that the greater or lesser durability – consumption (in the sense of
self-consumption), slower or more rapid – is regarded in connection with
_capital_ itself. Hence a relation of use value for _capital_ itself.
Sismondi by contrast immediately introduces a determinant initially
exoteric to capital; _direct or indirect human consumption:_ whether the
article is a direct or an indirect necessary of life for the human
consumer; he thereby joins this with the _quicker or slower consumption
of the object itself._ The objects which serve directly as necessaries
of life are more perishable, because designed to perish, than those
which help to produce the necessaries of life. With the latter, their
duration is their character; their transitoriness – fate. He says:
‘Fixed, indirect capital is _slowly consumed,_ in order to assist in
consuming that which man destines for his use; circulating capital does
not cease to be directly applied to the use of man … Whenever a thing is
consumed, it _never returns_ for him who consumes it; while a thing
consumed for reproduction is there for him at the same time.’ (Sismondi
VI.) He also presents the relation in such a way that: ‘the _first
transformation_ of annual consumption into durable foundations, suitable
for _increasing the productive powers of future labour – fixed capital;_
this first labour always accomplished by labour, represented by a wage,
exchanged for necessaries which the worker consumes during labour.
_Fixed capital is consumed slowly’_ (i.e. is slowly worn out). _Second
transformation: ‘Circulating capital_ consists of _labour-seeds_ (raw
material) and of the _worker’s consumption.’_ (loc. cit.) [52] This is
more concerned with the origin. Firstly the _transformation,_ that fixed
capital is itself only circulating capital which has assumed a
stationary form, _fixated_ circulating capital; second, the
_destination:_ the one destined to be consumed as means of production,
the other as product; or the different mode of its _consumption,_
determined by its role among the conditions of production in the
production process. Cherbuliez simplifies the matter to the point where
circulating capital is the _consumable, fixed capital_ the not
consumable part of capital. [53] (One you can eat, the other not. A very
easy method of taking the thing.) In a quotation already given above
[54] (29 in the Notebook), Storch vindicates for circulating capital
generally the circulating nature of capital. He contradicts himself by
saying: ‘all fixed capital comes originally from a circulating capital,
and needs continually to be maintained at the latter’s expense’ (hence
comes out of circulation, or is itself circulating in its first moment
and constantly renews itself _through_ circulation; thus although _it_
does not go _into circulation,_ circulation goes into _it)._ As for what
Storch adds further: ‘NO _fixed capital can give a revenue_ EXCEPT _by
means of a circulating capital’_ (26a. Notebook), [55] we shall return
to that later.

<’Reproductive consumption is not properly an expense, but only an
_advance,_ because it is reimbursed to its agent’; p. 54 in Storch’s
polemic against Say [56] (p. 5b. _Second_ notebook on Storch). (The
capitalist gives the worker a part of the latter’s own surplus labour in
the form of _advance,_ as something for which he must reimburse the
capitalist not merely with an equivalent, but with surplus labour as
well.)>

(The formula for _computing compound interest_ is: _S =_ c(1 +
_i_)_^(n)_. (S, the total magnitude of capital _c_ after _n_ years at an
interest rate _i_.)

The formula for _computing an annuity_ is:

+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
|                                   | c(1 + _i_)^(_n_)                  |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| _x_ (the annuity) =               | -------------------------------   |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
|                                   | 1 + (1 + _i_) + (1 + _i_)² + (1 + |
|                                   | _i_)^(_n_\ −\ 1)                  |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+

_Constant and variable capital_

We divided capital above into _constant_ and _variable value;_ this is
always correct as regards capital within the production phase, i.e. in
its immediate realization process. How it is that capital itself, as
presupposed value, can change its value as its reproduction costs rise
or fall, or as a consequence of a decline in props also etc., evidently
belongs to the section where capital is regarded as real capital, as the
interaction of many capitals on one another, not here in its general
concept.

Competition

<Because competition appears historically as the dissolution of
compulsory guild membership, government regulation, internal tariffs and
the like within a country, as the lifting of blockades, prohibitions,
protection on the world market – because it appears historically, in
short, as the negation of the limits and barriers peculiar to the stages
of production preceding capital; because it was quite correctly, from
the historical standpoint, designated and promoted by the Physiocrats as
_laissez faire, laissez passer;_ it has [therefore] never been examined
even for this merely negative side, this, its merely historical side,
and this has led at the same time to the even greater absurdity of
regarding it as the collision of unfettered individuals who are
determined only by their own interests – as the mutual repulsion and
attraction of free individuals, and hence as the absolute mode of
existence of free individuality in the sphere of consumption and of
exchange. Nothing can be more mistaken. While free competition has
dissolved the barriers of earlier relations and modes of production, it
is necessary to observe first of all that the things which were a
barrier to it were the inherent limits of earlier modes of production,
within which they spontaneously developed and moved. These limits became
barriers only after the forces of production and the relations of
intercourse had developed sufficiently to enable capital as such to
emerge as the dominant principle of production. The limits which it tore
down were barriers to its motion, its development and realization. It is
by no means the case that it thereby suspended all limits, nor all
barriers, but rather only the limits not corresponding to it, which were
barriers to it. Within its own limits – however much they may appear as
barriers from a higher standpoint, and are posited as such by its own
historic development – it feels free, and free of barriers, i.e. as
limited only by itself, only by its own conditions of life. Exactly as
guild industry, in its heyday, found in the guild organization all the
fullness of freedom it required, i.e. the relations of production
corresponding to it. After all, it posited these out of itself, and
developed them as _its_ inherent conditions, and hence in no way as
external and constricting barriers. The historical side of the negation
of the guild system etc. by capital through free competition signifies
nothing more than that capital, having become sufficiently strong, by
means of the mode of intercourse adequate to itself, tore down the
historic barriers which hindered and blocked the movement adequate to
it. But competition is very far from having only this historic
significance, or merely being _this negative_ force. _Free competition_
is the relation of capital to itself as another capital, i.e. the real
conduct of capital as capital. The inner laws of capital – which appear
merely as tendencies in the preliminary historic stages of its
development – are for the first time posited as laws; production founded
on capital for the first time posits itself in the forms adequate to it
only in so far as and to the extent that free competition develops, for
it is the free development of the mode of production founded on capital;
the free development of its conditions and of itself as the process
which constantly reproduces these conditions. It is not individuals who
are set free by free competition; it is, rather, capital which is set
free. As long as production resting on capital is the necessary, hence
the fittest form for the development of the force of social production,
the movement of individuals within the pure conditions of capital
appears as their freedom; which is then also again dogmatically
propounded as such through constant reflection back on the barriers torn
down by free competition. Free competition is the real development of
capital. By its means, what corresponds to the nature of capital is
posited as external necessity for the individual capital; what
corresponds to the concept of capital, is posited as external necessity
for the mode of production founded on capital. The reciprocal compulsion
which the capitals within it practice upon one another, on labour etc.
(the competition among workers is only another form of the competition
among capitals), is the _free,_ at the same time the _real_ development
of wealth as capital. So much is this the case that the most profound
economic thinkers, such as e.g. Ricardo, _presuppose_ the absolute
predominance of free competition [57] in order to be able to study and
to formulate the adequate laws of capital – which appear at the same
time as the vital tendencies governing over it. But free competition is
the adequate form of the productive process of capital. The further it
is developed, the purer the forms in which its motion appear. What
Ricardo has thereby admitted, despite himself, is the _historic nature_
of capital, and the limited character of free competition, which is just
the free movement of capitals and nothing else, i.e. their movement
within conditions which belong to no previous, dissolved stages, but are
its own conditions. The predominance of capital is the presupposition of
free competition, just as the despotism of the Roman Caesars was the
presupposition of the free Roman ‘private law’. As long as capital is
weak, it still itself relies on the crutches of past modes of
production, or of those which will pass with its rise. As soon as it
feels strong, it throws away the crutches, and moves in accordance with
its own laws. As soon as it begins to sense itself and become conscious
of itself as a barrier to development, it seeks refuge in forms which,
by restricting free competition, seem to make the rule of capital more
perfect, but are at the same time the heralds of its dissolution and of
the dissolution of the mode of production resting on it. Competition
merely _expresses_ as real, posits as an external necessity, that which
lies within the nature of capital; competition is nothing more than the
way in which the many capitals force the inherent determinants of
capital upon one another and upon themselves. Hence not a single
category of the bourgeois economy, not even the most basic, e.g. the
determination of value, becomes real through free competition alone;
i.e. through the real process of capital, which appears as the
interaction of capitals and of all other relations of production and
intercourse determined by capital. Hence, on the other side, the
insipidity of the view that free competition is the ultimate development
of human freedom; and that the negation of free competition = negation
of individual freedom and of social production founded on individual
freedom. It is nothing more than free development on a limited basis –
the basis of the rule of capital. This kind of individual freedom is
therefore at the same time the most complete suspension of all
individual freedom, and the most complete subjugation of individuality
under social conditions which assume the form of objective powers, even
of overpowering objects – of things independent of the relations among
individuals themselves. The analysis of what free competition really is,
is the only rational reply to the middle-class [58] prophets who laud it
to the skies or to the socialists who damn it to hell. The statement
that, within free competition, the individuals, in following purely
their private interest, realize the communal or rather the _general_
interest means nothing other than that they collide with one another
under the conditions of capitalist production, and hence that the impact
between them is itself nothing more than the recreation of the
conditions under which this interaction takes place. By the way, when
the illusion about competition as the so-called absolute form of free
individuality vanishes, this is evidence that the conditions of
competition, i.e. of production founded on capital, are already felt and
thought of as _barriers,_ and hence already _are_ such, and more and
more become such. The assertion that free competition = the ultimate
form of the development of the forces of production and hence of human
freedom means nothing other than that middle-class rule is the
culmination of world history – certainly an agreeable thought for the
parvenus of the day before yesterday.>

 

_Surplus value. Production time. Circulation time._ Turnover _time_

<Before we go further with the review of opinions about fixed capital
and circulating capital, we return for a moment to something developed
earlier.

We assume for the time being that production time and labour time
coincide. The case where interruptions take place within the production
phase itself, owing to the technological process, will be looked at
later.

Suppose the production phase of a capital equal to 60 working days; of
which 40 are necessary labour time. Then, according to the law developed
earlier, the surplus value, or the value newly posited by capital, i.e.
appropriated alien labour time = 60 − 40; = 20. Let us call this surplus
value (=20) _S;_ the production phase – or the labour time employed in
production – _p._ In a period of time which we shall call _T –_ e.g. 360
days – the total value can never be greater than the number of
production phases contained in, say, 360. The highest coefficient of _S
–_ i.e. the maximum of surplus value which capital can create on the
given presuppositions – equals the number of times the creation of _S_
is repeated in 360 days. The outer limit of this reproduction – the
reproduction of capital, or rather, now, the reproduction of its
production process – is determined by the relation of the production
period to the total period of time in which the former can be repeated.
If the given period = 360 days, and the duration of production = 60
days, then 360/60, or _T/p_, i.e. 6, is the coefficient indicating how
many times _p_ is contained in _T,_ or how often, given its own inherent
limits, the reproduction process of the capital can be repeated within
360 days. It goes without saying that the maximum of the creation of
_S,_ i.e. the positing of surplus value, is given by the number of
processes in which _S_ can be produced, in a given period of time. This
relation is expressed by _T/p_. The quotient of _T/p_, or _q,_ is the
highest coefficient of _S_ in the period of 360 days, in _T_ generally.
_ST/p_ or _Sq_ is the maximum of value. If _T/p_ = _q,_ then _T = pq;_
i.e. the entire duration of _T_ would be production time; the production
phase, _p,_ would be repeated as often as it is contained in _T._ The
total value created by capital in a certain time would be = to the
surplus labour it appropriates in one production phase, multiplied by
the number of times this production phase is contained in the given
time. Thus in the above example, = 20 × 360/60 = 20 × 6 = 120 days. _q,_
i.e. _T/p_, would express the number of _turnovers_ of the capital; but
since _T = pq,_ therefore _p = T/q_; i.e. the duration of one production
phase would be equal to the total time divided by the number of
turnovers. Thus one production phase of capital would be equal to one of
its turnovers. Turnover time and production time would be completely
identical; the number of turnovers therefore [would be] exclusively
determined by the relation of one production phase to the total time.

However, on this assumption, circulation time is posited as = 0. Yet
circulation time has a definite magnitude, which can never become = 0.
Now assume additionally that there are 30 days for circulation for every
60 days of production time; call this circulation time added to _p, c._
In this case, one turnover of capital, i.e. the total time it requires
before it can repeat the realization process – the positing of surplus
value – would be = 30 + 60 = 90 days (= _p + c_) (1_R_ (turnover) = _p_
+ _c_). One turnover of 90 days can be repeated in 360 days only 360/90
times, i.e. 4 times. The surplus value of 20 could therefore be posited
only 4 times; 20 × 4 = 80. In 60 days the capital produces 20 surplus
days; but it has to circulate for 30 days; i.e. during these 30 days it
can posit no surplus labour, no surplus value. This is the same for it
(as regards the result) as if it had posited a surplus value of only 20
in the period of 90 days. While previously the number of turnovers was
determined by _T/p_, it is now determined by _T/(p + c)_ or _T/R_; the
maximum of value was _ST/(p + c)_; (20 × (300/(60 + 30)) = 20 × (360/90)
= 20 × 4 = 80). The number of turnovers hence = the total time divided
by the sum of production time and circulation time, and the total value
= _S_ multiplied by the number of turnovers. But this formulation does
not yet suffice for us to express the relations of surplus value,
production time and circulation time.

The maximum of value creation contained in the formula _ST/p_; value
creation restricted by circulation, _ST/(p + c)_ (or _ST/R_); when we
subtract the second amount from the first, then

  ------ --- --------- ---
  _ST_   −   _ ST _    =
  _p_        _p + c_    
  ------ --- --------- ---

  ------------------- --- ------------------- --- ------------
  _ST(p + c) − STp_   =   _STp + STc − STp_   =   _ STc _
  _p(p +c)_               _p(p + c)_              _p(p + c)_
  ------------------- --- ------------------- --- ------------

 As difference we then obtain _STc_ / _p(p + c)_ or _ST/p_ × _c/(p +
c_); _ST/(p + c)_ or _S_′, as we may call this value in the second form,
_S_′ = _ST/p_ − (_ST/p_ × _c/(p + c_)). But before we develop this
formula further, there are still others to be introduced.

If we call the quotient of _T/(p + c)_ _q′_, then _q′_ expresses the
number of times _R_ = (_p + c_) is contained in _T_, the number of
turnovers. _T/(p + c)_ = _q′_ ; hence _T = pq′ + cq′._  _pq′_ then
expresses the total production time and _cq′_ the total circulation
time.

Let us call total circulation time _C_ (hence _cq′_ = _C_). (_T_(360) =
4 × 60 (240) + 4 × 30 (120).) With our presupposition, _q′_ = 4, _C =
cq′ =_ 4_c_; 4 being = to the number of turnovers. We saw previously
that the maximum of value-creation = _ST/p_; but in this case _T_ was
posited as = to production time. But the real production time is now _T
− q_; as indeed follows from the equation. _T = pq′_ (total production
time) + _cq′_ (total circulation time, or _C_ ). Hence _T − C_ = _cq′_.
Hence _S(T − C)_ / _p_ the maximum value creation. Because production
time not 360 days, but 360 − _cq′_, i.e. – 4 × 30 [=] 120; hence 20((360
− 120)/60); (20 × 240)/60 = 80.

Now, finally, as regards the formula

_S′ = ST/p − (ST/p × c/(c + p)) =_ (360 × 20)/60 − 20(360/60 × 30/(30 +
60))

= 120 − (120 × 30/90) = 6 × 20 − (6 × 20 × 3/9)

= 20 × 6 − (20 × 6 × 1/3) or

= 120 − (120 × 1/3) = 120 − 40 = 80,

it signifies that value is equal to the maximum of value, i.e. to value
determined only by the relation of production time to total time, minus
the number which expresses how often the circulation time is contained
in this maximum, plus _c/(c + p) = c/R; c/R_ expresses the relation of
circulation time to one turnover of capital. If we multiply numerator
and denominator by _q′_ then _cq′ / (c + p)q′ = C/T; c/(c + p) =_ 30/(30
+ 60) = 1/3. _c/(c + p)_ or 1/3 expresses the relation of circulation
time to total time, for 360/3 = 120. The turnover _(c + p)_ is contained
in _C, c/(c + p)_ or 1/3 times (or _c/T_ times), and this number is the
maximum itself multiplied by the number of times a turnover is contained
in _c_, in the circulation time added to one turnover, or divided by the
number which expresses how often _c_ is contained in _c + p_ or _C_ in
_T._ If _c_ = 0, then _S′_ would be _ST/p_ and would be at its maximum.
_S′_ becomes smaller in the same degree as _C_ grows, is inversely
related to it, for the factor _c/(c + p)_ and _ST/p_ grows to the same
degree. The number to be subtracted [from] the maximum value, _ST/p ×
c/(c + p)_ or _ST/p × c/R._

We have, then, the three equations: (1) _S′ = ST/(p + c) = ST/R_; (2)
_S′ = S(T − C) / p_; (3) _S′ = ST/p − (ST/p × c/(c + p)) = S_[_T/p −
(T/p × c_/(_c + p_))].

Hence: _S:S′ = ST/p: S(T − C) / p;_ or _S:S′ = T:(T − C)._ The maximum
of value is to the real value as a given period of time is to this
period of time minus total circulation time. Or, as well, _S:S′ =
pq′:(pq′ − q′c),_ i.e. = _p:(p − c)._

On (3) _S′ = ST/p − (ST/p × c/(c + p)) = S_[_T/p − (T/p × c/(c + p_))]
or, since _T/p = q,_

_S′ = S (q − q ⋅ c/(c + p)) = S(q − qc/R)_. The total surplus value,
therefore, = to the surplus value posited in one production phase, whose
coefficient is the number of times the production time is contained in
the total time minus the number of times the circulation time of one
turnover is contained in this latter number.

_S(q − qc/R) = Sq(1 − 1c/R) = Sq((R − c)/R) = Sqp/R = ST/(p + c)_, which
is the first equation. Thus equation 3 means … _equation_ 1_:_ the total
surplus value equals the surplus value of one production phase
multiplied by the total time, divided by turnover time or multiplied by
the number of times the sum of production time and circulation time is
contained in total time.

_Equation_ 2: The total value equals surplus value multiplied by total
time minus the total circulation time, divided by the duration of one
production phase.>

Competition

(The fundamental law in competition, as distinct from that advanced
about value and surplus value, is that it is determined not by the
labour contained in it, or by the labour time in which it is produced,
but rather by the labour time in which it can be produced, or, the
labour time necessary for reproduction. By this means, the individual
capital is in reality only placed within the conditions of capital as
such, although it seems as if the original law were overturned.
_Necessary_ labour time as determined by the movement of capital itself;
but only in this way is it posited. This is the fundamental law of
competition. Demand, supply, price (production costs) are further
specific forms; price as market price; or general price. Then the
positing of a general rate of profit. As a consequence of the market
price, the capitals then distribute themselves among different branches.
Reduction of production costs etc. In short, here all determinants
appear in a position which is the _inverse_ of their position in capital
in general. There price determined by labour, here labour determined by
price etc. etc. The influence of individual capitals on one another has
the effect precisely that they must conduct themselves as _capital_; the
seemingly independent influence of the individuals, and their chaotic
collisions, are precisely the positing of their general law. Market here
obtains yet another significance. The influence of capitals as
individuals on each other thus becomes precisely their positing as
general beings, and the suspension of the seeming independence and
independent survival of the individuals. This suspension takes place
even more in credit. And the most extreme form to which the suspension
proceeds, which is however at the same time the _ultimate positing_ of
capital in the form adequate to it – is joint-stock capital.) (Demand,
supply, price, production costs, contradiction of profit and interest,
different relations of exchange value and use value, consumption and
production.)

_Surplus value. Production time. Circulation time._ Turnover time. _Part of capital in production time, part in circulation time. – Circulation time. – Surplus value and production phase. Number of reproductions of capital = number of turnovers. – Total surplus value etc._

We have seen, then, that the surplus value a capital can posit in a
given period of time is determined by the number of times the
realization process can be repeated, or the capital can be reproduced in
a given period of time; and that the number of these reproductions is
determined by the relation of the duration of the production phase not
to the total period of time, but rather to this total time minus
circulation time. Circulation time thus appears as time during which the
ability of capital to reproduce itself, and hence to reproduce surplus
value, is suspended. Its productivity – i.e. its creation of surplus
values – is therefore inversely related to circulation time, and would
reach its maximum if the latter declined to 0. Circulation is an
inescapable condition for capital, a condition posited by its own
nature, since circulation is the passing of capital through the various
conceptually determined moments of its necessary metamorphosis – its
life process. In so far as it costs time for capital to run through this
course, in this time capital cannot _increase_ its value, because it is
not-production time, time in which it does _not_ appropriate living
labour. Hence this circulation time can never increase the value created
by capital, but can only posit _not-value-positing_ time, hence appear
as barrier to the increase of value, in the same relation as it stands
towards labour time. This circulation time cannot be counted as part of
value-creating time, for the latter is labour time which objectifies
itself in value, and nothing else. It does not belong to the production
costs of value, nor to the production costs of capital; but it is a
condition which makes its self-reproduction more difficult. The
obstacles which capital encounters in the path of its realization – i.e.
its appropriation of living labour – do not, of course, form a moment of
its realization, of its value-creation. Hence it is ridiculous to take
_production_ _costs_ here in the original sense. Or we have to
distinguish production costs as a particular form from the labour time
which objectifies itself in value (as we must distinguish profit from
surplus value). But even then, circulation time does not belong among
capital’s production costs in the same sense as wages etc.; but rather
it is an item which comes into consideration as part of the capitalists’
settling of accounts with one another, because they distribute the
surplus value among themselves according to certain general proportions.
Circulation time is not time during which capital creates value, but
rather during which it realizes the value created in the production
process. It does not increase its quantity, but rather transposes it
into another form, from the form of product into that of commodity, from
commodity to that of money etc.; the fact that the price which
previously existed ideally in the commodity is now really posited, that
it is now really exchanged for its price – money – does not, of course,
increase this price. Thus circulation time appears as time which does
not determine the price; and the number of turnovers, in so far as it is
determined by circulation time, appears not in such a way that capital
brings in a new value-determining element, an element proper to it, _sui
generis_, as distinct from labour; but rather as a limiting, negative
principle. The necessary tendency of capital is therefore _circulation
without circulation time,_ and this tendency is the fundamental
determinant of credit and of capital’s credit contrivances. At the same
time, credit is then also a form in which capital tries to posit itself
as distinct from the individual capitals, or the individual capital
[tries to posit] itself as capital as distinct from its quantitative
barrier. But the highest result it achieves in this line is, on one
side, _fictitious capital;_ on the other side, credit only appears as a
new element of _concentration_, of the destruction of capitals by
individual, centralizing capitals. Circulation time is in one respect
objectified in _money_. Attempt by credit to posit money as a merely
formal moment; so that it mediates the formal transformation without
itself being _capital_, i.e. value. This is one form, of circulation
without circulation time. Money is itself a product of circulation. It
will be shown how capital, in credit, creates new products of
circulation. But if the striving of capital in one direction is
_circulation without circulation time_, it strives in the other
direction to give _circulation time value_, the value of _production
time,_ in the various organs which mediate the process of circulation
time and of circulation; to posit them all as money, and, more broadly,
as capital. This is another side of credit. All this springs from the
same source. All the requirements of circulation, money, transformation
of commodity into money, transformation of money into commodity etc. –
although they take on different and seemingly quite heterogeneous forms,
are all derived from _circulation time_. The machinery for abbreviating
it is itself a part of it. _Circulation time_ is that part of capital
which may be regarded as the time it takes to perform its specific
motion as capital, as distinct from production time, in which it
reproduces itself; and in which it lives not as finished capital which
must merely pass through formal metamorphoses, but as
capital-in-process, creative capital, sucking its living soul out of
labour.

The contradiction of labour time and circulation time contains the
entire doctrine of credit, to the extent, namely, that the history of
currency etc. enters here. Now, of course, later, where circulation time
is not the only deduction from possible production time, there also
appear real costs of circulation, i.e. values which have already been
really posited must be spent on circulation. But these are all in fact
only costs – deductions from already created surplus values – which
capital undertakes in order to increase the sum of surplus values
possible e.g. in a year, i.e. to increase the proportion of production
time out of a given total time – i.e. to abbreviate circulation time. Of
course, in practice, production time does not really appear interrupted
by circulation time (except in crises and depressions of trade). But
this is only because every capital is divided into parts, one part in
the production phase, the other in the circulation phase. Thus, for
example, it is not the entire capital that is active (depending on the
relation of circulation time to production time), but only 1/3, 1/_x_ of
it; the other is engaged in circulation. Or the matter can further take
the form that a given capital doubles (through credit, e.g.). For this
capital – the original capital – it is then the same as if circulation
time did not exist at all. But then the capital borrowed by it is in
this plight. And if ownership is disregarded, again exactly the same as
if one capital were divided in two. Instead of _a_ dividing into two and
_b_ dividing into two, _a_ absorbs _b_ and divides into _a_ and _b_.
Illusions about this process frequent among credit-mystics [59] (who are
rarely creditors, but rather debtors).

We already pointed out above that the double and contradictory condition
of capital, the continuity of production and the necessity of
circulation time, and also the continuity of circulation (not
circulation time) and the necessity of production time, can be mediated
only by capital dividing itself into parts, of which one _circulates as
finished_ product, and the other _reproduces itself in the production
process._ These parts alternate; when one part returns into phase _P_
(production process), the other departs. This process takes place daily,
as well as at longer intervals (dimensions of time). The whole capital
and the total value are reproduced as soon as both parts have passed
through the production process and circulation process, or as soon as
the second part enters anew into circulation. The point of departure is
thereby the terminal point. The turnover therefore depends on the size
of the capital, or rather, here, still on the _total sum_ of these two
parts. Only when the total sum is reproduced has the entire _turnover_
been completed; otherwise only 1/2, 1/3, 1/_x_, depending on the
relation of the constantly circulating part.

It has further been emphasized that each part can be regarded as fixed
or as circulating in contrast to the other, and that they really relate
to each other in this alternating way. The simultaneity of the process
of capital in different phases of the process is possible only through
its division and break-up into parts, each of which is capital, but
capital in a different aspect. This change of form and matter is like
that in the organic body. If one says e.g. the body reproduces itself in
24 hours, this does not mean it does it all at once, but rather the
shedding in one form and renewal in the other is distributed, takes
place simultaneously. Incidentally, in the body the skeleton is the
fixed capital; it does not renew itself in the same period of time as
flesh, blood. There are different degrees of speed of consumption
(self-consumption) and hence of reproduction. (Here, then, already
_transition to_ many capitals.) The important thing here above all is to
examine capital as such for itself first of all; since the aspects being
developed here are those which make value in general into capital; which
constitute the specific distinguishing characteristics of capital as
such.

Before we go further, let us call attention once more to the important
point that circulation time – i.e. the time during which capital is
separated from the process in which it absorbs labour, i.e. the labour
time of capital as capital – is only the transposition of _previously
created_ value from one form into the other, but not a _value-creating_,
value-_increasing_ element. The transformation of a value of 4 working
days existing in the form of twist into the form of 4 working days
existing as money, or of a symbol recognized as the representative of 4
working days as such, 4 working days in general, transposes the
_previously created_ and _measured_ value from one form into another,
but that value is not increased. The exchange of equivalents leaves the
working days _after_ the exchange just as they were _before, qua_
amounts of value. If one thinks of one capital, or one thinks of the
various capitals of a country as one capital (national capital) as
distinct from that of other countries, then it is clear that the time
during which this capital does not act as productive capital, i.e.
posits no surplus value, is a deduction from the realization time
available to this capital. In this abstract conception, still without
any regard to the costs of circulation itself, it appears as the
negation not of the really posited realization time, but of the
_possible_ realization time, i.e. possible if circulation time = 0. It
is clear, now, that the national capital cannot regard the time during
which it does not multiply itself as time in which it does multiply
itself, no more than e.g. an isolated peasant can regard the time during
which he can neither harvest nor sow, during which his labour generally
is interrupted, as time which makes him rich. The fact that capital
regards itself, and necessarily so, as productive and fruit-bearing
independently of labour, of the absorption of labour, assumes itself as
fertile at all times, and calculates its circulation time as
value-creating time – as production cost – is quite another thing. In
this way one can see what is wrong when e.g. Ramsay says: ‘the use of
fixed capital modifies to a considerable extent the principle that value
depends on quantity of labour. For some commodities on which the same
quantity of labour has been expended require very different periods
before they are fit for consumption. But as during this time the capital
brings no return, _in order that the employment in question should not
be less lucrative than others in which the produce is sooner ready for
use,_ it is necessary that the commodity, when at last brought to
market, should be increased in value _by all the amount of profit
withheld.’_ (This already assumes that capital as such regularly brings
profit, like a healthy tree brings fruit.) _‘This shews … how capital
may regulate value independently of labour.’_ [60] E.g. wine in the
cellar. (Ramsay, IX, 84.) Here as if circulation time as well as labour
time – or on the same level with it – produced _value._ Capital, of
course, contains both moments in itself. (1) _Labour time_ as a
value-creating moment. (2) _Circulation time_ as a moment which
restricts labour time and thus restricts the total value creation of
capital; as necessary, because value, or capital, as an immediate result
of the production process, is indeed _value,_ but value not posited in
its adequate form. The time which is required for these changes of form
– i.e. which elapses between production and reproduction – is time which
devalues capital. Thus, like _continuity,_ so is the _interruption_ of
continuity contained in the character of capital as circulating, in
process.

The economists who correctly characterize circulation, the revolution
which capital must go through to fire itself up for new production, as a
series of exchanges thereby admit that this circulation time is not time
which increases the quantity of values – hence it cannot be time which
posits new values – because a series of exchanges, no matter how many
exchanges it may include, and how much time the completion of these
operations may cost, is merely the exchange of equivalents. The positing
of values – the extremes of the mediation – as equivalents naturally
cannot posit them as non-equivalents. Regarded quantitatively, they can
have neither increased nor diminished through the exchange.

The surplus value of a production phase is determined by the surplus
labour set in motion (appropriated) by capital during it; the sum of the
surplus values a capital can create in a given period of time is
determined by the repetition of the production phase in this period of
time; or by the _turnover_ of capital. The turnover, however, equals the
duration of the production phase plus the duration of circulation,
equals the sum of circulation time and production time. The turnover
approaches production time as circulation time diminishes, i.e. the time
which elapses between capital’s departure from production and its return
to it.

Surplus value is in fact determined by the labour time objectified
during one production phase. The more frequent the reproduction of
capital, the more often does the production of surplus value take place.
The number of reproductions = the number of turnovers. Hence the total
surplus value = _S_ × _nR_ (if _n_ is the number of turnovers). _S′ = S_
× _nR;_ hence _S_ = _S_′/_nR_. If the production time required by a
capital of £100 in a certain branch of industry equals 3 months, then it
could turn over 4 times a year, and if the _S_-value created each time =
5, then the total surplus value = 5 (the _S_ created in one production
phase) × 4 (the number of turnovers, determined by the relation of
production time to the year) = 20. But if circulation time = e.g. 1/4 of
production time, then 1 turnover would = 3 + 1 months, equals 4 months,
and the capital of 100 could turn over only 3 times a year = 15. Hence,
although the capital posits an _S_-value of £5 in 3 months, it is the
same for it as if it posited a value of 5 in only 4 months, because it
can only posit 5 × 3 per year. It is the same for it as if it produced
an _S_ of 5 every 4 months; hence produced only 15/4 or 3 3/4 in 3
months, and in the one circulation month, 1 1/4. In so far as turnover
is distinct from the duration posited by the conditions of production,
it is = to circulation time. The latter, however, is not determined by
labour time. In this way the sum of surplus values which capital posits
in a given period of time appears determined not simply by labour time,
but by labour time as well as circulation time, in the relations
indicated above. But, as shown above, the determination which capital
here brings into the positing of value is _negative, limiting._

If e.g. a capital of £100 needs 3 months for production, say 90 days,
then, if circulation time = 0, the capital could turn over 4 times a
year; and it would be _entirely_ active as capital the whole time, i.e.
positing surplus labour, multiplying its value. If 80 of the 90 days
represented necessary labour, then 10, surplus labour. Now posit that
circulation time amounts to 33 1/3% of production time, or 1/3 of it.
Hence 1 month for every 3. Circulation time then = 90/3; a third of
production time = 30 days, _c_ = 1/3 _p_; (_c = _p_/3_). Well. The
question is, what part of the capital can now continuously be occupied
in production (during the whole year)? If the capital of 100 had worked
90 days, and then circulated as a product of 105 for one month, then
during this month it could employ no labour at all. (The 90 working days
can of course equal 3, 4, 5, _x_ times 90, depending on the number of
workers employed during the 90 days. These would be = to only 90 days if
only 1 worker were employed. But this is beside the point for now.) (In
all these calculations it is presupposed that the surplus value is not
in turn capitalized, but that capital rather continues to work with the
same number of workers; but at the same time as the surplus is realized,
the entire capital is only then realized as money.) That is, during one
month the capital could not be employed at all. (The capital of 100
employs e.g. 5 workers continuously; this contains their surplus labour,
and the product which is circulated is never the original capital, but
rather that which has absorbed this surplus labour and hence has a
surplus value. Hence the circulation of a capital of 100 actually means
e.g. circulation of the capital of 105; i.e. of capital together with
the profit posited in one act of production. But this error irrelevant
here, particularly in the above question.)

(Posit that at the end of 3 months £100 worth of twist have been
produced.) Now it will be 1 month before the money comes in and I can
begin production again. Now, in order to set the same number of workers
to work during the I month while the capital is circulating, I would
have to have a surplus capital of £33 1/3; for if £100 set a given
quantity of labour in motion for 3 months, then 1/3 of £100 would set it
in motion for 1 month. At the end of the fourth month, the capital of
100 would return to the production phase, and that of 33 1/3 would enter
the circulation phase. The latter would require 1/3 of a month for
circulation, given the same relations; would hence return into
production after 10 days. The first capital could enter into circulation
again only at the end of the seventh month. The second, which entered
into circulation at the beginning of the fifth month, would have
returned say on the 10th of the fifth month, would re-enter circulation
on the 10th of the sixth month and would return on the 20th of the sixth
month, to re-enter circulation on the 20th of the seventh month; at the
end of the seventh month it would be back again, at which time the first
capital would just be beginning its course again at the same moment when
the second was returning. Beginning of the eighth month, and return on
the etc. Beginning of the ninth etc. In a word: if the capital were 1/3
larger – just the amount the circulation time adds up to – then it could
continuously employ the same number of workers. Or, alternately, it
could continuously remain in the production phase if it continuously
employed 1/3 less labour. If the capitalist began with a capital of only
75, then production would finish at the end of the third month; then the
capital would circulate for one month; but during this month he could
continue production because he would have retained a capital of 25, and,
if he needs 75 to set a given mass of labour in motion during 3 months,
he needs 25 to set the same in motion for 1 month. He would continuously
have the same number of workers at work. Each of his commodities
requires 1/12 of a year before it is sold.

If he always needs 1/3 of the production time to sell his commodities,
then etc. This matter must be reducible to a very simple equation, to
which we shall return later. It does not actually belong here. But the
question is important because of the credit questions later. This much
is clear, however. Call production time _pt,_ circulation time _ct._
Capital, _C. C_ cannot be in its production phase and its circulation
phase at the same time. If it is to continue to produce while it
circulates, then it must break into two parts, of which one in the
production phase, while the other in the circulation phase, and the
continuity of the process is maintained by part _a_ being posited in the
former aspect, part _b_ in the latter. Let the portion which is always
in production be _x;_ then _x = C − b_ (let _b_ be the part of the
capital always in circulation). C = _b_ + _x._ If _ct,_ circulation
time, were = 0, then _b_ likewise would be = 0, and _x = C._ _b_ (the
part of the capital in circulation):_C_ (the total capital) = _ct_
(circulation time):_pt_ (production time); _b:C = ct:pt;_ i.e. the
relation of circulation time to production time is the relation of the
part of capital in circulation to the total capital.

If a capital of 100 at a profit of 5% turns over every 4 months, so that
there is 1 month of circulation time for every 3 months of production
time, then the total surplus value, as we saw, will be = (5 × 12)/4 _M_
(month) = 5 × 3 = 15; instead of 20 as when _c_ = 0; for then _S′_ = (5
× 12)/3 = 20. But now 15 is the gain on a capital of 75 at 5% whose
circulation time = 0; which turned over 4 times a year; was continuously
occupied. At the end of the first quarter 3 3/4; at the end of the year
15. (But only a total capital of 300 would turn over; while one of 400
if in the above case _ct =_ 0.) Hence a capital of 100, with respect to
which circulation time amounts to 1 month on every 3 _M_ production
time, can constantly employ productively a capital of 75; a capital of
25 is constantly circulating and unproductive. 75:25 = 3 _M_:1 _M,_ or,
if we call the part of the capital occupied in production _p,_ the part
in circulation _c_, and the corresponding times _c′_ and _p′,_ then _p:c
= p′:c′ (p:c_ = 1:1/3). The part of the _C_ in production constantly
relates to the part in circulation as 1:1/3; this 1/3 constantly
represented by changing component parts. But _p:C_ = 75:100 = 3/4; c =
1/4; _p:C_ = 1:4/3 and _c:C_ = 1:4. The total turnover = 4 _M_, _p:R_ =
3 _M_:4 _M_ = 1:4/3.

_Change of form and of matter in the circulation of capital. – C–M–C. M–C–M._

A change of form [_Formwechsel_] and a change of matter [_Stoffwechsel_]
take place simultaneously in the circulation of capital. We must begin
here not with the presupposition of M, but with the production process.
In production, as regards the material side, the instrument is used up
and the raw material is worked up. The result is the product – a newly
created use value, different from its elemental presuppositions. As
regards the material side, a product is created only in the production
process. This is the first and essential material change. On the market,
in the exchange for money, the product is expelled from the circulation
of capital and falls prey to consumption, becomes object of consumption,
whether for the final satisfaction of an individual need or as raw
material for another capital. In the exchange of the commodity for
money, the material and the formal changes coincide; for, in money,
precisely the content itself is part of the economic form. The
retransformation of money into commodity is here, however, at the same
time present in the retransformation of capital into the material
conditions of production. The reproduction of a specific use value takes
place, just as well as of value as such. But, just as the material
element here was posited, from the outset, at its entry into
circulation, as a product, so the commodity in turn was posited as a
condition of production at the end of it. To the extent that money
figures here as medium of circulation, it does so indeed only as
mediation of production, on one side with consumption, in the exchange
where capital discharges value in the form of the product, and as
mediation, on the other side, between production and production, where
capital discharges itself in the form of money and draws the commodity
in the form of the condition of production into its circulation.
Regarded from the material side of capital, money appears merely as a
medium of circulation; from the formal side, as the nominal measure of
its realization, and, for a specific phase, as value-for-itself; capital
is therefore C–M–M–C just as much as it is M–C–C–M, and this in such a
way, specifically, that both forms of simple circulation here continue
to be determinants, since M–M is money, which creates money, and C–C a
commodity whose use value is both reproduced and increased. In regard to
money circulation, which appears here as being absorbed into and
determined by the circulation of capital, we want only to remark in
passing – for the matter can be thoroughly treated only after the many
capitals have been examined in their action and reaction upon one
another – that money is obviously posited in different aspects here.

_Difference between production time and labour time._ – Storch. _Money. Mercantile estate. Credit. Circulation_

Until now it has been assumed that production time coincides with labour
time. But now there take place, e.g. in agriculture, interruptions of
work within the production process itself, before the product is
finished. The same labour time may be applied and the duration of the
production phase may differ, because work is interrupted. If the
difference is only that the product in one case requires a longer
working time in order to be finished than in another case, then no case
at all is constituted, because it is then clear according to the general
law that the product in which a greater quantity of labour is contained
is of that much greater value, and if the reproduction is less frequent
in a given period of time, then the reproduced value is all the greater.
And 2 × 100 is just as much as 4 × 50. As with the total value, then, so
with the surplus value. The question is constituted by the unequal
duration required by different products, although the same amount of
labour time (namely stored-up and living labour together) is employed
upon them. The fixed capital here allegedly acts quite by itself,
without human labour, like e.g. the seed entrusted to the earth’s womb.
In so far as additional labour is required, this is to be deducted. The
question to be posed in pure form. If circulation time here the same,
then the turnover is less frequent because the production phase longer.
Hence production time + turnover time = 1_R_, larger than in the case
where production time coincides with labour time. The time required here
for the product to reach maturity, the interruptions of work, here
constitute conditions of production. Not-labour time constitutes a
condition for labour time, in order to turn the latter really into
production time. The question obviously belongs only with the
equalization of the rate of profit. Still, the ground must be cleared
here. The slower return – this is the essential part – here arises not
from circulation time, but rather from the conditions themselves in
which labour becomes productive; it belongs with the technological
conditions of the production process. It must absolutely be denied, it
is downright nonsensical to claim, that a natural circumstance which
hinders a capital in a specific branch of production from exchanging
with the same amount of labour time in the same amount of time as
another capital in another branch of production can in any way
contribute to _increasing_ the former’s value. Value, hence also surplus
value, is not = to the time which the production phase lasts, but rather
to the labour time, objectified and living, employed during this
production phase. The living labour time alone – and, indeed, in the
proportion in which it is employed relative to objectified labour time –
can create surplus value, because [it creates] surplus labour time. * It
has therefore correctly been asserted that in this regard agriculture
for instance is less productive (productivity is concerned here with the
production of values) than other industries. Just as in another respect
– _in so far as a growth of productivity in it_ DIRECTLY _reduces
necessary labour time – it is more productive than all the others._ But
this circumstance can accrue to its advantage only where _capital_
already rules, together with the general form of production
corresponding to it. This interruption in the production phase already
signifies that agriculture can never be the sphere in which capital
starts; the sphere in which it takes up its original residence. This
contradicts the primary fundamental conditions of industrial labour.
Hence agriculture is claimed for capital and becomes industrial only
retroactively. Requires a high development of competition on one side,
on the other a great development of chemistry, mechanics etc., i.e. of
manufacturing industry. History shows, consequently, that agriculture
never _appears in pure form_ in the modes of production preceding
capital, or which correspond to its own undeveloped stages. A rural
secondary industry, such as spinning, weaving etc. must make up for the
limit on the employment of labour time posited here – and located in
these interruptions. The non-identity of production time with labour
time can be due generally only to natural conditions, which stand
directly in the path of the realization of labour, i.e. the
appropriation of surplus labour by capital. These obstacles in its path
do not of course constitute advantages, but rather, from its point of
view, losses. The whole case is worth mentioning here actually only as
an example of fixated capital, capital fixated in one phase. The point
to remember here is only that capital creates no surplus value as long
as it employs no living labour. The reproduction of the employed fixed
capital itself is of course not the positing of surplus value.

* It is clear that other aspects also enter in with the equalization of
the rate of profit. Here, however, the issue is not the distribution of
surplus value but its creation.

(In the human body, as with capital, the different elements are not
exchanged at the same rate of reproduction, blood renews itself more
rapidly than muscle, muscle than bone, which in this respect may be
regarded as the fixed capital of the human body.)

As means of speeding up circulation, Storch lists: (1) formation of a
class of ‘workers’ who busy themselves only with trade; (2) easy means
of transport; (3) money; (4) credit. (See above.) [61]

This motley combination reveals the whole confusion of the political
economists. Money and money circulation – what we called simple
circulation – is the presupposition, condition, of capital itself, as
well as of the circulation of capital. Money as it exists, hence, as a
relation of intercourse belonging to a stage of production preceding
capital, money as money, in its immediate form, can therefore not be
said to speed up the circulation of capital, but is rather its
presupposition. When we speak of capital and of its circulation, we
stand on a stage of social development where the introduction of money
does not enter as a discovery etc., but is rather a _presupposition._ To
the extent that money in its immediate form itself has value, and is not
merely the value of other commodities, the symbol of their value – for,
if something which is itself immediate is supposed to be something else
which is also immediate, then it can only _represent_ the latter, in one
way or another, as symbol – but rather, itself has value, is itself
objectified labour in a specific use value, to that extent, money, so
far from speeding up the circulation of capital, rather delays it.
Regarded in both of the aspects in which it occurs in the circulation of
capital, both as medium of circulation and as the realized value of
capital, money belongs among the costs of circulation in so far as it is
itself labour time employed to abbreviate circulation time on the one
hand, and, on the other hand, to represent a qualitative moment of
circulation – the retransformation of capital into itself as
value-for-itself. In neither aspect does it increase the value. In one
aspect it is a precious form of representing value, i.e. a costly form,
costing labour time, hence representing a deduction from surplus value.
In the other aspect it can be regarded as a machine which saves
circulation time, and hence frees time for production. But, in so far as
it itself, as such a machine, costs labour and is a product of labour,
it represents for capital _faux frais de production._ It figures among
the costs of circulation. The original cost of circulation is
circulation time itself as opposed to labour time. The real costs of
circulation are themselves objectified labour time – machinery for the
purpose of abbreviating the original costs of circulation. Money in its
immediate form, as it belongs to a historic stage of production
preceding capital, thus appears to capital as a cost of circulation, and
the efforts of capital hence tend in the direction of transforming it
into a form adequate for its own ends; hence attempting to make it into
a representative of one moment of circulation which does not itself cost
labour, and has itself no value. Capital hence tends in the direction of
suspending money in its inherited, immediate reality, and transforming
it into something merely _posited_ and at the same time suspended by
capital, into something purely _ideal._ It cannot be said, therefore, as
does Storch, that money as such is a means of speeding up the
circulation of capital; it must rather be said to the contrary that
capital attempts to transform money into a merely _ideal_ moment of its
circulation, and first to raise it into the adequate form corresponding
to it. Suspension of money in its immediate form appears as a demand
made by money circulation once it has become a moment of the circulation
of capital; because in its immediate, presupposed form it is a _barrier_
to the circulation of capital. The tendency of capital is _circulation
without circulation time;_ hence also the positing of the instruments
which merely serve to abbreviate circulation time as mere _formal
aspects_ posited by it, just as the different moments through which
capital passes in its circulation are qualitative aspects of its own
metamorphosis.

As regards the formation of a special mercantile estate – i.e. a
development of the division of labour which has transformed the business
of exchanging into a particular kind of work – for which, of course, the
sum of exchange operations must already have reached a certain height –
(if the exchange among 100 people occupied the 100th part of their
labour time, then each man is 1/100 of an exchanger; 100/100 exchangers
would represent one single man. Then one merchant could arise per 100.
The separation of commerce from production itself, or the development of
exchange itself as a representation opposite the exchangers, requires as
such that exchange and intercourse have developed to a certain degree.
The merchant represents all buyers to the seller, all sellers to the
buyer and vice versa, hence he is not an extreme, but rather the middle
of the exchange itself; appears hence as mediator, middleman) – the
formation of the merchant estate, which presupposes that of money, even
if not developed in all its moments, is likewise a presupposition for
capital, and hence cannot be listed as being a mediator of its specific
circulation. Since commerce is both historically as well as conceptually
a presupposition for the rise of capital, we shall have to return to it
before concluding this chapter, since it belongs before or in the
section on the origin of capital.

The facilitation of the means of transport, to the extent that it means
facilitation of the physical circulation of commodities, does not belong
here, where we are examining merely the characteristic forms of the
circulation of capital. The product becomes a commodity, leaves the
production phase, only when it is on the _market._ On the other side,
the means of transportation do belong here in so far as the _returns_ of
capital – i.e. circulation time – must grow with the distance of the
market from the point of production. Its abbreviation by means of
transport thus appears as belonging directly, in this respect directly,
to the examination of the circulation of capital. But this actually
belongs to the doctrine of the market, which itself belongs to the
section on capital.

Finally, _credit._ This form of circulation etc. directly posited by
capital – which arises, hence, specifically from the nature of capital,
this specific characteristic of capital – is mixed up here by Storch
etc. together with money, mercantile estate, etc., which belong
generally with the development of exchange and of the production more or
less founded on it. The presentation of the specific, distinguishing
characteristics is here both the _logical_ development and the key to
the understanding of the _historical_ development. Thus we find in
history, too, e.g. in England (likewise in France), [attempts] to
replace money by paper; then also to give capital, in so far as it
exists in the form of _value,_ a form purely posited by itself; finally
attempts to found credit directly with the rise of capital. (E.g. Petty,
Boisguillebert.)

Small-scale circulation. The process of exchange between capital and labour capacity generally. Capital in the reproduction of labour capacities

Within circulation as the total process, we can distinguish between
large-scale and small-scale circulation. The former spans the entire
period from the moment when capital exits from the production process
until it enters it again. The second is continuous and constantly
proceeds simultaneously with the production process. It is the part of
capital which is paid out as wages, exchanged for labouring capacity.
The circulation process of capital, which is posited in the form of an
exchange of equivalents, but is in fact suspended as such, and posited
as such only formally (the transition from value to capital, where the
exchange of equivalents turns into its opposite, and where, on the basis
of exchange, exchange becomes purely formal, and the mutuality is all on
one side), is to be developed in this way: Values which become exchanged
are always objectified labour time, an objectively available,
_reciprocally_ presupposed quantity of labour (present in a use value).
Value as such is always an effect, never a cause. It expresses the
amount of labour by which an object is produced, hence – presupposing
the same stage of the productive forces – the amount of labour by which
it can be reproduced. The capitalist does not exchange capital directly
for labour or labour time; but rather time contained, worked up in
commodities, for time contained, worked up in living labour capacity.
The living labour time he gets in exchange is not the exchange value,
but the use value of labour capacity. Just as a machine is not
exchanged, paid for as cause of effects, but as itself an effect; not
according to its use value in the production process, but rather as
product – definite amount of objectified labour. The labour time
contained in labour capacity, i.e. the time required to produce living
labour capacity, is the same as is required – presupposing the same
stage of the productive forces – to reproduce it, i.e. to maintain it.
Hence, the exchange which proceeds between capitalist and worker thus
corresponds completely to the laws of exchange; it not only corresponds
to them, but also is their highest development. For, as long as labour
capacity does not itself exchange itself, the foundation of production
does not yet rest on exchange, but exchange is rather merely a narrow
circle resting on a foundation of non-exchange, as in all stages
preceding bourgeois production. But the use value of the value the
capitalist has acquired through exchange is itself the element of
realization and its measure, living labour and labour time, and,
specifically, more labour time than is objectified in labour capacity,
i.e. more labour time than the reproduction of the living worker costs.
Hence, by virtue of having acquired labour capacity in exchange as an
equivalent, capital has acquired labour time – to the extent that it
exceeds the labour time contained in labour capacity – in exchange
_without equivalent;_ it has appropriated alien labour time _without
exchange_ by means of the _form_ of exchange. This is why exchange
becomes merely formal, and, as we saw, in the further development of
capital even the semblance is suspended that capital exchanges for
labour capacity anything other than the latter’s own objectified labour;
i.e. that it exchanges anything at all for it. The turn into its
opposite [_Umschlag_] therefore comes about because the ultimate stage
of free exchange is the exchange of labour capacity as a commodity, as
value, for a commodity, for value; because it is given in exchange as
objectified labour, while its use value, by contrast, consists of living
labour, i.e. of the positing of exchange value. The turn into its
opposite arises from the fact that the use value of labour capacity, as
value, is itself the value-creating force; the substance of value, and
the value-increasing substance. In this exchange, then, the worker
receives the equivalent of the labour time objectified in him, and gives
his value-creating, value-increasing living labour time. He sells
himself as an effect. He is absorbed into the body of capital as a
cause, as activity. Thus the exchange turns into its opposite, and the
laws of private property – liberty, equality, property – property in
one’s own labour, and free disposition over it – turn into the worker’s
propertylessness, and the dispossession [_Entäusserung_] of his labour,
[i.e.] the fact that he relates to it as alien property and vice versa.

The circulation of the part of capital which is posited as wages
accompanies the production process, appears as an economic form-relation
alongside it, and is simultaneous and interwoven with it. This
circulation alone posits capital as such; is the condition of its
realization process, and posits not only the latter’s characteristic
form, but also its substance. This is the constantly circulating part of
capital, which at no time enters into the production process itself,
[but] constantly accompanies it. It is the part of capital which does
not even for a single instant enter into its reproduction process, which
is not the case with raw material. The worker’s _approvisionnement_
arises out of the production process, as product, as result; but it
never enters as such into the production process, because it is a
finished product for individual consumption, enters directly into the
worker’s consumption, and is directly exchanged for it. This, therefore,
as distinct from raw material as well as instrument, is the circulating
capital ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν. Here is the only moment in the circulation of
capital where consumption enters directly. At the point where the
commodity becomes exchanged for money, it may be acquired by another
capital as raw material for new production. Further, given the
presuppositions, capital encounters not the individual consumer but
rather the merchant; someone who buys the commodity itself in order to
sell it for money. (This presupposition is to be developed in connection
with the merchant estate in general. The circulation among dealers
thereby different from that between dealers and consumers.) Thus the
circulating capital here appears directly as that which is specified for
the workers’ individual consumption; specified for direct consumption
generally, and hence existing in the form of finished product. Thus,
while in one respect capital appears as the presupposition of the
product, the finished product also at the same time appears as the
presupposition of capital – which means, historically, that capital did
not begin the world from the beginning, but rather encountered
production and products already present, before it subjugated them
beneath its process. Once in motion, proceeding from itself as basis, it
constantly posits itself ahead of itself in its various forms as
consumable product, raw material and instrument of labour, in order
constantly to reproduce itself in these forms. They appear initially as
the conditions presupposed by it, and then as its result. In its
reproduction it produces its own conditions. Here, then – through the
relation of capital to living labour capacity and to the natural
conditions of the latter’s maintenance – we find circulating capital
specified in respect of its use value as well, as that which enters
directly into individual consumption, to be directly used up by the
latter. It is a mistake to conclude from this, as has been done, [62]
that circulating capital is therefore _consumable_ capital generally, as
if coal, oil, dye etc., instruments etc., improvements of the land etc.
factories etc. were not all consumed likewise, if by consumption is
meant the suspension of their use value and of their form; however, one
could just as well say that none of them is consumed, if this is taken
to mean individual consumption, i.e. consumption in the proper sense. In
this circulation, capital constantly expels itself as objectified
labour, in order to assimilate living labour power, its life’s breath.
Now, as regards the worker’s consumption, this reproduces one thing –
namely himself, as living labour capacity. _Because this, his
reproduction, is itself a condition for capital, therefore the worker’s
consumption also appears as the reproduction not of capital directly,
but of the relations under which alone it is capital. Living labour
capacity belongs just as much among capital’s conditions of existence as
do raw material and instrument. Thus it reproduces itself doubly, in its
own form, [and] in the worker’s consumption, but only to the extent that
it reproduces him as living labour capacity._ Capital therefore calls
this consumption productive consumption – productive not in so far as it
reproduces the individual, but rather individuals as labour capacities.
If Rossi is offended that wages are allegedly counted twice, first as
the worker’s revenue, then as reproductive consumption of capital, [63]
then the objection holds only against those who let wages enter directly
into the production process of capital as value. For the payment of
wages is an act of circulation which proceeds simultaneously with and
alongside the act of production. Or, as Sismondi says from this
perspective – the worker consumes his wages unreproductively; but the
capitalist consumes them productively, since he gets labour in the
exchange, which reproduces the wages and more than the wages. This
concerns capital itself regarded merely as an object. But in so far as
capital is a relation, and, specifically, a relation to living labour
capacity, [to that extent] the worker’s consumption reproduces this
relation; or, capital reproduces itself doubly, as value through
purchase of labour – as a possibility of beginning the realization
process anew, of acting as capital anew – and as a relation through the
worker’s consumption, which reproduces him as labour capacity
exchangeable for capital – wages as part of capital.

This circulation between capital and labour, then, yields the
characterization of one part of capital as constantly circulating, the
_approvisionnement;_ constantly consumed; constantly to reproduce. This
circulation strikingly reveals the difference between capital and money;
the circulation of capital and the circulation of money. Capital pays
wages e.g. weekly; the worker takes his wages to the grocer etc.; the
latter directly or indirectly deposits them with the banker; and the
following week the manufacturer takes them from the banker again, in
order to distribute them among the same workers again, etc. and so
forth. The same sum of money constantly circulates new portions of
capital. The sum of money itself, however, does not determine the
portions of capital which are thus circulated. If the money value of
wages rises, then the circulating medium will increase, but the mass of
the medium does not determine the rise. If the production costs of money
did not fall, then no increase of money would exercise an influence on
the portion of it entering into this circulation. Here money appears as
mere medium of circulation. Since many workers are to be paid at the
same time, a certain sum of money is required at one time, which grows
with the number of workers. Then, however, the velocity of the
circulation of the money makes a lesser sum necessary than in situations
where there are fewer workers but the machinery of monetary circulation
is not so arranged. This circulation is a condition of the production
process and thereby of the circulation process as well. On the other
hand, if capital does not return from circulation, then this circulation
between worker and capital could not begin anew; hence it is itself
conditional upon capital passing through the various moments of its
metamorphosis _outside_ the production process. If this did not happen,
it would be not because there was not enough _money_ as _medium of
circulation,_ but rather either because capital was not available in the
form of products, because this part of _circulating_ capital was
lacking, or because capital did not posit itself in the _form of money,_
i.e. did not realize itself as capital, which in turn, however, would
arise not from the quantity of the medium of circulation, but because
capital did not posit itself in the _qualitative aspect_ of money, which
in no way requires that it posit itself in the form of hard cash, in the
immediate money form; and whether or not it posited itself in that form
would again depend not on the quantity of money circulating as medium of
circulation, but rather on the exchange of capital for value as such;
again a qualitative, not a quantitative, moment, as we shall point out
in more detail when we speak of capital as money. (Interest etc.)

Threefold character, or mode, of circulation. – _Fixed capital and circulating capital. – Turnover time of the total capital divided into circulating and fixed capital. – Average turnover time of such a capital. – Influence of fixed capital on the total turnover time of capital. – Circulating fixed capital._ Say. Smith. Lauderdale. _(Lauderdale on the origin of_ profit)

Regarded as a whole, circulation thus appears threefold: (1) the total
process – the course of capital through its different moments;
accordingly, it is posited as being in flow; as circulating; in so far
as the continuity is virtually interrupted, and may resist the passage
into the next phase, capital here likewise appears as fixated in
different relations, and the various modes of this fixation constitute
different capitals, commodity capital, money capital, capital as
conditions of production.

(2) Small-scale circulation between capital and labour capacity. This
accompanies the production process and appears as contract, exchange,
form of intercourse; these things are presupposed before the production
process can be set going. The part of capital entering into this
circulation – the approvisionnement – is circulating capital ϰατ᾽
ἐξοχήν. It is specified not only in respect to its form; in addition to
this, its use value, i.e. its material character as a consumable product
entering directly into individual consumption, itself constitutes a part
of its form.

(3) Large-scale circulation; the movement of capital outside the
production phase, where its time appears in antithesis to labour time,
as circulation time. The distinction between _fluid_ and _fixed capital_
is the product of this opposition between the capital engaged in the
production phase and the capital which issues from it. Fixed is that
which is fixated in the production process and is consumed within it;
comes out of large-scale circulation, certainly, but does not return
into it, and, in so far as it circulates, circulates only in order to be
consumed in, confined to, the consumption process.

The three different distinctions in the circulation of capital yield the
three distinctions between circulating and fixated capital; they posit
one part of capital as circulating ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν, because it never enters
into the production process, but constantly accompanies it; and thirdly,
[they yield] the distinction between _fluid_ and _fixed_ capital.
Circulating capital in form No. 3 also includes No. 2, since the latter
is also in antithesis to the fixed; but No. 2 does not include No. 3.
The part of capital which belongs as such to the production process is
the part of it which serves, materially, only as _means of production;_
forms the link between living labour and the material to be worked on. A
part of the liquid capital, such as coal, oil etc., also serves merely
as means of production. Everything which serves merely as a means to
keep the machine, or the engine, running. This distinction will have to
be examined yet more closely. First of all, this does not contradict
aspect 1, since the fixed capital as _value_ also circulates in
proportion as it is worn out. Precisely in this aspect as _fixed_
capital – i.e. in the character in which capital has lost its fluidity
and become identified with a _specific_ use value, which robs it of its
ability to transform itself – does _developed capital –_ to the extent
we know it so far, as productive capital – most strikingly manifest
itself, and it is precisely in this seemingly inadequate form, and in
the latter’s increasing relation to the form of circulating capital in
No. 2, that the development of capital as capital is measured. This
contradiction pretty. To be developed.

The different kinds of capital, which, in economics, fall out of the
sky, here appear as so many precipitates of the movements arising out of
the nature of capital itself, or rather of this movement itself in its
different moments.

Circulating capital constantly ‘parts’ from the capitalist, in order to
return to him in the first form. _Fixed capital_ does not (Storch). [64]
_‘Circulating capital_ is that portion of the capital which does not
yield profit _till it is parted with;_ fixed etc. yields such profit,
_while it remains in the possession of the owner.’_ (Malthus.) [65]
‘Circulating capital gives its master no revenue or profit, _so long as
it remains in his possession; fixed capital_ gives this profit without
changing masters, and without requiring circulation.’ (A. Smith.) [66]

 In this respect, since capital’s departure on a voyage away from its
owner (_‘partir de son possesseur’_) [67] means nothing more than the
_sale_ of property or possessions which takes place in the act of
exchange, and since it is the nature of all exchange value, hence all
capital, to become value for its owner by means of sale, the definition
in its above formulation cannot be correct. If fixed capital were
[capital] for its owner without the mediation of exchange and of the use
value [68] included in it, then, in fact, fixed capital would be a mere
use value, hence not capital. But the basis of the above definition is
this: fixed capital circulates as _value_ (even if only in portions,
successively, as we shall see). It does not circulate as _use value._ As
far as its material aspect is concerned, as a moment of the production
process, _fixed capital_ never leaves its boundaries; is not sold by its
possessor; remains in his hand. It circulates as capital only in its
_formal aspect,_ as self-eternalizing value. This distinction between
form and content, use value and exchange value, does not take place in
circulating capital. In order to circulate, to exist, as the latter, it
has to step into circulation as the former, must be sold. Use value for
_capital_ as such is only value itself. Circulating capital realizes
itself as value for capital as such only when it is sold. As long as it
remains in its hand, it only has value _in itself;_ but it is not
_posited;_ only in potency – but not in act. Fixed capital, by contrast,
realizes itself as value only as long as it remains in the capitalist’s
hand as a use value, or, expressed as an objective relation, as long as
it remains in the production process, which may be regarded as the inner
organic movement of capital, its relation to itself, as opposed to its
animal movement, its presence for another. Hence, since _fixed capital,_
once it has entered the production process, remains in it, it also
passes away in it, is consumed in it. The duration of this consumption
does not yet concern us here. In this respect, then, _fixed capital_
also includes what Cherbuliez calls the _matières instrumentales,_ [69]
such as coal, oil, wood, grease etc., which are completely destroyed in
the production process, which only have a _use value_ for the process of
production itself. The same materials, however, also have a use value
outside production, and can also be consumed in another way, just as
buildings, houses, etc. are not necessarily specified for production.
They are _fixed capital_ not because of the specific mode of their
being, but rather because of their use. They become fixed capital as
soon as they step into the production process. They are _fixed capital,_
as soon as they are posited as moments of the production process of
capital; because they then lose their property of being potentially
circulating capital.

Therefore, just as the part of capital entering into the small-scale
circulation of capital – or capital, in so far as it enters into this
movement – circulation between capital and labour capacity, the part of
capital circulating as wages – _never leaves the circulation process and
never enters into the production process of capital,_ as regards its
material aspect, as use value, but rather is always ejected from a
previous production process as its product, result, so, inversely, does
the part of capital specified as _fixed capital,_ as a use value, as
regards its material presence, never leave the _production process_ and
_never go back into circulation._ While the latter only enters into
circulation as _value_ (as part of the value of the finished product),
the former only enters into the production process as _value,_ in that
necessary labour is the reproduction of wages, of the part of the
capital’s value which circulates as wages. This, then, is the _first_
characteristic of fixed capital, and in this respect it also includes
the _matières instrumentales._

_Secondly_: Fixed capital can enter into circulation as value, however,
only to the extent that it passes away as use value in the production
process. It passes, as value, into the product – i.e. as labour time
worked up or stored up in it – in so far as it passes away in its
independent form as use value. In being used, it is used up, but in such
a way that its value is carried over from its form into the form of the
product. If it is not used, not consumed in the production process
itself – if the machinery stands still, the iron rusts, the wood rots –
then of course its value passes away together with its transitory
presence as use value. Its circulation as value corresponds to its
consumption in the production process as use value. Its total value is
completely reproduced, i.e. is fully returned via circulation only when
it has been completely consumed as use value in the production process.
As soon as it is completely dissolved into value, and hence completely
absorbed into circulation, it has completely passed away as use value
and hence must be replaced, as a necessary moment of production, by a
new use value of the same kind, i.e. must be reproduced. The necessity
of reproducing it, i.e. its reproduction time, is determined by the time
in which it is used up, consumed within the production process. With
circulating capital, reproduction is determined by circulation time;
with fixed capital, circulation is determined by the time in which it is
consumed as use value, in its material presence, within the act of
production, i.e. by the period of time within which it must be
reproduced. A thousand pounds of twist can be reproduced as soon as they
are sold and the money obtained for them is again exchanged for cotton,
in short, for the elements of the production of twist. Their
reproduction is determined, hence, by circulation time. A machine of a
value of £1,000 which lasts 5 years, which is used up in 5 years and
then becomes nothing more than scrap iron, is used up, say, by 1/5 per
year, if we take the average consumption in the production process.
Hence every year only 1/5 of its value enters into circulation, and only
with the passing of the 5 years has it completely gone into circulation
and returned from it. Its entry into circulation is thus purely
determined by the time of its wearing out; and the time which its value
needs to enter totally into circulation and to return from it is
determined by its total reproduction time, the time in which it must be
reproduced. Fixed capital enters into the product only as value; while
the use value of circulating capital has remained in the product as the
latter’s substance, and has merely obtained another form. This
distinction essentially modifies the _turnover time_ of a total capital
divided into circulating and fixed capital. Let total capital = _S;_ its
circulating part = _c_; its fixed part = _f_; let the fixed capital form
1/_x_ _S_; the circulating capital _S_/_y_. Let the circulating capital
turn over 3 times a year, the fixed capital only twice every 10 years.
In 10 years, _f_ or _S_/_x_ will turn over twice; while in the same 10
years _S_/_y_ will turn over 3 × 10 = 30 times. If _S_ were = _S_/_y_,
i.e. circulating capital only, then _R,_ its turnover, would be = 30;
and the total capital turned over = 30 × _S_/_y_; the total capital
turned over in 10 years. But the fixed capital turns over only twice in
10 years. Its _R_′ = 2; and the total fixed capital turned over =
2_S_/_x_. But _S_ = _S_/_y_ + _S_/_x_ and its total turnover time = the
total turnover time of both these parts. If the fixed capital turns over
twice in 10 years, then in one year 2/10 or 1/5 of it turns over; while
in one year the circulating capital turns over 3 times. _S_/5_x_ turns
over once a year.

The question simply this: if a capital of 1,000 thalers = 600
circulating capital and 400 fixed capital; thus 3/5 circulating and 2/5
fixed capital; if the fixed capital lasts 5 years, hence turns over once
in 5 years and the circulating turns over 3 times a year, then what is
the average turnover or turnover time of the total capital? If it were
circulating capital only, then it would turn over 5 × 3, 15 times; the
total capital turned over in the 5 years would be 15,000. But 2/5 of it
turn over only once in 5 years. Hence, of the 400 thalers, 400/5 = 80
thalers turn over in one year. Of the 1,000 thalers, 600 annually turn
over 3 times, 80 once; or, in one year, only 1,880 would turn over;
hence in 5 years 5 ×1,880 = 9,400 turn over; i.e. 5,600 less than if the
total capital consisted only of circulating capital. If the entire
capital consisted only of circulating capital, then it would turn over
once in 1/3 of a year.

If the capital = 1,000; _c_ = 600, turns over twice a year; _f =_ 400,
turns over once a year; then 600 (3/5 _S_) turns over in half a year;
400/2 or 2_S/_(5 × 2) likewise in half a year. Hence in half a year, 600
+ 200 = 800 (i.e. _c_ + _f_/2) turns over. IN A WHOLE YEAR, hence, 2 ×
800 or 1,600 turn over; 1,600 thalers in 1 year; hence 100 in 12/16
months, hence 1,000 in 120/16 months = 7 1/2 months. The total capital
of 1,000 thus turns over in 7 1/2 months, while it would turn over in 6
months if it consisted of circulating capital only. 7 1/2: 6 = 1:1 1/4
or as 1:5/4. If the capital = 100, circulating = 50, fixed = 50; the
former turns over twice a year, the latter once; then 1/2 100 turns over
once in 6 months; and 1/4 100 likewise once in 6 months; hence in 6
months 3/4 of the capital turns over, 3/4 100 in 6 months; or 75 in 6
months, and 100 in 8 months. If 2/4 100 turn over in 6 months, and in
the same 6 months 1/4 100 (1/2 of the fixed capital), then 3/4 100 turn
over in 6 months. Hence 1/4 in 6/3 = 2 [months]; hence 4/4 100 or 100 in
6 + 2, in 8 months. The total turnover time of the capital = 6 (the
turnover time of the entire circulating capital and 1/2; of the fixed
capital or 1/4 of the total capital) + 6/3 i.e. + this turnover time
divided by the number expressing the ratio of the remaining fixed
capital to the capital turned over in the turnover time of circulating
capital. Thus in the above example: 3/5 100 turns over in 6 months;
ditto 1/5 100; hence 4/5 100 in 6 months; hence the remaining 1/5 100 in
6/4 months; hence the total capital in 6 + 6/4 months = 6 + 1 1/2 or 7
1/2 months. Thus, expressed in general terms:

Average turnover time = the turnover time of circulating capital + this
turnover time divided by the number which expresses how often the
remaining part of the fixed capital is contained in the total sum of the
capital which was circulated in this turnover time.

If there are two capitals of 100 thalers, one of them entirely composed
of circulating capital, the other half fixed capital, each at 5% profit,
the one turning over twice a year, and in the other the circulating
capital likewise twice, but the fixed capital only once; then the total
capital turning over would be = 200 in the first case, and the profit =
10; in the second = 3 turnovers in 8 months, 1 1/2 in 4; or 150 would
turn over in 12 months; profit then = 7 1/2. This kind of calculation
has strengthened the common prejudice that circulating capital or fixed
capital through some mysterious innate power brings a gain, as even in
Malthus’s phrase ‘the circulating capital brings a gain when its
possessors part with it etc.’; [70] likewise, in the above-quoted lines
from his _Measure of Value_ etc., the way in which he makes fixed
capital accumulate profits. [71] The greatest confusion and
mystification has arisen because the doctrine of surplus profit has not
been examined in its pure form by previous economists, but rather mixed
in together with the doctrine of real profit, which leads up to
distribution, where the various capitals participate in the general rate
of profit. The profit of the capitalists as a class, or the profit of
_capital_ as such, has to exist before it can be distributed, and it is
extremely absurd to try to explain its origin by its distribution.
According to the above, profit declines because the turnover time of
capital increases * in proportion as the component part of it which is
called fixed capital increases. A capital of the same size, 100 in the
above case, would turn over entirely twice a year if it consisted only
of a circulating capital. But it turns over only twice in 16 months, or
only 150 thalers are turned over in one year, because half of it
consists of fixed capital. As the number of its reproductions in a given
period declines, or the amount of it reproduced in this given time
declines, so does the production of surplus time or surplus value
decline, since capital posits value at all only in so far as it posits
surplus value. (This at least is its tendency, its adequate action.)

* Its size posited as permanent – this does not concern us here at all,
since the statement is true for a capital of any size. Capitals have
different sizes. But the size of each individual capital is _equal to
itself,_ hence, in so far as only its quality as capital is concerned,
any size. But if we examine two capitals in comparison to each other,
then the difference in their size introduces a relation of a qualitative
characters. Size becomes itself a distinguishing quality. _This is an
essential aspect,_ of which size is only one single instance, of how the
study of capital as such differs from the study of one capital in
relation to another capital, or the study of capital in its reality.

Fixed capital, as we saw, circulates as value only to the degree that it
is used up or consumed as use value in the production process. But the
time in which it is consumed and in which it must be reproduced in its
form as use value depends on its relative durability. Hence its
durability, or its greater or lesser perishability – the greater or
smaller amount of time during which it can continue to perform its
function within the repeated production processes of capital – this
aspect of its use value here becomes a form-determining moment, i.e. a
determinant for capital as regards its form, not as regards its matter.
The necessary reproduction time of fixed capital, together with the
proportion of the total capital consisting of it, here modify,
therefore, the turnover time of the total capital, and thereby its
realization. The greater durability of capital (the diminution
(duration) of its necessary reproduction time) and the proportion of
fixed capital to the total capital, then, here influence realization
just as does a slower turnover due either to a greater distance in space
of the market from which the capital returns as money, so that a longer
time is required to complete the path of circulation (as e.g. capitals
working in England for the East India market return more slowly than
those working for nearer foreign markets or for the domestic market), or
to the production phase being itself interrupted by natural conditions,
as in agriculture. Ricardo, who was the first to emphasize the influence
of fixed capital on the realization process, throws all these aspects
into one motley heap, as one can see from the excerpts quoted above.
[72]

In the first case (fixed capital), the turnover of capital is reduced
because the fixed capital is consumed slowly within the production
process; or the cause lies in the duration of the time required for its
reproduction. In the second case the reduced turnover arises from the
prolongation of _circulation time_ (in the first case the fixed capital
necessarily always circulates as rapidly as the product, _in so far as_
it circulates, enters circulation at all, because it circulates not in
its material existence, but only as value, i.e. as an ideal component
part of the total value of the product) and, specifically, from the
circulation time of the second half of the circulation process proper,
the retransformation into money; in the third case the reduced turnover
arises from the longer time the capital requires, not, as in the first
case, to pass away in the production process, but rather to emerge from
it as product. The first case is peculiar specifically to fixed capital;
the other belongs to the category of capital which is not liquid, but
fixated, fixated in one or another phase of the total circulation
process (fixed capital of a considerable degree of durability, _or_
circulating capital returnable at distant periods. McCulloch,
_Principles of Political Economy._ Notebook, p. 15.) [73]

_Thirdly:_ We have regarded fixed capital so far only from the aspect in
which its particular relation, its specific relation, distinguishes it
from the circulation process proper. Still further distinctions will
arise in this respect. Firstly, the return of its value in successive
parts, whereas each part of circulating capital is exchanged in its
entirety; this because in the former, the existence of the value
coincides with that of the use value. Secondly, not merely [because of]
its influence on the average turnover time of a given capital, as we
have indicated up to now, but also [because of] its own turnover time.
The latter circumstance becomes important where the fixed capital
appears not as a mere instrument of production within the production
process, but rather as an independent form of capital, e.g. in the form
of railways, canals, roads, aqueducts, improvements of the land, etc.
This latter aspect becomes notably important for the proportion in which
the total capital of a country is divided into these two forms. Then,
the way in which it is renewed and maintained; which the economists
formulate in the form that it can bring revenue only by means of
circulating capital etc. This last is basically nothing but the
examination of the moment where it appears, not as a particular
independent existence _alongside_ and _outside_ circulating capital, but
rather as circulating capital transformed into fixed capital. But what
we want to examine here first of all is the relation of fixed capital
not towards the outside, but rather the extent to which the relation is
given through its continued enclosure within the production process. It
is thereby posited that it is a definite moment of the production
process itself.

<It is not necessarily the case that _fixed capital_ is capital which in
all its aspects serves not for individual consumption, but only for
production. A house can serve for production as well as for consumption;
likewise all vehicles, a ship and a wagon, for pleasure outings as well
as a means of transport; a street as a means of communication for
production proper, as well as for taking walks etc. _Fixed capital_ in
this second aspect does not concern us here at all, since we regard
capital here only as process of realization and process of production.
The second aspect will enter when we study interest. Ricardo can have
only this aspect in mind when he says: ‘Depending on whether the capital
is more or less perishable, hence must be more or less frequently
reproduced in a given time, it is called circulating or fixed capital.’
(Ricardo, VIII, 19.) [74] According to this, a coffee-pot would be fixed
capital, but coffee circulating capital. The crude materialism of the
economists who regard as the _natural properties_ of things what are
social relations of production among people, and qualities which things
obtain because they are subsumed under these relations, is at the same
time just as crude an idealism, even fetishism, since it imputes social
relations to things as inherent characteristics, and thus mystifies
them. (The difficulty of defining a thing as fixed capital or
circulating capital on the basis of its natural qualities has here, by
way of exception, led the economists to the discovery that things in
themselves are neither fixed nor circulating, hence not capital at all,
any more than it is a natural quality of gold to be money.)>

(Also included in the points listed above, so that it is not forgotten,
is the circulation of fixed capital as circulating capital, i.e.
transactions through which it changes its owners.)

‘Fixed capital – _tied up:_ capital so _tied up in one kind of
production_ that it can no longer be diverted to _another kind of
production.’_ (Say, 24.) [75] ‘Fixed capital is consumed in order to
help produce the things useful to man … it consists of _durable
foundations which increase the productive powers of future labour.’_
(Sismondi, VI) [76] _‘Fixed capital_ the capital necessary to maintain
the instruments, machines etc. of labour.’ (Smith, Vol. II, p. 226.)
‘Floating capital is consumed, fixed capital merely used in the great
work of production.’ (_Economist,_ Notebook VI, p. 1.) [77] ‘We shall
show that the first stick or the first stone which he took in his hand
to assist him in the pursuit of these objects, by accomplishing a part
of his labour, performed precisely the function of the capitals
presently employed by the commercial nations.’ (Lauderdale, p. 120.
Notebook, 8a.) ‘It is one of the characteristic and distinguishing
traits of the human species to _replace labour in this way_ with a
capital transformed into machines.’ (p. 120.) (p. 9, Notebook
Lauderdale.) ‘It may now be seen that the profit of capitals always
arises either because they replace a portion of the work which man must
do by hand, or because they accomplish a portion of work which is beyond
the personal effort of man, and which he could not perform by himself.’
(p. 119 loc. cit.) Lauderdale polemicizes against Smith and Locke, whose
view that labour is the creator of profit, has the following result,
according to him: ‘if this idea of capital’s benefits were rigorously
correct, then it would follow that it would not be an _original source_
of wealth, but rather a derived one; and one could not consider capital
as one of the principles of wealth, its _profit being nothing more than
a transfer from the worker’s pocket to that of the capitalist.’_ (loc.
cit. 116, 117.) ‘The profit of capitals always arises either because
they _replace_ a portion of the work which man must do by hand, or
because they accomplish a portion of work which is beyond the personal
effort of man, and which he could not perform by himself.’ (p. 119, loc.
cit., p. 9b.) ‘It is well to remark that while the capitalist, with the
use he makes of his money, saves the class of consumers a certain amount
of labour, _he does not substitute for it an equal portion of his own;_
which proves that _his capital_ performs it, and not he himself.’ (10,
Notebook, loc. cit., p. 132.) ‘If Adam Smith, instead of imagining that
the effect of a machine is to facilitate labour, or, as he expresses it,
to increase the productive power of labour (it is only through a strange
confusion of ideas that Mr Smith has been able to assert that the effect
of capital is to increase the productive power of labour. With the same
logic one could very well claim that _to shorten by half a roundabout
path between two points is to double the walker’s speed)_ had perceived
that the money spent on machinery brings a profit by replacing labour,
he would have attributed the origin of profit to the same circumstance.’
(p. 11, p. 137.) ‘Capitals in domestic commerce, whether fixed or
circulating, far from serving to set labour in motion, far from
increasing its productive power, are, on the contrary, useful and
profitable only in two circumstances, either when they obviate the
necessity of a portion of the work which man would otherwise have to do
with his hands; or when they perform a particular piece of work which
man does not have the power to do unaided.’ This, says Lauderdale, is
not merely a semantic difference. ‘The idea that capital sets labour
into action, and adds to its productive power, gives rise to the opinion
that labour is everywhere proportional to the quantity of existing
capitals; that a country’s industry is always in proportion to the funds
employed: from which it would follow that the increase of capital is the
sovereign and unlimited means of increasing wealth. Instead of that, if
one admits that capital can have no profitable or useful employment
other than to replace a certain work, or to perform it, then one will
draw the natural conclusion that the State would gain no benefit
whatever from the possession of more capitals than it can employ in
doing the work or in substituting for it in the production and
fabrication of the things the consumer demands.’ (p. 151, 152, pp. 11,
12.) To prove his view that capital is a source _sui generis_ of profit
and hence of wealth, independently of labour, he points to the surplus
profits which the owner of a newly invented machine has before his
patent runs out and competition presses down the prices, and concludes
then with the words: ‘This change of rule for the price does not prevent
the benefit’ (as regards use value) ‘of the machine from coming from a
fund of the same nature as that from which it came before the expiration
of the patent: _this fund is always that part of a country’s revenues
which was formerly destined to pay the wages of the labour which the new
invention replaces.’_ (loc. cit. 125, p. 10b.) By contrast, Ravenstone
(IX, 32): ‘Machinery can seldom be applied with success to abridge the
labours of an individual; more time would be lost in its construction
than could be saved by its application. It is only really useful when it
acts on great masses, when a single machine can assist the labours of
thousands. It is accordingly in the most populous countries where there
are most idle men that it is always most abundant. It is not called into
action by a scarcity of men, but by the facility with which they are
brought together.’ (loc. cit.) [78]

‘Division of machines into (1) machines employed to produce power; (2)
machines whose purpose is simply to transmit power and to perform the
work.’ (Babbage, Notebook, p. 10.) [79] _‘Factory_ signifies the
cooperation of several classes of workers, adults and non-adults,
watching attentively and assiduously over a system of productive
mechanisms, continually kept in action by a central force … excludes any
workshop whose mechanism does not form a continuous system, or which
does not depend on a single source of power. Examples of this latter
class among textile factories, copper foundries etc. … In its most
rigorous sense, this term conveys the idea of a vast automaton, composed
of numerous _mechanical and intellectual organs_ operating in concert
and without interruption, towards one and the same aim, all these organs
being subordinated to a motive force which moves itself.’ (Ure, 13.)
[80]

_The labour process. – Fixed capital. Means of labour._ Machine. – _Fixed capital. Transposition of powers of labour into powers of capital both in fixed and in circulating capital. – To what extent_ fixed capital (machine) _creates_ value. – _Lauderdale. Machine presupposes a mass of workers._

Capital which consumes itself in the production process, or fixed
capital, is the _means of production_ in the strict sense. In a broader
sense the entire production process and each of its moments, such as
circulation – as regards its material side – is only a means of
production for capital, for which value alone is the end in itself.
Regarded as a physical substance, the raw material itself is a means of
production for the product etc.

But the determination that the use value of fixed capital is that which
eats itself up in the production process is identical to the proposition
that it is used in this process only as a means, and itself exists
merely as an agency for the transformation of the raw material into the
product. As such a means of production, its use value can be that it is
merely the technological condition for the occurrence of the process
(the site where the production process proceeds), as with buildings
etc., or that it is a direct condition of the action of the means of
production proper, like all _matières instrumentales._ Both are in turn
only the material presuppositions for the production process generally,
or for the employment and maintenance of the means of labour. The
latter, however, in the proper sense, serves only within production and
for production, and has no other use value.

Originally, when we examined the development of value into capital, the
labour process was simply included within capital, and, as regards its
physical conditions, its material presence, capital appeared as the
totality of the conditions of this process, and correspondingly sorted
itself out into certain qualitatively different parts, _material of
labour_ (this, not raw material, is the correct expression of the
concept), _means of labour_ and _living labour._ On one side, capital
was divided into these three elements in accordance with its material
composition; on the other, the _labour process_ (or the merging of these
elements into each other within the process) was their moving unity, the
product their static unity. In this form, the material elements –
material of labour, means of labour and living labour – appeared merely
as the essential moments of the labour process itself, which capital
appropriates. But this material side – or, its character as use value
and as real process – did not at all coincide with its formal side. In
the latter,

(1) the three elements in which it appears before the exchange with
labour capacity, before the real process, appeared merely as
quantitatively different portions of itself, as quantities of value of
which it, itself, as sum, forms the unity. The physical form, the use
value, in which these different portions existed did not in any way
alter their formal identity from this side. As far as their formal side
was concerned, they appeared only as quantitative subdivisions of
capital;

(2) within the process itself, as regards the form, the elements of
labour and the two others were distinct only in so far as the latter
were specified as constant values, and the former as value-positing. But
as far as their distinctness as use values, their material side was
concerned, this fell entirely outside the capital’s specific character
as form. Now, however, with the distinction between circulating capital
(raw material and product) and _fixed capital_ (means of labour), the
distinctness of the elements as use values is posited simultaneously as
a distinction within capital as capital, on its formal side. The
relation between the factors, which had been merely quantitative, now
appears as a qualitative division within capital itself, and as a
determinant of its total movement (turnover). Likewise, the material of
labour and the product of labour, this neutral precipitate of the labour
process, are already, as _raw material_ and _product,_ materially
specified no longer as material and product of labour, but rather as the
use value of capital itself in different phases.

As long as the means of labour remains a means of labour in the proper
sense of the term, such as it is directly, historically, adopted by
capital and included in its realization process, it undergoes a merely
formal modification, by appearing now as a means of labour not only in
regard to its material side, but also at the same time as a particular
mode of the presence of capital, determined by its total process – as
_fixed capital._ But, once adopted into the production process of
capital, the means of labour passes through different metamorphoses,
whose culmination is the _machine,_ or rather, an _automatic system of
machinery_ (system of machinery: the _automatic_ one is merely its most
complete, most adequate form, and alone transforms machinery into a
system), set in motion by an automaton, a moving power that moves
itself; this automaton consisting of numerous mechanical and
intellectual organs, so that the workers themselves are cast merely as
its conscious linkages. In the machine, and even more in machinery as an
automatic system, the use value, i.e. the material quality of the means
of labour, is transformed into an existence adequate to fixed capital
and to capital as such; and the form in which it was adopted into the
production process of capital, the direct means of labour, is superseded
by a form posited by capital itself and corresponding to it. In no way
does the machine appear as the individual worker’s means of labour. Its
distinguishing characteristic is not in the least, as with the means of
labour, to transmit the worker’s activity to the object; this activity,
rather, is posited in such a way that it merely transmits the machine’s
work, the machine’s action, on to the raw material – supervises it and
guards against interruptions. Not as with the instrument, which the
worker animates and makes into his organ with his skill and strength,
and whose handling therefore depends on his virtuosity. Rather, it is
the machine which possesses skill and strength in place of the worker,
is itself the virtuoso, with a soul of its own in the mechanical laws
acting through it; and it consumes coal, oil etc. _(matières
instrumentales),_ just as the worker consumes food, to keep up its
perpetual motion. The worker’s activity, reduced to a mere abstraction
of activity, is determined and regulated on all sides by the movement of
the machinery, and not the opposite. The science which compels the
inanimate limbs of the machinery, by their construction, to act
purposefully, as an automaton, does not exist in the worker’s
consciousness, but rather acts upon him through the machine as an alien
power, as the power of the machine itself. The appropriation of living
labour by objectified labour – of the power or activity which creates
value by value existing for-itself – which lies in the concept of
capital, is posited, in production resting on machinery, as the
character of the production process itself, including its material
elements and its material motion. The production process has ceased to
be a labour process in the sense of a process dominated by labour as its
governing unity. Labour appears, rather, merely as a conscious organ,
scattered among the individual living workers at numerous points of the
mechanical system; subsumed under the total process of the machinery
itself, as itself only a link of the system, whose unity exists not in
the living workers, but rather in the living (active) machinery, which
confronts his individual, insignificant doings as a mighty organism. In
machinery, objectified labour confronts living labour within the labour
process itself as the power which rules it; a power which, as the
appropriation of living labour, is the form of capital. The
transformation of the means of labour into machinery, and of living
labour into a mere living accessory of this machinery, as the means of
its action, also posits the absorption of the labour process in its
material character as a mere moment of the realization process of
capital. The increase of the productive force of labour and the greatest
possible negation of necessary labour is the necessary tendency of
capital, as we have seen. The transformation of the means of labour into
machinery is the realization of this tendency. In machinery, objectified
labour materially confronts living labour as a ruling power and as an
active subsumption of the latter under itself, not only by appropriating
it, but in the real production process itself; the relation of capital
as value which appropriates value-creating activity is, in fixed capital
existing as machinery, posited at the same time as the relation of the
use value of capital to the use value of labour capacity; further, the
value objectified in machinery appears as a presupposition against which
the value-creating power of the individual labour capacity is an
infinitesimal, vanishing magnitude; the production in enormous mass
quantities which is posited with machinery destroys every connection of
the product with the direct need of the producer, and hence with direct
use value; it is already posited in the form of the product’s production
and in the relations in which it is produced that it is produced only as
a conveyor of value, and its use value only as condition to that end. In
machinery, objectified labour itself appears not only in the form of
product or of the product employed as means of labour, but in the form
of the force of production itself. The development of the means of
labour into machinery is not an accidental moment of capital, but is
rather the historical reshaping of the traditional, inherited means of
labour into a form adequate to capital. The accumulation of knowledge
and of skill, of the general productive forces of the social brain, is
thus absorbed into capital, as opposed to labour, and hence appears as
an attribute of capital, and more specifically of _fixed capital,_ in so
far as it enters into the production process as a means of production
proper. _Machinery_ appears, then, as the most adequate form of _fixed
capital,_ and fixed capital, in so far as capital’s relations with
itself are concerned, appears as _the most adequate form of capital_ as
such. In another respect, however, in so far as fixed capital is
condemned to an existence within the confines of a specific use value,
it does not correspond to the concept of capital, which, as value, is
indifferent to every specific form of use value, and can adopt or shed
any of them as equivalent incarnations. In this respect, as regards
capital’s external relations, it is _circulating capital_ which appears
as the adequate form of capital, and not fixed capital.

Further, in so far as machinery develops with the accumulation of
society’s science, of productive force generally, general social labour
presents itself not in labour but in capital. The productive force of
society is measured in _fixed capital,_ exists there in its objective
form; and, inversely, the productive force of capital grows with this
general progress, which capital appropriates free of charge. This is not
the place to go into the development of machinery in detail; rather only
in its general aspect; in so far as the _means of labour,_ as a physical
thing, loses its direct form, becomes _fixed capital,_ and confronts the
worker physically as _capital._ In machinery, knowledge appears as
alien, external to him; and living labour [as] subsumed under
self-activating objectified labour. The worker appears as superfluous to
the extent that his action is not determined by [capital’s]
requirements.


NOTEBOOK VII

End of February. March. End of May – Beginning of June 1858



THE CHAPTER ON CAPITAL (CONTINUATION)


The full development of capital, therefore, takes place – or capital has
posited the mode of production corresponding to it – only when the means
of labour has not only taken the economic form of _fixed capital,_ but
has also been suspended in its immediate form, and when _fixed capital_
appears as a machine within the production process, opposite labour; and
the entire production process appears as not subsumed under the direct
skilfulness of the worker, but rather as the technological application
of science. [It is,] hence, the tendency of capital to give production a
scientific character; direct labour [is] reduced to a mere moment of
this process. As with the transformation of value into capital, so does
it appear in the further development of capital, that it presupposes a
certain given historical development of the productive forces on one
side – science too [is] among these productive forces – and, on the
other, drives and forces them further onwards.

Thus the quantitative extent and the effectiveness (intensity) to which
capital is developed as fixed capital indicate the general degree to
which capital is developed as capital, as power over living labour, and
to which it has conquered the production process as such. Also, in the
sense that it expresses the accumulation of objectified productive
forces, and likewise of objectified labour. However, while capital gives
itself its adequate form as use value within the production process only
in the form of machinery and other material manifestations of fixed
capital, such as railways etc. (to which we shall return later), this in
no way means that this use value – machinery as such – is capital, or
that its existence as machinery is identical with its existence as
capital; any more than gold would cease to have use value as gold if it
were no longer _money._ Machinery does not lose its use value as soon as
it ceases to be capital. While machinery is the most appropriate form of
the use value of fixed capital, it does not at all follow that therefore
subsumption under the social relation of capital is the most appropriate
and ultimate social relation of production for the application of
machinery.

To the degree that labour time – the mere quantity of labour – is
posited by capital as the sole determinant element, to that degree does
direct labour and its quantity disappear as the determinant principle of
production – of the creation of use values – and is reduced both
quantitatively, to a smaller proportion, and qualitatively, as an, of
course, indispensable but subordinate moment, compared to general
scientific labour, technological application of natural sciences, on one
side, and to the general productive force arising from social
combination [_Gliederung_] in total production on the other side – a
combination which appears as a natural fruit of social labour (although
it is a historic product). Capital thus works towards its own
dissolution as the form dominating production.

While, then, in one respect the transformation of the production process
from the simple labour process into a scientific process, which
subjugates the forces of nature and compels them to work in the service
of human needs, appears as a quality of _fixed capital_ in contrast to
living labour; while individual labour as such has ceased altogether to
appear as productive, is productive, rather, only in these common
labours which subordinate the forces of nature to themselves, and while
this elevation of direct labour into social labour appears as a
reduction of individual labour to the level of helplessness in face of
the communality [_Gemeinsamkeit_] represented by and concentrated in
capital; so does it now appear, in another respect, as a quality of
_circulating capital,_ to maintain labour in one branch of production by
means of _co-existing labour_ in another. In small-scale circulation,
capital advances the worker the wages which the latter exchanges for
products necessary for his consumption. The money he obtains has this
power only because others are working alongside him at the same time;
and capital can give him claims on alien labour, in the form of money,
only because it has appropriated his own labour. This exchange of one’s
own labour with alien labour appears here not as mediated and determined
by the simultaneous existence of the labour of others, but rather by the
advance which capital makes. The worker’s ability to engage in the
exchange of substances necessary for his consumption during production
appears as due to an attribute of the part of _circulating capital_
which is paid to the worker, and of circulating capital generally. It
appears not as an exchange of substances between the simultaneous labour
powers, but as the metabolism [_Stoffwechsel_] of capital; as the
existence of circulating capital. Thus all powers of labour are
transposed into powers of capital; the productive power of labour into
fixed capital (posited as external to labour and as existing
independently of it (as object [_sachlich_]); and, in circulating
capital, the fact that the worker himself has created the conditions for
the repetition of his labour, and that the exchange of this, his labour,
is mediated by the co-existing labour of others, appears in such a way
that capital gives him an advance and posits the simultaneity of the
branches of labour. (These last two aspects actually belong to
accumulation.) Capital in the form of circulating capital posits itself
as mediator between the different workers.

_Fixed capital,_ in its character as means of production, whose most
adequate form [is] machinery, produces value, i.e. increases the value
of the product, in only two respects: (1) in so far as it _has_ value;
i.e. is itself the product of labour, a certain quantity of labour in
objectified form; (2) in so far as it increases the relation of surplus
labour to necessary labour, by enabling labour, through an increase of
its productive power, to create a greater mass of the products required
for the maintenance of living labour capacity in a shorter time. It is
therefore a highly absurd bourgeois assertion that the worker shares
with the capitalist, because the latter, with fixed capital (which is,
as far as that goes, itself a product of labour, and of _alien labour_
merely appropriated by capital) makes labour easier for him (rather, he
robs it of all independence and attractive character, by means of the
machine), or makes his labour shorter. Capital employs machinery,
rather, only to the extent that it enables the worker to work a larger
part of his time for capital, to relate to a larger part of his time as
time which does not belong to him, to work longer for another. Through
this process, the amount of labour necessary for the production of a
given object is indeed reduced to a minimum, but only in order to
realize a maximum of labour in the maximum number of such objects. The
first aspect is important, because capital here – quite unintentionally
– reduces human labour, expenditure of energy, to a minimum. This will
redound to the benefit of emancipated labour, and is the condition of
its emancipation. From what has been said, it is clear how absurd
Lauderdale is when he wants to make fixed capital into an independent
source of value, independent of labour time. It is such a source only in
so far as it is itself objectified labour time, and in so far as it
posits surplus labour time. The employment of machinery itself
historically presupposes – see above, Ravenstone – superfluous hands.
Machinery inserts itself to replace labour only where there is an
overflow of labour powers. Only in the imagination of economists does it
leap to the aid of the individual worker. It can be effective only with
masses of workers, whose concentration relative to capital is one of its
historic presuppositions, as we have seen. It enters not in order to
replace labour power where this is lacking, but rather in order to
reduce massively available labour power to its necessary measure.
Machinery enters only where labour capacity is on hand in masses.
(Return to this.)

Lauderdale believes himself to have made the great discovery that
machinery does not increase the productive power of labour, because it
rather replaces the latter, or does what labour cannot do with its own
power. It belongs to the concept of capital that the increased
productive force of labour is posited rather as the increase of a force
[_Kraft_] outside itself, and as labour’s own debilitation
[_Entkräftung_]. The hand tool makes the worker independent – posits him
as proprietor. Machinery – as fixed capital – posits him as dependent,
posits him as appropriated. This effect of machinery holds only in so
far as it is cast into the role of fixed capital, and this it is only
because the worker relates to it as wage-worker, and the active
individual generally, as mere worker.

 

Fixed capital and circulating capital _as two particular kinds of capital. Fixed capital and continuity of the production process. – Machinery and living labour. (Business of inventing)_

While, up to now, fixed capital and circulating capital appeared merely
as different passing aspects of capital, they have now hardened into two
particular modes of its existence, and fixed capital appears separately
alongside circulating capital. They are now two particular kinds of
capital. In so far as a capital is examined in a particular branch of
production, it appears as divided into these two portions, or splits
into these two kinds of capital in certain p[rop]ortions.

The division within the production process, originally between means of
labour and material of labour, and finally product of labour, now
appears as circulating capital (the last two) and fixed capital [the
first]. [1] The split within capital as regards its merely physical
aspect has now entered into its form itself, and appears as
differentiating it.

From a viewpoint such as Lauderdale’s etc., who would like to have
capital as such, separately from labour, create _value_ and hence also
_surplus value_ (or profit), fixed capital – namely that whose physical
presence or use value is machinery – is the form which gives their
superficial fallacies still the greatest semblance of validity. The
answer to them, e.g. in _Labour Defended,_ [is] that the road-builder
may share [profits] with the road-user, but the ‘road’ itself cannot do
so. [2]

Circulating capital – presupposing that it really passes through its
different phases – brings about the decrease or increase, the brevity or
length of circulation time, the easier or more troublesome completion of
the different stages of circulation, a decrease of the surplus value
which could be created in a given period of time without these
interruptions – either _because the number of reproductions grows
smaller,_ or because the quantity of _capital continuously engaged in
the production process_ is reduced. In both cases this is not a
reduction of the initial value, but rather a reduction of the rate of
its growth. From the moment, however, when fixed capital has developed
to a certain extent – and this extent, as we indicated, is the measure
of the development of large industry generally – hence fixed capital
increases in proportion to the development of large industry’s
productive forces – it is itself the objectification of these productive
forces, as presupposed product – from this instant on, every
interruption of the production process acts as a direct reduction of
capital itself, of its initial value. The value of fixed capital is
reproduced only in so far as it is used up in the production process.
Through disuse it loses its use value without its value passing on to
the product. Hence, the greater the scale on which fixed capital
develops, in the sense in which we regard it here, the more does the
_continuity of the production process_ or the constant flow of
reproduction become an externally compelling condition for the mode of
production founded on capital.

In machinery, the appropriation of living labour by capital achieves a
direct reality in this respect as well: It is, firstly, the analysis and
application of mechanical and chemical laws, arising directly out of
science, which enables the machine to perform the same labour as that
previously performed by the worker. However, the development of
machinery along this path occurs only when large industry has already
reached a higher stage, and all the sciences have been pressed into the
service of capital; and when, secondly, the available machinery itself
already provides great capabilities. Invention then becomes a business,
and the application of science to direct production itself becomes a
prospect which determines and solicits it. But this is not the road
along which machinery, by and large, arose, and even less the road on
which it progresses in detail. This road is, rather, dissection
[_Analyse_] – through the division of labour, which gradually transforms
the workers’ operations into more and more mechanical ones, so that at a
certain point a mechanism can step into their places. (_See under
economy of power._) Thus, the specific mode of working here appears
directly as becoming transferred from the worker to capital in the form
of the machine, and his own labour capacity devalued thereby. Hence the
workers’ struggle against machinery. What was the living worker’s
activity becomes the activity of the machine. Thus the appropriation of
labour by capital confronts the worker in a coarsely sensuous form;
capital absorbs labour into itself – ‘as though its body were by love
possessed’. [3]

_Contradiction between the foundation of bourgeois production_ (value as measure) _and its development. Machines etc._

The exchange of living labour for objectified labour – i.e. the positing
of social labour in the form of the contradiction of capital and wage
labour – is the ultimate development of the _value-relation_ and of
production resting on value. Its presupposition is – and remains – the
mass of direct labour time, the quantity of labour employed, as the
determinant factor in the production of wealth. But to the degree that
large industry develops, the creation of real wealth comes to depend
less on labour time and on the amount of labour employed than on the
power of the agencies set in motion during labour time, whose ‘powerful
effectiveness’ is itself in turn out of all proportion to the direct
labour time spent on their production, but depends rather on the general
state of science and on the progress of technology, or the application
of this science to production. (The development of this science,
especially natural science, and all others with the latter, is itself in
turn related to the development of material production.) Agriculture,
e.g., becomes merely the application of the science of material
metabolism, its regulation for the greatest advantage of the entire body
of society. Real wealth manifests itself, rather – and large industry
reveals this – in the monstrous disproportion between the labour time
applied, and its product, as well as in the qualitative imbalance
between labour, reduced to a pure abstraction, and the power of the
production process it superintends. Labour no longer appears so much to
be included within the production process; rather, the human being comes
to relate more as watchman and regulator to the production process
itself. (What holds for machinery holds likewise for the combination of
human activities and the development of human intercourse.) No longer
does the worker insert a modified natural thing [_Naturgegenstand_] as
middle link between the object [_Objekt_] and himself; rather, he
inserts the process of nature, transformed into an industrial process,
as a means between himself and inorganic nature, mastering it. He steps
to the side of the production process instead of being its chief actor.
In this transformation, it is neither the direct human labour he himself
performs, nor the time during which he works, but rather the
appropriation of his own general productive power, his understanding of
nature and his mastery over it by virtue of his presence as a social
body – it is, in a word, the development of the social individual which
appears as the great foundation-stone of production and of wealth. The
_theft of alien labour time, on which the present wealth is based,_
appears a miserable foundation in face of this new one, created by
large-scale industry itself. As soon as labour in the direct form has
ceased to be the great well-spring of wealth, labour time ceases and
must cease to be its measure, and hence exchange value [must cease to be
the measure] of use value. The _surplus labour of the mass_ has ceased
to be the condition for the development of general wealth, just as the
_non-labour of the few,_ for the development of the general powers of
the human head. With that, production based on exchange value breaks
down, and the direct, material production process is stripped of the
form of penury and antithesis. The free development of individualities,
and hence not the reduction of necessary labour time so as to posit
surplus labour, but rather the general reduction of the necessary labour
of society to a minimum, which then corresponds to the artistic,
scientific etc. development of the individuals in the time set free, and
with the means created, for all of them. Capital itself is the moving
contradiction, [in] that it presses to reduce labour time to a minimum,
while it posits labour time, on the other side, as sole measure and
source of wealth. Hence it diminishes labour time in the necessary form
so as to increase it in the superfluous form; hence posits the
superfluous in growing measure as a condition – question of life or
death – for the necessary. On the one side, then, it calls to life all
the powers of science and of nature, as of social combination and of
social intercourse, in order to make the creation of wealth independent
(relatively) of the labour time employed on it. On the other side, it
wants to use labour time as the measuring rod for the giant social
forces thereby created, and to confine them within the limits required
to maintain the already created value as value. Forces of production and
social relations – two different sides of the development of the social
individual – appear to capital as mere means, and are merely means for
it to produce on its limited foundation. In fact, however, they are the
material conditions to blow this foundation sky-high. ‘Truly wealthy a
nation, when the working day is 6 rather than 12 hours. _Wealth_ is not
command over surplus labour time’ (real wealth), ‘but rather,
_disposable time_ outside that needed in direct production, for _every
individual_ and the whole society.’ (_The Source and Remedy_ etc. 1821,
p. 6.)

Nature builds no machines, no locomotives, railways, electric
telegraphs, self-acting mules etc. These are products of human industry;
natural material transformed into organs of the human will over nature,
or of human participation in nature. They are _organs of the human
brain, created by the human hand;_ the power of knowledge, objectified.
The development of fixed capital indicates to what degree general social
knowledge has become a _direct force of production,_ and to what degree,
hence, the conditions of the process of social life itself have come
under the control of the general intellect and been transformed in
accordance with it. To what degree the powers of social production have
been produced, not only in the form of knowledge, but also as immediate
organs of social practice, of the real life process.

Significance of the development of fixed capital _(for the development of capital generally). Relation between the creation of fixed capital and circulating capital. Disposable time. To create it, chief role of capital. Contradictory form of the same in capital. – Productivity of labour and production of fixed capital._ (The Source and Remedy.) – _Use and consume:_ Economist. _Durability of fixed capital_

_The development of fixed capital indicates in still another respect the
degree of development of wealth generally, or of capital._ The aim of
production oriented directly towards use value, as well as of that
directly oriented towards exchange value, is the product itself,
destined for consumption. The part of production which is oriented
towards the production of fixed capital does not produce direct objects
of individual gratification, nor direct exchange values; at least not
directly realizable exchange values. _Hence, only when a certain degree
of productivity has already been reached – so that a part of production
time is sufficient for immediate production – can an increasingly large
part be applied to the production of the means of production._ This
requires that society be able to wait; that a large part of the wealth
already created can be withdrawn both from immediate consumption and
from production for immediate consumption, in order to employ this part
for labour which is _not immediately productive_ (within the material
production process itself). This requires a certain level of
productivity and of relative overabundance, and, more specifically, a
level directly related to the transformation of circulating capital into
fixed capital. As the _magnitude of relative surplus labour depends on
the productivity of necessary labour, so does the magnitude of labour
time –_ living as well as objectified – _employed on the production of
fixed capital depend on the productivity of the labour time spent in the
direct production of products. Surplus population_ (from this
standpoint), as well as _surplus production,_ is a condition for this.
That is, the output of the time employed in direct production must be
larger, relatively, than is directly required for the reproduction of
the capital employed in these branches of industry. The _smaller_ the
direct fruits borne by _fixed capital,_ the less it intervenes in the
_direct production process,_ the greater must be this relative _surplus
population and surplus production;_ thus, more to build railways,
canals, aqueducts, telegraphs etc. than to build the machinery directly
active in the direct production process. Hence – a subject to which we
will return later – in the constant under- and over-production of modern
industry – constant fluctuations and convulsions arise from the
disproportion, when sometimes too little, then again too much
circulating capital is transformed into fixed capital.

<_The creation of a large quantity of disposable time_ apart from
necessary labour time for society generally and each of its members
(i.e. room for the development of the individuals’ full productive
forces, hence those of society also), this creation of not-labour time
appears in the stage of capital, as of all earlier ones, as not-labour
time, free time, for a few. What capital adds is that it increases the
surplus labour time of the mass by all the means of art and science,
because its wealth consists directly in the appropriation of surplus
labour time; since _value directly its purpose,_ not use value. It is
thus, despite itself, instrumental in creating the means of social
disposable time, in order to reduce labour time for the whole society to
a diminishing minimum, and thus to free everyone’s time for their own
development. But its tendency always, on the one side, _to create
disposable time, on the other, to convert it into surplus labour._ If it
succeeds too well at the first, then it suffers from surplus production,
and then necessary labour is interrupted, because _no surplus labour can
be realized by capital._ The more this contradiction develops, the more
does it become evident that the growth of the forces of production can
no longer be bound up with the appropriation of alien labour, but that
the mass of workers must themselves appropriate their own surplus
labour. Once they have done so – and _disposable time_ thereby ceases to
have an _antithetical_ existence – then, on one side, necessary labour
time will be measured by the needs of the social individual, and, on the
other, the development of the power of social production will grow so
rapidly that, even though production is now calculated for the wealth of
all, _disposable time_ will grow for all. For real wealth is the
developed productive power of all individuals. The measure of wealth is
then not any longer, in any way, labour time, but rather disposable
time. _Labour time as the measure of value_ posits wealth itself as
founded on poverty, and disposable time as existing _in and because of
the antithesis to surplus labour time;_ or, the positing of an
individual’s entire time as labour time, and his degradation therefore
to mere worker, subsumption under labour. _The most developed machinery
thus forces the worker to work longer than the savage does, or than he
himself did with the simplest, crudest tools.>_

‘If the entire labour of a country were sufficient only to raise the
support of the whole population, there would be no _surplus labour,_
consequently nothing that could be allowed to accumulate as capital. If
in one year the people raises enough for the support of two years, one
year’s consumption must perish, or for one year men must cease from
productive labour. But the _possessors of [the] surplus produce or
capital …_ employ people upon _something not directly and immediately
productive,_ e.g. in the erection of machinery. So it goes on.’ (_The
Source and Remedy of the National Difficulties,_ p. 4.)

<As the basis on which large industry rests, the appropriation of alien
labour time, ceases, with its development, to make up or to create
wealth, so does _direct labour_ as such cease to be the basis of
production, since, in one respect, it is transformed more into a
supervisory and regulatory activity; but then also because the product
ceases to be the product of isolated direct labour, and the
_combination_ of social activity appears, rather, as the producer. ‘As
soon as the division of labour is developed, almost every piece of work
done by a single individual is a part of a whole, _having no value or
utility of itself. There is nothing on which the labourer can seize:
this is my produce, this I will keep to myself.’_ (_Labour Defended,_ p.
25, 1, 2, XI.) In direct exchange, individual direct labour appears as
realized in a particular product or part of the product, and its
communal, social character – its character as objectification of general
labour and satisfaction of the general need – as posited through
exchange alone. In the production process of large-scale industry, by
contrast, just as the conquest of the forces of nature by the social
intellect is the precondition of the productive power of the means of
labour as developed into the automatic process, on one side, so, on the
other, is _the labour of the individual in its direct presence posited
as suspended individual, i.e. as social, labour. Thus the other basis of
this mode of production falls away._>

The labour time employed in the production of fixed capital relates to
that employed in the production of circulating capital, within the
production process of capital itself, as does _surplus labour time to
necessary_ labour time. To the degree that production aimed at the
satisfaction of immediate need becomes more productive, a greater part
of production can be directed towards the need of production itself, or
the production of means of production. In so far as the production of
_fixed capital,_ even in its physical aspect, is directed immediately
not towards the production of direct use values, or towards the
production of values required for the direct reproduction of capital –
i.e. those which themselves in turn represent use value in the
value-creation process – but rather towards the production of the means
of value creation, that is, not towards value as an immediate object,
but rather towards value creation, towards the means of realization, as
an immediate object of production – the production of value posited
physically in the object of production itself, as the aim of production,
the objectification of productive force, the value-producing power of
capital – to that extent, it is in the production of _fixed capital that
capital posits itself as end-in-itself_ and appears active as capital,
_to a higher power than it does in the production of circulating
capital._ Hence, in this respect as well, the dimension already
possessed by fixed capital, which its production occupies within total
production, is the measuring rod _of the development_ of wealth founded
on the mode of production of capital.

‘The number of workers depends as much on _circulating capital_ as it
depends on the quantity _of products of co-existing labour,_ which
labourers are allowed to consume.’ _(Labour Defended,_ p. 20.)

In all the excerpts cited above from various economists fixed capital is
regarded as the part of capital which is locked into the production
process. ‘Floating capital is consumed; fixed capital is merely used in
the great process of production.’ _(Economist,_ VI, 1.) [4] This wrong,
and holds only for the part of circulating capital which is itself
consumed by the fixed capital, the _matières instrumentales._ The only
thing consumed ‘in the great process of production’, if this means the
immediate production process, is _fixed capital._ Consumption within the
production process is, however, in fact _use, wearing-out._ Furthermore,
the _greater durability of fixed capital_ must not be conceived as a
purely physical quality. The iron and the wood which make up the bed I
sleep in, or the stones making up the house I live in, or the marble
statue which decorates a palace, are just as durable as iron and wood
etc. used for machinery. But _durability_ is a condition for the
instrument, the means of production, not only on the technical ground
that metals etc. are the chief material of all machinery, but rather
because the instrument is destined to play the same role constantly in
repeated processes of production. Its durability as means of production
is a required quality of its use value. The more often it must be
replaced, the costlier it is; the larger the part of capital which would
have to be spent on it uselessly. Its durability is its existence as
means of production. Its duration is an increase of its productive
force. With circulating capital, by contrast, in so far as it is not
transformed into fixed capital, durability is in no way connected with
the act of production itself and is therefore not a conceptually posited
moment. The fact that among the articles thrown into the consumption
fund there are some which are in turn characterized as _fixed capital_
because they are consumed slowly, and can be consumed by many
individuals in series, is connected with further determinations (renting
rather than buying, interest etc.) with which we are not yet here
concerned.

‘Since the general introduction of soulless mechanism in British
manufactures, people have with rare exceptions been treated as a
secondary and subordinate machine, and far more attention has been given
to the perfection of the raw materials of wood and metals than to those
of body and spirit.’ (p. 31. Robert Owen: _Essays on the Formation of
the Human Character,_ 1840, London.)

_Real saving – economy – = saving of labour time = development of productive force. Suspension of the contradiction between free time and labour time. – True conception of the process of social production_

<Real economy – saving – consists of the saving of labour time (minimum
(and minimization) of production costs); but this saving identical with
development of the productive force. Hence in no way _abstinence from
consumption,_ but rather the development of power, of capabilities of
production, and hence both of the capabilities as well as the means of
consumption. The capability to consume is a condition of consumption,
hence its primary means, and this capability is the development of an
individual potential, a force of production. The saving of labour time
[is] equal to an increase of free time, i.e. time for the full
development of the individual, which in turn reacts back upon the
productive power of labour as itself the greatest productive power. From
the standpoint of the direct production process it can be regarded as
the production of _fixed capital,_ this fixed capital being man himself.
It goes without saying, by the way, that direct labour time itself
cannot remain in the abstract antithesis to free time in which it
appears from the perspective of bourgeois economy. Labour cannot become
play, as Fourier would like, [5] although it remains his great
contribution to have expressed the suspension not of distribution, but
of the mode of production itself, in a higher form, as the ultimate
object. Free time – which is both idle time and time for higher activity
– has naturally transformed its possessor into a different subject, and
he then enters into the direct production process as this different
subject. This process is then both discipline, as regards the human
being in the process of becoming; and, at the same time, practice
[_Ausübung_], experimental science, materially creative and objectifying
science, as regards the human being who has become, in whose head exists
the accumulated knowledge of society. For both, in so far as labour
requires practical use of the hands and free bodily movement, as in
agriculture, at the same time exercise.

As the system of bourgeois economy has developed for us only by degrees,
so too its negation, which is its ultimate result. We are still
concerned now with the direct production process. When we consider
bourgeois society in the long view and as a whole, then the final result
of the process of social production always appears as the society
itself, i.e. the human being itself in its social relations. Everything
that has a fixed form, such as the product etc., appears as merely a
moment, a vanishing moment, in this movement. The direct production
process itself here appears only as a moment. The conditions and
objectifications of the process are themselves equally moments of it,
and its only subjects are the individuals, but individuals in mutual
relationships, which they equally reproduce and produce anew. The
constant process of their own movement, in which they renew themselves
even as they renew the world of wealth they create.>

Owen’s _historical conception of industrial_ (capitalist) _production_

(In his _Six Lectures Delivered at Manchester,_ 1837, Owen speaks about
the difference which capital, by its very growth (and widespread
appearance, and it obtains the latter only with large-scale industry,
which is connected with the development of fixed capital), creates
between workers and capitalists; but formulates the development of
capital as a _necessary condition_ for the recreation of society, and
recounts about himself: ‘It was by being gradually trained to create and
conduct some of these large’ (manufacturing) ‘establishments, that your
lecturer’ (Owen himself) ‘was taught to understand the great errors and
disadvantages of the past and present attempts to ameliorate the
character and situation of his fellow beings.’ (p. 58.) We here put down
the entire excerpt, to be used on another occasion.

‘The producers of developed wealth can be divided into workers in soft
and workers in hard materials, under the immediate direction generally
of masters whose object it is to make money through the labour of those
they employ. Before the introduction of the chemical and mechanical
manufacturing system, operations were carried out on a limited scale;
there were many small masters, each with a few day-labourers, who
expected in due time to become small masters themselves. They usually
ate at the same table and lived together; a spirit and feeling of
equality reigned among them. Since the period when scientific power
began by and large to be employed in the business of manufacturing, a
gradual change has taken place in this regard. Almost all manufactures,
to be successful, must now be carried out extensively and with a great
capital; small masters with small capitals have only little chance of
success, particularly in the manufactures of soft materials, such as
cotton, wool, flax etc.; and it is indeed evident now, that so long as
the present classification of society and the mode of directing business
life should endure, the small masters will be increasingly displaced by
those who possess great capitals, and that the former relatively happier
equality among the producers must give way to the greatest inequality
between master and worker, such as has never before occurred in the
history of mankind. The large capitalist is now elevated to the position
of a commanding lord, treating the health, the life and death,
indirectly, of his slaves, as he likes. He obtains this power through
combination with other great capitalists, engaged in the same interest
with himself, and thus effectively bends to his purpose those he
employs. The large capitalist now swims in wealth, whose proper use he
has not been taught and does not know. Through his wealth, he has gained
power. His wealth and his power blind his reason; and when he oppresses
altogether grievously, he believes he is bestowing favours … His
servants, as they are called, his slaves in fact, are reduced to the
most hopeless degradation; the majority robbed of health, of domestic
comfort, of the leisure and healthy open-air pleasures of earlier days.
Through excessive exhaustion of their powers, brought about by lengthy,
drawn-out monotonous occupations, they are seduced into habits of
intemperance, and made unfit for thinking or reflection. They can have
no physical, intellectual or moral amusements other than of the worst
sort; all real pleasures of life are far distant from them. The life
which a very large part of the workers lead under the present system is,
in a word, not worth having. But the individuals are not to blame for
the changes of which these are the result; _they proceed in the regular
order of nature and are preparatory and necessary stages towards the
great and important social revolution_ now in progress. Without great
capitals no great establishments can be founded; men cannot be brought
to understand the practicability of effecting new combinations, in order
to ensure a superior character to all and the production of more annual
wealth than can be consumed by all; and that wealth, too, should be of a
higher kind than that hitherto generally produced.’ (loc. cit. 56, 57.)
‘It is this new chemical and mechanical manufacturing system which now
expands human abilities, and prepares men to understand and to adopt
other principles and practices, and thus to effect the most beneficial
change in affairs which the world has yet known. And it is this new
manufacturing system which now creates the necessity for another and
higher classification of society.’ (loc. cit. 58.))

_Capital and value of natural agencies. – Scope of fixed capital indicates the level of capitalist production. – Determination of raw material, product, instrument of production, consumption. – Is money fixed capital or circulating capital? – Fixed capital and circulating capital in regard to individual consumption_

We remarked earlier that the force of production (fixed capital) only
has value, hence only imparts value, in so far as it is itself produced,
itself a given quantity of objectified labour time. But now natural
agencies enter in, such as water, land (this notably), mines etc., which
are appropriated, hence possess exchange value, and hence come as values
into the calculation of production costs. This is, in a word, the entry
of landed property (which includes earth, mines, water). The value of
means of production which are not the product of labour does not belong
here yet, since it does not arise out of the examination of capital
itself. They appear for capital, initially, as given, historic
presupposition. And we leave them as such, here. Only the form of landed
property – or of natural agencies as value-determining magnitudes –
modified to correspond to capital belongs within the examination of the
system of bourgeois economy. It does not affect the examination of
capital at the point we have so far reached, to regard land etc. as a
form of fixed capital.

Since _fixed capital,_ in the sense of a produced production force, as
agency of production, increases the mass of use values created in a
given time, it cannot grow without the raw material it works on also
growing (in manufacturing industry. In the extractive industries, such
as fishery, mining, labour merely consists in overpowering the obstacles
in the way of the seizure and appropriation of the raw products or
primary products. There is no raw material to be worked up for
production; rather, the existing raw product is appropriated. By
contrast, in agriculture the raw material is the earth itself; seed the
circulating capital etc.). Its employment on a larger scale thus
presupposes expansion of the part of circulating capital consisting of
raw materials; hence growth of capital generally. It likewise
presupposes (relative) decrease of the portion of capital exchanged for
living labour.

In _fixed capital,_ capital exists materially, too, not only as
objectified labour, destined to serve as the means of new labour, but
rather as value, whose use value is to create new values. The existence
of fixed capital is therefore ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν its existence as productive
capital. Hence the stage of development reached by the mode of
production based on capital – or the extent to which capital itself is
already presupposed as the condition of its own production, has
presupposed itself – is measured by the existing scope of fixed capital;
not only by its quantity, but just as much by its quality.

Finally: in _fixed capital,_ the social productivity of labour [is]
posited as a property inherent in capital; _including the scientific
power as well as the combination of social powers within the production
process, and finally, the skill transposed from direct labour into the
machine, into the dead productive force. In circulating capital,_ by
contrast, it is the exchange of labours, of the different branches of
labour, their interlacing and system-forming quality, the co-existence
of productive labour, which appear as _property of capital._ *

* The determinations of raw material, product, instrument of production,
change according to the role which the use values play in the production
process itself. What may be regarded as a mere raw material (certainly
not agricultural products, which are all reproduced, and not only
reproduced in their original form, but also modified in their natural
being itself to correspond to human needs. Quote from Hodges etc. [6]
The products of purely extractive industry such as e.g. coal, metals,
are themselves the result of labour, not only to bring them to light,
but also in order to give them the form, as with metals, in which they
can serve as raw materials for industry. But they are not reproduced,
since we do not yet know how to create metals) is itself the product of
labour. The product of one industry is the raw material for another and
vice versa. The instrument of production itself is the product of one
industry, and serves as instrument of production only in the other. One
industry’s waste is the raw material of the other. In agriculture, a
part of the product (seed, cattle etc.) itself appears as raw material
for the same industry; hence, like fixed capital, it never leaves the
production process; the portion of the agricultural products destined
for animal feed can be regarded as _matière instrumentale;_ but seed is
reproduced in the production process, while the instrument as such is
consumed in it. Could not seed, considering that it always remains
within the production process, like draught animals, be regarded as
fixed capital, like draught animals? No; otherwise all raw materials
would have to be so regarded. As raw material it is always comprised
within the production process. Finally, products entering into direct
consumption in turn come out of consumption as raw materials for
production, fertilizer in the process of nature etc., paper out of rags
etc.; but secondly, their consumption reproduces the individual himself
in a specific mode of being, not only in his immediate quality of being
alive, and in specific social relations. So that the ultimate
appropriation by individuals taking place in the consumption process
reproduces them in the original relations in which they move within the
production process and towards each other; reproduces them in their
social being, and hence reproduces their social being – society – which
appears as much the subject as the result of this great total process.

_Fourthly:_

We have now to examine the other relations of fixed capital and
circulating capital.

We said above that the social relation between different labours is
posited as a property of capital in _circulating capital,_ as the social
productive power of labour in fixed capital.

‘The circulating capital of a nation is: money, necessaries of life, raw
materials, and finished products.’ (Adam Smith, tome II, p. 218.) Smith
is in a quandary whether he should call money circulating or fixed
capital. In so far as it always serves merely as instrument of
circulation, which is itself a moment of the total reproduction process,
it is _fixed capital –_ as instrument of circulation. But its use value
itself is only to circulate and never to be absorbed either into the
production process proper nor into individual consumption. It is the
part of capital constantly fixed in the circulation phase, and in this
respect it is the most perfect form of circulating capital; in the other
respect, because it is fixed as an instrument, it is _fixed capital._

In so far as a distinction between _fixed capital and circulating
capital_ enters in from the perspective of individual consumption, this
is already given in the fact that _fixed capital_ does not enter into
circulation as use value. (A part of the seed in agriculture does enter
into circulation as use value, because it multiplies itself.) This
non-entry-into-circulation supposes that it does not become the object
of individual consumption.

_Turnover time of capital consisting of fixed capital and circulating capital. Reproduction time of fixed capital. With circulating capital, the only requirement is that the interruption should be not so great as to ruin its use value. With fixed capital, continuity of production absolutely necessary etc. – Unit of labour time the day; for circulating capital, the year. Longer total period as unit with the entry of fixed capital. – Industrial cycle. – Circulation of fixed capital. – The so-called risk. – All parts of capital yield an equal profit – false._ Ricardo _etc. – The same commodity sometimes fixed capital, sometimes circulating capital. – Sale of capital as capital. – Fixed capital which enters into circulation as use value._ – Every moment which a presupposition of production, at the same time its result. Reproduction of its own conditions. _Reproduction of capital as fixed capital and circulating capital_

_‘Fixed capital’_ serves over and over again for the same operation,
‘and by how much larger has been the range of these iterations, by so
much [the] more intensely is the tool, engine, or machinery, entitled to
the denomination of fixed’. (De Quincey, X, 4.) [7] If a capital
consists of £10,000, of which 5,000 is fixed and 5,000 circulating; the
latter turns over 1 time in 1 year, the former 1 time in 5 years; then
5,000 turn over, or 1/2 of the total capital, 1 time in one year. During
the same year, 1/5 of the fixed capital or £1,000 turn over; hence in 1
year £6,000 or 3/5 of the total capital turn over. Hence 1/5 of the
total capital turns over in 12/3 months and the total capital, in (12 ×
5)/3 months, in 60/3 = 20 months = 1 year and 8 months. In 20 months the
total capital of £10,000 is turned over, although the fixed capital is
replaced only in 5 years. This turnover time holds, however, only for
the repetition of the production process and thus for the creation of
surplus value; not for the reproduction of the capital itself. If the
capital begins the process anew less frequently – returns from
circulation into the form of fixed capital – then it returns all the
more often into the form of circulating capital. But the capital itself
is not replaced thereby. So with the circulating capital itself. If a
capital of 100 returns 4 times a year and hence brings in 20%, like a
capital of 400 which circulates only once, then the capital remains 100
at the end of the year as at the beginning, and the other capital
remains 400, although it has effected a production of use values and a
positing of surplus value equal to a 4 times larger capital. The fact
that the velocity of turnover here substitutes for the magnitude of the
capital shows strikingly that it is only the amount of surplus labour
set into motion, and of labour generally, which determines the creation
of value as well as the creation of surplus value, and not the magnitude
of the capital for itself. The capital of 100 has, during the year, set
in motion successively as much labour as one of 400, and hence created
the same surplus value.

But the issue here is this. In the above example, the circulating
capital of 5,000 first returns in the middle of the first year; then at
the end of the second half; in the middle of the second; in the second
half of the second (in the first 4 months) £3,333 2/6 of it have
returned and the rest will have come back at the end of this half year.

But, of the fixed capital, only 1/5 was returned in the first year, 1/5
in the second. At the end of the first year, the owner has on hand
£6,000; at the end of the second, 7,000; the third, 8,000; the fourth,
9,000; the fifth, 10,000. Only at the end of the fifth is he again in
possession of his total capital, with which he began the production
process; although _in the creation of surplus value his capital acted as
if it had wholly turned over in 20 months; thus the total capital itself
is only reproduced in 5 years. The former aspect of turnover important
for the relation of its realization;_ the latter, however, brings in a
new relation which does not take place with circulating capital at all.
_Since circulating capital is completely absorbed into circulation and
returns from it as a whole, it follows that it is reproduced as capital_
as _many times as it is realized as surplus value_ or as surplus
capital. But since fixed capital never enters circulation as a use
value, and enters it as value only to the extent that it is consumed as
a use value, it follows that it is by no means reproduced as soon as the
_surplus value determined by the average turnover time of the total
capital is posited._ The turnover of the circulating capital must take
place 10 times in the 5 years before the fixed capital is reproduced;
i.e. the period of the revulsions of circulating capital must be
repeated 10 times while that of fixed capital is repeated once, and the
_total average turnover of the capital – 20 months – has to be repeated
2 times before the fixed capital is reproduced._ Hence, the larger is
the part of the capital consisting of fixed capital – i.e. the more
capital acts in the mode of production corresponding to it, with great
employment of produced productive force – and the more durable the fixed
capital is, i.e. the longer its reproduction time, the more its use
value corresponds to its specific economic role – the more often must
the part of capital which is determined as circulating _repeat the
period of its turnover, and the longer is the total time the capital
requires for the achievement of its total circulation._ Hence the
_continuity_ of production becomes an external necessity for capital
with the development of that portion of it which is determined as fixed
capital. For circulating capital, _an interruption, if it does not last
so long as to ruin its use value, is only an interruption in the
creation of surplus value. But with fixed capital, the interruption,_ in
so far as in the meantime its use value is necessarily destroyed
relatively unproductively, i.e. without replacing itself as value, is
the destruction of its original value itself. Hence the continuity of
the production process which corresponds to the concept of capital is
posited as _conditio sine qua [non]_ for its maintenance only with the
development of fixed capital; hence likewise the continuity and the
constant growth of consumption.

This is No. I. But No. II, the formal side, even more important. The
total time in which we measured the return of capital was the year,
while the time unit in which we measure labour is the day. We did [so]
firstly because the year is more or less the natural reproduction time,
or duration of the production phase, for the reproduction of the largest
part of the vegetable raw materials used in industry. The turnover of
circulating capital was determined, therefore, by the number of
turnovers in the total time of a year. In fact, the circulating capital
begins its reproduction at the end of each turnover, and while the
number of turnovers during the year affects the total value, and the
fate it encounters during each turnover appears as a determinant of the
conditions under which it begins reproduction anew, yet each of them for
itself is a complete lifespan for the circulating capital. As soon as
capital is transformed back into money, it can transform itself e.g.
into conditions of production other than the original ones, throw itself
from one branch of production into another one, so that _reproduction,
regarded materially, is not repeated in the same form._

The introduction of fixed capital changes this; and neither the turnover
time of capital, nor the unit in which their number is measured, the
year, henceforth appear as the measure of time for the motion of
capital. This unit is now determined, rather, by the _reproduction time_
required for fixed capital, and hence the total circulation time it
needs to enter into circulation as value, and to come back from it in
the totality of its value. The reproduction of the circulating capital
must _also proceed in the same material form_ during this whole time,
and the number of its necessary turnovers, i.e. _the turnovers necessary
for the reproduction of the original capital, is distributed over a
longer or shorter series of years._ Hence a longer _total period_ is
posited as the unit in which its turnovers are measured, and their
_repetition_ is now not merely externally, but rather necessarily
connected with this unit. According to Babbage, the average reproduction
of machinery in England 5 years; [8] the real one hence perhaps 10
years. There can be no doubt whatever that the cycle which industry has
passed through since the development of fixed capital on a large scale,
at more or less 10-yearly intervals, is connected with this _total
reproduction phase of capital._ We shall find other determinant causes
as well. But this is one of them. There were good and bad times for
industry before, too, as well as for harvests (agriculture). But the
industrial cycle of a number of years, divided into characteristic
periods, epochs, is peculiar to large-scale industry.

Now the new distinction, No. III, appears.

Circulating capital was ejected from the production process in the form
of the product, of the newly created use value, and thrown wholly into
circulation; when transformed back into money, the entire value of the
product (the entire labour time objectified in it, necessary and surplus
labour time) was realized, and thereby the surplus value realized and
all conditions of reproduction fulfilled. With the realization of the
price of the commodity, all these conditions were fulfilled, and the
process could begin anew. This holds, however, only for that part of the
circulating capital which entered into large-scale circulation. As to
the other portion of it, which continuously accompanies the process of
production itself, the circulation of that part of it which is
transformed into wages, it naturally depends on whether the labour is
used for the production of fixed capital or of circulating capital
whether these wages themselves are replaced by a use value entering into
circulation or not.

Fixed capital, by contrast, does not itself circulate as a use value,
but rather enters as value into the manufactured raw material (in
manufactures and agriculture) or into the directly extracted raw
material (mining industry etc.) only to the extent that it is used up as
use value in the production process. Fixed capital in its developed form
hence only returns in a cycle of years which embraces a series of
turnovers of circulating capital. It is not at once exchanged as product
for money, in such a way that its reproduction process might coincide
with the turnovers of circulating capital. It enters into the price of
the product only in successive bits, and hence returns as value only
successively. _It returns fragmentarily over longer periods, while
circulating capital circulates wholly in shorter periods._ To the extent
that fixed capital remains as such, [it] does not return, because it
does not enter into circulation; to the extent that it enters into
circulation, it no longer remains as fixed capital, but rather forms an
ideal value-component of the circulating capital. It returns in
principle only to the extent that it _transposes itself directly or
indirectly into the product, hence into circulating capital._ Because it
is not a direct use value for consumption, it does not enter into
circulation as use value.

This different kind of return of fixed and circulating capital will
appear significant later as the difference between selling and renting,
annuity, interest and profit, rent in its different forms, and profit;
and the incomprehension of this _merely formal_ distinction has led
Proudhon and his gang to the most confused conclusions; as we shall see.
[9] In its observations on the last crisis, the _Economist_ reduces the
whole difference between fixed capital and circulating capital to the
‘resale of articles within _a short period and at a profit’_
(_Economist_ No. 754, 6 Feb. 1858) and ‘production of a revenue large
enough to provide for _expenses,_ risk, _wear and tear,_ and the market
rate of interest’. * The shorter return through the sale of the whole
article, and the merely annual return of a part of the fixed capital,
analysed above. As to profit – merchant’s profit does not concern us
here – each part of the circulating capital which leaves and returns to
the production process, i.e. contains objectified labour (the value of
the advances), necessary labour (the value of wages) and surplus labour
– brings profit as soon as it passes fully through circulation, because
the surplus labour which the product contains is realized with it. But
it is neither the circulating capital nor the fixed capital which create
the profit, but rather the appropriation of alien labour which both of
them mediate, hence at bottom only the part of circulating capital which
enters into small-scale circulation. This profit is realized in
practice, however, only through the entry of capital into circulation,
hence only in its form as circulating capital, never in its form as
fixed capital. But what the economist here understands by fixed capital
is – as far as revenues from it are concerned – the form of fixed
capital in which it does not directly enter into the production process
as machinery, but rather in railways, buildings, agricultural
improvements, drainings etc., † where, hence, the realization of the
value and surplus value contained in it appears in the form of an
annuity, where interest represents the surplus value and the annuity the
successive return of the value advanced. This is therefore not in fact a
case (although it is the case with agricultural improvements) of fixed
capital entering into circulation as value by forming a part of the
product, but rather of the sale of fixed capital in the form of its use
value. It is here sold not all at once, but as an annuity. Now, it is
clear, firstly, that some forms of fixed capital figure initially as
circulating capital, and become fixed capital only when they become
fixed in the production process; e.g. the circulating products of a
machine-maker are machines just as those of a cotton-weaver are calico,
and they enter into circulation in just the same way, for him. For him
they are circulating capital; for the manufacturer who uses them in the
production process, fixed capital; because product for the former, and
instrument of production only for the latter. Likewise even houses,
despite their immovability, are circulating capital for the
building-trade; for him who buys them to rent them out again, or to use
them as buildings for production, they are fixed capital. Now in so far
as fixed capital itself circulates as use value, i.e. is sold, changes
hands, we shall speak of it further, below.

* Risk, which plays a role for the economists in the determination of
profit – it can obviously play none in the surplus gain, because the
creation of surplus value is not increased thereby, and possible that
capital incurs risk in the _realization_ of this surplus value – is the
danger that the capital does not pass through the different phases of
circulation, or remains fixated in one of them. We have seen that the
surplus gain is part of the production costs, not of the capital, but of
the product. The necessity for capital to realize this surplus gain or a
part of it confronts it as a double external compulsion. As soon as
profit and interest become separated, so that the industrial capitalist
must pay interest, a portion of the surplus gain is _cost of production_
from capital’s viewpoint, i.e. belongs itself among his outlays. In
another respect, it is the average assecurance which it gives itself in
order to cover the risk of devaluation which it runs in the
metamorphoses of the total process. A part of the surplus gain appears
to the capitalist only as a compensation for the risk he runs so as to
make more money; a risk which can lead to the loss of the presupposed
value itself. In this form, the necessity of realizing the surplus gain
appears to him as means to ensure its reproduction. Both relations, of
course, do not determine the surplus value, but rather make its positing
appear as an external necessity for capital, and not only as the
satisfaction of its tendency to seek riches.

† We are not concerned here with the illusion that _all parts of capital
equally bring a profit,_ an illusion arising out of the division of the
surplus value into average portions, independently of the relations of
the component parts of capital as circulating and fixed, and the part of
it transformed into living labour. Because Ricardo half shares this
illusion, he considers the influence of the proportions of fixed and
circulating capital from the start of his determination of value as
such, and the reverend parson Malthus stupidly and simple-mindedly
speaks of the profits accruing to fixed capital, as if capital grew
organically by some power of nature.

But the viewpoint that capital is sold as capital – whether as money or
in the form of fixed capital – is obviously not relevant here, where we
are considering circulation as the movement of capital in which it
posits itself in its various conceptually specific moments. Productive
capital becomes product, commodity, money, and is transformed back into
the conditions of production. It remains capital in each of these forms,
and it becomes capital only by realizing itself as such. So long as it
remains in one of these phases, it is fixed as commodity capital, money
capital, or industrial capital. But each of these phases forms only one
moment of its movement, and in the form from which it must propel itself
to pass over into another phase it ceases to be capital. If it rejects
itself as commodity and becomes money, or vice versa, then it does not
exist as capital in the rejected form, but rather in the newly reached
one. Of course, the rejected form can in turn become the form of another
capital, or it can be the direct form of the consumable product. But
this does not concern us and does not concern capital as far as the
course it traces out in its internal circulation is concerned. Rather,
it rejects each of the forms as its not-capital-being, so as to assume
them again later. But if capital is lent out as money, as land and soil,
house etc., then it becomes a commodity _as capital,_ or, the commodity
put into circulation is _capital as capital._ This to be further pursued
in the next section.

What is paid for in the transposition of the commodity into money, as
far as the part of the price which is the value of part of the fixed
capital is concerned, is the part required for its partial reproduction,
the part worn out and used up in the production process. What the buyer
pays, then, is the use or wear of the fixed capital, in so far as it is
itself value, objectified labour. Since this wear takes place
successively, he pays it in portions in the product, whereas in the
price he pays for the product he replaces the whole value of the
fractional part of the raw material contained in the product. The
worn-out, used-up fractional part of fixed capital is paid for not only
successively, but also by a mass of buyers simultaneously, in relation
as they buy products. Since capital appears in the first half of its
circulation as C and the buyer as M, since its aim is value while the
buyer’s is use (whether in turn productive, no matter here, where we are
examining only the formal aspect such as it appears towards capital in
its circulation), it follows that the relation of the buyer to the
product is that of the consumer generally. Indirectly, then, in all
commodities the buyer successively and bit by bit pays for the wear and
use of fixed capital, even though the latter does not enter into
circulation as use value. But there are forms of fixed capital where he
pays directly for its use value – as with means of communication,
transport etc. In all these cases the fixed capital in fact never leaves
the production process, as with railways etc. But while it serves for
some as means of communication within the production process itself, to
bring the product to market, and for the producers themselves [as] means
of circulation, it can serve others as means of consumption, as use
value, for holiday travel, etc. Regarded as a means of production, it
distinguishes itself from machinery etc. here in that it is used up by
various capitals at the same time, as a common condition for their
production and circulation. (We are not yet concerned with consumption
as such here.) It does not appear as locked within a particular
production process, but rather as the connecting artery of a mass of
such production processes of particular capitals, who use it up only in
portions. In contrast to all these particular capitals and their
particular production processes, then, fixed capital is here cast as the
product of a particular branch of production separate from them, in
which, however, it is not sold by one producer as circulating capital
and bought by another as fixed capital, as with machinery, but, rather,
in which it can be sold only in the form of fixed capital itself. Then
its successive return, hidden in the commodity, becomes apparent. But
this fixed capital then also includes the surplus value, since it is
itself a sold product (for the industrialist, the machine he uses is not
a product), hence the return of interest and profit, if any. Since it
can be consumed in the same common and successive form, can be use value
for direct consumption, it follows that its sale – not as an instrument
of production but as a commodity generally – also appears in the same
form. But in so far as it is sold as an instrument of production – a
machine is _sold_ as a mere commodity and only becomes an instrument of
production in the industrial process – i.e. as its sale directly
coincides with its use in the general social production process, this is
a determination which has no place within the examination of the simple
circulation of capital. In the latter, fixed capital, in so far as it
enters as an agency of production, appears as a presupposition of the
production process, not as its result. It can therefore only be a matter
of the replacement of its value, in which no surplus value for the user
is included. What is rather the case is that _he_ has paid this surplus
value to the machine-maker. Railways, however, or buildings rented for
production, are _simultaneously_ instruments of production, and are
simultaneously realized by their seller as product, as capital.

 _Since each moment which appears as presupposition of production is at
the same time its result –_ in that it reproduces its own conditions –
the original division of the capital within the production process now
appears in such a way that the production process divides into three
production processes, in which different portions of the capital – which
now also appear as particular capitals – are at work. (Here we can still
assume a form in which one capital is at work, because we are examining
capital _as such,_ and this way of looking at it simplifies what needs
to be said about the proportion of these different kinds.) The capital
is annually reproduced in different and changing portions as raw
material, as product, and as means of production; in a word, as fixed
capital and as circulating capital. The minimum presupposition which
appears in all of these production processes is the part of circulating
capital destined for exchange with labouring capacity and for the
maintenance and consumption of the machinery or the instrument, and the
means of production. In purely extractive industries, e.g. mining, the
mine itself exists as the material of labour, but not as raw material
passing over into product, which latter must, in the manufacturing
industry, by contrast, have a particular existence in all forms. In
agriculture, seed, fertilizer, cattle etc., may be regarded as raw
material as well as _matières instrumentales._ Agriculture forms a mode
of production _sui generis,_ because the organic process is involved, in
addition to the mechanical and chemical process, and the natural
reproduction process is merely controlled and guided; extractive
industry (mining the most important) is likewise an industry _sui
generis,_ because no reproduction process whatever takes place in it, at
least not one under our control or known to us. (Fishery, hunting etc.
can involve a reproduction process; likewise forestry; this is therefore
not necessarily purely extractive industry.) Now, in so far as the means
of production, fixed capital as the product of capital and hence
containing objectified surplus time, is itself constituted in such a way
that it can be ejected by its producer as circulating capital, e.g. like
machinery by the machine builder, before it becomes fixed capital, i.e.
first enters into circulation as use value, [to that extent] its
circulation contains no new aspect whatever. But in so far as it can
never be sold while it serves at the same time as instrument of
production, as e.g. railways, or in proportion as it is used up as such,
it shares with fixed capital generally the quality that its value
returns only successively; but there is also the addition that this
return of its value includes the return of its surplus value, of the
surplus labour objectified in it. It then has a special form of return.

The important thing now is that the production of capital thus appears
as the production in definite portions of circulating capital and fixed
capital, so that capital itself produces its double way of circulating
as fixed capital and circulating capital.

_Fixed capital and circulating capital._ Economist. Smith. _Counter-value of circulating capital must be produced within the year. Not so for fixed capital. It engages the production of subsequent years_

Before we settle the last point, first a few secondary matters.
‘Floating capital is consumed, fixed capital merely used, in the great
work of production.’ (_Economist,_ VI, p. 1.) The distinction between
_consume_ and _use_ dissolves into gradual or rapid destruction. We need
dwell on this point no further.

‘Floating capital assumes an _infinite variety of forms,_ fixed capital
_has only one.’_ (_Economist,_ VI, p. 1.) [10] This ‘infinite variety of
forms’, as regards the production process of capital itself, is much
more correctly reduced by Adam Smith to a mere change of form. Fixed
capital is of use to its master ‘so long as it continues to remain in
the same form’. That means it remains within the production process as
use value, in a specific material presence. Circulating capital, by
contrast (A. Smith, tome II, p. 197, 198) ‘constantly passes out of his
hands in a specific form’ (as product) ‘to return in another’ (as
condition of production) ‘and brings profit only by means of this
circulation and successive changes’. Smith does not speak here of the
‘infinite variety of forms’ in which circulating capital appears.
Regarded materially, ‘fixed capital’ also assumes ‘an infinite variety
of forms’; but this proceeds from the metamorphoses which circulating
capital passes through as itself a use value, and the ‘infinite variety
of forms’ reduces itself, therefore, to the qualitative differences of
the various phases of circulation. Regarded within a specific production
process, circulating capital always returns in the same form of raw
materials and money for wages., The material presence is the same at the
end of the process as at the beginning. Incidentally, elsewhere the
_Economist_ itself reduces the ‘infinite variety of forms’ to the
conceptually determined change of forms in circulation. ‘The commodity
is wholly consumed in the shape in which it is produced’ (i.e. enters
into circulation as use value and is ejected from it) ‘and replaced in
his hands in a _new shape’_ (as raw material and wages), ‘ready to
repeat a _similar_ operation’ (rather, the same operation). (loc. cit.
VI, p. 1.) [11] Smith also says explicitly that fixed capital ‘requires
no circulation’. (tome II, 197, 198.) With _fixed capital,_ the value is
imprisoned within a specific use value; with circulating capital, value
takes the form of various different use values, likewise assumes as well
as rejects the independent form distinct from every particular use value
(as money); hence constant change of matter and form goes on.

‘Circulating capital supplies him’ (the entrepreneur) ‘with the
materials and wages of the workers, and sets industry into activity.’
(A. Smith, tome II, p. 226.) _‘Every fixed capital comes originally from
a circulating capital,_ and needs to be continually maintained _by means
of a circulating capital.’_ (loc. cit. p. 207.) ‘Since so great a part
of the circulating capital is being withdrawn continuously to be spent
in the other two branches of the general social fund, this capital needs
in turn to be renewed by continual replenishment, otherwise it would
soon be reduced to nothing. These replenishments are drawn from three
principal sources: the produce of the soil, of mines, and of fisheries.’
(loc. cit. p. 208.)

<We have already developed one distinction emphasized by the
_Economist:_ ‘Every production the whole cost of which is returned to
the producer out of the _current income_ of the country _is floating
capital;_ but every production, in respect of which only _an annual sum
is paid for the use, is – fixed capital.’_ (Notebook VI, p. 1.) [12] ‘In
the first case, the producer is entirely dependent on the country’s
current income.’ (loc. cit.) We have seen that only part of the fixed
capital returns in the time determined by circulating capital, which
serves as the unit of its turnovers because it is the natural unit for
the reproduction of the greatest part of food products and raw
materials, just as, and because, it appears as the natural epoch in the
life process (cosmic process) of the earth. This unit is the year, whose
bourgeois calculation deviates more or less, but insignificantly, from
its natural magnitude. The more the material presence of fixed capital
corresponds to its concept, the more adequate its material mode of
existence is, the more does its turnover time span a cycle of years.
Since circulating capital is wholly exchanged first for money, secondly
for its elements, it presupposes that a _countervalue has been produced_
equal to its whole value (including the surplus value). It cannot be
said that it enters or can enter into consumption entirely; since it
must also in part serve in turn as raw material, or as an element for
fixed capital; in short itself, in turn, as an element of production – a
counter-production. A part of the use value ejected by capital as the
product, as the result of the production process, becomes an object of
consumption and thus drops out of the circulation of capital altogether;
another part enters into another capital as a condition of production.
This is itself posited in the circulation of capital _as such,_ since it
ejects itself from itself in the first half of circulation, as
commodity, i.e. as use value; i.e. dismisses itself _with respect to
itself_ in this form from its own circulation as use value, article of
consumption; but exchanges itself as money for commodity as condition of
production, in the second half of its circulation. Thus, as circulating
use value itself, it posits its material presence both as an article of
consumption and as a new element of production, or rather an element of
reproduction. But in both cases the whole of its countervalue must be on
hand; i.e. it must have been wholly produced during the year. For
example, the sum of manufactured products which can be exchanged during
a year for agricultural products is determined by the mass of the raw
products produced in a year, counted from harvest to harvest. Since we
speak here of capital _as such,_ capital in the process of becoming, we
are not yet concerned with anything else in addition – in that the many
capitals are not yet present for us – nothing but it itself and simple
circulation, out of which it absorbs value in the double form of money
and commodity and into which it throws it in the double form of money
and commodity. When an industrial people producing on the foundation of
capital, such as the English, e.g., exchange with the Chinese, and
absorb value in the form of money and commodity from out of their
production process, or rather absorb value by drawing the latter within
the sphere of the circulation of their capital, then one sees right away
that the Chinese do not therefore need to produce as capitalists. Within
a single society, such as the English, the mode of production of capital
develops in one branch of industry, while in another, e.g. agriculture,
modes of production predominate which more or less antedate capital.
Nevertheless, it is (1) its necessary tendency to conquer the mode of
production in all respects, to bring them under the rule of capital.
Within a given national society this already necessarily arises from the
transformation, by this means, of all labour into wage labour; (2) as to
external markets, capital imposes this propagation of its mode of
production through international competition. Competition is the mode
generally in which capital secures the victory of its mode of
production. Still, this much is clear: quite regardless of whether it is
another capital or whether it is capital itself as another which stands
on both sides of the successive exchanges, each time in the opposite
aspect, both aspects are already posited before we proceed to examine
this double movement from the circulation of capital _as such_ itself.
In the first phase it ejects itself out of the movement of capital as
use value, as commodity, and exchanges itself for money. The commodity
expelled from the circulation of capital is no longer the commodity as a
moment of self-perpetuating value, as the presence of value. It is,
thus, its presence as use value, its being for consumption. Capital is
transposed out of the form of commodity into the form of money only
because an exchanger appears _opposite it_ in ordinary circulation as
consumer, who transposes M into C; [completes] this transposition in its
material aspect, so that he relates to the use value as use value, as
consumer, and only in this way is the use value replaced for capital as
_value._ Thus, capital creates articles of consumption, but ejects them
from itself in this form, ejects them from its circulation. On the basis
of the aspect developed so far, no other relations exist. The commodity
which is ejected as such from the circulation of capital loses its
character as value and fulfills the role of use value for consumption,
as distinct from fulfilling it for production. But in the second phase
of circulation, capital exchanges money for commodity, and its
transformation into commodity now itself appears as a moment of
value-positing, because the commodity is accepted as such into the
circulation process of capital. While it presupposes consumption in the
first phase, in the second it presupposes production, production for
production; for value in the form of the commodity is here taken into
the circulation of capital from the outside, or, the inverse process is
undertaken in the first phase. The commodity, as use value for capital
itself, can only be the commodity as an element, use value, for its
production process. In its double form, the process presents itself in
this way: capital _a_ exchanges its product as C for capital _b_’s M in
the first phase; in the second, capital _b_ as C exchanges for capital
_a_’s M. Or, in the first phase, capital _b_ as M exchanges for capital
_a_’s C, in the second, _a_ as M for capital _b_’s C. That is, capital
is simultaneously posited in each of the two circulation phases as M and
C; but in two different capitals, which are always in the opposite phase
of their circulation process. In the simple circulation process, the
acts of exchange, C–M or M–C appear either as directly coinciding or as
directly divided. Circulation is not only the succession of both forms
of exchange, but it is at the same time each of them distributed to two
different sides. But we are not yet concerned here with exchange among
many capitals. This belongs to the theory of competition or to that of
the circulation of capitals (of credit). What concerns us here is the
presupposition of consumption on one side – of the commodity ejected
from the movement of value as use value – and the presupposition of
production for production – of value, posited as use value, as a
condition of its reproduction posited externally to the circulation of
capital on the other side – so that these two sides arise out of the
examination of the simple form of the circulation of capital. This much
is clear: Since the entire circulating capital exchanges as C for M in
the first phase, and as M for C in the second, then, if we regard the
year as the unit of time of its evolutions, its transformations are
limited both by the annual reproduction of raw materials etc. (the
commodity for which it exchanges as money must have been produced, a
simultaneous production must correspond to it), and by the constant
creation of an annual revenue (the part of M which exchanges for
commodity as use value) to consume the product of capital which is
ejected as use value. Since further-developed relations are not present
yet, such revenues are only those of the capitalists themselves and
those of the workers. The examination of the exchange of capital and
revenue, by the way, another form of the relation of production and
consumption, does not belong here yet. In another respect, since fixed
capital is exchanged only to the extent it enters as value into
circulating capital, since it is, thus, realized only in part during the
year, it presupposes only a _partial counter-value,_ i.e. only the
partial production of this counter-value during the course of the year.
It is paid for only in proportion to its wear. This much clear, then,
which already follows from the difference introduced by fixed capital
into the industrial cycle, namely that _it engages the production of
subsequent years,_ and, just as it contributes to the creation of a
large revenue, it anticipates further labour as a counter-value. The
anticipation of future fruits of labour is therefore in no way a
consequence of the state debt etc., in short, not an invention of the
credit system. It has _its roots in the specific mode of realization,
mode of turnover, mode of reproduction of fixed capital._>

Since we are essentially concerned here with grasping the pure, specific
economic forms, hence with not joining together things that do not
belong, it has thus become clear from the above that the different forms
in which circulating capital and fixed capital bring revenue – as well
as the examination of revenue generally – do not yet belong here at all;
but only the different ways in which they return and affect the total
turnover of capital, the movement of its reproduction generally.
Nevertheless, the incidental points made here are important – in that
they reject the economists’ motley compilations, which have no place yet
in the examination of the simple distinction between fixed capital and
circulating capital – and because they showed us that the differences in
revenue etc. have their basis in the difference of form between the
reproduction of fixed and circulating capital. The issue here is still
only the simple return of the value. Only later will it be found how the
latter becomes the return of revenue, and that in turn becomes the
difference in the determination of revenue.

_Maintenance costs_

We have said nothing so far about the _maintenance costs,_ the _frais
d’entretien_ of fixed capital. These are partly the _matières
instrumentales_ it consumes in its action. They make up fixed capital in
the first sense, as we have regarded it within the production process.
These are circulating capital and may just as well serve for
consumption. They become fixed capital only in so far as they are
consumed in the production process, but do not have, like fixed capital
proper, a material substance determined purely by their formal presence.
The second part of these maintenance costs consists of the labour
necessary for repairs.

_Revenue of fixed capital and circulating capital_

A. Smith’s determination that every fixed capital comes originally from
a circulating capital and must be constantly maintained by a circulating
capital: ‘Every fixed capital originally comes from a circulating
capital and must be continually kept up at the latter’s expense. _No
fixed capital can yield revenue except at the expense of a circulating
capital.’_ (Storch, 26a.) [13] As to Storch’s remark about revenue – an
aspect which does not belong here – it is clear: fixed capital returns
as value only in proportion as it becomes extinguished as use value, as
fixed capital, and enters into circulating capital as value. Hence it
can return in the form of a circulating capital only in so far as its
_value_ is concerned. But it does not circulate at all as use value.
Further, since it has a use value only for production, it can return for
individual use, for consumption, also only in the form of circulating
capital. Improvements of the soil can directly enter chemically into the
reproduction process and in this way be directly transformed into use
values. But then they are consumed in their form as fixed capital. _A
capital can bring revenue at all only in the form in which it enters
into and returns from circulation, because the production of revenue in
direct use values, use values not mediated through circulation,
contradicts the nature of capital. Hence, since fixed capital returns as
value only in the form of circulating capital, it can bring revenue only
in this form._ Revenue is nothing whatsoever other than the part of the
surplus value destined for immediate consumption. Its returns thus
depend on the mode of return of value itself. Hence the different forms
in which fixed capital and circulating capital bring revenue. Likewise,
since fixed capital as such never enters circulation as use value, hence
is never thrown out of the realization process as use value, it never
serves for immediate consumption.

Now as to Smith, his view becomes clearer for us when he says that
circulating capital must be annually replaced and constantly renewed by
constantly drawing it from the sea, the soil, and from mines. Here,
then, circulating capital becomes purely material for him; it is fished
out by the hairs, chipped out, harvested; they are the movable primary
products which are released from their connection with the earth,
isolated, made movable thereby, or separated from their element in their
ready-made individuality, like fish etc. Still regarded as pure
material, it is further certain that, if Smith presupposes the
production of capital and does not suppose himself at the beginning of
the world, then every circulating capital likewise comes originally from
a fixed capital. Without nets he can catch no fish; without a plough,
till no fields; and without a hammer, etc., drive no mines. If he uses
even so little as a stone for a hammer etc., then this stone is
certainly no circulating capital, no capital of any sort, but rather a
means of labour. As soon as he has to produce, man possesses the resolve
to use a part of the available natural objects directly as means of
labour, and, as Hegel correctly said it, subsumes them under his
activity without further process of mediation. [14] The place where all
capital, circulating as well as fixed, not only originally but
continually comes from is the appropriation of alien labour. But this
process presupposes, as we have seen, a continuous small-scale
circulation, the exchange of wages for labour capacity, or
_approvisionnement_. Assuming the production process of capital: _All
capital returns only in the form of a circulating capital;_ hence fixed
capital can be renewed only by a process in which a part of circulating
capital becomes fixed; hence, by the employment of part of the raw
materials produced, and a part of labour consumed (hence also a part of
the _approvisionnement_ exchanged for living labour) for the production
of fixed capital. In agriculture, e.g., part of the product is consumed
by labour to build irrigation systems or a part of the grain is
exchanged for guano, chemical substances etc., which are incorporated
into the earth, but also in fact have no use value except in so far as
they are surrendered to the chemical process of the soil. A part of the
circulating capital has a use value only for the reproduction of the
fixed capital, and is produced (even if its production consisted only of
the labour time spent in changing its location) only for fixed capital.
But fixed capital itself can be renewed as capital only by becoming a
value-component of circulating capital, and its _elements are thus
reproduced through the transformation of circulating capital_ into fixed
capital. _Fixed capital is as much a presupposition for the production
of circulating capital as circulating capital is for the production of
fixed capital._ Or, the reproduction of fixed capital requires: (1) the
return of its value in the form of a circulating capital, for only in
this way can it in turn be exchanged for the conditions of its
production; (2) that a part of living labour and of the raw material be
used to produce instruments of production, direct or indirect ones,
instead of producing exchangeable products. Circulating capital enters
as use value into fixed capital, just as does labour, while fixed
capital enters as value into circulating capital; and, as movement
(where it is direct machinery), as static motion, as form, into the use
value.

Free labour = latent pauperism. Eden [15]

<In connection with our statements developed above, that pauperism
latent in free labour, the following statements by Sir Fr. Morton Eden,
Bt: _The State of the Poor, or an History of the Labouring Classes in
England from the Conquest etc., 3_ vols., 4º, London, 1797. (The
quotations from Vol. I, bk I.) (In book I, chapter I, it says: ‘Our zone
requires labour for the satisfaction of needs, and _therefore_ at least
_one part_ of society must _always tirelessly_ labour; others labour in
the arts etc., and some, who do not work, still have the products of
diligence at their disposal. For this, these proprietors have only
_civilization and order_ to thank; they are purely the creatures of
_civilized institutions._ For these have recognized that one can also
obtain the fruits of labour through ways other than labour; the men of
independent fortune owe their _wealth almost entirely to the labour of
others,_ not to their own ability, which is not at all better. What
divides the rich from the poorer is not the ownership of land or of
money, but rather the command of labour.’ _Poverty_ as such begins with
the tiller’s freedom – the feudal fetters to the soil, or at least the
locality, had until then spared the legislature the task of occupying
itself with the vagrants, poor etc. Eden believes that the various
commercial guilds etc. also fed their own poor. He said: ‘Without the
most distant idea, then, of disparaging the numberless benefits derived
for the country from manufactures and commerce, the result of this
investigation seems to lead _to this inevitable conclusion that
manufactures and commerce’_ (i.e. the first sphere of production in
which capital became predominant) ‘are _the true parents of our national
poor.’_ In the same place: Beginning with Henry VII (where at the same
time there began the clearing of the land of superfluous mouths through
transformation of the tilled fields into pasture, continuing for more
than 150 years, at least the litigation and legislative interference;
hence the number of hands made available for industry grew), wages in
industry were no longer fixed, only in agriculture. 11, Henry VII. (With
free labour, wage labour is not yet completely posited. The labourers
still have support in the feudal relations; their supply is still too
small; capital hence still unable to reduce them to the minimum. Hence
statutory determination of wages. So long as wages are still regulated
by statute, it cannot yet be said either that capital has subsumed
production under itself as capital, or that wage labour has attained the
mode of existence adequate to it.) The act cited also mentions linen
weavers, building craftsmen, shipwrights. The same act also fixes the
hours of labour: ‘Because many day labourers waste half the day, arrive
late, leave early, take a long afternoon nap, spend a long time at
breakfast, lunch and dinner, etc. etc.,’ it ordains the following hours:
‘from 15 March to 15 September, from 5 a.m., 1/2 hour breakfast, 1 1/2
dinner and siesta, 1/2 hour for noon meal, and work until between 7 and
8 p.m. In winter, however, no siesta during daylight; this permitted
only from 15 May to 15 August.’>

<Wages again regulated in 1514, almost like the previous time. Hours of
work again fixed. Whoever will not work upon application, arrested.
Hence still _compulsory labour_ by free workers at the given wages. They
must first be _forced_ to work within the conditions posited by capital.
The propertyless are more inclined to become vagabonds and robbers and
beggars than workers. The last becomes normal only in the developed mode
of capital’s production. In the prehistory of capital, state coercion to
transform the propertyless into _workers_ at conditions advantageous for
capital, which are not yet here forced upon the workers by competition
among one another.> (Very bloody means of coercion of this sort employed
under Henry VIII et. al.) (Suppression of the _monasteries_ under Henry
VIII likewise frees many hands.) (Under Edward VI still sharper laws
against able-bodied labourers who do not want to work. ‘1 Edw. VI, 3:
Who is able to work, refuses to labour, and lives idle for 3 days, shall
be branded with redhot iron on the breast with the letter V – and shall
be adjudged the slave for two years of the person who should inform
against such idler etc.’ ‘If he runs away from his master for 14 days he
shall become his slave for life and be branded on forehead or cheek with
letter S, and if he runs away a second time and shall be convicted
thereof by two sufficient witnesses, he shall be taken as a felon and
suffer pains of death.’ (1376 first mention of the vagrants, sturdy
rogues, 1388 the paupers.) (Similar cruel statute 1572 under Elizabeth.)
[16]

_The smaller the value of fixed capital in relation to its product, the more useful. – Movable, immovable, fixed and circulating. – Connection of circulation and reproduction. Necessity of reproducing use value in_ definite _time_

Circulating capital and fixed capital, which appeared earlier as
changing forms of the same capital in the different phases of its
turnover, are now, when fixed capital is developed to its highest form,
posited at the same time as two different modes of the existence of
capital. They become such through the difference in kind of their
return. Circulating capital which returns slowly has a quality in common
with fixed capital. But it distinguishes itself from it because its use
value itself – its material presence – enters into circulation and is at
the same time shed by it, thrown beyond the bounds of the turnover
process; while fixed capital – to the extent that it has been developed
at this point – enters into circulation only as value, and, as long as
it is still in circulation as a use value, such as e.g. the machine in
circulation, it is fixed capital only δυνάμει. However, this distinction
between fixed capital and circulating capital, resting initially on the
relation of the material presence of the capital, or of its presence as
use value, towards circulation, must, with reproduction, be posited at
the same time as the reproduction of the capital in the double form of
fixed capital and circulating capital. In so far as the reproduction of
capital in every form is the positing not only of objectified labour
time, but rather of surplus labour time, not only reproduction of its
value but of a surplus value, the production of fixed capital cannot
therefore be different in this regard from the production of circulating
capital. Hence, in the manufacture of instruments or machines – in all
the forms where fixed capital appears first as circulating capital in
its material presence, in its presence as use value before becoming
fixed as fixed capital, i.e. before it is consumed, for it is precisely
its consumption which binds it to the production phase and distinguishes
it as fixed capital – there is no difference at all, as to the
realization of capital, whether it reproduces itself in the form of
fixed or of circulating capital. Hence no new economic determination
enters here, either. But where fixed capital as such is thrown into
circulation by its producer – and not as circulating capital – hence
where _its proportionate use is sold, either for production_ or for
consumption – for in the transformation of C into M, which takes place
in the first section of the circulation of capital, it is irrelevant to
the latter whether the commodity in turn enters into the circulation
sphere of another productive capital, or whether it serves the purpose
of direct consumption; for the first capital, it is rather _always
determined as a use value_ whenever it ejects it from itself, exchanges
it for M – there the mode of return must be different for the producer
of fixed capital from that for the producer of circulating capital. The
surplus value created by him can return only proportionately and
successively with the value itself. This to be looked at in the next
section. Finally, although circulating capital and fixed capital now
appear as two different kinds, circulating capital is still posited
through the consumption, the wear of fixed capital; while fixed capital,
for its part, exists only as a circulating capital transformed into this
specific form. All capital transformed into objectified productive power
– all fixed capital – is a use value fixated in this form, and hence a
use value snatched away from consumption as well as from circulation.
The transformation of wood, iron, coal and living labour (hence also
indirectly that of the products consumed by the worker) into the
specific use values of a machine or a railway would not by itself turn
them into fixed capital if the other determinants developed above were
absent. When circulating capital is transformed into fixed capital, then
a part of the use values in whose form capital circulated, as well as
indirectly the part of the capital which exchanges for living labour,
are transformed into capital whose counter-value is created only over a
longer cycle; which enters into circulation as value only
proportionately and successively; and which can be realized as value
only through being used up in production. The transformation of
circulating capital into fixed capital presupposes relative surplus
capital, since it is capital employed not for direct production but
rather for new means of production. Fixed capital itself can in turn
serve as a direct instrument of production – as a means within the
immediate production process. In this case its value enters into the
product and is replaced by the successive return of the products. Or it
does not enter into the immediate production process – appears rather as
a general condition for production processes, such as buildings,
railways etc., and its value can be replaced only through circulating
capital, to whose creation it indirectly contributed. Questions of
greater detail about the proportion in the production of fixed capital
and circulating capital belong to the following section. If valuable
machinery were employed to supply a small quantity of products, then it
would not act as a force of production, but rather make the product
infinitely more expensive than if the work had been done without
machinery. It creates value not in so far as it has value – for the
latter is simply replaced – but rather only in so far as it increases
relative surplus time, or decreases necessary labour time. In the same
proportion, then, as that in which its scope grows, the mass of products
must increase, and the living labour employed relatively decrease. _The
less the value of the fixed capital in relation to its effectiveness,
the more does it correspond to its purpose._ All unnecessary fixed
capital appears as _faux frais de production,_ like all unnecessary
circulation costs. If capital could possess the machinery without
employing labour for the purpose, then it would raise the productive
power of labour and diminish necessary labour without having to buy
labour. The value of the fixed capital is therefore never an end in
itself in the production of capital.

Circulating capital, then, is transformed into fixed capital, and fixed
capital reproduces itself in circulating capital; both, only in so far
as capital appropriates living labour.

‘Every saving in fixed capital is an increase in the net revenue of
society.’ (A. Smith.) [17]

The final and last distinction cited by economists is that between
_movable and immovable;_ not in the sense that the former enters into
the movement of circulation, the latter does not; rather in the sense
that the former is physically fixed, immovable, in the same way as
movable and immovable property is distinguished. For example,
improvements sunk in the soil, aqueducts, buildings; and machinery
itself in great part, since it must be physically fixed, to act;
railways; in short, every form in which the product of industry is
welded fast to the surface of the earth. This basically adds nothing to
the determination of fixed capital; but it is indeed part of this
character that it becomes fixed capital in a more eminent sense the more
its use value, its material presence, corresponds to its specific
economic form. The immovable use value, such as house, railway etc., is
therefore the most tangible form of fixed capital. Of course, it can
then still circulate in the same sense as immovable property generally –
as title; but not as use value; it cannot circulate in the physical
sense. Originally, the growth of movable property, its increase as
against immovable, indicates the ascendant movement of capital as
against landed property. But once the mode of production of capital is
presupposed, the level to which it has conquered the conditions of
production is indicated in the transformation of capital into immovable
property. It thereby establishes its residence on the land itself, and
the seemingly solid presuppositions given by nature, themselves
[appear], in landed property, as merely posited by industry.

(Originally, life in the community and, through its mediation, the
relationship to the earth as property, are basic presuppositions of the
reproduction both of the individual and of the community. Among pastoral
peoples, land and soil appear merely as precondition of the migratory
life, hence appropriation does not take place. Fixed settlements with
soil cultivation follow – thus landed property is initially held in
common, and even where it advances to private property the individuals’
connection to it appears as posited by his relation to the community. It
appears as a mere fief of the community; etc. etc. The transformation of
the latter into mere exchangeable value – its mobilization – is the
product of capital and of the complete subordination of the state
organism to it. Land and soil, even where they have become private
property, are therefore exchange value only in a restricted sense.
Exchange value begins in the isolated natural product, separated from
the earth and individualized through industry (or mere appropriation).
Individual labour first arises here too. Exchange as such does not begin
within the original communes, but on their boundaries, where they cease
to be. Of course, to exchange the land, their residence, to pawn it to
alien communes, would be treason. Exchange can expand only little by
little from its original realm, movable property, to immovable property.
Only through expansion of the former does it little by little gain
control over the latter. Money is the chief agent in this process.)

A. Smith at first distinguishes circulating capital and fixed capital by
their role in the _production process._ Only later does he adopt the
expression: ‘One can gainfully lay out a capital in different ways, (1)
as circulating capital, (2) as fixed capital.’ [18] This second
expression obviously does not belong to the examination of this
distinction as such, since fixed capital and circulating capital first
have to be presupposed as two kinds of capital before we can speak about
how to lay out capital gainfully in both forms.

‘The total capital of each entrepreneur is necessarily divided into his
fixed capital and his circulating capital. If the sum is equal, then the
one becomes larger as the other diminishes.’ (A. Smith, tome II, p.
226.)

Since capitals are (1) divided into fixed and circulating capital in
unequal portions; (2) [have] an interrupted or uninterrupted production
phase and return from more distant or nearer markets, hence, unequal
circulation time; it follows that the determination of the surplus value
created in a given time, e.g. annually, must be unequal because the
number of reproduction processes in the given period is unequal. The
amount of value created appears determined not simply by the labour
employed during the immediate production process, but by the degree to
which this exploitation of labour can be repeated within a given period
of time.

Finally, then: While, in the examination of the simple production
process, capital appeared to realize itself as value only in connection
with wage labour, and circulation lay alongside, without connection to
it, here, in its reproduction process, circulation is included in it in
both the moments of circulation, C–M–M–C (as a system of exchanges
through which it must pass, and to which the same number of qualitative
changes within it correspond). In so far as its form as money is the
point of departure and hence of return, circulation appears included in
it as M–C–C–M. It contains both circular courses, and not merely as
either change of form or change of substance, but rather as both of them
included within the determination of value itself. The production
process, as containing within itself the conditions of its renewal, is a
reproduction process whose speed is determined by various relations
developed above, which all arise from differences of circulation. The
reproduction of capital also contains the reproduction of the use values
in which it is realized – or the constant renewal and reproduction by
human labour of the use values which enter human consumption and are
themselves perishable. The change of substance and of form subordinated
to human need through human labour appears from the viewpoint of capital
as its own reproduction. It is at bottom the constant reproduction of
labour itself. ‘Capital values perpetuate themselves by reproduction:
the products which compose a capital are consumed just like any others;
but their value, at the same time as it is destroyed by consumption, is
reproduced in other materials or in the same one.’ (Say, 14.) [19]
Exchange and a system of exchanges, and, included in that, the
transformation into money as independent value, appears as condition and
barrier for the reproduction of capital. With capital, production itself
is on all sides subordinate to exchange. These exchange operations,
circulation as such, produce no surplus value, but are conditions for
its realization. They are conditions of the _production of capital
itself,_ in so far as its _form as capital_ is posited only to the
extent that it passes through them. The reproduction of capital is at
the same time the production of specific formal conditions; of specific
modes of relationship in which personified objectified labour is
posited. Circulation is thus not merely the exchange of the product for
the conditions of production – i.e. of produced wheat, e.g., for seed,
new labour etc. The worker must exchange his product for the conditions
of production, so as to begin anew, in every form of production. The
peasant producing for immediate consumption also transforms part of the
product into seed, instrument of labour, beasts of burden, fertilizer
etc., and begins his labour anew. The transformation into money is
necessary for the reproduction of capital as such, and its reproduction
is necessarily the production of surplus value. * Although labour must
merely maintain the value of what we earlier called constant capital in
one production process, it must constantly reproduce it in another,
since what appears as presupposition of material and instrument in one
production process is product in the other, and this renewal,
reproduction, must constantly proceed simultaneously.

* In regard to the reproduction phase (especially circulation time),
note that use value itself places limits upon it. Wheat must be
reproduced in a year. Perishable things like milk etc. must be
reproduced more often. Meat on the hoof does not need to be reproduced
quite so often, since the animal is alive and hence resists time; but
slaughtered meat on the market has to be reproduced in the form of money
in the very short term, or it rots. The reproduction of value and of use
value partly coincide, partly not.

 

Capital as Fructiferous. Transformation of Surplus Value into Profit

We now come to the

THIRD SECTION. CAPITAL AS FRUCTIFEROUS. INTEREST. PROFIT. (PRODUCTION
COSTS ETC.)

_Rate of profit. – Fall of the rate of profit. – Rate of profit. – Sum of profit. – Atkinson. A. Smith. Ramsay. Ricardo. – Surplus value as_ profit _always expresses a lesser proportion. – Wakefield. Carey. Bastiat_

Capital is now posited as the unity of production and circulation; and
the surplus value it creates in a given period of time, e.g. in one
year, is = _ST_/(_p + c_) = _ST_/_R_ or = _S_(_T_/_p - T_/_p_ × _c_/(_c
+ p_)). Capital is now realized not only as value which reproduces
itself and is hence perennial, but also as value which posits value.
Through the absorption of living labour time and through the movement of
its own circulation (in which the movement of exchange is posited as its
own, as the inherent process of objectified labour), it relates to
itself as positing new value, as producer of value. It relates as the
foundation to surplus value as that which it founded. Its movement
consists of relating to itself, while it produces itself, at the same
time as the foundation of what it has founded, as value presupposed to
itself as surplus value, or to the surplus value as posited by it. In a
definite period of time which is posited as the unit measure of its
turnovers because it is the natural measure of its reproduction in
agriculture, capital produces a definite surplus value, which is
determined not only by the surplus value it posits in one production
process, but rather by the number of repetitions of the production
process, or of its reproductions in a specified period of time. Because
of the inclusion of circulation, of its movement outside the immediate
production process, within the reproduction process, surplus value
_appears_ no longer to be posited by its simple, direct relation to
living labour; this relation appears, rather, as merely a moment of its
total movement. Proceeding from itself as the active subject, the
subject of the process – and, in the turnover, the direct production
process indeed appears determined by its movement as capital,
independent of its relation to labour – capital relates to itself as
self-increasing value; i.e. it relates to surplus value as something
posited and founded by it; it relates as well-spring of production, to
itself as product; it relates as producing value to itself as produced
value. It therefore no longer measures the newly produced value by its
real measure, the relation of surplus labour to necessary labour, but
rather by itself as its presupposition. A capital of a certain value
produces in a certain period of time a certain surplus value. Surplus
value thus measured by the value of the presupposed capital, capital
thus posited as self-realizing value – is _profit;_ regarded not _sub
specie aeternitatis,_ but _sub specie – capitalis,_ the surplus value is
profit; and capital as capital, the producing and reproducing value,
distinguishes itself within itself from itself as profit, the newly
produced value. The product of capital is _profit._ The magnitude,
surplus value, is therefore measured by the value-magnitude of the
capital, and the _rate of profit_ is therefore determined by the
proportion between its value and the value of capital. A very large part
of what belongs here has been developed above. [20] But the anticipated
material is to be put here. In so far as the newly posited value, which
is of the same nature as the capital, is itself in turn taken up into
the production process, itself in turn maintains itself as capital, to
that extent the capital itself has grown, and now acts as a capital of
greater value. After it has distinguished the profit, as newly
reproduced value, from itself as presupposed, self-realizing value, and
has posited profit as the measure of its realization, it suspends the
separation again, and posits it in its identity to itself as capital
which, grown by the amount of the profit, now begins the same process
anew in larger dimensions. By describing its circle it expands itself as
the subject of the circle and thus describes a self-expanding circle, a
spiral.

The general laws developed previously here briefly summarized thus: The
real surplus value is determined by the relation of surplus labour to
necessary labour, or by the portion of the capital, the portion of
objectified labour, which exchanges for living labour, relative to the
portion of objectified labour by which it is replaced. But surplus value
in the form of profit is measured by the total value of the capital
presupposed to the production process. Presupposing the same surplus
value, _the same surplus labour in proportion to necessary labour,_
then, the _rate of profit_ depends on the relation between the part of
capital exchanged for living labour and the part existing in the form of
raw material and means of production. Hence, the smaller the portion
exchanged for living labour becomes, the smaller becomes the rate of
profit. Thus, in the same proportion as capital takes up a larger place
as capital in the production process relative to immediate labour, i.e.
the more the relative surplus value grows – the value-creating power of
capital – the more _does the rate of profit fall._ We have seen that the
magnitude of the capital already presupposed, presupposed to
reproduction, is specifically expressed in the growth of fixed capital,
as the produced productive force, objectified labour endowed with
apparent life. The total value of the producing capital will express
itself in each of its portions as a diminished proportion of the capital
exchanged for living labour relative to the part of capital existing as
constant value. Take e.g. manufacturing industry. In the same proportion
as fixed capital grows here, machinery etc., the part of capital
existing in raw materials must grow, while the part exchanged for living
labour decreases. Hence, the rate of profit falls relative to the total
value of the capital presupposed to production – and of the part of
capital acting as capital in production. The wider the existence already
achieved by capital, the narrower the relation of newly created value to
presupposed value (reproduced value). _Presupposing equal surplus value,
i.e. equal relation of surplus labour and necessary labour,_ there can
therefore be an unequal profit, and it must be unequal relative to the
size of the capitals. The rate of profit can rise although real surplus
value falls. Indeed, the capital can grow and the rate of profit can
grow in the same relation if the relation of the part of capital
presupposed as value and existing in the form of raw materials and fixed
capital rises at an equal rate relative to the part of the capital
exchanged for living labour. But this equality of rates presupposes
growth of the capital without growth and development of the productive
power of labour. One presupposition suspends the other. This contradicts
the law of the development of capital, and especially of the development
of fixed capital. Such a progression can take place only at stages where
the mode of production of capital is not yet adequate to it, or in
spheres of production where it has assumed predominance only formally,
e.g. in agriculture. Here, natural fertility of the soil can act like an
increase of fixed capital – i.e. relative surplus labour can grow –
without the amount of necessary labour diminishing. (E.g. in the _United
States.)_ The _gross profit,_ i.e. the surplus value, regarded apart
from its formal relation, not as a proportion but rather as a simple
magnitude of value without connection with any other, will grow on the
average _not as does the rate of profit, but as does the size of the
capital._ Thus, while the rate of profit will be inversely related to
the value of the capital, the _sum of profit_ will be directly related
to it. However, even this statement is true only for a restricted stage
of the development of the productive power of capital or of labour. A
capital of 100 with a profit of 10% yields a smaller sum of profit than
a capital of 1,000 with a profit of 2%. In the first case the sum is 10,
in the second 20, i.e. the gross profit of the larger capital is twice
as large as that of the 10 times smaller capital, although the rate of
the smaller capital’s profit is 5 times greater than that of the larger.
But if the larger capital’s profit were only 1%, then the sum of its
profit would be 10, like that for the 10 times smaller capital, because
the rate of profit would have declined in the same relation as its size.
If the rate of profit of the capital of 1,000 were only 1/2%, then the
sum of its profit would be only half as large as that of the smaller
capital, only 5, because the rate of profit would be 20 times smaller.
Thus, expressed in general terms: if the rate of profit declines for the
larger capital, but not in relation with its size, then the gross profit
rises although the rate of profit declines. If the profit rate declines
relative to its size, then the gross profit remains the same as that of
the smaller capital; remains stationary. If the profit rate declines
more than its size increases, then the gross profit of the larger
capital decreases relative to the smaller one in proportion as its rate
of profit declines. This is in every respect the most important law of
modern political economy, and the most essential for understanding the
most difficult relations. It is the most important law from the
historical standpoint. It is a law which, despite its simplicity, has
never before been grasped and, even less, consciously articulated. Since
this decline in the rate of profit is identical in meaning (1) with the
productive power already produced, and the foundation formed by it for
new production; this simultaneously presupposing an enormous development
of scientific powers; (2) with the decline of the part of the capital
already produced which must be exchanged for immediate labour, i.e. with
the decline in the immediate labour required for the reproduction of an
immense value, expressing itself in a great mass of products, great mass
of products with low prices, because the total sum of prices is = to the
reproduced capital + profit; (3) [with] the dimension of capital
generally, including the portion of it which is not fixed capital; hence
intercourse on a magnificent scale, immense sum of exchange operations,
large size of the market and all-sidedness of simultaneous labour; means
of communication etc., presence of the necessary consumption fund to
undertake this gigantic process (workers’ food, housing etc.); hence it
is evident that the material productive power already present, already
worked out, existing in the form of fixed capital, together with the
population etc., in short all conditions of wealth, that the greatest
conditions for the reproduction of wealth, i.e. the abundant development
of the social individual – that the development of the productive forces
brought about by the historical development of capital itself, when it
reaches a certain point, suspends the self-realization of capital,
instead of positing it. Beyond a certain point, the development of the
powers of production becomes a barrier for capital; hence the capital
relation a barrier for the development of the productive powers of
labour. When it has reached this point, capital, i.e. wage labour,
enters into the same relation towards the development of social wealth
and of the forces of production as the guild system, serfdom, slavery,
and is necessarily stripped off as a fetter. The last form of servitude
assumed by human activity, that of wage labour on one side, capital on
the other, is thereby cast off like a skin, and this casting-off itself
is the result of the mode of production corresponding to capital; the
material and mental conditions of the negation of wage labour and of
capital, themselves already the negation of earlier forms of unfree
social production, are themselves results of its production process. The
growing incompatibility between the productive development of society
and its hitherto existing relations of production expresses itself in
bitter contradictions, crises, spasms. The violent destruction of
capital not by relations external to it, but rather as a condition of
its self-preservation, is the most striking form in which advice is
given it to be gone and to give room to a higher state of social
production. It is not only the growth of scientific power, but the
measure in which it is already posited as fixed capital, the scope and
width in which it is realized and has conquered the totality of
production. It is, likewise, the development of the population etc., in
short, of all moments of production; in that the productive power of
labour, like the application of machinery, is related to the population;
whose growth in and for itself already the presupposition as well as the
result of the growth of the use values to be reproduced and hence also
to be consumed. Since this decline of profit signifies the same as the
decrease of immediate labour relative to the size of the objectified
labour which it reproduces and newly posits, capital will attempt every
means of checking the smallness of the relation of living labour to the
size of the capital generally, hence also of the surplus value, if
expressed as profit, relative to the presupposed capital, by reducing
the allotment made to necessary labour and by still more expanding the
quantity of surplus labour with regard to the whole labour employed.
Hence the highest development of productive power together with the
greatest expansion of existing wealth will coincide with depreciation of
capital, degradation of the labourer, and a most straitened exhaustion
of his vital powers. These contradictions lead to explosions,
cataclysms, crises, in which by momentaneous suspension of labour and
annihilation of a great portion of capital the latter is violently
reduced to the point where it can go on. These contradictions, of
course, lead to explosions, crises, in which momentary suspension of all
labour and annihilation of a great part of the capital violently lead it
back to the point where it is enabled [to go on] fully employing its
productive powers without committing suicide. [21] Yet, these regularly
recurring catastrophes lead to their repetition on a higher scale, and
finally to its violent overthrow. There are moments in the developed
movement of capital which delay this movement other than by crises; such
as e.g. the constant devaluation of a part of the existing capital: the
transformation of a great part of capital into fixed capital which does
not serve as agency of direct production; unproductive waste of a great
portion of capital etc. (Productively employed capital is always
replaced doubly, as we have seen, in that the positing of value by a
productive capital presupposes a counter-value. The unproductive
consumption of capital replaces it on one side, annihilates it on the
other. * That the fall of the rate of profit can further be delayed by
the omission of existing deductions from profit, e.g. by a lowering of
taxes, reduction of ground rent etc., is actually not our concern here,
although of importance in practice, for these are themselves portions of
the profit under another name, and are appropriated by persons other
than the capitalists themselves. † The fall [in the rate of profit]
likewise delayed by creation of new branches of production in which more
direct labour in relation to capital is needed, or where the productive
power of labour is not yet developed, i.e. the productive power of
capital.) (Likewise, monopolies.) ‘Profit is a term signifying the
increase of capital or wealth; so failing to find the laws which govern
the rate of profit, is failing to find the laws of the formation of
capital.’ (William Atkinson, _Principles of Political Economy etc.,_
London, 1840, p. 55.) He has however failed to understand even what the
rate of profit is. A. Smith explained the fall of the rate of profit, as
capital grows, by the competition among capitals. [22] To which Ricardo
replied that competition can indeed reduce profits in the various
branches of business to an average level, can equalize the rate, but
cannot depress this average rate itself. [23] A. Smith’s phrase is
correct to the extent that only in competition – the action of capital
upon capital – are the inherent laws of capital, its tendencies,
realized. But it is false in the sense in which he understands it, as if
competition imposed laws on capital from the outside, laws not its own.
Competition can permanently depress the rate of profit in all branches
of industry, i.e. the average rate of profit, only if and in so far as a
general and permanent fall of the rate of profit, having the force of a
law, is conceivable _prior to_ competition and regardless of
competition. Competition executes the inner laws of capital; makes them
into compulsory laws towards the individual capital, but it does not
invent them. It realizes them. To try to explain them simply as results
of competition therefore means to concede that one does not understand
them. Ricardo, for his part, says: ‘No accumulation of capitals can
_permanently_ reduce profits unless an equally permanent cause raises
wages.’ (p. 92, tome II, Paris 1835, translated by Constancio.) He finds
this cause in the growing, relatively growing unproductivity of
agriculture, ‘the growing difficulty of increasing the quantity of
subsistence’, i.e. in the growth of proportionate wages, so that
labour’s real wage is no greater, but the product obtains more labour;
in a word, a greater portion of necessary labour is required for the
production of agricultural products. The falling rate of profit hence
corresponds, with him, to the nominal growth of wages and real growth of
ground rent. His one-sided mode of conceiving it, which seizes on only
one single case, just as the rate of profit can fall because wages
momentarily rise etc., and which elevates a historical relation holding
for a period of 50 years and reversed in the following 50 years to the
level of a general law, and rests generally on the historical
disproportion between the developments of industry and agriculture – in
and for itself it was strange that Ricardo, Malthus, etc. constructed
general and eternal laws about physiological chemistry at a time where
the latter hardly existed – this method that Ricardo has of conceiving
the matter has therefore been attacked from all sides, partly because of
an instinct that it is wrong and unsatisfactory; but mostly for its true
rather than for its false aspects.

* The same law expresses itself simply – but this expression to be
looked at later in the theory of population – as the relation of the
growth of population – namely its labouring part – to the capital
already presupposed.

† The other way in which this same law also expresses itself, in the
relation among many capitals, i.e. in competition, likewise belongs in
another section. It can also be formulated as a law of the accumulation
of capitals; as e.g. by Fullarton. We shall come to this in the next
section. It is important to call attention to the point that this law
deals not simply with the development of productive power δυνάμει, but
at the same time with the scope in which this productive power acts as
capital, and is realized as fixed capital above all in one respect, and
as population in the other.

‘A. Smith thought that accumulation or increase of stock in general
lowered the rate of profits in general, on the same principle which
makes the increase of stock in any particular trade lower the profits of
that trade. But such increase of stock in a particular trade _means_ an
increase in a greater _proportion_ than stock is at the same time
increased in other trades. It is relative.’ (p. 9, _An Inquiry into
those Principles respecting the Nature of Demand and the Necessity of
Consumption, lately advocated by Mr Malthus._ London, 1821.) ‘The
competition among the industrial capitalists can level profits which
rise particularly above the level, but cannot lower this ordinary
level.’ (Ramsay, IX, 88.) [24] (Ramsay and other economists correctly
distinguish between whether productivity grows in the branches of
industry which make fixed capital, and naturally wages, or in other
industries, e.g. luxury-goods industries. The latter cannot diminish
necessary labour time. This they can do only through exchange for
agricultural products of other countries, which is then the same as if
productivity had increased in agriculture. Hence the importance of free
trade in grain for the industrial capitalists.) Ricardo says (English
edition _On the Principles of Political Economy and Taxation._ 3rd
edition, London, 1821): ‘The farmer and manufacturer can no more live
without profits, than the labourer without wages.’ (p. 23 loc. cit.)
‘There is a natural tendency for profits to fall, because in the
progress of society and of wealth, the additional food requires more and
more labour. This tendency, this gravitation of profits, is delayed in
repeated intervals by improvement of the machinery involved in the
production of necessaries, as well as by discoveries in the science of
agriculture, which reduce the costs of production.’ (loc. cit. p. 121.)
Ricardo at once identifies profit directly with surplus value; he did
not make this distinction at all. _But whereas the rate of surplus value
is determined by the relation of surplus labour employed by the capital
to necessary labour, the rate of profit is nothing but the relation of
the surplus value to the total value of the capital presupposed to
production._ Its proportion falls and rises, hence, in relation with the
part of the capital exchanged for living labour relative to the part
existing as material and fixed capital. _Under_ ALL _circumstances, the
surplus value regarded as profit must express a smaller proportion of
the gain than the real proportion of the surplus value._ For, under all
circumstances, it is measured by the total capital, which is always
larger than that employed for wages and exchanged for living labour.
Since Ricardo simply mixes surplus value and profit together in this
way, and since the surplus value can constantly decline, can
_tendentially_ decline only if the relation of surplus labour to
necessary labour, i.e. to the labour required for the reproduction of
labouring capacity, declines, but since the latter is possible only if
the productive force of labour declines, Ricardo assumes that the
productive force of labour decreases in agriculture, although it grows
in industry, with the accumulation of capital. He flees from economics
to seek refuge in organic chemistry. We have demonstrated the necessity
of this tendency without any reference to ground rent, nor did we have
to refer e.g. to rising demand for labour etc. The connection between
ground rent and profit is to be treated only in the examination of
ground rent itself, does not belong here. But modern chemistry has
demonstrated that Ricardo’s physiological postulate, expressed as a
general law, is false. [25] As for Ricardo’s disciples, in so far as
they are more than his pious echoes, they have quietly let drop whatever
is unpleasant to them in their master’s principles, as has the newer
economics generally. To drop the problem is their general method of
solving it. Other economists, such as e.g. Wakefield, seek refuge in the
examination of the _field of employment_ for the growing capital. This
belongs in the examination of competition, and is rather the _difficulty
for capital to realize the growing profit, hence denial of the inherent
tendency towards the fall of the rate of profit._ But the need for
capital to seek a constantly more extensive field of employment is
itself again a consequence. One cannot count Wakefield and similar
people among those who have posed the question itself. (Is in certain
respects a reproduction of A. Smith’s view.) Finally, the harmonists
among the most modern economists, at their head the American, Carey,
whose most obnoxious adherent was the Frenchman Bastiat (by the way, it
is the nicest irony of history that the Continental free-traders worship
Mr Bastiat, who, for his part, gets his wisdom from the protectionist,
Carey), accept the fact of the tendency of the rate of profit to fall in
measure as productive capital grows. But they explain it simply and
entirely as due to growth in the value of labour’s share; growth of the
proportion of the total product obtained by the worker, while the
capital is allegedly compensated for this by the growth of gross
profits. The unpleasant contradictions, antagonisms within which
classical economics moves, and which Ricardo emphasizes with scientific
ruthlessness, are thus watered down into well-to-do harmonies. In
Carey’s development, it sometimes seems as if he still had a mind of his
own. This concerns a law which we need look at only in the doctrine of
competition, where we will then settle accounts with him. We can finish
up here with the witlessness of Bastiat, who expresses commonplaces in a
paradoxical way, grinds and polishes them into facets, and hides an
utter poverty of ideas under a cover of formal logic. * In the _Gratuité
du Crédit._ Discussion entre M. Fr. Bastiat et M. Proudhon, Paris, 1850
(Proudhon, by the way, cuts a highly ridiculous figure in this polemic,
where he hides his dialectical feebleness under a great show of
rhetoric), it says in Bastiat’s letter No. VIII (where this noble
spirit, by the way, simply transforms, with his conciliatory dialectic,
the gain resulting from the simple division of labour both for the
road-builder and for the road-user into a gain owed to the ‘road’ (i.e.
to capital) itself): ‘To the degree that capitals increase (and the
products with them), the absolute part returning to capital increases,
and its proportional part diminishes. To the degree that capitals
increase (and the products with them), labour’s proportional part and
its absolute part increase … Since capital’s absolute part grows even
while it successively obtains only 1/2, 1/3, 1/4, 1/5 of the total
product, it follows that labour, which successively obtains 1/2, 2/3,
3/4, 4/5, evidently receives a progressively increasing share of the
whole, both in the proportional and in the absolute sense.’ He gives as
_illustration_:

  ----------------------------------------------------------
  Total product           Capital’s share   Labour’s share
  --------------- ------- ----------------- ----------------
  1st period      1,000   1/2 or 500        1/2 or 500

  2nd             1,800   1/3 or 600        2/3 or 1,200

  3rd             2,800   1/4 or 700        3/4 or 2,100

  4th             4,000   1/5 or 800        4/5 or 3,200
                                            (p. 130, 131.)
  ----------------------------------------------------------

* Some things from Notebook III about the antithesis of Carey and
Bastiat can be included at this point. [26]

The same joke is repeated (p. 288) in the form of increasing gross
profit with declining rate of profit, but increasing mass of products
sold at lower prices, and weighty words are spoken on that occasion
about ‘the law of unlimited decline which never reaches zero, a law well
known to mathematicians’. (p. 288.) ‘Here we have’ (hawking his wares)
‘an endlessly decreasing multiplier, because the multiplicand is ever
growing.’ (p. 288 loc. cit.)

Ricardo had anticipated his Bastiat. Emphasizing that the sum of profit
grows as capital grows despite the decline of the rate of profit – thus
anticipating Bastiat’s whole profundity – he does not fail to note that
this progression ‘is true only for a certain time’. He says, word for
word: ‘Regardless of how the rate of profit on stock may decline in
consequence of the accumulation of capital on the land and of a rise of
wages’ (by which Ricardo understands, N.B., the rise of the cost of
production of the agricultural products necessary for the maintenance of
labour capacity), ‘the aggregate amount of profits must nevertheless
grow. Supposing, then, that in repeated accumulations of £100,000 the
rate of profits fell from 20 to 19, 18, 17%, we should expect that the
whole amount of profits received by the successive owners of capital
would be always progressive; that it would be greater with the capital
of £200,000 than with that of 100,000; yet greater with 300,000; and so
on, increasing, although at a decreasing rate, with every increase of
capital. _However, this progress is true only for a certain time:_ thus
19% on £200,000 is more than 20 on 100,000; 18% on 300,000 more than 19%
on 200,000; but after capital has accumulated to a large amount and
profits have fallen, further accumulation diminishes the sum of profits.
Thus, supposing the accumulation of 1,000,000 and profits of 7%, then
the total amount of profit will be £70,000; now if an addition of
100,000 is made to the million, and profits fall to 6%, then £66,000 or
a decrease of £4,000 will be received by the owners of the stock,
although the amount of capital will be increased from 1,000,000 to
1,100,000.’ (loc. cit. p. 124, 125.) Of course this does not prevent Mr
Bastiat from undertaking the operation of making a growing multiplicand
grow in such a way that, with the declining multiplier, it produces a
growing product, in true elementary-school pupil style, just as the laws
of production did not prevent Dr Price from constructing his compound
interest calculations. Because the rate of profit declines, it declines
relative to wages, which must consequently grow proportionally and
absolutely. So reasons Bastiat. (Ricardo observed this tendency towards
the decline of the profit rate with the growth of capital; and since he
confuses profit with surplus value, he was forced to make wages rise in
order to let profits fall. But since he saw at the same time that wages
really declined more than they rose, he let the value of wages grow,
i.e. the quantity of necessary labour, without letting its use value
grow. Thus in fact he only let ground rent increase. The harmonic Mr
Bastiat discovers, however, that, with the accumulation of capitals,
wages rise proportionally and absolutely.) He assumes what he has to
prove, that the decline of the profit rate is identical with the
increase in the rate of wages, and then ‘illustrates’ his presupposition
with an arithmetical example which appears to have amused him greatly.
If the decline of the profit rate expresses nothing more than the
decline of the relation in which the total capital requires living
labour for its reproduction, then it is another matter. Mr Bastiat
overlooks the trifling circumstance that, in his presupposition, while
the profit rate on capital declines, the capital itself increases, the
capital presupposed to production. Now even Mr Bastiat ought to have had
an inkling that the value of the capital cannot grow without
appropriating surplus labour. The misery of agricultural overproduction,
recorded in French history, could have shown him that the mere increase
of products does not increase their value. The question would then
revolve simply around an investigation of whether the fall of the profit
rate is identical with the growth of the rate of surplus labour relative
to necessary labour, or, instead, with the fall of the total rate of
living labour employed relative to the reproduced capital. Mr Bastiat
also therefore divides the product simply between capitalist and worker,
instead of dividing it into raw material, instrument of production and
labour, and asking himself in what proportional parts its value in
exchange is applied against these different portions. The part of the
product exchanged for raw material and instrument of production is
obviously none of the workers’ business. What they divide with capital,
as wages and profit, is nothing other than the newly added living labour
itself. But what particularly worries Bastiat is who, after all, is to
eat up the increased product? Since the capitalist eats up a relatively
small part, does not the worker have to eat up a relatively large one?
Particularly in France, whose total production is sufficient only in
Bastiat’s fantasy to give anyone at all very much to eat, Mr Bastiat
could have found convincing testimony that a mass of parasitic bodies
come to cluster around capital, and, under one or another title, they
lay hands on so much of the total production as to leave little danger
of the workers being overwhelmed by abundance. It is clear, of course,
that with large-scale production the total mass of labour employed can
increase although the proportion of labour employed relative to capital
decreases, and that there is no obstacle, therefore, which prevents an
increasing working population from requiring a greater mass of products
as capital increases. Incidentally, Bastiat – in whose harmonic brain
all cows are grey – (see above, wages), [27] confuses the decline of
interest with the increase of wages, since this is rather an increase of
industrial profit, which concerns the workers not at all, but concerns
only the relation in which different species of capitalists divide up
the total profit among themselves.

_Capital and revenue (profit). Production and distribution. Sismondi. – Production costs from capital’s viewpoint. Profit, ditto. – Inequality of profits. Equalization and communal rate of profit. – Transformation of surplus value into profit. – Laws_

Back to our topic. The product of capital, then, is profit. By relating
to itself as profit, it relates to itself as the _source of the
production of value, and the rate of profit expresses the proportion to
which it has increased its own value._ But the capitalist is not merely
capital. He has to live, and since he does not live by working he must
live from profit, i.e. from the alien labour he appropriates. Thus
capital is posited as the source of wealth. Since capital has
incorporated productivity into itself as its inherent quality, capital
relates to profit as _revenue._ It can consume a part of it (seemingly
all of it, but this will prove to be false) without ceasing to be
capital. After consumption of this fruit it can bear new fruit. It can
represent consumption wealth without ceasing to represent the general
form of wealth, something which money in simple circulation could not
possibly do. The latter had to _abstain in order to remain the general
form_ of wealth; or, if it exchanged for real wealth, for consumer
gratifications, it ceased to be the general form of wealth. Thus profit
appears as a _form of distribution,_ like wages. But since capital can
grow only through the retransformation of profit into capital – into
surplus capital – profit is at the same time a _form of production for
capital;_ just exactly as wages are a mere _relation of production_ from
the standpoint of capital, a relation of distribution from the worker’s
standpoint. This shows that the relations of distribution are themselves
produced by the relations of production, and represent the latter
themselves from another point of view. It shows further that the
relation of production to consumption is posited by production itself.
Note the fatuousness of all bourgeois economists, including e.g. J. St.
Mill, who considers the bourgeois relations of production as eternal,
but their forms of distribution as historical, and thereby shows that he
understands neither the one nor the other. As to simple exchange,
Sismondi correctly remarks: ‘An exchange always presupposes two values;
each may have a different share; but the _quality of capital and
revenue_ does not follow from the object exchanged; it attaches to the
person who is its owner.’ (Sismondi, VI.) [29] Hence the simple exchange
relation provides no basis for the explanation of revenue. The quality
of a value obtained in exchange, whether it represents capital or
revenue, is determined by relations lying outside simple exchange.
Absurd, therefore, to want to reduce these more complex forms to the
earlier, simpler exchange relations, as do the harmonic freetraders.
From the standpoint of simple exchange, and considering accumulation as
the mere accumulation of money (exchange value), capital’s profit and
revenue are impossible. ‘If the rich spend the accumulated wealth for
luxury products – and they can obtain commodities only through exchange
– then their funds would soon be exhausted … But, in the social order,
wealth has achieved the quality of reproducing itself through _alien
labour._ Wealth, like labour, and _through labour,_ yields an annual
fruit which may be _destroyed_ each year without the rich man thereby
becoming poorer. This fruit is the revenue springing from capital.’
(Sismondi, IV.) [30] While profit thus appears in one respect as the
result of capital, it appears in the other as the _presupposition of
capital formation._ Thus is posited anew the circular movement in which
the result appears as presupposition. ‘Thus a part of the revenue became
transformed into capital, into a permanent, self-multiplying value,
which did not perish; this value tore itself free from the commodity
which created it; like a metaphysical, insubstantial quality it always
remained in possession of the same _cultivateur’_ (capitalist),
‘assuming various forms for him.’ (Sismondi, VI) [31]

_When capital is posited as profit-creating, as a source of wealth
independently of labour, each part of the capital is thereby assumed to
be equally productive._ Just as surplus value in the form of profit is
measured against the total value of the capital, so does it appear to be
created by its different components to an equal degree. Thus its
circulating part (the part consisting of raw materials and
_approvisionnement)_ brings no more profit than the component which
consists of the fixed capital, and, more particularly, profit accrues to
these component parts in proportion to their magnitude.

Since the profit of capital is realized only in the price which is paid
for it, for the use value created by it, profit is determined by the
_excess of the price obtained over the price which covers outlays._
Since, furthermore, this realization proceeds only through _exchange,_
the individual capital’s _profit is not necessarily restricted by its
surplus value,_ by the surplus labour contained in it; but is relative,
rather, to the excess of price obtained in exchange. It can exchange
more than its _equivalent, and then its profit is greater than its
surplus value._ This can be the case only to the extent that the other
party to the exchange does not obtain an equivalent. The total surplus
value, as well as the _total profit,_ which is only _surplus value
itself, computed differently,_ can neither grow nor decrease through
this operation, ever; what is _modified thereby_ is not it, but only
_its distribution among the different capitals._ However, this
examination belongs only with that of the many capitals, it does not yet
belong here. In relation to profit, the value of the capital presupposed
in production appears as _advances – production costs_ which must be
replaced in the product. After deduction of the part of the price which
replaces them, the excess forms the profit. Since surplus labour – of
which profit and interest are, both, only portions – costs capital
nothing, hence does not figure as part of the value advanced by it – not
as part of the value which it possessed before the production process
and the realization of the product – it follows that this surplus
labour, which is included in the production costs of the product and
forms the source of surplus value and hence of profit as well, does not
figure as part of the production costs of capital. The latter are equal
only to the values actually advanced by it, not including the surplus
value appropriated in production and realized in circulation. The
production costs from the standpoint of capital are therefore not the
real production costs, precisely because surplus labour does not cost
_it_ anything. The excess of the price of the product over the price of
the production costs gives it its profit. Thus profit can exist for
capital even without the realization of the real production costs – i.e.
the whole surplus labour set to work by capital. Profit – the excess
over the advances made by capital – may be smaller than surplus value –
the surplus of living labour gained in exchange by capital in excess of
the objectified labour it has given in exchange for labour capacity.
However, through the separation of interest from profit – which we will
look at immediately – a part of the surplus value is posited as
production cost even for productive capital itself. The confusion of
_production costs_ from the standpoint of capital with the amount of
labour objectified in capital’s product, surplus labour included, has
given rise to statements such as that ‘profit is not included in the
natural price’. It is allegedly ‘absurd to call the excess, or profit, a
part of the expenditure’. (Torrens, IX, 30.) [32] This then leads to a
mass of confusion; either by having profit not realized in, but rather
arising from, exchange (which can always be the case only relatively, if
one of the parties to the exchange does not obtain his equivalent), or
by ascribing to capital some magic power which makes something out of
nothing. Since the value posited in the production process realizes its
price through exchange, the price of the product appears in fact
determined by the sum of money which expresses an equivalent for the
total quantity of labour contained in raw material, machinery, wages and
in unpaid surplus labour. Thus price still appears here merely as a
formal modification of value; as value expressed in money; but the
magnitude of this price is presupposed in the production process of
capital. Capital thereby appears as a determinant of price, so that
price is determined by the advances made by capital + the surplus labour
realized by it in the product. We shall see later that price, on the
contrary, appears as determining profit. And, while here the total
_real_ production costs appear as determining price, price appears later
as determining the production costs. So as to impose the inherent laws
of capital upon it as external necessity, competition seemingly turns
all of them over. _Inverts them._

To repeat once more: the profit of capital does not depend on its
magnitude; but rather, given an equal magnitude, on the relation between
its component parts (the constant and the variable part); and then on
the productivity of labour (which is expressed, however, in the above
proportion, since, with diminished productivity, the same capital could
not work up the same material with the same portion of living labour);
on the turnover time, which is determined by the different proportions
between fixed and circulating capital, different durability of fixed
capital, etc. etc. (see above). The inequality of profit in different
branches of industry with capitals of equal magnitudes is the condition
and presupposition for their equalization through competition.

In so far as capital obtains raw material, instrument, labour, through
exchange, buys them, its elements are themselves already present in the
form of prices; already posited as prices; presupposed to it. The
comparison of the market price of its product with the prices of its
elements then becomes decisive for it. But this belongs only in the
chapter on competition.

Thus the surplus value which capital posits in a given turnover period
obtains the form of _profit_ in so far as it is measured against the
total value of the capital presupposed to production. While surplus
value is measured directly by the surplus labour time which capital
gains in the exchange with living labour. Profit is nothing but another
form of surplus value, a form developed further in the sense of capital.
Surplus value no longer regarded here as exchanged for capital itself in
the production process; not for labour. Hence capital appears as
capital, as presupposed value relating to itself, through the mediation
of its own process, as posited, produced value, and the value posited by
it is called _profit._

The two immediate laws which this transformation of surplus value into
the shape of profit yields for us are these: (1) _Surplus value
expressed as profit always appears as a smaller proportion than surplus
value in its immediate reality actually amounts to._ For, instead of
being measured by a part of the capital, the part exchanged for living
labour (a relation which turns out to be that of necessary to surplus
labour), it is measured against the whole. Whatever may be the surplus
value which a capital A posits, and whatever may be the proportion
within A of _c_ and _v_, the constant and the variable part of the
capital, the surplus value _s_ must appear smaller when measured against
_c_ + _v_ than when measured against its real measure, _v_. Profit, or –
if it is regarded not as an absolute sum but rather, as is usually done,
as a _proportion_ (the rate of profit is profit expressed as the
_relation in which_ capital has posited surplus value) – the rate of
profit never expresses the real rate at which capital exploits labour,
but always a much smaller relation, and the larger the capital, the more
false is the relation it expresses. The rate of profit could express the
real rate of surplus value only if the entire capital were transformed
solely into wages; if the entire capital were exchanged for living
labour, i.e. if the _approvisionnement_ alone existed, and if it not
only existed not in the form of already produced raw material (which has
happened in extractive industry), hence if not only the raw material
were = 0, but if the means of production, also, whether in the form of
instruments or in the form of developed fixed capital, were = 0. The
latter case cannot occur on the basis of the mode of production
corresponding to capital. If A = _c_ + _v,_ whatever the numerical value
of _s,_ then _s_/(_c_ + _v_) < _s_/_v_. [33]

(2) The second great law is that the rate of profit declines to the
degree that capital has already appropriated living labour in the form
of objectified labour, hence to the degree that labour is already
capitalized and hence also acts increasingly in the form of fixed
capital in the production process, or to the degree that the productive
power of labour grows. The growth of the productive power of labour is
identical in meaning with (a) the growth of relative surplus value or of
the relative surplus labour time which the worker gives to capital; (b)
the decline of the labour time necessary for the reproduction of labour
capacity; (c) the decline of the part of capital which exchanges at all
for living labour relative to the parts of it which participate in the
production process as objectified labour and as presupposed value. The
profit rate is therefore inversely related to the growth of relative
surplus value or of relative surplus labour, to the development of the
powers of production, and to the magnitude of the capital employed as
[constant] capital within production. In other words, the second law is
the _tendency of the profit rate to decline_ with the development of
capital, both of its productive power and of the extent in which it has
already posited itself as objectified value; of the extent within which
labour as well as productive power is capitalized.

Other causes which additionally act upon the rate of profit, which can
depress it for longer or shorter periods, do not yet belong here. It is
quite correct, as regards the production process as a whole, that the
capital acting as material and as fixed capital not only is objectified
labour, but must also be reproduced, and continuously reproduced, by new
labour. Its presence assumes, therefore – the extent which its presence
has attained assumes, therefore, the extent of the labouring population,
population on a large scale, which in and for itself is the condition of
all productive power – but this reproduction everywhere proceeds on the
presupposition of the action of fixed capital and of raw material and of
scientific power, both as such, and as appropriated within production
and already realized within it. This point is to be developed in more
detail only in the examination of accumulation.

It is clear, further, that although the part of capital exchanged for
living labour declines in relation to the total capital, the total mass
of living labour employed can increase or remain the same if capital
grows in the same or a larger relation. Hence a constant growth in the
population may accompany a relative decline in necessary labour. If
capital A lays out 1/2 in _c_ and 1/2 in _v_, while capital A′ lays out
3/4 in _c_ and 1/4 in _v_, then capital A′ could employ 2/4 _v_ for 6/4
_c_. But if it was originally = 3/4 _c_ + 1/4 _v_, then it is now = 6/4
_c_ + 2/4 _v,_ or it grew by 4/4; i.e. it doubled. However, this
relation also is to be examined more closely only in connection with the
theory of accumulation and population. All in all we must not at this
point be sidetracked by drawing the consequences which follow from the
laws, and by turning them over in the mind from one angle or another.

The rate of profit is determined, then, not only by the relation of
surplus labour to necessary labour, or by the relation in which
objectified labour is exchanged for living labour, but by the overall
relation of living labour employed to objective labour; by the portion
of capital exchanged for living labour relative to the part which
participates in the production process as objectified labour. This
portion, however, declines in the same relation as surplus labour
increases in relation to necessary labour.

Surplus value = _relation of surplus labour to necessary labour_

(Since the worker must reproduce the part of the capital which is
exchanged for his labour capacity just as much as he must reproduce the
other parts of the capital, the relation in which the capitalist gains
from the exchange with labour capacity appears as determined by the
relation of surplus labour to necessary labour. Originally this appears
in such a way that the necessary labour only replaces his outlay. But
since he lays out nothing other than labour itself – as is shown in
reproduction – the relation can be expressed simply in this way – the
relation of surplus value as the relation of surplus labour to necessary
labour.)

Value of fixed capital _and its_ productive power. _Durability of fixed capital, ditto. – The powers of society, division of labour etc._ cost _capital nothing. – Distinction between this and machinery (capitalist’s_ economy _in the employment of machinery). – Profit and surplus value_

<We have still to note in regard to fixed capital – and its durability,
as one of its conditions which does not enter in from the outside: To
the extent that the instrument of production is itself a value,
objectified labour, _it does not contribute as a productive force._ If a
machine which cost 100 working days to make replaced only 100 working
days, then it would in no way increase the productive power of labour
and in no way decrease the cost of the product. The more durable the
machine, the more often can the same quantity of product be created with
it, or the more often can the circulating capital be renewed, its
reproduction be repeated, and the smaller is the value-share (that
required to replace the depreciation, the wear and tear of the machine);
i.e. the more is the price of the product and its unit production cost
decreased. However, we may not introduce the price relation at this
point in the development. The reduction of the price as condition for
conquest of the market belongs only to competition. It must therefore be
developed in a different way. If capital could obtain the instrument of
production at no cost, for 0, what would be the consequence? The same as
if the cost of circulation = 0. That is, the labour necessary for the
maintenance of labour capacity would be diminished, and thus surplus
labour, i.e. surplus value, [increased], without the slightest cost to
capital. Such an increase of the force of production, a piece of
machinery which costs capital nothing, is the division of labour and the
combination of labour within the production process. This assumes,
however, work proceeding on a large scale, i.e. development of capital
and wage labour. Another productive force which costs it nothing is
scientific power. (It goes without saying that it must always pay a
certain contribution for parsons, schoolmasters and scholars, whether
the scientific power they develop is great or small.) But it can
appropriate the latter only through the employment of machinery (and in
part through the chemical process). The growth of population is a
productive force of this kind, and it costs it nothing. In short, all
the social powers developing with the growth of population and with the
historic development of society cost it nothing. To the extent, however,
that a substratum which itself exists in the form of objectified labour,
i.e. is itself produced by labour, is required to employ them within the
direct production process, hence to the extent that they are themselves
values, it can appropriate them only through equivalents. Well. Fixed
capital whose employment required more labour for its production or
maintenance than it replaced would be a nuisance. The kind that would
cost nothing, but merely needed to be appropriated by capital, would
have the maximum value for capital. It follows from the simple
proposition that machinery is most valuable for capital when its value =
0, that every reduction of its cost is a gain for capital. _While it is
the tendency of capital, on one side, to increase the total value of the
fixed capital,_ [so], _at the same time,_ [is its tendency] _to decrease
the value of each of its fractional parts._ To the extent that fixed
capital enters into circulation as value, it ceases to act as use value
within the production process. Its use value is precisely that it
increases the productive power of labour, decreases necessary labour,
and increases relative surplus labour and hence surplus value. To the
extent that it enters into circulation, its value is merely replaced,
not increased. By contrast, the product, the circulating capital, is the
vehicle of the surplus value, which is realized only when it steps
outside the production process and into circulation. If machinery lasted
for ever, if it did not itself consist of transitory material which must
be reproduced (quite apart from the invention of more perfect machines
which would rob it of the character of being a machine), if it were a
_perpetuum mobile,_ then it would most completely correspond to its
concept. Its value would not need to be replaced because it would
continue to last in an indestructible materiality. Since fixed capital
is employed only to the extent that its value is smaller than the value
it posits, it follows that, even if it never itself entered into
circulation as value, the surplus value realized in the circulating
capital would nevertheless soon replace the advances, and it would thus
act to posit value after its costs for the capitalist, as well as the
cost of the surplus labour he appropriates, were = 0. It would continue
to act as a productive power of labour and at the same time be money in
the third sense, constant value for-itself. Take a capital of £1,000.
Let one-fourth be machinery; the sum of surplus value = 50. The value of
the machinery then equal to 200. After 4 turnovers the machinery would
be paid for. And, in addition, since the capital would continue to
possess, in the machine, objectified labour to the amount of 200, then,
beginning with the fifth turnover, it would be the same as if it made 50
on a capital which only costs it 800; hence 6 1/4% instead of 5%. As
soon as fixed capital enters into circulation as value, its use value
for the capital realization process ceases, or, it enters into it only
as soon as the latter ceases. Hence, the more durable, the less it
requires repair, total or partial reproduction, the longer its
circulation time, the more does it act as productive power of labour, as
capital; i.e. as objectified labour, which posits living surplus labour.
The durability of fixed capital, which is identical with the circulation
time of its value, or with the time required for its reproduction,
arises from its concept itself, as its value-moment. (That in and for
itself, as regards its _material_ side only, it lies in the concept of
the means of production is something which needs no elucidation.) The
rate of surplus value is determined simply by the relation of surplus
labour to necessary labour; the rate of profit is determined not only by
the relation of surplus to necessary labour, but by the relation of the
part of capital exchanged for living labour to the total capital
entering into production.>

Profit as we still regard it here, i.e. as the profit of capital _as
such,_ not of an individual capital at the expense of another, but
rather as the _profit of the capitalist class,_ concretely expressed,
_can never be greater than the sum of the surplus value._ As a sum, it
is the sum of the surplus value, but it is this same sum of values as a
proportion relative to the total value of the capital, instead of to
that part of it whose value really grows, i.e. is exchanged for living
labour. _In its immediate form, profit is nothing but the sum of the
surplus value expressed as a proportion of the total value of the
capital._

_Machinery and surplus labour. Recapitulation of the doctrine of surplus value generally_

The transformation of surplus value into the form of profit, this method
by which capital calculates surplus value, is necessary from the
standpoint of capital, regardless of how much it rests on an illusion
about the nature of surplus value, or rather veils this nature. *

* It is easy to form the notion that machinery as such posits value,
because it acts as a productive power of labour. But if machinery
required no labour, then it would be able to increase the use value; but
the exchange value which it would create would never be greater than its
own costs of production, its own value, the labour objectified in it. It
creates value not because it replaces labour; rather, only in so far as
it is a means to increase surplus labour, and only the latter itself is
both the measure and the substance of the surplus value posited with the
aid of the machine; hence of labour generally.

If we look at a single worker’s day, then the decrease of necessary
labour relative to surplus labour expresses itself in the appropriation
of a larger part of the working day by capital. The living labour
employed here remains the same. Suppose that an increase of the force of
production, e.g. employment of machinery, made 3 workers superfluous out
of 6, each of whom worked 6 days a week. If these 6 workers themselves
possessed the machinery, then each of them would thereafter work only
half a day. Now, instead, 3 continue to work a whole day every day of
the week. If capital were to continue to employ the 6, then each of them
would work only half a day, but perform no surplus labour. Suppose that
necessary labour amounted to 10 hours previously, the surplus labour to
2 hours per day, then the total surplus labour of the 6 workers was 2 ×
6 daily, equal to a whole day, and was equal to 6 days a week = 72
hours. Each one worked one day a week for nothing. Or it would be the
same as if the sixth worker had worked the whole week long for nothing.
The 5 workers represent necessary labour, and if they could be reduced
to 4, and if the one worker worked for nothing as before – then the
relative surplus value would have grown. Its relation previously was =
1:6, and would now be 1:5. _The previous law, of an increase in the
number of hours of surplus labour, thus now obtains the form of a
reduction in the number of necessary workers._ If it were possible for
this same capital to employ the 6 workers at this new rate, then the
surplus value would have increased not only relatively, but absolutely
as well. Surplus labour time would amount to 14 2/5 hours. 2 2/5 hours
[each] performed by 6 workers is of course more than 2 2/5 performed by
5.

If we look at absolute surplus value, it appears determined by the
absolute lengthening of the working day above and beyond necessary
labour time. Necessary labour time works for mere use value, for
subsistence. Surplus labour time is work for exchange value, for wealth.
It is the first moment of industrial labour. The natural limit is
posited – presupposing that the conditions of labour are on hand, raw
material and instrument of labour, or one of them, depending on whether
the work is merely extractive or formative, whether it merely isolates
the use value from nature or whether it shapes it – the natural limit is
posited by the number of simultaneous work days or of living labour
capacities, i.e. by the labouring population. At this stage the
difference between the production of capital and earlier stages of
production is still merely formal. With kidnapping, slavery, the slave
trade and forced labour, the increase of these labouring machines,
machines producing surplus product, is posited directly by force; with
capital, it is mediated through exchange.

Use values grow here in the same simple relation as exchange values, and
for that reason this form of surplus labour appears in the slave and
serf modes of production etc., where use value is the chief and
predominant concern, as well as in the mode of production of capital,
which is oriented directly towards exchange value, and only indirectly
towards use value. This use value may be purely imaginary, as e.g. with
the Egyptian pyramids, in short, with the works of religious ostentation
which the mass of the nation in Egypt, India etc. was forced [to
undertake]; or may be directed at immediate utility as e.g. with the
ancient Etruscans.

In the second form of surplus value, however, as relative surplus value,
which appears as the development of the workers’ productive power, _as
the reduction of necessary labour time relative to the working day,_ and
_as the reduction of the necessary labouring population_ relative to the
population (this is the antithetical form), in this form there directly
appears the industrial and the distinguishing historic character of the
mode of production founded on capital.

The forcible transformation of the greater part of the population into
wage labourers, and the discipline which transforms their existence into
that of mere labourers, correspond to the first form. Throughout a
period of 150 years, e.g. from Henry VII on, the annals of English
legislation contain the bloody handwriting of coercive measures employed
to transform the mass of the population, after they had become
propertyless and free, into free wage labourers. The dissolution of the
monastic orders, the confiscation of church lands, the abolition of the
guilds and confiscation of their property, the forcible ejection of the
population from the land through the transformation of tillage into
pasture, enclosures of commons etc., had posited the labourers as mere
labour capacities. But they now of course preferred vagabondage, beggary
etc. to wage labour, and had still to be accustomed forcibly to the
latter. This is repeated in a similar fashion with the introduction of
large industry, of factories operating with machines. Cf. Owen. [34]

Only at a certain stage of the development of capital does _the exchange
of capital and labour become in fact formally free._ One can say that
wage labour is completely realized in form in England only at the end of
the eighteenth century, with the repeal of the law of apprenticeship.

The tendency of capital is, of course, to link up absolute with relative
surplus value; hence _greatest stretching of the working day with
greatest number of simultaneous working days, together with reduction of
necessary labour time to the minimum, on one side, and of the number of
necessary workers to the minimum, on the other._ This contradictory
requirement, whose development will show itself in different forms as
overproduction, over-population etc., asserts itself in the form of a
process in which the contradictory aspects follow closely upon each
other in time. A necessary consequence of them is the _greatest possible
diversification of the use value of labour – or of the branches of
production—_so that the production of capital constantly and necessarily
creates, on one side, the _development of the intensity of the
productive power of labour,_ on the other side, the _unlimited diversity
of the branches of labour,_ i.e. thus the most universal wealth, in form
and content, of production, bringing all sides of nature under its
domination.

Capital pays nothing for the increase of the productive force arising by
itself, in large-scale production, from division and combination of
labour, from savings on certain expenses – conditions for the labour
process – which _remain the same or diminish when labour is done in
common, such as heating_ etc., _industrial buildings_ etc.; it obtains
this increased productive power of labour free of charge. If the force
of production increased simultaneously in the production of the
different conditions of production, raw material, means of production
and means of subsistence, and in the [branches of production] determined
[by them], then their growth would bring about no change in the relation
between the different component parts of the capital. If e.g. the
productive force of labour grows simultaneously in the production of
flax and of looms and of weaving itself (by division of labour), then a
greater quantity of raw material etc. would correspond to the greater
quantity woven in a day. In extractive work, e.g. the mining industry,
it is not necessary for raw materials to increase when labour becomes
more productive, since no raw material is used. To make harvests more
productive, it is not even necessary for the number of instruments to
have grown, but rather merely for them to be _concentrated_ and for the
work, _previously done fragmentarily by hundreds,_ to be done
_communally._ However, what is required for all forms of surplus labour
is _growth of population;_ of the labouring population for the first
form; of population generally for the second, since it requires the
development of science etc. Population, however, appears here as the
basic source of wealth.

_Relation between the objective conditions of production. Change in the proportion of the component parts of capital_

But as we regard capital originally, raw material and instrument appear
to come out of circulation, not to be produced by capital itself; just
as, in reality, the individual capital obtains the condition of its
production from circulation, although they are in turn produced by
capital, but by another capital. From this follows, on one side,
capital’s necessary tendency to subjugate production to itself on all
sides; its tendency to posit the production of labour materials and of
raw materials, as well as instruments, as likewise produced by capital,
even if it is a different capital; the propagandistic tendency of
capital. Secondly, however, it is clear that if _the objective
conditions of production which it obtains from circulation remain
unchanged in value,_ i.e. if the same amount of labour objectifies
itself in the same amount of use value, then a lesser part of the
capital can be laid out for living labour, or, there is a _change in the
proportion of the component parts of capital._ If the capital amounts to
e.g. 100, raw material 2/5, the instrument 1/5, labour 2/5, and if,
owing to a doubling of the productive force (division of labour), the
same labour using the same instrument could work up double the raw
material, then the capital would have to grow by 40; hence a capital of
140 would have to work; of which 80 in raw material, 20 in instrument,
40 for labour. Labour would now relate 40:140 (previously = 40:100);
labour previously related as 4:10; now only as 4:14. Or, of the same
capital of 100, now 3/5 would go for raw material, 1/5 for the
instrument, and 1/5 for labour. The gain would be 20, as before. But
surplus labour would be 60%, whereas it was 50 earlier. It now only
takes 20 in labour for 60 in raw material and 20 in instrument.
80/20/100. A capital of 80 gives the capitalist a profit of 20. Now if
the capital were to employ all the labour at this stage of production,
it would have to grow to 160; namely 80 for raw material, instrument 40,
and 40 for labour. This would give a surplus value of 40. At the earlier
stage, where the capital of 100 gives a surplus value of only 20, a
capital of 160 would give a surplus value of only 32, i.e. 8 less, and
the capital would have to grow to 200 in order to produce the same
surplus value of 40.

The following distinctions must be drawn: (1) Labour, increasing (or
_intensity, speed of labour_), requires no greater advance in material
or instrument of labour. E.g. the same 100 workers with instruments of
the same value catch more fish, or till the soil better, or draw more
ores from the mines or coal from the pits, or beat more leaf from the
same amount of gold as a result of greater skill, better combination and
division of labour etc., or waste less raw material, hence get further
with the same value of raw materials. In this case then, if we assume
either that their products enter into their own consumption, then their
necessary labour time diminishes; they perform a greater amount of work
at the same maintenance costs. Or, a smaller part of their labour is
necessary for the reproduction of labour capacity. The necessary part of
labour time diminishes relative to surplus labour time, and, although
the value of the product remains the same 100 working days, the part
going to capital, the surplus value, increases. If the total surplus
worker was = 1/10, i.e. = 10 working days, and if it is now 1/5, then
surplus labour time has grown by 10 days. The workers work 80 days for
themselves and 20 for the capitalists, whereas in the first case 90 for
themselves and only 10 for the capitalist. (This calculation by working
days, and labour time as the only substance of value, shows itself in
this open way where relations of bondage exist. With capital, covered up
by money.) Of the newly created value, a greater portion accrues to
capital. But the relations between the various component parts of the
invariable capital remain the same, on this presupposition. That is,
although the capitalist employs a greater mass of surplus labour,
because he pays less wages, he does not employ more capital in raw
materials and instruments. He gives a smaller part of objectified labour
in exchange for the same amount of living labour, or the same amount of
objectified for a greater amount of living labour. This possible only in
extractive industry; in manufacturing, only in so far as there is
greater economy in use of raw materials; further, where chemical
processes increase the material, in agriculture; in the transporting
industry.

(2) Productivity increases at the same time not only in the given branch
of production, but also in its conditions; in the case, namely, where
raw material or instrument or both must be increased along with an
increase in the intensity of labour, the increase of the number of
products produced by labour in the same time. (The raw material need not
cost anything, e.g. reeds for basket-making; free wood etc.) In this
case the relation of capital remains the same. That is, with the growing
productivity of labour the capital need not lay out a greater value in
raw material and instruments.

(3) The increased productivity of labour requires a greater outlay of
capital for raw material and instrument. If an unchanged number of
workers has become more productive merely through division of labour
etc., then the instrument remains the same; the raw material alone must
grow; since the same labour time processes a greater amount of it in the
same time; and, according to the presupposition, the productivity arose
only from greater skill on the part of the workers, division and
combination of labour etc. In this case the part of the capital
exchanged for living labour not only diminishes (it remains the same if
absolute labour time alone increases; decreases, if relative time grows)
relative to the other component parts of capital, which remain the same,
by an amount equal to its own decline, but likewise by an amount equal
to their growth.

If it was

                    Raw Material:   Instrument:   Labour:   Surplus:
  ----------------- --------------- ------------- --------- ----------
  _Working days:_   180             90            80        10
                    411 3/7         90            70        20

in the first case: so that out of 90 working days, 10 are surplus
working days; surplus labour 12 1/2%. In the second case, the relation
of the raw material rose in the same proportion as the relation of
surplus labour rose, compared to the first case.

While the growth of the surplus value in all cases presupposes growth of
the population, in this case [it presupposes] additionally accumulation,
or a greater capital entering into production. (This ultimately comes
down to a larger population of workers occupied in the production of raw
material.) In the first case the total part of the capital employed for
labour forms 1/4 of the total capital, and relates to the constant part
of the capital as = 1:3; in the second case capital employed for labour
forms less than 1/6 of the total capital, and the total part of the
capital employed for labour relates as less than 1:5 to the constant
part of the capital. Hence, although _the increase of productive power
resting on division and combination of labour rests on absolute increase
of the labour power employed, it is necessarily linked with a decrease
of the latter, relative to the capital which sets it in motion._ And
while, in the first form, the form of _absolute surplus labour, the mass
of labour employed must grow in the same relation as the capital
employed,_ in the _second case it grows in a lesser relation,_ and, more
precisely, _in inverse relation to the growth of the force of
production._

If the productivity of the soil doubled owing to employment of the
latter method of agricultural labour, if the same amount of labour
yielded 1 quarter of wheat instead of 1/2, then necessary labour would
fall by 1/2, and capital could employ twice the number for the same
wages. (This, if expressed in grain only.) But the capitalist would not
need additional workers to work his land. Hence he will employ the same
labour with half the previous wages; a part of his capital, the part
earlier laid out in money, becomes free; the labour time employed has
remained the same relative to the capital employed, but its surplus part
has risen relative to the necessary part. If the relation of necessary
labour to the total working day was = 3/4 of the working day or 9 hours,
before, then it will now be equal to 3/8 or = 4 1/2 hours. In the first
case the surplus value was 3 hours; in the second = 7 1/2.

The course of the process is this: With a given population of workers
and length of the working day, i.e. length of the working day multiplied
by the number of simultaneous working days, surplus labour can be
increased only relatively, by means of greater productive power of
labour, the possibility of which is already posited in the presupposed
growth of the population and [its] training for labour (including
thereby also a certain amount of free time for non-labouring, not
directly labouring population, hence development of mental capacities
etc.; mental appropriation of nature). Given a certain stage of the
development of the productive forces, surplus labour can be absolutely
increased only through transformation of a greater part of the
population into workers, and increase of the number of simultaneous
working days. The first process is _decrease of the relative working
population, although it remains the same in absolute terms;_ the second
is _its increase._ Both tendencies necessary tendencies of capital. The
unity of these contradictory tendencies, hence the living contradiction,
only with machinery, which we will discuss in a moment. The first form
obviously allows only a _small non-labouring population relative to the
labouring one._ The second, since the quota of living labour required in
it increases more slowly than the quota of capital employed, allows _a
larger non-labouring population relative to the labouring one._

During the formative stages of capital, where it obtains raw material
and instrument, the conditions of the product, from circulation, it
relates to these component parts and to their relations as given
presuppositions. Although this appearance vanishes on closer
examination, since all these moments appear as equally the products of
capital, and since it would otherwise not have conquered the total
conditions of its production, they nevertheless remain always in the
same relation for the individual capital. Hence, one part of it can
always be regarded as constant value, and only the part laid out in
labour varies. These component parts do not develop evenly, but, as will
be seen in competition, [it is] the tendency of capital to distribute
the force of production evenly.

Since the growing productivity of labour would lead capital to encounter
a barrier in the not-growing mass of raw material and machinery,
industrial development takes the following course: the introduction of
labour on a large scale, as well as the employment of machinery, begins
in the branches which are closest to being production of raw materials
for industry, raw material both for the material of labour and [for the]
instrument, where the material of labour most closely approaches mere
raw material. Thus, in spinning before in weaving, in weaving before
printing etc. First of all in the production of metals, which are the
chief raw material for the instruments of labour themselves. If the
actual raw product which makes up the raw material for industry at the
lowest stage cannot itself be rapidly increased – then refuge is sought
in more rapidly increasable substitutes. (_Cotton_ for linen, wool and
silk.) The same happens for the necessaries of life in the substitution
of potatoes for grain. The higher productivity in the latter case
through production of a worse article containing fewer nourishing
substances and hence cheaper organic conditions of the worker’s
reproduction. The latter belongs in the examination of wages. In the
discussion of the minimum wage, not to forget Rumford. [35]

Now we come to the third case of relative surplus labour as it presents
itself in the employment of machinery.

<It has become apparent in the course of our presentation that value,
which appeared as an abstraction, is possible only as such an
abstraction, as soon as money is posited; this circulation of money in
turn leads to capital, hence can be fully developed only on the
foundation of capital, just as, generally, only on this foundation can
circulation seize hold of all moments of production. This development,
therefore, not only makes visible the historic character of forms, such
as capital, which belong to a specific epoch of history; but also, [in
its course] categories such as value, which appear as purely abstract,
show the historic foundation from which they are abstracted, and on
whose basis alone they can appear, therefore, in this abstraction; and
categories which belong more or less to all epochs, such as e.g. money,
show the historic modifications which they undergo. The economic concept
of value does not occur in antiquity. Value distinguished only
juridically from _pretium,_ against fraud etc. The concept of value is
entirely peculiar to the most modern economy, since it is the most
abstract expression of capital itself and of the production resting on
it. In the concept of value, its secret betrayed.>

What distinguishes surplus labour founded on machinery is the reduction
of necessary labour time, which takes the form that fewer simultaneous
working days are employed, fewer workers. The second moment, that the
increase in productive power must be paid for by capital itself, is not
free of charge. The means by which this increase in the force of
production is set to work is itself objectified direct labour time,
value, and, in order to lay hands upon it, capital must exchange a part
of its value for it. It is easy to develop the introduction of machinery
out of competition and out of the law of the reduction of production
costs which is triggered [36] by competition. We are concerned here with
developing it out of the relation of capital to living labour, without
reference to other capitals.

If a capitalist annually employed 100 workers at spinning cotton, which
annually cost him £2,400, and if he replaced 50 workers with a machine
costing £1,200, but in such a way that the machine would likewise be
worn out within the year and have to be replaced again at the beginning
of the second year, then he would obviously have gained nothing; nor
could he sell his product more cheaply. The remaining 50 workers would
do the same work as 100 did earlier; each individual worker’s surplus
labour would have increased in the same relation as their number had
diminished, hence would have remained the same. If previously it was =
200 hours of work daily, i.e. 2 hours for each of the 100 working days,
then it would now likewise be = 200 hours of work, i.e. = 4 for each of
the 50 working days. Relative to the worker, his surplus time would have
increased; for capital the matter would be unchanged, since it would now
have to exchange 50 working days (necessary and surplus time together)
for the machine. The 50 days of objectified labour which it exchanged
for machinery would only give him an equivalent, hence no surplus time,
as if it had exchanged 50 days of objectified labour for 50 living ones.
This would be replaced, however, by the surplus labour time of the
remaining 50 workers. If the form of exchange is stripped off, the
matter would be the same as if the capitalist employed 50 workers whose
entire working day were necessary labour only, and 50 additional ones
whose working day made good this ‘loss’. But posit now that the machine
cost only £960, i.e. only 40 working days, and that the remaining
workers produce 4 hours of surplus labour time each, as before, i.e. 200
hours or 16 days, 4 hours (16 1/3 days), then the capitalist would have
saved £240 on outlays. While he gained only 16 days 4 hours with his
previous outlay of 2,400, he would now likewise gain 200 hours of work
on an outlay of 960. 200 is to 2,400 as 1:12; while 200:2,160 = 20:216 =
1:10 4/5. Expressed in days of work, in the first case he would gain 16
days 4 hours per 100 working days, in the second, the same amount on 90;
in the first, on 1,200 hours of work daily, 200; in the second, on
1,080. 200:1,200 = 1:6, 200:1,080 = 1:5 2/3. In the first case the
individual worker’s surplus time = 1/6 working day = 2 hours. In the
second case = 2 6/27 hours per worker. Furthermore, with the employment
of machinery, the part of the capital which was previously employed in
instruments must be deducted from the additional cost caused by the
machinery.

Money and fixed capital: _presupposes certain amount of wealth._ (Economist.) – _Relation of fixed capital and circulating capital. Cotton-spinner_ (Economist)

<The money circulating in a country is a _certain portion of the
capital_ of the country, absolutely withdrawn from productive purposes,
in order to facilitate _or increase the productiveness of the
remainder._ A certain amount of wealth is, therefore, as necessary, in
order to adopt gold as a circulating medium, _as it is to make a
machine, in order to facilitate any other production.’ (Economist,_ Vol.
V, p. 520.)> <’What is the practice? A manufacturer obtains £500 from
his banker on Saturday, for wages; he distributes these among his
workers. On the same day the majority of money is brought to the
shopkeepers, and through them returned to their various bankers.’ (loc.
cit. p. 575.)>

<’A cotton spinner, with a capital of £100,000, who laid out £95,000 for
his mill and machinery, would soon find he wanted means to buy cotton
and pay wages. His trade would be hampered and his finances deranged.
And yet men expect that a nation, which has recklessly sunk the bulk of
its available means in railways, should nevertheless be able to conduct
the infinite operations of manufacture and commerce.’ (loc. cit. p.
1271.)>

Slavery and wage labour (Steuart). – Profit upon alienation. _Steuart_

‘Money … _an adequate equivalent for any thing alienable.’_ (J.
Steuart.) (p. 13) (Vol. I, p. 32, ed. Dublin, 1770.)

<’In the old times to make mankind labour beyond their wants, to make
one part of a state work, to maintain the other gratuitously, to be
brought about only through slavery … If mankind be not forced to labour,
they will only labour for themselves; and if they have few wants, there
will be few [who] labour. But when states come to be formed and have
occasion for idle hands to defend them against the violence of their
enemies, food at any rate must be procured for those who do not labour;
and as, by the supposition, the wants of the labourers are small, a
method must be found to increase their labour above the proportion of
their wants. For this purpose slavery was calculated … Here then was a
violent method of making men laborious in raising food; … men were then
forced to labour because they were slaves of others; men are now forced
to labour because they are slaves to their own wants.’ (Steuart, Vol. I,
p. 38–40.) ‘It is the _infinite variety of wants,_ and of the _kinds of
commodities_ necessary to their gratification, which alone renders the
passion for wealth indefinite and insatiable.’ (Wakefield _on_ A. Smith,
p. 64 note.)> [37]

_‘Machines_ I consider as a method of augmenting (virtually) the number
of industrious, without the expense of feeding an additional number.’
(Steuart, Vol. I, p. 123.) ‘When manufacturers get together in bodies,
they depend not directly upon _consumers,_ but upon _merchants.’_
(Steuart, Vol. I, p. 154.) ‘The abusive agriculture is no _trade,_
because it applies no _alienation,_ but is purely a method of
subsisting.’ (loc. cit. p. 156.) _‘Trade_ is an operation, by which the
wealth, or work, either of individuals, or of societies, may be
exchanged, by a set of men called _merchants,_ for an equivalent, proper
for supplying every want, without any interruption to industry, or any
check upon consumption.’ (Steuart, I, p. 166.) ‘While wants continue
simple and few, a workman finds time enough to distribute all his work;
when wants become more multiplied, men must work harder: _time becomes
precious;_ hence trade is introduced. The merchant as mediator between
the workman and consumer.’ (loc. cit. p. 171.) ‘Money the _common_ price
of all things.’ (loc. cit. p. 177.) ‘Money represented by the merchant.
To the consumers, the merchant represents the totality of manufacturers,
towards the latter, the totality of consumers, and to both classes his
credit supplies the use of money. He represents wants, manufacturers and
money by turns.’ (loc. cit. p. 177, 178.) (Steuart, see Vol. I, p.
181–3, regards profit as distinct from _real value,_ which he defines
very confusedly (has production costs in mind) as the amount of
objectified labour (what a workman can perform in a day etc.), necessary
expense of the workmen, price of the raw material, as _profit upon
alienation_ fluctuating with demand.) (With Steuart the categories still
vary greatly; they have not yet become fixed, as with A. Smith. We just
saw that _real value_ identical with production costs, in which, besides
the labour of the workmen and the value of the material, wages, also,
confusingly, figure as a separate component part. At another point he
takes the _intrinsic value_ of a commodity to mean the value of its raw
material or the raw material itself, while, by _useful value,_ he
understands the labour time employed on it. ‘The first is something real
in itself; e.g. the silver in a silver lattice-work. The _intrinsic
worth_ of a silk, woollen or linen manufacture is less than the
primitive value employed, because it is rendered almost unserviceable
for any other use but that for which the manufacture is intended; the
_useful value by contrast must be estimated according to the labour it
has cost to produce it. The labour employed in the modification
represents a portion of a man’s time,_ which having been usefully
employed, _has given a form to some substance_ which has rendered it
useful, ornamental, or in short, fit for man, mediately or immediately.’
(p. 361, 362, Vol. I loc. cit.) (The real use value is the form given to
the substance. But this form itself is only static labour.) ‘When we
suppose a common standard on the price of any thing, we must suppose the
alienation of it to be frequent and familiar. In countries where
simplicity reigns, … it is hardly possible to determine any standard for
the price of articles of first necessity … in such states of society the
articles of food and necessaries are hardly found in commerce: no person
purchases them; because the principal occupation of everybody is to
procure them for himself … Sale alone can determine prices, and frequent
sale can only fix a standard. Now the frequent sale of articles of the
first necessity marks a distribution of inhabitants in labourers and
free hands’ etc. (Vol. I, p. 395 seq. loc. cit.) (The doctrine of the
determination of prices by the mass of the circulating medium first
advanced by Locke, repeated in the _Spectator,_ 19 October 1711,
developed and elegantly formulated by Hume and Montesquieu, its basis
raised to its formal peak by Ricardo, and with all its absurdities in
practical application to the banking system, by Loyd, Colonel Torrens
etc.). Steuart polemicizes against it, and his development materially
anticipates more or less everything later advanced by Bosanquet, Tooke,
Wilson. (Notebook, p. 26.) [38] (He says among other things as historic
illustration: ‘It is a fact that at the time when Greece and Rome
abounded in wealth, when every rarity and the work of choicest artists
was carried to an excessive price, an ox was bought for a mere trifle
and grain was cheaper perhaps than ever it was in Scotland … The demand
is proportioned, not to the number of those who consume, but of those
who buy; now those who consume are all the inhabitants, but those who
buy are only the few industrious who are free … In Greece and Rome,
slavery: Those who were fed by the labour of their own slaves, the
slaves of the state, or by grain distributed free of charge among the
people, had no occasion to go to the market: they did not enter into
competition with the buyers … The few manufacturers then known made
wants in general less extensive; consequently, the number of the
industrious free was small, and _they_ were the only persons who _could_
have occasion to purchase food and necessaries: consequently, the
competition of the buyers must have been small in proportion, and price
low; further the markets were supplied partly from the surplus produced
on the lands of the great men, laboured by slaves; who being fed from
the lands, the surplus cost in a manner nothing to the proprietors; and
since the number of those who had occasion to buy, very small, this
surplus was sold cheap. Also, the grain distributed to the people free
of charge must necessarily have held the market down, etc. By contrast,
for a fine mullet or an artist, etc. great competition and hence prices
rising extraordinarily. The luxury of those times, though excessive, was
confined to a few, and as money, in general, circulated but slowly
through the hands of the multitude, it was constantly stagnating in
those of the rich who found no measure, but their own caprice, in
regulating the prices of what they wished to possess.’) (26, 27,
Notebook. Steuart.) [39] _‘Money of account_ is nothing but an arbitrary
scale of equal parts, invented for measuring the respective value of
things vendible. Money of account quite different from _money-coin,_
which is price, and could exist, even if there were no substance in the
world which was the proportional equivalent for all commodities.’ (Vol.
II, p. 102.) ‘Money of account does the same service for value as things
like minutes, seconds etc. do for angles, or scales for geographical
maps etc. In all these inventions some denomination is always taken for
the unit.’ (loc. cit.) ‘The usefulness of all those inventions being
solely confined to the marking of _proportion._ Just so, the unit in
money can have no invariable determinate proportion to any part of
value, i.e. it cannot be fixed to any particular quantity of gold,
silver or any other commodity whatsoever. The unit once fixed, we can,
by multiplying it, ascend to the greatest value’ etc. (p. 103.) ‘So
money a scale for measuring value.’ (p. 102.) ‘The value of commodities,
therefore, depending upon a general combination of circumstances
relative to themselves and to the fancies of men, their value ought to
be considered as changing only with respect to one another;
consequently, any thing which troubles or perplexes the ascertaining
those _changes of proportion by the means of a general, determinate and
invariable scale,_ must be hurtful to trade and a clog upon alienation.’
(loc. cit.) ‘It is absolutely necessary to distinguish between _price_
(i.e. coin) considered as a measure and _price_ considered as an
equivalent for value. The metals do not perform both functions equally
well … _Money is an ideal scale of equal parts._ If it be demanded what
ought to be the standard of value of one part? I answer by putting
another question: What is the standard length of a degree, a minute, a
second? It has none – but so soon as one part becomes determined, by the
nature of a scale, all the rest must follow in proportion.’ (p. 105.)
‘Examples of this ideal money are the bank money of Amsterdam and the
Angola money on the African coast. – The bank money stands invariable
like a rock in the sea. According to this ideal standard are the prices
of all things regulated.’ (p. 106, 107 seq.)

In Custodi’s anthology of the Italian economists, _Parte Antica, Tomo
III:_ Montanari (Geminiano), _Della moneta,_ written about 1683, [40]
says of the ‘invention’ of money: ‘Intercourse between nations spans the
whole globe to such an extent that one may almost say all the world is
but a single city in which a permanent fair comprising all commodities
is held, so that by means of money all the things produced by the land,
the animals and human industry can be acquired and enjoyed by any person
in his own home. A wonderful invention!’ (p. 40.) ‘But, since it is
another peculiarity of measures that they enter into such a relation
with the things measured that in a certain manner the thing measured
becomes the measure of the measuring unit, it follows that, just as
motion is the measure of time, time may be the measure of the motion
itself; hence it occurs that not only are the coins measures of our
wants, but also our wants are, reciprocally, the measure of the coins
themselves and of value.’ (p. 41, 42.) ‘It is quite clear that the
greater the number of coins circulating in commerce within the confines
of a given district, in proportion to the marketable goods there are in
that place, the more expensive will they be. Can a thing be said to be
expensive because it is worth a large quantity of gold in countries
where gold is abundant? Should not the gold itself, which is estimated
as of the same quantity as another thing which comes to be considered
elsewhere as cheap, be rather described as cheap in that case?’ (p. 48.)

‘100 years earlier the chief feature in the commercial policy of nations
was the _amassing_ of gold and silver, as a kind of wealth par
excellence.’ (p. 67.) (Gouge, Wm. _A Short History of Paper Money and
Banking in the United States. Philadelphia,_ 1833.) _(Barter in United
States (see_ Gouge Notebook VIII, p. 81 seq.): ‘In Pennsylvania as in
the other colonies, significant traffic was carried on by barter … as
late as 1723 in Maryland, an act was passed making tobacco a legal
tender at one penny a pound, and Indian corn at 20d. a bushel.’ (p. 5.)
(Part II.) Soon however, ‘their trade with the West-Indies and a
clandestine commerce with the Spanish made silver so plentiful, that in
1652 a mint was established in New England for coining shillings,
sixpences and threepenny pieces.’ (p. 5.) (loc. cit.) ‘Virginia in 1645
forbade dealings by barter, and established the Spanish piece of 8 to
6s. as the standard currency of the colony (the Spanish dollar) … The
other colonies affixed different denominations to the dollar … The money
in account was everywhere nominally the same as in England. The coin of
the realm was especially Spanish and Portuguese’ etc. cf. p. 81 Notebook
VIII). (p. 6. By an act of Queen Anne an attempt was made to put an end
to this confusion.)

_Wool industry in England since Elizabeth_ (Tuckett). – _Silk-manufacture (Same). Ditto Iron. Cotton_

Tuckett: _A History of the Past and Present State of the Labouring
Population_ etc., 2 vols., London, 1846.

_‘Wool manufactures:_ During Elizabeth’s time the _clothier_ occupied
the place of the _mill-owner or manufacturer;_ he was the capitalist who
brought the wool, and delivered it to the weaver, in portions of about
12 pounds, to be made into cloth. At the beginning, manufacture was
_confined to cities_ and _corporate and market-towns,_ the inhabitants
of the villages making little more than [sufficed] for the use of their
families. Later, in non-corporate towns favoured by local advantages,
and also in country places by farmers, graziers and husbandmen, who
commenced making cloth for sale, as well as for domestic use.’ (The
cruder sorts.) ‘In 1551 a statute was passed, restricting the number of
looms and apprentices which might be held by clothiers and weavers
residing out of cities; and that no country weaver should have a tucking
mill, nor any tucker a loom. By a law of the same year, all weavers of
broad cloth had to undergo an apprenticeship of 7 years. Nevertheless,
_village manufacture,_ as an _object of mercantile profit,_ took firm
root. 5 and 6 _Edward VI,_ c. 22, a statute, prohibits the use of
_machinery …_ The Flemish and Dutch thus maintained superiority in this
manufacture until the end of the seventeenth century … In 1668 the Dutch
loom was introduced from Holland.’ (p. 138–41.) _‘Owing to the
introduction of machinery, in 1800 one person could do as much work as
45 in the year 1785._ In the year 1800 the capital invested in mills,
machinery etc. appropriate for the woollen trade was not less than _6
million pounds sterling and the total number of persons of all ages
occupied in England in this branch was 1,500,000.’_ (p. 142–3.) Thus the
productive power of labour grew 4,600%. But, firstly, this number only
about 1/6 of the fixed capital alone; relative to the total capital (raw
material etc.) perhaps only 1/20. ‘Hardly any manufacture had such an
advantage from the improvements in science as the art of dyeing cloth
through the application of the _laws of chemistry.’_ (loc. cit. p. 144.)

_Silk manufacture._ Until the beginning of the eighteenth century, ‘the
art of _silk throwing_ most successful in Italy, where machinery of a
particular description adopted to this purpose. In 1715 John Lombe, one
of three brothers who had a business as throwers and silk-merchants,
travelled to Italy and was able to obtain a model in one of the mills …
A silk mill, with the improved machinery, erected in 1719 in Derby by
Lombe and his brothers. This mill contained 26,586 wheels, all turned by
one water wheel … Parliament gave him £14,000 for throwing open the
secret to the trade. This mill came nearer to the idea of a modern
factory than any previous establishment of the kind. The machine had
97,746 wheels, movements, and individual parts working day and night,
all of which were moved by one large water wheel and were governed by
one regulator: and it employed 300 persons to attend and supply it with
work.’ (133–4.) (No spirit of invention showed itself in the English
silk trade; first introduced by the weavers of Antwerp, who fled after
the sacking of the town by the Duke of Parma; then different branches by
the French refugees 1685–92.)

In 1740, 1,700 tons of iron were produced by 59 high furnaces; 1827:
690,000 by 284. Furnaces thus increased = 1:4 48/49; less than
quintupled; the tons = 1:405 15/17. (Comp. on the relation over a series
of years loc. cit. Notebook p. 12.) [41]

Glass manufacturing, among other things, best shows how dependent [is]
the progress of science on manufactures. On the other side e.g. the
invention of quadrants arose from the needs of navigation, parliament
offered a prize for inventions.

8 cotton machines, which cost £5,000 in 1825, were sold in 1833 for
£300. (On cotton spinning, see loc. cit. p. 13, Notebook.) [42]

‘A first rate cotton spinning factory cannot be built, filled with
machinery, and fitted with gas work and steam engine, under £100,000. A
steam engine of one hundred horse power will turn 50,000 spindles, which
will produce 62,500 miles of fine cotton-thread per day. In such a
factory, 1,000 persons will spin as much thread as 250,000 persons could
without machinery. McCulloch estimates the number in Britain at
130,000.’ (p. 218, loc. cit.)

Origin of free wage labour. _Vagabondage._ Tuckett

‘Where there are no regular roads, there can hardly be said to be a
community; the people could have nothing in common.’ (p. 270. Tuckett
loc. cit.)

‘Of the produce of the earth, useful to men, 99/100 are the produce of
men.’ (loc. cit. p. 348.)

‘When slavery or life-apprenticeship was abolished, the labourer became
his own master and was left to his own resources. But if without
sufficient employment etc., men will not starve whilst they can beg or
steal; consequently the first character the poor assumed was that of
thieves and mendicants.’ (p. 637 note, Vol. II, loc. cit.) ‘One
remarkable distinction of the present state of society, since Elizabeth,
is that her poor law was especially a law for the enforcement of
industry, intended to meet the mass of vagrancy that grew out of the
suppression of the monasteries and the transition from slavery to free
labour. As example, the 5th act of Elizabeth, directing households using
half a plough of land in tillage, to require any person they might find
unemployed, to become their apprentice in husbandry, or in any art or
mystery; and, if unwilling, to bring him before a justice, who was
almost compelled to commit him to ward until he consented to be bound.
Under Elizabeth, out of every 100 people, 85 were required for the
production of food. At present, not a lack of industry, but a profitable
employment … _The great difficulty then was_ to overcome the propensity
of idleness and vagabondage, not to procure them remunerative
occupation. During this reign there were several acts of the legislature
to enforce the idle to labour.’ (p. 643, 644. Vol. II, loc. cit.)

_‘Fixed capital,_ when once formed, ceases to affect the demand for
labour, but during its formation it gives employment to just as many
hands as an equal amount would employ, either of circulating capital, or
of revenue.’ (p. 56. John Barton, _Observations on the Circumstances
which Influence the Condition of the Labouring Classes of Society,_
London, 1817.)

Blake _on accumulation and rate of profit. (Shows that prices etc. not indifferent because a class of mere consumers does not at the same time consume and reproduce.) – Dormant capital_

‘The community consists _of two classes of persons,_ one, which consumes
and reproduces, the other, which consumes without reproduction. If the
entire society consisted of producers, then of little consequence at
what price they exchanged their commodities among one another; but those
who are only consumers form too numerous a class to be overlooked. Their
power of demanding arises from seats, mortgages, annuities, professions
and services of various descriptions rendered to the community. The
higher the price at which the class of consumers can be made to buy, the
greater will be the profit of the producers upon the mass of commodities
which they sell to them. Among these purely consuming classes, the
government takes up the most prominent station.’ (W. Blake,
_Observations on the Effects Produced by the Expenditure of Government
during the Restriction of Cash Payments,_ London, 1823, p. 42, 43.) In
order to show that the capital lent to the state is not necessarily such
as was previously employed productively – and we are concerned here only
with the admission that a part of capital is always dormant – Blake
says: ‘The error lies in the supposition (1) that the whole capital of
the country is fully employed; (2) _that there is immediate employment
for successive accumulations of capital as it accrues from saving._ I
believe there are at all times some portions of capital devoted to
undertakings that yield very slow returns and slender profits, and some
portions lying wholly dormant in the form of goods, for which there is
no sufficient demand … Now, if these dormant portions and savings could
be transferred into the hands of government in exchange for its
annuities, they would become sources of new demand, without encroaching
upon existing capital.’ (p. 54, 55 loc. cit.) ‘_Whatever amount of
produce is withdrawn from market by the demand of the saving capitalist,
is poured back again, with addition, in the goods that he reproduces._
The government, by contrast, takes it away from consumption without
reproduction … Where savings are made from revenue, it is clear that the
person entitled to enjoy the portion saved is satisfied without
consuming it. It proves that the industry of the country is capable of
raising more produce than the wants of the community require. If the
quantity saved is employed as capital in reproducing a value equivalent
to itself, together with a profit, this new creation, when added to the
general fund, can be drawn out by that person alone who made the
savings, i.e. by the very person who has already shown his
disinclination to consume … If everyone consumes what he has a right to
consume, there must of necessity be a market. Whoever saves from his
revenues, foregoes this right, and his share remains undisposed of.
Should this spirit of economy be general, the market is necessarily
overstocked, and it must depend on the degree, to which this surplus
accumulates, whether it can find new employments as capital.’ (56, 57.)
(Cf. this work generally in the section on _accumulation.)_ (Cf.
Notebook p. 68 and p. 70, where it is shown that the rate of profits and
wages rose owing to _prices,_ caused by war demand, without any respect
‘to the quantity of land taken last into cultivation’.) ‘During the
revolutionary war the market rate of interest rose to 7, 8, 9 and even
10%, although during the whole time lands of the lowest quality were
cultivated.’ (loc. cit. p. 64–6.) ‘The rise of interest to 6, 8, 10 and
even 12% proves the rise of profit. The depreciation of money, supposing
it to exist, could not change the relation of capital and interest. If
£200 are worth only £100; £10 interest worth only £5, whatever affected
the value of the principal would equally affect the value of profits. It
could not alter the relation between the two.’ (p. 73.) ‘Ricardo’s
reasoning, that the price of wages cannot make the prices of commodities
rise, does not apply to a society _where a large class are not
producers.’_ (loc. cit.) ‘More than the just share is obtained by the
producers at the expense of that portion, which of right belongs to the
class who are only consumers.’ (74.) This of course important, since
capital exchanges not only for capital, but also for revenue, and each
capital can itself be eaten up as revenue. Still, this does not affect
the determination of profit in general. Under the various forms of
profit, interest, rent, pensions, taxes etc., it may be distributed
(like a part of wages even) under different titles among different
classes of the population. They can never divide up among them more than
the total surplus value of the total surplus product. The ratio in which
they distribute it is of course economically important; [but] does not
affect the question before us.

‘If the circulation of commodities of 400 million required a currency of
40 million, and this proportion of 1/10 were the due level, then, if the
value of the commodities to be circulated grows to 450 million, from
natural causes, the currency, in order to continue at its level, would
have to grow to 45 million, or the 40 million must be made to circulate
with such increased rapidity, by banking or other improvements, as to
perform the functions of 45 million … such an augmentation, or such
rapidity, the consequence and not the cause of the increase of prices.’
(W. Blake. loc. cit., p. 80 seq. cf. Notebook p. 70.)

‘The upper and middle class of Rome gained great wealth by Asiatic
conquest, but not being created by commerce or manufactures, it
resembled that obtained by Spain from her American colonies.’ (p. 66
Vol. I, Mackinnon, _History of Civilisation,_ London, 1846, Vol. I.)

_Domestic agriculture at the beginning of the sixteenth century._ Tuckett

‘In the fifteenth century, Harrison asserts’ (see also Eden), [43] ‘that
the farmers are barely able to pay their rents without selling a cow, or
a horse, or some of their produce, although they paid at the most £4 for
a farm … The farmer in these times consumed the chief part of the
produce to be raised, his servants taking their seats with him at his
table … _The principal materials for clothing were not bought, but were
obtained by the industry of each family. The instruments of husbandry_
were so simple that many of them were made, or at least kept in repair,
by the farmer himself. Every yeoman was expected to know how to make
yokes or bows, and plough gear; _such work_ employed their winter
evenings.’ (p. 324, 325 loc. cit. Tuckett, Vol. II.)

_Profit. Interest. Influence of machinery on the wage fund._ Westminster Review

_Interest and Profit:_ ‘Where an individual employs his own savings
productively, the remuneration of his time and skill – _agency for
superintendence (profit_ further includes the risk to which his capital
may have been exposed in his particular business); and the remuneration
for the productive employment of his savings, _Interest._ The whole of
this remuneration, _Gross Profit;_ where an individual employs the
savings of another, he obtains the agency only. Where one individual
lends his savings to another, only the _interest_ or the _net profit.’
(Westminster Review,_ January 1826, p. 107, 108.) Thus here interest =
_net profit = remuneration for the productive employments of savings;_
the actual profit the remuneration for the _agency for superintendence_
during his productive employment. The same philistine says: ‘Every
improvement in the arts of production, that does not disturb the
proportion between the portions devoted to capital and not devoted to
the payment for wages, is attended with an increase of employment to the
labouring classes: every fresh application of machinery and horse labour
is _attended with an increase of produce and consequently of capital;_
to whatever extent it may diminish the _ratio_ which that part of the
national capital forming the fund for the payment of wages bears to that
which is otherwise employed, its tendency is not to diminish but to
increase the _absolute amount of that fund_ and hence to increase the
quantity of employment.’ (loc. cit. p. 123.)

[_Money as measure of values and yardstick of prices. Critique of theories of the standard measure of money._]

The role of money as _measure,_ as well as, secondly, the fundamental
law that the mass of the circulating medium, at a definite velocity of
circulation, is determined by the prices of the commodities and by the
mass of commodities circulating at definite prices, or by the total
price, the aggregate amount of commodities, which is itself in turn
determined by two circumstances: (1) the level of the commodity price;
(2) the mass of circulating commodities at definite prices; further, (3)
the law that money as medium of circulation becomes coin, mere vanishing
moment, mere _symbol_ of the values it exchanges – all this leads to
more particular aspects which we shall develop only when and in so far
as they coincide with more complicated economic relations, credit
circulation, exchange rate etc. It is necessary to avoid all detail, and
where detail must be brought in, it is to be brought in only at the
point where it loses the elementary character.

First of all, money circulation, as the most superficial (in the sense
of: driven out onto the surface) and the most abstract form of the
entire production process, is in itself quite without content, except in
so far as its own formal distinctions, precisely the simple aspects
developed in section II, make up its content. It is clear that simple
money circulation, regarded in itself, is not bent back into itself,
[but] consists of an infinite number of indifferent and accidentally
adjacent movements. The coin, e.g., may be regarded as the point of
departure of money circulation, but there is no law of any reflux back
to the coin except for depreciation through wear and tear, which
necessitates melting-down and new issue of coins. This concerns only the
material side and does not at all form a moment of circulation itself.
Within circulation itself, the point of return may be different from the
point of departure; in so far as it bends back into itself, money
circulation appears as the mere appearance of a circulation going on
behind it and determining it, e.g. when we look at the money circulation
between manufacturer, worker, shopkeeper and banker. Furthermore, the
factors which affect the mass of commodities thrown into circulation,
the rise and fall of prices, the velocity of circulation, the amount of
simultaneous payments etc., are all circumstances which lie _outside_
simple money circulation itself. They are relations which express
themselves in it; it provides the names for them, as it were; but they
are not to be explained by its own differentiation. Different metals
serve as money, and they have a different and changing value relation to
one another. Thus the question of the double standard etc. enters, which
takes on world-historical forms. But it takes them on, and the double
standard itself enters, only through external trade, hence, to be
usefully examined, supposes the development of much higher relations
than that of the simple money relation.

Money as the _measure_ of value is not expressed in amounts of bullion,
but rather in accounting money, arbitrary names for fractional parts of
a specific amount of the money-substance. These names can be changed,
the relation of the coin to its metallic substance can be changed, while
the name remains the same. Hence counterfeiting, which plays a great
role in the history of states. Further, the different kinds of money in
various countries. This question [is of] interest only in exchange rate.
[44]

Money is a _measure_ only because it is labour time materialized in a
specific substance, hence itself _value,_ and, more particularly,
because this specific materiality counts as its general objective one
[_allgemeingegenständliche_], as the materiality of labour time as such,
as distinct from its merely particular incarnations; hence because it is
an _equivalent._ But since, in its function as _measure,_ money is only
an imagined point of comparison, only needs to exist ideally – only the
ideal transposition of commodities into their general value-presence
takes place –; since, further, in this quality as measure it figures
first as accounting coin, and I say a commodity is worth so many
shillings, francs etc., when I transpose it into money; this has given
rise to the confused notion of an _ideal measure,_ developed by Steuart
and refurbished at various periods, even recently, in England, as a
profound discovery. Namely in this sense, that the names, pound,
shillings, guinea, dollar etc., which count as accounting units are not
specific names for specific quantities of gold, silver etc., but merely
arbitrary points of comparison which do not themselves express value, no
definite quantity of objectified labour time. Hence the whole nonsense
about fixing the price of gold and silver – price understood here as the
name by which fractional parts are called. An ounce of gold now divided
into £3 17s. 10d. This is called fixing the price; it is, as Locke
correctly remarks, only fixing the name of fractional parts of gold and
silver etc. Expressed in itself, gold, silver is naturally equal to
itself. An ounce is an ounce, whether I call it £3 or £20. In short,
this _ideal measure_ in Steuart’s sense means this: if I say commodity A
is worth £12, commodity B 6, commodity C 3, then their relation to one
another = 12:6:3. Prices express only the relations in which they are
exchanged for one another. 2B are exchanged for 1A and 1 1/2B for 3C.
Now, instead of expressing the relation of A, B, C in real money, money
which itself has value, is value, could I not, instead of the £ which
expresses a specific mass of gold, just as well take any name you like,
without content (this means, here, _ideally_), e.g. mackerels? A = 12
mackerels; B = 6M, C = 3M. This word M is here only a name, without any
relation to a content belonging to itself. Steuart’s example with a
degree, line, second, proves nothing; for although degree, line, second
have changing magnitudes, they are not merely names, but rather always
express the fractional part of a specific magnitude of space or of time.
They thus have in fact a substance. The fact that money in the role of
measure functions only as something _imagined_ is here transformed into
it supposedly being any imagined thing you like, a mere _name,_ namely a
name for the numerical value-relation. In that case, however, it would
be correct to express no names at all, but merely a numerical relation,
for the whole affair comes down to this: I obtain 6B for 12A, 3C for 6B;
this relation can also be expressed in this way, A = 12_x_, B = 6_x_, C
= 3_x_, where the _x_ is itself only a name for the relation of A:B and
B:C. The mere, unnamed numerical relation would not do. For A:B = 12:6 =
2:1, and B:C = 6:3 = 2:1. Hence C = 1/2. Hence B = 1/2, hence B = C.
Hence A = 2 and B = 2; hence A = B.

Let me take any price list, e.g. potash, 35s. the ton; cocoa, lb., 60s.;
iron (bars) (p. ton) 145s. etc. In order to have the relation of these
commodities to one another, not only can I forget the silver in the
shilling; the numbers alone, 35, 60, 145 suffice to define the
reciprocal value relations of potash, cocoa, iron bars. Undenominated
numbers now suffice; and not only can I give their unit, 1, any name,
regardless of any value; I need not give it any name at all. Steuart
insists that I must give it one or another name, but that this name
then, as mere arbitrary name of the unit, as mere _marking of
proportion_ itself, cannot be fixed to any portion of the quantity of
gold, silver or any other commodity.

With every measure, as soon as it serves as point of comparison, i.e. as
soon as the different entities to be compared are put into a numerical
relation to the measure as unit, and are now related to one another, the
nature of the measure becomes irrelevant and vanishes in the act of
comparison itself; the unit of measure has become a mere unit of
numbers; the quality of this unit has vanished, e.g. that it is itself a
specific magnitude of length or of time or of an angle. But is it only
when the different entities are already presupposed as measured that the
unit of measure _marks only proportion between them,_ thus e.g. in our
case the proportion of their values. The accounting unit not only has
different names in different countries; but is the name for different
fractional parts of an ounce of gold, e.g. But the exchange rate reduces
all of them to the same unit of weight of gold or silver. Thus if I
presuppose the various magnitudes of commodities, e.g. as above, = 35s.,
60s., 145s., then, to compare them, since the 1 is presupposed as equal
in all of them, since they have been made commensurable, it is wholly
superfluous to bring in the observation that s. is a specific quantity
of silver, the name for a specific amount of silver. But, as mere
numerical magnitudes, as amounts of any unit of the same name, they only
become comparable to one another, and only express proportions towards
one another, when each individual commodity is measured with the one
which serves as unit, as measure. But I can only measure them against
one another, only make them commensurable, if they have a unit – the
latter is the labour time contained in both. The measuring unit must
therefore [be] a certain quantity of a commodity in which a quantity of
labour is objectified. Since the same quantity of labour is not always
expressed in the same quantity of e.g. gold, it follows that the value
of this measuring unit itself variable. But, in so far as money is
regarded only as measure, this variability is no obstacle. Even in
barter, to the extent that it is somewhat developed as barter, i.e. is a
repeated, normal operation, not merely an isolated act of exchange, some
other commodity appears as measuring unit, e.g. cattle with Homer. Among
the savage Papuans of the coast, who, in order ‘to obtain a foreign
article, barter 1 or 2 of their children, and if they are not to hand,
borrow those of their neighbours, promising to give their own in
exchange, when they come to hand, this request being rarely refused’,
there exists no measure for exchange. The only side of exchange which
exists for the Papuan is that he can obtain the alien thing only by
dispossessing himself of something he possesses. This dispossession
[_Entäusserung_] itself is regulated for him by nothing but his fancy on
one side, and the scope of his movable possessions on the other. In the
_Economist_ of 13 March 1858, we read, in a letter addressed to the
editor: ‘As the substitution in France of gold for silver in the coinage
(which has been the principal means hitherto of absorbing the new
discoveries of gold) must be approaching its completion, particularly as
less coinage will be wanted for a stagnant trade and reduced prices, we
may expect ere long that our fixed price of £3 17s. 10 1/2d. an ounce
will attract the gold here.’ [45] Now what does this, our ‘fixed price
of an ounce’ of gold, mean? Nothing other than that a certain aliquot
part of an ounce is called pence, a certain multiple of this
penny-weight of gold a shilling, and a certain multiple of this
shilling-weight of gold a pound? Does the gentleman imagine that in
other countries the golden Guilder, the Louis d’or etc. do not likewise
signify a specific quantity of gold, i.e. that a specific quantity has a
fixed name? and that this is an English privilege? or a speciality?
That, in England, a monetary coin expressed in gold is more than a
monetary coin, and in other countries, less? It would be interesting to
know what this noble spirit imagines the exchange rate to be.

What leads Steuart astray is this: the prices of commodities express
nothing but the relations in which they are exchangeable for one
another, the _proportions_ in which they exchange for one another. These
proportions given, I can call the unit any name whatever, because the
undenominated abstract number would suffice, and instead of saying that
this commodity = 6 stivers, the other = 3 etc., I could say this one = 6
ones, the other = 3; I would not have to give the unit any name at all.
Since the numerical relation is all that matters at that point, I can
give it any name whatever. But it is already presupposed here that these
proportions are _given,_ that the commodities have previously become
commensurable magnitudes. As soon as magnitudes have once been posited
as commensurable, their relations become simple numerical relations.
Money appears as measure, and a specific quantity of the commodity in
which it represents itself appears as measuring unit, precisely in order
to find the _proportions,_ and to articulate and to handle commodities
as commensurable ones. This real unit is the labour time relatively
objectified in them. However, it is labour time itself posited as
general. The process by which values within the money system are
determined by labour time does not belong in the examination of money
itself, and falls outside circulation; proceeds behind it as its
effective base and presupposition. The question here could only be this:
instead of saying this commodity is = to one ounce of gold, why does one
not say directly it is = to _x_ labour time, objectified in the ounce of
gold? Why is labour time, the substance and measure of value, not at the
same time the measure of prices, or, in other words, why are price and
value different at all? Proudhon’s school believe it a great deed to
demand that this identity be posited and that the price of commodities
be expressed in labour time. The coincidence of price and value
presupposes the equality of demand and supply, exchange solely of
equivalents (hence not of capital for labour) etc.; in short, formulated
economically, it reveals at once that this demand is the negation of the
entire foundation of the relations of production based on exchange
value. But if we suppose this basis suspended, then on the other side
the problem disappears again, which exists only of it and with it. That
the commodity in its unmediated presence as use value is not value, is
not the adequate form of value = that it is [the adequate form of value]
as an objective other, or that it is this as equated to another object;
or, that value possesses its adequate form in a specific object as
distinct from another. Commodities, as values, are objectified labour;
the adequate value must therefore itself appear in the form of a
specific thing, as a specific form of objectified labour.

Steuart illustrates this drivel about an ideal standard with two
historic examples, of which the first, the bank money of Amsterdam,
shows just the opposite, since it is nothing but the reduction of
circulating coins to their bullion content (metal content); the second
one has been repeated after him by all the moderns who follow the same
tendency. For example, Urquhart cites the example of the Barbary Coast,
where an ideal bar, an iron bar, a merely imaginary iron bar, counts as
standard which neither rises nor falls. If e.g. the real iron bar falls,
say by 100%, then the bar is worth 2 iron bars; if it rises again by
100%, then only one. Mr Urquhart claims to have observed at the same
time that the Barbary Coast knows neither commercial nor industrial
crises, but least of all monetary crises, and ascribes this to the
magical effects of this ideal standard of value. [46] This ‘ideal’
imaginary standard is nothing but an imagined real value; an imagined
notion, however, which, because the monetary system has not developed
its further determinants – a development depending on quite different
relations – achieves no objective reality. It is the same as if, in
mythology, one were to consider as the higher religions those whose
god-figures are not worked out in visible form but remain stuck in the
imagination, i.e. where they obtain at most an oral, but not a graphic
presence; The bar rests on a real iron bar, which was later transformed
into a fantasy-creature and fixated as such. An ounce of gold, expressed
in English accounting money, = £3 17s. 10 1/2d. Well. Well. Say a pound
of silk had had exactly this price; but that it had later fallen to
where Milanese raw silk stood on 12 March ’58 in London, the lb. at £1
8s. It is the imaginary conception of an amount of iron, an iron bar,
which keeps the same value (1) relative to all other commodities, (2)
relative to the labour contained in it. This iron bar is of course
purely imaginary, but it is not so fixed and ‘standing like a rock in
the sea’ [47] as Steuart, and nearly a 100 years later Urquhart,
believes. The only thing fixed in the iron bar is the name; in one case
the real iron bar contains 2 ideal ones, in the other, only 1. This is
expressed in such a way that the same, unchangeable ideal one is first =
2, then = 1 real bar. Thus, this posited, only the relation of the real
iron bar has changed, not the ideal one. But in fact the ideal iron bar
is twice as long in one case as in the other, and only its name is
unchanged. In one case 100 lb. of iron are called e.g. a bar, in the
other, 200 a bar. Suppose money were issued which represented labour
time, e.g. time-chits; this time-chit itself could be baptized any name
one wished, e.g. one pound, a twentieth of an hour 1s., 1/240th of an
hour 1d. Gold and silver, like all other commodities, depending on the
production time they cost, would express different multiples or
fractional parts of pounds, shillings, pence etc., and an ounce of gold
could just as well be = £8 6s. 3d. as £3 17s. 10 1/2d. These numbers
would always be the expression of the proportion in which a specific
quantity of labour is contained in the ounce. Instead of saying that £3
17s. 10 1/2d. = one ounce of gold, now cost only 1/2 lb. of silk, one
can imagine that the ounce is now = £7 15s. 9d. or that £3 17s. 10 1/2d.
are now only equal to half an ounce, because they are now only half the
value. If we compare prices in England in e.g. the fifteenth century
with those of the eighteenth, then we may find that two commodities had
e.g. entirely the same nominal money value, e.g. 1 pound sterling. In
this case the pound sterling is the standard, but expresses four or five
times as much value in the first case as in the second, and we could say
that, if the value of this commodity is = 1 ounce in the fifteenth
century, then it was = 1/4 ounce of gold in the eighteenth; because in
the eighteenth, 1 ounce of gold expresses the same labour time as 1/4
ounce in the fifteenth century. It could be said, therefore, that the
measure, the pound, had remained the same, but in one case = four times
as much gold as in the other. This is the _ideal standard._ The
comparison we make here could have been made by the people of the
fifteenth century themselves, if they had lived on into the eighteenth;
they would say that 1 ounce of gold, which is now worth £1, was only
worth 1/4 before. 4 pounds of gold now worth no more than 1 in the
fifteenth century. If this pound previously had the name of _livre,_
then I can imagine that one _livre_ had been = 4 pounds at that time,
and is now = to only 1; the value of gold had changed but that the
standard, the _livre,_ had remained the same. In fact, one _livre_ in
France and England originally meant 1 pound of silver, and now only
1/_x_. It can be said, therefore, that the name, _livre,_ the standard,
had remained nominally the same always, but that silver had changed its
value in comparison to it. A Frenchman who had lived from the time of
Charlemagne until today could say that the _livre_ of silver had always
remained the standard of value, unchanged; it had once been worth 1
pound of silver, but, owing to a variety of misfortunes, had finished up
being worth only 1/_x_ of a pennyweight. The ell is the same; only its
length is different in different countries. It is in fact the same as if
the product of one working day, the gold brought to light in one day of
work, were given the name _livre;_ this _livre_ would always remain the
same, although it would express very different amounts of gold in
different periods.

What do we do in fact when we compare £1 of the fifteenth century with
£1 of the eighteenth? Both are the same mass of metal (each = 20s.), but
of a different value; since the metal was then worth 4 times as much as
now. We say therefore that, compared with today, the _livre_ was = 4
times the mass of metal it contains today. And one could imagine that
the _livre_ had remained unchanged, but had been = 4 real _livres_ of
gold then, only = 1 today. The matter would be correctly comparable not
in regard to the quantity of metal contained in a _livre,_ but rather in
regard to its value; this value, however, in turn expresses itself
quantitatively in such a way that 1/4 _livre_ gold, then, = 1 _livre_
gold today. Well; the _livre_ identical, but at that time = 4 real
_livres_ of gold (by today’s value) and now only = 1. If gold falls in
value, and its relative fall or rise as regards other articles is
expressed in their price, then, instead of saying that an object which
cost £1 of gold before now costs 2, it could be said that it still costs
1 pound, but 1 pound is now worth 2 real _livres_ of gold etc.; i.e. 1
_livre_ of 2 real gold _livres_ etc. Instead of saying: I sold this
commodity yesterday at £1, today I sell it at £4, I might say that I
sell it at £1, but yesterday at 1 pound of 1 real pound, today at 1
pound of 4 real pounds. The remaining prices all follow by themselves as
soon as the relation of the real bar to the imaginary one is
established; but this simply the comparison between the past value of
the bar and its present one. The same as if we calculated everything in
the £ of the fifteenth century for instance. This Berber or Negro does
the same thing that every historian must do who pursues one kind of
coin, one accounting name for a coin of the same metallic content, from
one century to the next; if he computes it in contemporary money, he
must equate it to more or less gold depending on its changing value in
different centuries. [49] It is semi-civilized man’s effort to establish
an unchanging value for the unit of money, for the mass of metal which
counts as measure; to fix this value, also, as a constant measure. But
at the same time, the cleverness to know that the bar has changed its
real value. With the small number of commodities which this Berber has
to measure, and with the vigour of tradition among the uncivilized, this
complicated method of calculating is not as difficult as it looks.

1 ounce is = £3 17s. 10 1/2d., i.e. not quite = £4. But for
convenience’s sake let us assume it to be exactly = £4. Then 1/4 of an
ounce of gold therefore obtains the name pound, and serves under this
name as accounting coin. But this pound changes its value, partly
relative to the value of other commodities which change their value,
partly in so far as it is itself the product of more or less labour
time. The only firm thing about it is the name, and the quantity, the
fractional part of the ounce, of the weight-unit of gold, whose
baptismal name it is; which is contained, thus, in one piece of money,
called one pound.

The savage wants to hold it constant as unchangeable value, and thus the
quantity of metal it contains changes for him. If the value of gold
falls by 100%, then the pound is the measure of value for him as before;
but a pound of 2/4 ounces of gold etc. The pound for him always equals a
mass of gold (iron) which has the same value. But since this value
changes, it sometimes equals a greater, sometimes a smaller quantity of
real gold or iron, depending on whether more or less of them must be
given in exchange for other commodities. He compares the contemporary
value with the past value, which latter counts as standard for him, and
survives only in his imagination. Thus, instead of calculating in 1/4
ounce of gold, whose value changes, he calculates in the value which 1/4
ounce of gold previously had, hence in an imaginary unchanged 1/4
ounce-value, which expresses itself, however, in varying quantities. On
one side the effort to establish a fixed value for the value-standard;
on the other side, the cleverness of nevertheless avoiding trouble by
making a detour. But it is altogether absurd to take this accidental
displacement, this way in which semi-savages have assimilated the
measurement of values in money, forced on them from the outside, by
first displacing it and then getting themselves straight again in the
displacement, and to regard this as an organic historical form, or even
to erect it as a higher form compared to more developed relations. These
savages also take a quantity, the iron bar, as point of departure; but
they hold fast to the value which this traditionally had, as accounting
unit etc.

This question achieved significance in the modern economy chiefly owing
to two circumstances: (1) It has been experienced at various times, e.g.
in England during the Revolutionary War [50] that the price of raw gold
rose above the price of minted gold. This historic phenomenon thus
seemed irrefutably to prove that the names which are given to certain
fractional weight-parts of gold (precious metal), pound, shilling, pence
etc., by some inexplicable process act in an independent way towards the
substance of which they are the name. How else could an ounce of gold be
worth more than the same ounce of gold minted in £3 17s. 10 1/2d.? Or
how could an ounce of gold be worth more than 4 _livres_ of gold, if
_livre_ is merely the name for 1/4 ounce? On closer inspection it was
found, however, that the coins which circulated under the name pound in
fact no longer contained the normal metallic content, so that, for
instance, 5 circulating pounds in fact weighed only 1 ounce of gold (of
the same refinement). Since a coin which allegedly represented 1/4 ounce
of gold (thereabouts) in fact represented only 1/5, it was very simple
that the ounce = 5 of this kind of circulating £; hence that the value
of the bullion price rose above the mint price, in that in fact no
longer 1/4 but merely 1/5 of an ounce of gold was called pound,
represented money, had that name; was merely the name, now, for 1/5 of
an ounce. The same phenomenon took place when, although the metal
content of the circulating coins had not fallen below their normal
measure, they circulated at the same time as depreciated paper money,
while to melt them down and to export them was prohibited. In that case,
the 1/4 ounce of gold circulating in the form of £ shared in the
depreciation of the notes; a fate from which gold in bars was exempt. *
The fact was again the same; the accounting name, pound, had ceased to
be the name for 1/4 ounce, became the name for a lesser amount. Thus the
ounce equalled e.g. 5 of such pounds. This means, then, that the bullion
price rose above the mint price. These or analogous historical
phenomena, all capable of equally simple solution and all belonging to
the same series, led therefore to the notion of the _ideal measure,_ or,
that money as measure was only a point of comparison, not a specific
quantity. Hundreds of volumes have been written about this case in
England in the past 150 years.

* The mint price can also be raised above the bullion price within a
country by the mintage.

That a specific sort of coin should rise above its bullion content is
not in itself something strange, since new labour (to give it form) is
added to the coin. But regardless of that, it happens that the value of
a specific sort of coin rises above its bullion content. This is of no
economic interest whatever, and has as yet led to no economic studies.
It means nothing more than that, for certain purposes, gold and silver
was requisite in precisely this form, say of British pounds or of
Spanish dollars. The directors of the Bank had, of course, a particular
interest in proving that the value of notes had not fallen, but rather
that of gold had risen. As to the last question, this can be treated
only later.

(2) But the theory of the _ideal measure_ was first brought up at the
beginning of the eighteenth century and again in the second decade of
the nineteenth, where questions were at issue in which money figures not
as measure, nor as medium of exchange, but rather as constantly
self-identical equivalent, as value for-itself (in the third aspect) and
hence as the universal material of contracts. The issue both times was
whether or not debts of state, and other debts, contracted in a
depreciated money, should be acknowledged and paid back in full-valued
money. It was a question simply between the creditors of the state and
the mass of the nation. This question itself does not concern us here.
Those who demanded a readjustment of claims on the one side, and of
payments (obligations) on the other, chose the wrong battlefield in
asking whether or not the _standard of money_ ought to be changed. On
this occasion, then, crude theories of this type were brought forward
about the standard of money, fixing of the price of money, etc.
(‘Altering the standard like altering the national measures or weights.’
Steuart. It is clear at the first glance that the mass of grain in a
nation does not change by the unit measure of e.g. the bushel being
doubled or halved. But the change would be very important for e.g.
farmers who had to pay grain rent in a specific number of bushels, if,
were the measure doubled, they then had to supply the same number of
bushels as before.) In this case, it was the creditors of the state who
clung to the name ‘pound’, regardless of the fractional weight-unit of
gold which it expressed, i.e. to the ‘ideal standard’ – for the latter
is in fact only the accounting name for the weight-unit of metal which
serves as measure. Strangely enough, however, it was precisely their
opponents who advanced this theory of the ‘ideal standard’, and they
themselves who combated it. Instead of simply demanding a readjustment,
or that the creditors of the state ought to be paid back only the
amount, in gold, which they had in fact advanced, they demanded that the
standard be reduced in accordance with depreciation; thus e.g. if the
pound sterling had fallen to 1/5 of an ounce of gold, that this 1/5
ounce should henceforth carry the name pound, or that the pound ought
perhaps to be minted in 21 shillings instead of in 20. This reduction of
the _standard_ was called raising the value of money; in that the ounce
now = £5 instead of = 4 as previously. Thus, they did not say that those
who had advanced e.g. 1 ounce of gold in 5 depreciated pounds now ought
to get 4 full-valued pounds back; they said, rather, that they should be
repaid 5 pounds, but that the pound ought henceforth to express 1/20 of
an ounce less than before. When they raised this demand in England after
the resumption of cash-payment, the accounting coin had regained its old
metal value. On this occasion yet further crude theories about money as
the measure of value were constructed, and, on the pretense of refuting
these theories, whose falsity was simple to prove, the interests of the
creditors of the state were smuggled through. The first battle of this
sort between Locke and Lowndes. From 1688 to 1695 the state contracted
debts in depreciated money – depreciated owing to all full-weighted
money having been melted down, and only the light-weight being in
circulation. The guinea had risen to 30s. Lowndes (mintmaster?)
(secretary to the treasury) wanted to have the £ reduced by 20%; Locke
stood by the old standard of Elizabeth. In 1695 the general recoinage.
Locke won the day. Debts contracted at 10 and 14s. the guinea, paid back
at the rate of 20s. This equally advantageous for the state and for the
landed proprietors. ‘Lowndes posed the question on the wrong basis.
First he asserted that his scheme was not a debasement of the old
standard. Then he ascribed the rise of the bullion price to the inherent
value of silver and not to the lightness of the coin with which it was
bought. He always supposed that it was the stamp and not the substance
which made the currency … For his part, Locke only asked himself whether
or not Lowndes’s scheme included a debasement, but never inquired into
the interests of those who are engaged by permanent contracts. Mr
Lowndes’s great argument for reducing the standard was that silver
bullion was risen to 6s. 5d. per ounce (i.e. that it might have been
bought with 77 pence of shillings of 1/77 part of a pound troy) and was
therefore of the opinion that the pound troy should be coined into 77s.,
which was a diminution of the value of the £ by 20% or 1/5. Locke
replied to him that the 77s. were paid in clipped money and that they
were not more than 62 pence standard coin, by weight … But ought a man
who had borrowed £1,000 in this clipped money to be obliged to pay back
£1,000 in standard weight? Both Lowndes and Locke developed only quite
superficially the influence of a change of standard on the relation of
debtors and creditors, … the credit system then still little developed
in England … the landed interest and the interest of the crown, were
only attended to. Trade at that time was almost at a stop, and had been
raised at a piratical war … Restoring the standard was the most
favourable, both for the landed interest and the exchequer; and so it
was gone in for.’ (Steuart loc. cit. Vol. II. p. 178, 179.) Steuart
ironically remarks on the whole transaction: ‘By this raising of the
standard the government gained significantly as regards taxes, and
creditors on their capital and interest; and the nation, which was the
principal loser, was satisfied (pleased) (quite joyful) because _its_
standard’ (i.e. the measure of its own value) ‘was not debased; so were
all the three parties satisfied.’ (loc. cit. Vol. II, p. 156.) Compare
John Locke. _Works._ 4 vols. 7th ed., London, 1768; as well as the essay
‘Some Considerations on the Lowering of Interest and Raising the Value
of Money’ (1691); and also: ‘Further Considerations Concerning Raising
the Value of Money, wherein Mr Lowndes’s arguments for it, in his late
Report concerning “An Essay for the amendment of the silver coins”, are
particularly examined’, both in Vol. II. In the first monograph it says,
among other things:

‘The _raising of money,_ about which so much nonsense is now being
uttered, is either _raising value of our money,_ and that you cannot do;
or _raising the denomination of our coin.’_ (p. 53.) ‘For example, term
a crown what previously was called 1/2 a crown. The value remains
determined by the metal content. If the abating 1/20 of the quantity of
the silver of any coin, does not lessen its value, the abating 19/20 of
the quantity of the silver of any coin, will not abate its value. Thus,
according to this theory, a single three pence or a single farthing,
being called a crown, will buy as much spice or silk, or any other
commodity, as a crown-piece which contains 20 or 60 times as much
silver.’ (p. 54.) ‘The raising of money is thus nothing but giving a
less quantity of silver the stamp and denomination of a greater.’ (loc.
cit.) ‘The stamp of the coin a guarantee to the public; it must contain
so much silver under such a denomination.’ (57.) ‘It is silver, and not
names, that pays debts and purchases commodities.’ (p. 58.) ‘The mint
stamp suffices as guarantee for the weight and the fineness of the piece
of money, but lets the thus-coined gold money, find its own rate, like
other commodities.’ (p. 66.) In general one can do nothing with the
raising of money but make ‘more money in tale’, but not more ‘money in
weight and worth’. (p. 73.) ‘Silver is altogether a different standard
from the others. The ell or the quart with which people measure may
remain in the hands of the seller, of the buyer or of a third person: it
matters not whose it is. But silver is not only the measure of bargains,
it is the thing bargained for, and passes in trade from the buyer to the
seller, as being in such a quantity equivalent to the thing sold: and so
it not only _reassumes_ the value of the commodity it is applied to, but
is given in exchange for it, as of equal value. But this it does only by
its quantity, and nothing else.’ (p. 92.) ‘The raising being but giving
of names at pleasure to aliquot parts of any piece, viz. that now the
sixtieth part of an ounce still be called a penny, may be done with what
increase you please.’ (118.) ‘The privilege that bullion has, to be
exported freely, will give it a little advance above our coin, let the
denomination of that be raised, or fall as you please, whilst there is
need of its exportation, and the exportation of our coin is prohibited
by law.’ (p. 119, 120.)

The same position adopted by Lowndes against Locke, in that the former
believed the rise of the bullion price to be due to a rise in the value
of bullion, as a result of which the value of the accounting coin had
declined (i.e. because the value of bullion rose, the value of a
fractional part of it, called £, fell), was adopted by the
little-shilling-men – Attwood and the others of the Birmingham school
1819 seq. (Cobbett had posed the question on the correct ground:
non-adjustments of national debts, rents etc.; but spoiled it all by his
false theory which condemned paper money as such. [51] (Strangely
enough, he came to this conclusion by beginning, like Ricardo, who comes
to the opposite conclusion, from the same false premise, the
determination of price by the quantity of the medium of circulation).)
Their entire wisdom in the following phrases: ‘In his dispute with the
Birmingham Chamber of Commerce, Sir R. Peel asks: “What will _your_
pound note represent”’ (p. 266. ‘The Currency Question’, _The Gemini
Letters,_ London, 1844) (namely, the pound note if not paid in gold).
‘Now what is meant by the present standard of value? … £3 17s. 10 1/2d.,
do they signify one _ounce of gold_ or its _value?_ If the ounce itself,
why not call things by their names and say, instead of pound, shilling,
pence, ounces, pennyweights and grains? Then we go back to a _direct
system of barter.’_ (p. 269. Not quite. But what would Mr Attwood have
gained if people said ounce instead of £3 17s. 10 1/2d., and so many
pennyweight instead of shillings? That, for convenience in calculating,
the fractional parts are given names – which apart from that, also
indicates that the metal is here given a social quality alien to itself
– what witness does it bear either for or against Attwood’s doctrine?)
‘Or the _value?_ If an ounce = £3 17s. 10 1/2d., why at different
periods money £5 4s., and then again 3,17, 9? … the expression pound has
reference to _value,_ but not _a fixed standard value … Labour_ is the
parent of cost, and gives the relative value to gold or iron.’ (And that
is in fact why the value of one ounce and of £3 17s. 10 1/2d. changes.)
‘_Whatever denomination or words are used to express the daily or weekly
labour of a man,_ such words express the cost of commodity produced.’
(p. 270.) The word ‘one pound is the _ideal_ unit’. (p. 272.) The last
sentence important because it shows how this doctrine of the ‘ideal
unit’ dissolves into the demand for a money which is supposed directly
to represent labour. Pound then e.g. the expression for 12 days’ work.
The demand is this, that the determination of value should not lead to
that of money as a distinct quantity, or that labour as the measure of
values should not compel the labour objectified in a specific commodity
to be made the measure of the other values. The important thing is that
this demand is here made from the standpoint of the bourgeois economy
(thus also by Gray, who actually works out this matter to perfection,
and of whom we will speak in a moment), not from the standpoint of the
negation of the bourgeois economy, as e.g. with Bray. The Proudhonists
(see e.g. Mr Darimon) have indeed succeeded in raising this demand both
as one corresponding to the present relations of production and also as
a demand which totally revolutionizes them, and a great innovation,
since, as _crapauds_, [52] they are of course not required to know
anything of what has been written or thought on the other side of the
Channel. At all events, already the simple fact that this demand was
raised more than 50 years ago in England by a fraction of bourgeois
economists shows to what extent the socialists who pretend thereby to
advance something new and anti-bourgeois are on the wrong track. About
the demand itself, see above. (Only a few things from Gray can be added
here. As to the rest, the matter can be gone into in detail only in the
banking system.)

 

[More on the critique of theories about medium of circulation and money. – _Transformation of the medium of circulation into money. – Formation of treasures. – Means of payment. – Prices of commodities and quantity of circulating money. – Value of money_]

As regards money as constantly self-identical equivalent, i.e. as
_value_ as such, and thus as the material of all contracts, it is clear
that the changes in the value of the material in which it represents
itself (directly, as in gold, silver, or indirectly, as claims, in
notes, on specific quantity of gold, silver etc.) must bring about great
revolutions between the different classes of a state. This not to be
examined here, since these relations presuppose knowledge of the various
economic relations. Only something by way of illustration. In the
sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, it is well known that the
depreciation of gold and silver, due to the discovery of America,
depreciated the labouring class and that of the landed proprietors;
raised that of the capitalists (specially of the industrial
capitalists). In the Roman republic, the appreciation of copper turned
the plebeians into the slaves of the patricians. ‘Since one was forced
to pay the largest sums in copper, one had to hold this money in masses
or in stamped fragments which were tendered and received by weight.
Copper in this state was _aes grave._ Metal money weighed. [53]
<Originally copper without stamp among the Romans; then stamping of
external coins. _Servius rex ovium boumque effigie primus aes signavit._
[54] (Pliny, _Historia naturalis_ I. 18, c. 3.)> After the patricians
had stockpiled a mass of this dark and ugly metal … they tried to free
themselves from it, either by buying from the plebeians all the land
which the latter would sell, or by lending at long term. This value had
cost them nothing to acquire, and was a hindrance to them, so they were
forced to rid themselves of it unsparingly. The competition of all who
had the same desire of getting rid of it necessarily brought about, in a
short time, a considerable reduction of the price of copper in Rome. At
the beginning of the fourth century after the foundation of Rome, as one
may see from the Lex Menenia (302 A.U.C.), the relation of copper to
silver = 1:960 … This metal, so depreciated in Rome, at the same time
one of the most sought-after articles of trade (since the Greeks made
their works of art out of bronze etc.) … The precious metals came to be
exchanged in Rome for copper, with enormous profits, and so lucrative a
commerce stimulated new imports each day … Little by little the
patricians exchanged their treasure for ingots of gold and of silver,
_aurum infectum, argentum infectum,_ [55] in place of these piles of old
copper, so troublesome to dispose of and so disagreeable to look at.
After the defeat of Pyrrhus and particularly after the conquests in Asia
… the _aes grave_ had already quite vanished, and the requirements of
circulation had necessitated the introduction of the Greek victoria, and
the name _victoriatus …_ of a weight of 1 1/2 scruples of silver, like
the Attic coin, the drachma; in the _seventh century_ A.U.C. the lex
Clodia made Roman coin of it. It was usually exchanged for the pound of
copper or the _as of 12 ounces._ Thus between silver and copper the
relation of 192:1, i.e. a 5 times weaker relation than during the time
of the greatest depreciation of copper due to export; still, copper
cheaper in Rome than in Greece and Asia. This great revolution in the
exchange value of the monetary substance, to the measure it proceeded,
most cruelly worsened the lot of the unfortunate plebeians, who had
obtained the depreciated copper as a loan, and, having spent or used it
at the rate it then had, now owed, by the letter of their contracts, a
five times greater sum than they had borrowed in reality. They had no
means to buy their way out of servitude … Whoever had borrowed 3,000
_as_ during the time when this sum = 300 oxen or 900 _scruples_ of
silver, could then obtain these only for 4,500 _scruples_ of silver,
when the _as_ was represented by 1 1/2 _scruples_ of this metal … If the
plebeian gave back 1/5 of the copper he had obtained, then he had in
reality paid off his debt, for 1/5 now the same value as 1 at the time
the contract was made. Copper had risen 5 times in value compared to
silver … The plebeians demanded a revision of the debt, a new appraisal
of the sum due, and a change in the title of their original obligation …
While the creditors did not demand the restitution of the capital, the
payment of interest was itself unbearable, because the interest,
originally stipulated as 12%, had, owing to the excessive rise in cost
of the specie, become as onerous as if it had been fixed at 60% of the
principal. By way of concession, the debtors obtained a law that
deducted the accumulated interest from the capital … The senators
resisted letting go of the means by which they held the people in the
most abject dependence. The masters of nearly all landed property, armed
with legal titles which authorized them to throw their debtors into
irons and to sentence them to corporal punishment, suppressed the
uprisings and persecuted the most mutinous. Every patrician’s home was a
prison. Finally wars were got up which gave the debtor some payment,
with a suspension of obligations, and which opened to the creditor new
sources of wealth and of power. This the internal situation in Rome at
the time of the defeat of Pyrrhus, the capture of Taranto and important
victories over the Samnians, Lucanians and other South-Italian peoples
etc. … 483 or 485 the first Roman silver coin, the _libella; …_ was
called _libella_ because of small weight = _libra_ of 12 ounces of
copper.’ (Garnier, Germain, _Histoire de la Monnaie_ etc., 2 vols.,
Paris, 1819. Vol. II. p. 14–24.)

_<Assignats. ‘National Property. Assignat of_ 100 _frs.’_ legal tender …
They are distinguished from all other notes in not _even professing to
represent any specified thing._ The words ‘national property’ meant that
their value could be obtained by buying confiscated properties with them
at the continuous auctions of the latter. But no reason why this value
called 100 fr. It depended on the comparative quality of the property so
purchasable and the number of assignats issued.’ (78, 79, Nassau W.
Senior, ‘_Three Lectures on the Cost of Obtaining Money’_ etc., London,
1830.)

‘The _livre de compte,_ introduced by Charlemagne, almost never
represented by a real equivalent coin, retained its name, as well as its
divisions into _sous_ and _deniers,_ until the end of the eighteenth
century, while real coins have varied infinitely in form, size, value,
not only with every change of government, but even under the same reign.
The value of the _livre de compte_ nevertheless underwent enormous
diminutions … but this always an act of force.’ (p. 76, Vol. I. Garnier,
loc. cit.) All coins in antiquity originally weights. (loc. cit. p.
125.)

‘Money is in the first place the universally marketable commodity, or
that in which every one deals for the purpose of procuring other
commodities.’ (Bailey: _‘Money and its Vicissitudes’_ etc., London,
1837, p. 1.) ‘It is the great _medial_ commodity.’ (loc. cit. p. 2.) It
is the _general commodity of contracts,_ or that in which the majority
of bargains about property, to be completed at a future time, are made.
(p. 3.) Finally, it is the _‘measure of value …_ Now, as all articles
are exchanged for money, the mutual values of A and B are necessarily
shown by their values in money or their prices … as the comparative
weight of substances are seen by their weight in relation to water, or
their specific gravities.’ (p. 4.) ‘The first essential requisite is
that money should be uniform in its physical qualities, so that equal
quantities should be so far identical as to present no ground for
preferring one to the other … For example, grain and cattle already for
this reason not useful, because an equal quantity of grain and equal
numbers of cattle are not always alike in the qualities for which they
are preferred.’ (p. 5, 6.) ‘The _steadiness of value_ is so desirable in
money as medial commodity and a commodity of contract; it is quite
unessential to it in its capacity of the measure of value.’ (p. 9.)
‘Money may continually vary in value, and yet be as good a measure of
value as if it remained perfectly stationary. Suppose e.g., it is
reduced in value and the reduction in value implies a reduction of value
in relation to some one or more commodities, suppose it is reduced in
value in relation to corn and labour. Before the reduction, a guinea
would purchase three bushels of wheat, or six days’ labour;
subsequently, it would purchase only two bushels of wheat or four days’
labour. In both cases, the relations of wheat and labour to money being
given, their mutual relations can be inferred; in other words, we can
ascertain that a bushel of wheat is worth two days’ labour. This, which
is all that measuring value implies, is as readily done after the
reduction as before. The excellence of any thing as a measure of value
is altogether independent of its own variableness in value … One
confuses invariableness of value with invariableness in fineness and
weight … The command of _quantity_ being that which constitutes value, a
_definite quantity_ of a substance of some uniform commodity must be
used as a unit to measure value; and it is this definite _quantity_ of a
substance of uniform quality which must be invariable.’ (p. 11.) In all
money contracts the issue at stake is the _quantity_ of the gold and
silver to be lent, not its value. (p. 103.) ‘If someone were to insist
that it be a contract for a specified _value,_ he is bound to show in
relation to what commodity: thus, he would be maintaining that a
pecuniary contract does not relate to a quantity of money as expressed
on the face of it, but to a quantity of some commodity of which no
mention is made.’ (p. 104.) ‘It is not necessary to restrict this to
contracts where actual _money_ is lent. It holds for all obligations for
the future payment of money, whether for articles of any kind sold on
credit, or for services, or as rent of land or houses; they are
precisely in the same condition as pure loans of the medial commodity.
If A sells a ton of iron to B for ten pounds, at twelve months’ credit,
it is just the same in effect as lending the ten pounds for a year and
the intents of both contracting parties will in the same way be affected
by changes in currency.’ (p. 110, 111.)

The confusion of giving names to specified and unchangeable fractional
parts of the money substance which is to serve as unit of measure –
confusing the denomination of it with fixing the _price_ of money – is
also displayed, among others, by the high-flown romanticist of political
economy, Mr Adam Müller. He says, among other things: ‘Every one can see
how much depends on the true _determination_ of the _mint price,_ above
all in a country like England, where the government, with generous
liberality’ (i.e. at the country’s expense and the profit of the Bank of
England bullion dealers) ‘mints without charge, collects no mintage
etc., and thus, if it set the mint price significantly higher than the
market price, if, instead of paying an ounce of gold at £3 17s. 10
1/2d., as now, it set £3 19s. as the mint price of one ounce of gold,
then all gold would flow towards the mint, all the silver there would be
changed into the cheap gold here, and thus be brought to the mint anew,
and the currency system would become disordered.’ (p. 280, 281, Vol. II.
_Die Elemente der Staatskunst,_ Berlin, 1809.) Herr Müller does not
know, then, that pence and shillings here are only names for fractional
parts of a gold ounce. Because silver and copper coins – which,
notabene, are not minted according to the proportion of silver and
copper to gold, but are issued as markers for the equivalent parts of
gold, and hence need be accepted in payment only in very small amounts –
circulate under the names of shillings and pence, he imagines that an
ounce of gold is divided into pieces of gold, of silver, and of copper
(thus triple standard of value). A couple of steps later he suddenly
remembers again that there is no double standard in England, hence even
less a triple one. Herr Müller’s lack of clarity about the ‘common’
economic relations is the real foundation of his ‘higher’ conception.

From the general law that the total price of commodities in circulation
determines the mass of the circulating medium at a given stage of the
velocity of circulation, it follows that at a given stage of growth of
the values thrown into circulation, the more precious metal – the metal
of greater specific value, i.e. which contains more labour time in a
smaller amount – takes the place of the less precious as the predominant
medium of circulation; hence, copper, silver, gold, each one replacing
the previous one as the predominant medium of circulation. The same
aggregate sum of prices can be circulated e.g. with 14 times as few gold
coins as silver coins. Copper or even iron coin as predominant medium of
circulation supposes weak circulation. Just as the more powerful but
more valuable means of transport and means of circulation takes the
place of the less valuable to the degree that the mass of circulating
commodities, and circulation generally, grows.

On the other side it is clear that the small retail traffic of everyday
life requires exchange on a very diminutive scale – the smaller, the
poorer the country and the weaker is circulation as such. It is in this
retail traffic, where very small amounts of commodities on the one side,
hence also very small values circulate, that money appears in the most
proper sense of the word merely as vanishing medium of circulation, and
does not congeal as realized price. Consequently, a subsidiary medium of
circulation enters for this traffic, which is merely the symbol of the
fractional parts of the predominant media of circulation. These are
silver and copper markers, which are therefore not minted in the
relation of the value of their substance to the value of e.g. gold. Here
money appears still only as symbol, even if itself still in a relatively
valuable substance. Gold e.g. would have to be divided into excessively
small fractions to serve as equivalent of the division of commodities
required by this retail traffic.

This is why these subsidiary media of circulation need be accepted in
payment, by law, in only very small amounts, so that they can never
solidify as realization of price. For example, in England, copper in the
amount of 6d., silver in the amount of 20s. The more developed
circulation is generally, the greater the mass of prices of the
commodities entering into circulation, the more does their wholesale
exchange separate off from their retail exchange, and they require
different sorts of coin for their circulation. The velocity of the
circulation of these markers is inversely related to the magnitude of
their value.

‘In the early stage of society, when nations are poor, and their
payments trifling, copper has frequently been known to answer all the
purposes of currency and it is coined into pieces of very low
denominations in order to facilitate the inconsiderable exchanges which
then take place. So in the early age of the Roman Republic and of
Scotland.’ (p. 3.) (David Buchanan, ‘_Observations on the Subjects,
treated of in Dr Smith’s Inquiry’_ etc., Edinburgh, 1814.) ‘The general
wealth of a country is very accurately measured by the nature of its
payments and the state of its coin; and the decided prevalence of a
coarse metal in its currency, joined to the use of coins of very low
denomination, marks a rude state of society.’ (p. 4.) Later ‘the
business of currency becomes divided into two distinct departments; the
duty of effecting the main payments … for the more precious metals; the
inferior metals by contrast retained for some trivial exchanges, and
thus purely subservient to the main currency. Between the first
introduction of a precious metal into the currency of a country, and its
exclusive use in the main payments, a wide interval; and the payments of
the retail trade must in the interval have become so considerable, owing
to the increase of wealth, that at least in part they could be
conveniently managed by the new and more valuable coin; since no coin
can be used for the main payments’ (this is false, as the notes show)
‘which is not suited, at the same time, to the transactions of the
retail trade, since every trade ultimately obtains from the consumer …
the return of its capital … Silver has maintained itself everywhere on
the continent in the main payments … In Britain the quantity of silver
in circulation does not exceed what is necessary for the smaller
payments … in fact few payments to the amount of 20s. made in silver …
Before the reign of William III silver was brought in large bags to the
treasury in payment of the national revenue. At this period the great
change took place … The exclusive introduction of gold in the main
payments of England was a clear proof that the _returns of the retail
trade at this time were made mainly in gold;_ this possible without a
single payment ever exceeding or even equalling any of the gold coins;
because, in the general abundance of gold, and scarcity of silver, gold
coins naturally offered for small sums and a balance of silver demanded
in return; so that gold, by thus assisting in the retail trade and in
economizing the use of silver, even for the small payments, would
prevent its _accumulation_ by the retail trader … At the same time, as
in England gold was substituted for silver’ (1695) ‘for the main
payments, silver for copper in Sweden … _Clear, that the coin used for
the larger payments can only pass current at its intrinsic worth …_ But
intrinsic worth _not necessary for a subsidiary currency …_ In Rome, so
long as copper the prevailing coin, current only for its intrinsic value
… 5 years before the beginning of the first Punic war, silver
introduced, little by little displaced copper in the main payments … 62
years after the silver, gold, but it never seems to have excluded silver
from the main payments … In India, copper not a subsidiary currency;
passes therefore for its intrinsic worth. The rupee, a silver coin of
2s. 3d., is the money of account; in relation to which the mohour, a
gold coin, and the pice, a copper coin, are allowed to find their value
in the market; the number of pice currently exchanged for a rupee
constantly varies with the weight and value of the coin, while here 24
halfpence always = 1s. without reference to their weight. In India the
retail dealer must still take considerable quantities of copper for his
goods, and he cannot afford to take it therefore but for its intrinsic
value … In the currencies of Europe, copper passes for whatever value is
fixed upon it, without examination of its weight and fineness.’ (p.
4–18.) In England ‘an excess of copper spent 1798 by private traders;
and although copper only legal payment for 6d., found its way (the
surplus) to the retail traders; they sought to put it in circulation
again; but ultimately returned to them. When this currency was stopped,
copper accumulated with the retail traders in sums of £20, £30, even
£50, which they finally had to sell at their intrinsic value.’ (p. 31.)

In the subsidiary currency, the medium of circulation takes on a
particular form as such, as a merely vanishing medium, alongside the
medium of circulation which is at the same time equivalent, which
realizes prices, and accumulates as independent value. Thus, here, pure
symbol. Thus it may be issued only in the quantity absolutely required
for the small retail trade, so that it can never thereby accumulate. The
quantity must be determined by the mass of prices which it circulates,
divided by its velocity. Because the mass of the circulating medium, of
a certain value, is determined by prices, it follows automatically that
if a greater quantity than required by circulation itself were
artificially thrown into it and could not run off (which is not the case
here, because, as medium of circulation, it is above its intrinsic
worth), then it would be depreciated; not because the quantity
determines prices, but because prices determine the quantity, and hence
only a specific amount can remain in circulation at a specific value.
Thus, if there are no openings by which circulation can throw out the
superfluous quantity, if the circulating medium cannot change from that
form into the form of value for itself, then the value of the medium of
circulation must fall. But this can only take place, apart from
artificial hindrances, prohibition of melting-down, of export etc., if
the circulating medium is merely a symbol, and does not itself possess a
real value corresponding to its nominal value, hence cannot make the
transition from the form of circulating medium into that of the
commodity in general, and shed its stamp; if it is imprisoned in its
existence as coin. It follows on the other side that the symbol, the
money marker, can circulate at the nominal value of the gold it
represents – without possessing any value whatever of its own – in so
far as it represents the medium of circulation only in that quantity in
which it would itself circulate. But then [it becomes] at the same time
a condition either that it is itself then on hand only in such a small
quantity that it circulates only in the subsidiary form, hence does not
cease for an instant to be a medium of circulation (where it constantly
serves partly in the exchange with small amounts of commodities, partly
merely to make exchange for the real medium of circulation), hence can
never accumulate; or it must possess no value whatever, so that its
nominal value can never be compared with its intrinsic value. In the
latter case it is posited as mere _symbol,_ which, by means of itself,
points to value as something existing outside itself. In the other case
it never comes to a comparison between its intrinsic value and its
nominal value.

Which is why counterfeits of money show an effect immediately; while
total destruction of its value does not damage it. It might otherwise
appear paradoxical that money can be replaced by worthless paper; but
that the slightest alloying of its metallic content depreciates it.

The double function of money in circulation contradicts itself as such;
to serve as mere medium of circulation, where it is a vanishing
mediation; and at the same time as realization of prices, in which form
it accumulates and turns into its third character as money. As medium of
circulation it is worn out; thus does not contain the metal content
which makes it into objectified labour in a fixed amount. Its
correspondence to its value hence always more or less illusory. One
example to be presented. It is important to bring in the determination
of quantity already at this point in the chapter on money, but deduced
in just the opposite way to the usual doctrine. Money can be replaced
because its quantity is determined by the prices it circulates. In so
far as it, itself, has value – as in the subsidiary medium of
circulation – its quantity must be so determined that it can never
accumulate as an equivalent, and in fact always figures as an auxiliary
cog of the medium of circulation proper. In so far, however, as it is to
replace the latter, it must have no value whatsoever, i.e. its value
must exist apart from itself. The variations in circulation determined
by the amount and number of transactions. (_Economist._) Circulation may
rise, prices remaining equal, by increase in the amount of commodities;
if the amount remains constant, by increase of their prices; by both
together.

With the proposition that prices regulate the quantity of currency and
not the quantity of currency prices, or in other words that trade
regulates currency (the quantity of the medium of circulation), and
currency does not regulate trade, [it] is, of course, as our deduction
has shown, supposed that price is only value translated into another
language. Value, and value determined by labour time, is the
presupposition. It is clear, therefore, that this law is not equally
applicable to the fluctuations of prices in all epochs; e.g. in
antiquity, e.g. in Rome, where the circulating medium does not itself
arise from circulation, from exchange, but from pillage, plunder etc.

‘No country may consequently have more than one standard; more than one
standard for the _measure of value;_ for this standard must be uniform
and unchanging. No article has a uniform and unchanging value relative
to others: it only has such with itself. A piece of gold is constantly
of the same value as the other, of exactly the same fineness, the same
weight and in the same place; but this cannot be said of gold _and_ any
other article, e.g. silver.’ (_Econ._ Vol. I p. 771.) [56] _‘Pound_ is
nothing but a denomination in account, which has reference to a given
and fixed quantity of gold of standard quality.’ (loc. cit.) ‘To speak
of making one ounce of gold worth £5 instead of £3 17s. 10 1/2d. is to
say only that it ought henceforth to be minted in 5 sovereigns instead
of in 3 420/480 sovereigns. We would not thereby alter the _value of the
gold,_ but only the _weight_ and hence the _value of_ the _pound_ or
_sovereign._ An ounce of gold would have the same value relative to
wheat and all other commodities as before, but since a pound, although
bearing the same name as before, would represent a smaller part of an
ounce of gold, it would represent a correspondingly smaller quantity of
wheat and other commodities. Just as if we had said that a _quarter of
wheat_ should _no longer be divided into 8, but rather into 12 bushels;_
we could not thereby change the value of wheat, but merely diminish the
quantity contained in a bushel, and hence the latter’s value.’ (p. 772
loc. cit.) ‘Whatever temporary or permanent change might take place, its
_price_ is always expressed in the same amount of money; an ounce of
gold will remain £3 17s. 10 1/2d. of our money. The change in its value
indicated by the greater or lesser quantity of the commodities it can
purchase.’ (loc. cit. p. 890.) [57]

_The ideal bar_ to be compared e.g. with the _ideal milrea_ in Buenos
Aires (likewise the pound in England during the depreciation of notes
etc.). What is fixed here is the name _milrea;_ what fluctuates is the
quantity of gold or silver it expresses. In Buenos Aires the currency is
inconvertible paper money (paper dollars); these dollars originally =
4s. 6d. each; now approximately 3 3/4d. and has been as low as 1 1/2d.
An ell of cloth formerly worth 2 dollars, now _nominally_ 28 dollars in
consequence of the depreciated paper.

‘In Scotland, the _medium of exchange,_ not to be confused with the
standard of value, in the amount of £1 and upwards may be said to be
exclusively paper, and gold does not circulate at all; yet gold is as
much the standard of value as if nothing else circulated, because the
paper is convertible into the _same fixed quantity_ of that metal; and
it circulates only on the faith of being so convertible.’ (p. 1275.)
[58]

‘Guineas are _hoarded_ in times of distrust.’ (Thornton, p. 48.) [59]
The _hoarding principle,_ in which money functions as independent value,
is, apart from the striking forms in which it appears, necessary as _one
moment_ of exchange resting on money circulation; since everyone, as A.
Smith says, needs, beside his own commodity, the medial quantity, a
certain proportion of the ‘general commodity’. _‘The man in trade has
property in trade.’_ (loc. cit. p. 21.)>

Capital, not labour, _determines the value of the commodity. Torrens_

‘Equal capitals or in other words equal quantities of accumulated labour
will often put in motion different quantities of immediate labour, but
that does not alter the matter.’ (p. 31. Torrens, ‘An Essay on the
Production of Wealth’, London, 1821.) ‘In the early period of society …
it is the total quantity of labour, accumulated and immediate, expended
on production … which _determines the relative value of commodities._
But as soon as stock is accumulated and a class of capitalists
distinguishes itself from another class, of workers, when the person who
undertakes any branch of industry does not perform his own work, but
advances subsistence and materials to others, then it is the amount of
capital, or the quantity of accumulated labour expended in production,
which determines the exchangeable power of commodities.’ (p. 33, 34.)
‘So long as two capitals are equal … their products are of _equal
value,_ however we may vary the quantity of immediate labour which they
put in motion, or which their products may require. If they are unequal,
… their products are of unequal value, though the total quantity of
labour expended upon each should be precisely equal.’ (p. 39.) Thus
‘after this separation of capitalists and labourers, it is the amount of
capital, the quantity of accumulated labour, and not, as before this
separation, the sum of accumulated _and_ immediate labour, expended on
production, which determines the exchange value.’ (loc. cit.) Mr
Torrens’s confusion correct compared to the abstract way of the
Ricardians. In itself, fundamentally wrong. Firstly, the determination
of value by pure labour time takes place only on the foundation of the
production of capital, hence the separation of the two classes. The
positing of _prices_ as equal, in consequence of the same average rate
of profit – and even this with a grain of salt – has _nothing_ to do
with the determination of value, rather _supposes_ the latter. This
point important so as to show the Ricardians’ confusion.

_The minimum of wages_

The rate of surplus value as profit is determined (1) by the magnitude
of the surplus value itself; (2) by the relation of living labour to
accumulated (the ratio of the capital expended as wages to the capital
employed as such). Both the causes which determine (1) and (2), to be
examined separately. The law of rent, e.g., belongs to (1). For the time
being, necessary labour supposed as such; i.e. that the worker always
obtains only the minimum of wages. This supposition is necessary, of
course, so as to establish the laws of profit in so far as they are not
determined by the rise and fall of wages or by the influence of landed
property. All of these fixed suppositions themselves become fluid in the
further course of development. But only by holding them fast at the
beginning is their development possible without confounding everything.
Besides it is practically sure that, for instance, however the standard
of necessary labour may differ at various epochs and in various
countries, or how much, in consequence of the demand and supply of
labour, its amount and ratio may change, at any given epoch the standard
is to be considered and acted upon as a fixed one by capital. To
consider those changes themselves belongs altogether to the chapter
treating of wage labour.

‘Exchangeable value is determined not by the absolute, but by the
relative cost of production. If the cost of producing gold remained the
same, while the cost of producing all other things doubled, then would
gold have a less power of purchasing all other things than before; and
its exchangeable value would fall one half; and this diminution in its
exchange value precisely the same in effect as if the cost of producing
all other things remained unaltered, while that of producing gold had
been reduced one half.’ (p. 56, 57. Torrens, loc. cit.) This important
for prices. For determination of value, absolutely not; mere tautology.
The value of a commodity is determined by the amount of labour it
contains; this means that it exchanges for the same quantity of labour
in every other form of use value. It is therefore clear that, if the
labour time necessary for the production of object A doubles, then now
only 1/2 of it = its earlier equivalent, B. Since equivalence is
determined by the equality of labour time or of the amount of labour,
the difference of value is of course determined by the inequality of
labour time, or, labour time is the measure of value.

_1826 cotton machinery and workmen._ Hodgskin

‘In 1826, the various machinery used in manufacturing cotton employed 1
man to perform the work of 150. Now suppose that only 280,000 men are
employed in it at present; then, half a century earlier, 42,000,000
would have had to be in it.’ (p. 72.) (Hodgskin.) ‘The relative value of
the precious metals to other commodities determines how much of them
must be given for other things; and the number of sales to be made,
within a given period, determines, as far as money is the instrument for
effecting sales, the quantity of money required.’ (loc. cit. p. 188.)

‘Abundant reason to believe that the practice of coining originated with
individuals and carried on by them before it was seized on and
monopolized by governments. Such long the case in Russia.’ (See Storch.)
(loc. cit. p. 195 note.)

Hodgskin is of a different opinion from the romantic Müller: ‘The mint
stamps only what individuals bring, most injudiciously charging them
nothing for the labour of coining; and taxing the nation for the benefit
of those who deal in money.’ (p. 194. _Popular Polit. Econ._ etc.,
London, 1827.)

_How the machine creates raw material. Linen industry. Tow yarn._ Economist

After all these digressions about money – and we will occasionally have
to take them up again, before ending this chapter – we return to the
point of departure. As example of how, in manufacturing industry also,
the improvement of machinery and the consequent increase of the force of
production creates (relatively) _raw material,_ instead of demanding an
absolute increase of it: ‘The factory system in the linen trade is very
recent. Before 1828 the great mass of linen yarn in Ireland and England
spun by hand. About this time the flax spinning machine so much
improved, especially through the persistence of Mr Peter Fairbairn in
Leeds, that it came into very general use. From this time on, spinning
mills erected very intensively at Belfast and other parts of Northern
Ireland, as in different parts of Yorkshire, Lancashire and Scotland,
for spinning fine yarns, and in a few years, spinning by hand given up …
Fine tow yarn now manufactured from what, 20 years earlier, was thrown
away as waste.’ (_Economist,_ 31 Aug. 1850.)

Machinery and surplus labour

With all application of machinery – let us initially look at the case
such as it arises directly, that a capitalist puts a part of his capital
into machinery rather than into immediate labour – a part of the capital
is taken away from its variable and self-multiplying portion, i.e. that
which exchanges for living labour, so as to add it to the constant part,
whose value is merely reproduced or maintained in the product. But the
purpose of this is to make the remaining portion more productive. _First
case: the value of the machinery equal to the value of the labour
capacity it replaces._ In this case the newly produced value would be
diminished, not increased, if the surplus labour time of the remaining
part of labour capacity did not grow at the same rate as its amount is
diminished. If 50 out of 100 workers are let go and replaced by
machinery, then the remaining 50 have to accomplish as much surplus
labour time as the 100 did before. If the 100 worked 200 hours’ surplus
labour time every day out of 1,200 hours’ work, then the 50 must now
create the same quantity of surplus labour time; hence 4 hours per day,
if the former only 2. In that case the surplus labour time remains 50 ×
4 = 200, the same as before, 100 × 2 = 200, although the absolute labour
time has decreased. In this case, the situation for capital is the same;
it is concerned only with the production of surplus labour. In this
case, the raw material worked up would remain the same; hence the outlay
for it; that for instrument of labour would have increased; that for
labour decreased. The value of the total product would be the same,
because = to the same sum of objectified and surplus labour time. Such a
case would be altogether no incentive for capital. What it would gain in
surplus labour time on one side, it would lose on the part of capital
which would enter production as objectified labour, i.e. as invariable
value. It is also to be kept in mind that the machinery takes the place
of more imperfect instruments of production, which possessed a specific
value; i.e. had been exchanged for a definite sum of money. The part of
the capital employed at a developed stage of the productive force is
deducted from the cost of the machinery for the capitalist who sets up a
new business, although not for the capitalist who is already in
business.

Thus e.g. if, as soon as the machine is introduced for £1,200 (50 labour
capacities), an earlier expenditure of, say, 240 pounds for instruments
of production ceases to be necessary, then the additional expenditure of
capital amounts to only £960; the price of 40 workers a year. In this
case then, if the remaining 50 workers together produce exactly as much
surplus labour as did the 100 previously, then now 200 hours of surplus
labour are produced with a capital of £2,160; before, with a capital of
£2,400. The number of workers has decreased by half, absolute surplus
labour has remained the same, 200 hours of labour as before; the capital
invested in material of labour is also the same; but the relation of
surplus labour to the invariable part of the capital has increased
absolutely. Altogether £9,240. The relationship is this:

Since the capital laid out in raw material has remained the same, and
that laid out in machinery increased, but not in the same relation as
that laid out in labour diminished; it follows that the _total outlay of
capital diminished;_ surplus labour remained the same, hence grown
relative to the capital, not only at the rate at which surplus labour
time must grow to remain the same with half as many workers, but by more
than that; namely by the rate at which the [outlay] for the old means of
production is deducted from the costs of the new.

The introduction of machinery or a general increase in the force of
production has objectified labour as its substratum, hence costs
something; therefore, if a part of the capital previously laid out for
labour is laid out as a component part of the part of the capital which
enters into the production process as constant value, then the
introduction of machinery can take place only if the rate of surplus
labour time does not merely remain the same, i.e. grow relative to the
living labour employed, but if it grows at a greater rate than the
relation between the value of the machinery and the value of the
dismissed workers. This can happen either because the entire expenditure
incurred for the previous instrument of production must be deducted. In
this case the _total sum of the capital laid out diminishes,_ and,
although the relation of the total sum of employed labour relative to
the constant part of the capital has diminished, the surplus labour time
has remained the same, and has hence grown not only relative to the
capital laid out for labour, for necessary labour time, but also
relative to the total capital, to the total value of the capital,
because the latter has diminished. Or, the value for machinery may be as
great as that previously laid out for living labour, which has now
become superfluous; but the rate of surplus labour of the remaining
capital has increased so that the 50 workers supply not only as much
surplus labour as the 100 did before, but a greater amount. Say, e.g.
instead of 4 hours each, 4 1/4 hours. But in this case a greater part of
the capital is required for raw materials etc., in short, a greater
total capital is required. If a capitalist who previously employed 100
workers for £2,400 annually, lets 50 go, and puts a machine costing
£1,200 in their place, then this machine – although it costs him as much
as 50 workers did before – is the product of fewer workers, because he
pays the capitalist from whom he buys the machine not only the necessary
labour, but also the surplus labour. Or, if he had his own workers build
the machine, he would have used a part of them for necessary labour
only. In the case of machinery, thus, increase of surplus labour with
absolute decrease of necessary labour time. It may be accompanied both
by absolute diminution of the employed capital, and by its growth.

Capital and profit. _Value makes the product_. – Relation of the worker to the conditions of labour in _capitalist production. – All parts of capital bring a profit. – Relation of fixed and circulating capital in the cotton mill. Senior’s surplus labour and profit. Tendency of the machine to prolong labour. – Influence of transport on circulation etc. – Transport increasingly suspends hoarding. –_ Absolute surplus labour and machinery. Senior

_Surplus value,_ as posited by capital itself and measured by its
quantitative relation to the total value of the capital, is _profit._
Living labour, as appropriated and absorbed by capital, appears as
capital’s own vital power; its self-reproducing power, additionally
modified by its own movement, by circulation, and by the time belonging
to its own movement, circulation time. Only by distinguishing itself as
presupposed value from itself as posited value is capital posited as
self-perenniating and multiplying value. Since capital enters wholly
into production, and since, as capital, its various component parts are
only formally distinct from one another, are equally sums of value, it
follows that the positing of value appears to be equally inherent in
them. Furthermore, since the part of the capital which exchanges for
labour acts productively _only insofar as the other parts of capital are
posited together with it_ – and since the relation of this productivity
is conditioned by the magnitude of the value etc., the various relations
of these parts to one another (as fixed capital etc.) – it follows that
the positing of surplus value, of profit, appears to be determined by
all parts of capital equally. Because on one side the conditions of
labour are posited as objective component parts of the capital, on the
other side labour itself is posited as activity incorporated in it, the
entire labour process appears as capital’s own process and the positing
of surplus value as its own product, whose magnitude is therefore also
not measured by the surplus labour which it compels the worker to do,
but rather as a magnified productivity which it lends to labour. The
product proper of capital is profit. To that extent, it is now posited
as the source of wealth. But in so far as it creates use values, it
produces use values, but _use values determined by value:_ ‘Value makes
the product.’ (Say.) [60] Accordingly, it produces for consumption. In
so far as it eternalizes itself through the constant renewal of labour,
it appears as permanent value, a presupposition for production, which
latter depends on its preservation. To the extent that it constantly
exchanges itself anew for labour, it appears as labour fund. The worker
can naturally not produce without the objective conditions of labour.
Now, in capital, the latter are separated from him, confront him as
independent. He can relate to them as conditions of labour only in so
far as his labour itself has previously been appropriated by capital.
From the standpoint of capital, the objective conditions of labour do
not appear as necessary for the worker; what rather appears as necessary
is that _they exist independently opposite him – his separation from
them,_ _their ownership by the capitalist –_ and that the suspension of
this separation takes place only when he cedes his producing power to
capital, in exchange for which the latter maintains him as abstract
labour capacity, i.e. precisely as the mere capacity of reproducing
wealth opposite himself as capital, as the power which rules him.

Thus all parts of the capital bear profit simultaneously, both the
circulating part (laid out in wages and raw material etc.) and the part
laid out in fixed capital. The capital can now reproduce itself either
in the form of circulating capital or in the form of fixed capital.
Since we saw earlier, in the examination of circulation, that its value
returns in a different form depending on in which of these two forms it
is presupposed, and since, from the standpoint of profit-producing
capital, what returns is not simply the value, but rather the value of
the capital plus the profit, value as itself and value as
self-realizing, it follows that the capital will be posited as
profit-bearing in a different form corresponding to each of these two
forms. The circulating capital enters wholly into circulation, with its
use value as vehicle of its exchange value; and thus exchanges for
money. I.e. then, it is sold, entirely, although each time only a part
of it enters into circulation. In one turnover, however, it has entirely
gone over into consumption (whether this be merely individual, or in
turn productive) as product, and has completely reproduced itself as
value. This value includes the surplus value, which now appears as
profit. It is sold as use value, in order to be realized as exchange
value. This, then, is _sale at a profit._ On the other side, we have
seen that the fixed capital returns only in portions over the course of
several years, of several cycles of the circulating capital, and, more
specifically, enters into circulation as exchange value and returns as
such only to the degree that it is used up (at that time, in the
immediate act of production). However, the entry as well as the return
of the exchange value is now posited as the entry and return not only of
the value of the capital, but also at the same time of the profit, so
that a fractional part of profit corresponds to the fractional part of
capital.

‘The capitalist expects an equal benefit from all parts of the capital
he advances.’ (Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy,_ 2nd ed.
Lond., 1836, p. 267.)

‘Where Wealth and Value are perhaps the most nearly connected, is in the
necessity of the latter to the production of the former.’ (loc. cit. p.
301.)

 <‘The _fixed capital_’ (in the cotton factories) ‘usually = 1:4 to the
circulating, so that if a manufacturer has £50,000, he spends £40,000 in
erecting his mill and filling it with machinery, and only £10,000 in the
purchase of raw material (cotton, coals etc.) and the payment of wages.’
(Nassau W. Senior, _Letters on the Factory Act_ etc., 1837, p. 12.) ‘The
fixed capital is subject to incessant deterioration, not only through
wear and tear, but also through constant mechanical improvements …’
(loc. cit.) ‘Under present laws, no mill in which persons under 18 years
of age are employed can be worked more than 11 1/2 hours by day, i.e. 12
hours for 5 days and 9 on Saturday. Now, the following analysis shows
that, in a mill so worked, the whole _net profit_ is derived from the
_last hour._ Let a manufacturer invest £100,000 – 80,000 in his mill and
machinery, and 20,000 in raw material and wages. As to the annual return
of the mill, supposing the capital to be turned once a year, and gross
profits to be 15%, his goods must be worth £115,000, produced by the
constant conversion and reconversion of the £20,000 circulating capital,
from money into goods and from goods into money’ (in fact the conversion
and reconversion of surplus labour first into commodity and then again
into necessary labour etc.) ‘in periods of rather more than two months.
Of these £115,000, each of the 23 half hours of work produces 5/115th or
1/23rd. Of the 23/23, constituting the whole 115,000, 20/23, i.e.
£100,000 out of the 115,000, only replace the capital; 1/23 (or 5,000
out of the 115,000) makes up for deterioration of the mill and
machinery. The remaining 2/23, i.e. the last 2 of the 23 half hours of
every day, produce the net profit of 10%. If, therefore (prices
remaining the same), the factory could be kept at work for 13 hours
instead of 11 1/2, by an addition of about £2,600 to the circulating
capital, the net profit would be more than doubled.’ (I.e. 2,600 would
be worked up, without requiring relatively more fixed capital, and
without payment to _labour at all._ The gross and net profit is = to the
material which is worked up for the capitalist _free of charge,_ and
then of course one hour is = 100% more, if the surplus labour, as Mr
Shit [61] falsely presupposes, is only = 1/12 day or only 2/23, as
Senior says. ‘On the other side, if the daily hours of work were reduced
by 1 hour per day (prices remaining the same), _net_ profit would be
destroyed; if reduced by 1 1/2 hours, gross profit as well. The
circulating capital would be replaced, but there would be no fund to
compensate the progressive deterioration of the fixed capital.’ (12,
13.) (As false as Mr Senior’s data, so important his illustration for
our theory.) ‘The relation of fixed capital to circulating grows
constantly for two reasons: (1) the tendency of mechanical improvement
to throw on machinery more and more the work of production … (2) the
improvement of the means of transport and the consequent diminution of
the stock of raw material in the manufacturer’s hands waiting for use.
Formerly, when coals and cotton came by water, the incertainty and
irregularity of supply forced him to keep on hand 2 or 3 months’
consumption. Now, a railway brings it to him week by week, or rather day
by day, from the port or the mine. Under such circumstances, I fully
anticipate that, in a very few years, the fixed capital, instead of its
present proportion, will be as 6 or 7 or even 10 to 1 to the
circulating; and, _consequently, that the motives to long hours of work
will become greater, as the only means by which a large proportion of
fixed capital can be made profitable._ “When a labourer”, said Mr
Ashworth to me, “lays down his spade, he renders useless, for that
period, a capital worth 18d. When one of our people leaves the mill, he
renders useless a capital that has cost £100.”’ (13, 14.)> <This a very
nice proof that, under the rule of capital, the application of machinery
does not shorten labour; but rather prolongs it. What it abbreviates is
necessary labour, not the labour necessary for the capitalist. Since
fixed capital becomes devalued to the extent it is not used in
production, its growth is linked with the tendency to make labour
_perpetual._ As for the other point raised by Senior, the diminution of
the circulating capital relative to the fixed capital would be as great
as he assumes if prices remained constant. But if e.g. cotton, on the
average, has fallen below its average price, then the manufacturer will
purchase as great a supply as his floating capital permits, and vice
versa. With coal, however, where production regular and no special
circumstances give grounds for anticipating an extraordinary rise in
demand, Senior’s remark correct. We have seen that transport (and hence
means of communication) do not determine circulation, in so far as they
concern bringing the product to market or its transformation into
commodity. For in this respect they are themselves included as part of
the production phase. But they determine circulation in so far as they
determine (1) the return; (2) the retransformation of the capital from
the money form into that of the conditions of production. The more rapid
and uninterrupted the supply of material and _matières instrumentales,_
the smaller a supply does the capitalist need to buy. He can therefore
all the more often turn over or reproduce the same circulating capital
in this form, instead of having it lie around as dormant capital. On the
other side, as Sismondi already noted, this also has the effect that the
retail merchant, the shopkeeper, can all the more rapidly restore his
stock, thus also has less need to keep commodities in stock, because he
can renew the supply at any instant. All this shows how with the
development of production there is a relative decline of accumulation in
the sense of hoarding; increases only in the form of fixed capital,
while however continuous simultaneous labour (production) increases in
regularity, in intensity, and in scope. The speed of the means of
transport, together with their all-sidedness, increasingly transforms
(with the exception of agriculture) the necessity of antecedent labour,
as far as circulating capital is concerned, into that of simultaneous,
mutually dependent, differentiated production. This observation
important for the section on accumulation.> _‘Our cotton factories, at
their commencement, were kept going the whole_ 24 _hours._ The
difficulty of cleaning and repairing the machinery, and the divided
responsibility, arising from the necessity of employing a double staff
of overlookers, book-keepers etc. have nearly put an end to this
practice, but until Hobhouse’s Act reduced them to 69, our factories
generally worked from 70 to 80 hours per week.’ (p. 15, loc cit.)

_Cotton factories in England. Workers. Example for machinery and surplus labour._ – Example from Symons. [62] _Glasgow. Power-loom factory etc._ (These examples for the rate of profit.) – Different ways in which machinery _diminishes necessary labour. Gaskell. – Labour the immediate market for capital_

‘According to Baines a first-rate cotton-spinning factory cannot be
built, filled with machinery, and fitted with steam engines and gas
works, under £100,000. A steam-engine of 100 horse-power will turn
50,000 spindles, which will produce 62,500 miles of fine cotton thread
per day. In such a factory 1,000 persons will spin as much thread as
250,000 persons could without machinery.’ (p. 75. S. Laing, _National
Distress etc.,_ London, 1844.)

 ‘When _profits fall,_ circulating capital is disposed to become to some
extent _fixed capital._ When interest 5%, capital not used in making new
roads, canals or railways, until these works yield a corresponding large
percentage; but when interest only 4 or 3%, capital would be advanced
for such improvements, if it obtained but a proportional lower
percentage. _Joint-stock companies,_ to accomplish great improvements,
are the natural offspring of a falling rate of profit. It also induces
individuals to _fix_ their capital in the form of buildings and
machinery.’ (p. 232. Hopkins (Th.), _Great Britain for the last 40
Years_ etc., London, 1834.) ‘McCulloch thus estimates the numbers and
incomes of those engaged in the cotton manufacture:

  ------------------------------------------ -------------
  833,000 weavers, spinners, blackers etc.   £20,000,000
  at £24 each a year                         

  111,000 joiners, engineers, machine         £3,330,000
  makers etc. at £30 each                    

  Profits, superintendence, coal and          £6,670,000
  materials of machines                      

      944,000                                £30,000,000
  ------------------------------------------ -------------

‘Of the 6 2/3 millions, 2 millions are supposed to go for coal, iron and
other materials, for machinery and other outgoings, which would give
employment at £30 a year each, to 666,666, making a total population
employed of 1,010,666; add to these 1/2 the number of children, aged
etc., dependent on those who work, or an additional 505,330; so a total,
supported on wages, of 1,515,996 persons. Added to these, those who are
supported, directly or indirectly, by the 4 2/3 millions of profit etc.’
(Hopkins loc. cit. 336, 337.) According to this calculation, then,
833,000 directly engaged in production; 176,666 in the production of the
machinery and the _matières instrumentales_ which are required only
because of the employment of machinery. The latter are reckoned,
however, at £30 per head; thus, so as to resolve their labour into
labour of the same quality as that of the 833,000, this must be
calculated at £24 per head; thereby, £5,333,000 would give about 222,208
workers; this would give about 1 occupied in the production of machinery
and _matières instrumentales_ per 3 3/4 occupied in the production of
the cotton fabric. Less than 1 to 4, but say 1 to 4. Now, if the 4
remaining workers worked only as much as 5 did earlier, thus each of
them 1/4 more surplus labour time, then no profit for capital. The
remaining 4 have to supply more surplus labour than the 5 did before; or
the number of workers employed for machinery must be smaller than the
number of workers displaced by the machinery. Machinery profitable for
capital only in relation as it increases the surplus labour time of the
workers employed in machinery (not in so far as it reduces it; only in
so far as it reduces the relation of surplus labour time to necessary,
so that the latter has not only relatively declined, while the number of
simultaneous working days has remained the same, but has diminished
absolutely).

The increase of absolute labour time supposes the same or an increasing
number of simultaneous working days; ditto the increase of the force of
production by division of labour etc. In both cases the aggregate labour
time remains the same or grows. With the employment of machinery,
relative surplus labour time grows not only relative to necessary labour
time and hence correlative with aggregate labour time; but rather the
relation to necessary labour time grows while aggregate labour
diminishes, i.e. the number of simultaneous working days diminishes
(relative to surplus labour time).

A Glasgow manufacturer gave Symons (J.C.), author of _Arts and Artisans
at Home and Abroad,_ Edinb., 1839, the following pieces of information
(we cite several of them here in order to have examples for the relation
of fixed capital, circulating, the part of the capital laid out in
wages, etc.):

  ---------------------------------------------------------------------- ----------
  _Glasgow:_ ‘Expense of _erecting a power-loom factory_ of 500 looms,   £18,000
  calculated to weave a good fabric of calico, or shirting, such as is   
  generally made in Glasgow, would be about                              

  Annual produce, say 150,000 pieces of 24                               £45,000
  yards, at 6s.                                                          

  Which cost as under:                                                    

  Interest on sunk capital, and for depreciation                         1,800
  of value of machinery                                                  

  Steam power, oil, tallow, etc. keeping up                              2,000
  machinery, utensils, etc.                                              

  Yarns and flax                                                         32,000

  Wages to workmen                                                       7,500

  Suppose profit                                                         1,700

                                                                         £45,000’

                                                                         (p. 233)
  ---------------------------------------------------------------------- ----------

Thus if we take 5% interest on machinery, then the gross profit 1,700 +
900 = 2,600. The capital laid out in wages amounts, however, to only
7,500. Thus profit relates to wages = 26:75 = 5 1/5:15, hence = 34 2/3%.

  ---------------------------------------------------------- ----------
  ‘Probable expense of erecting a [spinning] _cotton-mill_   £23,000
  with hand mules, calculated to produce No. 40              
  of [a] fair average quality                                

  If patent self-actors, £2,000 additional.                  25,000
  Produce annually to the present prices of cottons          
  and the rates at which yarns could be sold                 

  Cost of which as follows:                                  2,300
  Interest of sunk capital, allowance for depreciation       
  of value of the machinery by 10%                           

  Cotton                                                     14,000

  Steam power, oil, tallow, gas, and general expense         1,800
  of keeping up utensils and machinery in repair             

  Wages to workers                                           5,400

  Profit                                                     1,500

                                                             £25,000’

                                                             (p. 234)
  ---------------------------------------------------------- ----------

(Thus assuming floating capital of £7,000, since 1,500 5% on 30,000.)

‘The produce of the mill taken at 10,000 lb. weekly.’ (234 loc. cit.)
Here, then, profit = 1,150 + 1,500 = 2,650:5,400 (wages) = 1:2 2/53, =
49 8/108%.

  -------------------------------------------------------- ----------
  ‘Cost of a _cotton spinning mill of 10,000 throstles_,   £20,000
  calculated to produce a fair quality of No. 24           

  Taking present value of produce, the amount              £23,000
  would annually be costing                                

  Interest on sunk capital, depreciation of value          2,000
  of machinery at 10%                                      

  Cotton                                                   13,300

  Steam power, tallow, oil, gas, keeping machinery         2,500
  in repair etc.                                           

  Wages to workers                                         3,800

  Profit                                                   1,400

                                                           £23,000’

                                                           (p. 235)
  -------------------------------------------------------- ----------

Hence gross profit = 2,400; wages 3,800; 2,400:3,800 = 24:38 = 12:19 =
63 3/19%.

In the first case 34 2/3%; in the second 49 8/108% and in the last 63
3/19%.

In the first case, wages 1/6 of the total price of the product; in the
second more than 1/4; in the last, more than 1/6. But in the first case
wages related to the value of the capital as = 1:4 8/15; in the second
case = 1:5 15/27; in the third = 1:7 2/19. At the same rate as the total
ratio of the part of the capital laid out in wages declines relative to
the part laid out in machinery and circulating capital (this, together,
34,000 in the first case; 30,000 in the second; 28,000 in the third),
the profit on the part laid out in wages must naturally rise, to allow
the percentage of profit to remain the same.

The absolute decrease of aggregate labour, i.e. of the working day
multiplied by the number of simultaneous working days, can appear
doubly. In the first-cited form, that one part of the hitherto employed
workers is dismissed in consequence of the use of fixed capital
(machinery). Or, that the introduction of machinery will diminish the
_increase_ of the working days employed, even though productivity grows
and, indeed, at a greater rate (of course) than it diminishes in
consequence of the _‘value’_ of the newly introduced machinery. In so
far as the fixed capital has _value,_ it does not magnify, but rather
diminishes the productivity of labour. ‘The surplus hands would enable
the manufacturers to lessen the rate of wages; but the certainty that
any considerable reduction would be followed by immediate immense losses
from turnouts, extended stoppages, and various other impediments which
would be thrown in their way, makes them prefer the slower process of
mechanical improvement, by which, though they may triple production,
they require no new men.’ (Gaskell, _Artisans and Machinery,_ London,
1836.) (p. 314.) ‘When the improvements not quite displace the workmen,
they will render one man capable of producing, or rather superintending,
the production of quantity now requiring ten or twenty labourers.’ (315,
loc. cit.) ‘Machines have been invented which enable 1 man to produce as
much yarn as 250, or 300 even, could have produced 70 years ago: which
enable 1 man and 1 boy to print as many goods as a 100 men and a 100
boys could have printed formerly. The 150,000 workmen in the spinning
mills produce as much yarn as 40 millions with the one-thread wheel
could have produced.’ (316, loc. cit.)

_‘The immediate market for capital, or field for capital, may be said to
be labour._ The amount of capital which can be invested at a given
moment, in a given country, or the world, so as to return not less than
a given rate of profits, seems principally to depend on the quantity of
labour, which it is possible, by laying out that capital, to induce the
then existing number of human beings to perform.’ (p. 20. _An Inquiry
into those Principles respecting the Nature of Demand_ etc., London,
1821.) (By a Ricardian against Malthus’s _Principles_ etc.)

_Alienation of the conditions of labour with the development of capital. (Inversion.) The inversion is the foundation of the capitalist mode of production, not only of its distribution._

The fact that in the development of the productive powers of labour the
objective conditions of labour, objectified labour, must grow relative
to living labour – this is actually a tautological statement, for what
else does growing productive power of labour mean than that less
immediate labour is required to create a greater product, and that
therefore social wealth expresses itself more and more in the conditions
of labour created by labour itself? – this fact appears from the
standpoint of capital not in such a way that one of the moments of
social activity – objective labour – becomes the ever more powerful body
of the other moment, of subjective, living labour, but rather – and this
is important for wage labour – that the objective conditions of labour
assume an ever more colossal independence, represented by its very
extent, opposite living labour, and that social wealth confronts labour
in more powerful portions as an alien and dominant power. The emphasis
comes to be placed not on the state of being _objectified,_ but on the
state of being _alienated,_ dispossessed, sold [Der Ton wird gelegt
nicht auf das _Vergegenständlichtsein,_ sondern das _Entfremdet-,_
Entäussert-, Veräussertsein]; on the condition that the monstrous
objective power which social labour itself erected opposite itself as
one of its moments belongs not to the worker, but to the personified
conditions of production, i.e. to capital. To the extent that, from the
standpoint of capital and wage labour, the creation of the objective
body of activity happens in antithesis to the immediate labour capacity
– that this process of objectification in fact appears as a process of
dispossession from the standpoint of labour or as appropriation of alien
labour from the standpoint of capital – to that extent, this twisting
and inversion [_Verdrehung und Verkehrung_] is a _real_ [_phenomenon_],
not a merely _supposed one_ existing merely in the imagination of the
workers and the capitalists. But obviously this process of inversion is
a merely _historical_ necessity, a necessity for the development of the
forces of production solely from a specific historic point of departure,
or basis, but in no way an _absolute_ necessity of production; rather, a
vanishing one, and the result and the inherent purpose of this process
is to suspend this basis itself, together with this form of the process.
The bourgeois economists are so much cooped up within the notions
belonging to a specific historic stage of social development that the
necessity of the _objectification_ of the powers of social labour
appears to them as inseparable from the necessity of their _alienation
vis-à-vis_ living labour. But with the suspension of the _immediate_
character of living labour, as merely _individual,_ or as general merely
internally or merely externally, with the positing of the activity of
individuals as immediately general or _social_ activity, the objective
moments of production are stripped of this form of alienation; they are
thereby posited as property, as the organic social body within which the
individuals reproduce themselves as individuals, but as social
individuals. The conditions which allow them to exist in this way in the
reproduction of their life, in their productive life’s process, have
been posited only by the historic economic process itself; both the
objective and the subjective conditions, which are only the two distinct
forms of the same conditions.

The worker’s propertylessness, and the ownership of living labour by
objectified labour, or the appropriation of alien labour by capital –
both merely expressions of the same relation from opposite poles – are
fundamental conditions of the bourgeois mode of production, in no way
accidents irrelevant to it. These modes of distribution are the
relations of production themselves, but _sub specie distributionis._ It
is therefore highly absurd when e.g. J. St. Mill says _(Principles of
Political Economy,_ 2nd ed., London, 1849, Vol. I, p. 240): ‘The laws
and conditions of the production of wealth partake of the character of
physical truths … It is not so with the distribution of wealth. That is
a matter of human institutions solely.’ (p. 239, 240.) The ‘laws and
conditions’ of the production of wealth and the laws of the
‘distribution of wealth’ are the same laws under different forms, and
both change, undergo the same historic process; are as such only moments
of a historic process.

It requires no great penetration to grasp that, where e.g. free labour
or wage labour arising out of the dissolution of bondage is the point of
departure, there machines can only _arise_ in antithesis to living
labour, as property alien to it, and as power hostile to it; i.e. that
they must confront it as capital. But it is just as easy to perceive
that machines will not cease to be agencies of social production when
they become e.g. property of the associated workers. In the first case,
however, their distribution, i.e. that they _do not belong_ to the
worker, is just as much a condition of the mode of production founded on
wage labour. In the second case the changed distribution would start
from a _changed_ foundation of production, a new foundation first
created by the process of history.

Merivale. _Natural dependence of the worker in colonies to be replaced by_ artificial _restrictions_

Gold, in the figurative language of the Peruvians, ‘the tears wept by
the sun’. (Prescott.) ‘Without the use of the tools or the machinery
familiar to the European, each individual’ (in Peru) ‘could have done
but little; but acting in large masses and under a common direction,
they were enabled by indefatigable perseverance to achieve results etc.’
(loc. cit.) [63]

<The money prevalent among the Mexicans (more with barter and oriental
landed property), ‘a regulated currency of different values. This
consisted of transparent quills of gold dust; of bits of tin, cut in the
form of a T; and of bags of cocoa, containing a specified number of
grains. “_O felicem monetam_”, says Peter Martyr (_de Orbe novo_),
“_quae suavem utilemque praebet humano generi potum, et a tartarea peste
avaritiae suos immunes servat possessores, quod suffodi aut diu servari
nequeat_”.’ (Prescott.) [64] ‘Eschwege (1823) estimates the total value
of the diamond workings in 80 years at a sum hardly exceeding 18 months’
produce of sugar or coffee in Brazil.’ (Merivale.) [65] ‘The first’
(British) ‘settlers’ (in North America) ‘cultivated the cleared ground
about their villages in common … this custom prevails until 1619 in
Virginia’ etc. (Merivale, Vol. I. p. 91.) (Notebook, p. 52.) (‘In 1593
the Cortes made the following representation to Philip II: “The Cortes
of Valladolid of the year ’48 begged Your Majesty to cease to permit the
entry into the kingdom of candles, mirrors, jewellery, knives and
similar things from the exterior, these articles, so useless to human
life, being exchanged _for gold, as if Spaniards were Indians”.’_
(Sempéré.)) [66]

‘In densely peopled colonies the labourer, although free, is naturally
dependent on the capitalist; in thinly peopled ones the want of this
natural dependence must be supplied by artificial restrictions.’
(Merivale, 314, Vol. II. _Lectures on Colonization_ etc., London, 1841,
1842.)>

_How the machine etc. saves material._ [67] Bread. Dureau de la Malle

_Roman money: aes grave_ pound copper _(emere per aes et libram)._ This
the _as._ * 485 A.U.C., _deniers d’argent =_ 10 _as_ (these _denarii_ 40
per pound: in 510, 75 _deniers_ per pound; each _denarius_ still = 10
_as,_ but 10 _as_ of 4 ounces each). In 513, the _as_ reduced to 2
ounces; the denarius still = 10 _as,_ but only 1/84 of the pound of
silver. The latter figure, 1/84, held firm until the end of the
Republic, but in 537 the denier was 16 _as_ to the ounce, and in 665
only 16 _as_ the half ounce … The silver _denarius anno_ 485 of the
Republic = 1 franc 63; 510 = 87 _centimes;_ 513 – 707 = 78 _centimes._
From Galba to the Antonines, 1 franc. (Dureau de la Malle, Vol. 1.) At
the time of the first silver _denarius,_ 1 pound silver to 1 pound
copper = 400:1. Beginning of the second Punic war = 112:1. (loc. cit.,
Vol. I, pp. 82–4.) ‘The Greek colonies in the south of Italy drew the
silver from which they had fabricated coins since the sixth and fifth
century B.C. from Greece and Asia, directly or by way of Tyre and
Carthage. Despite this proximity, for political reasons the Romans
prohibited the use of gold and silver. The People and the Senate felt
that so _easy a medium of circulation_ would lead to _concentration,_ to
decay of the old mores and of agriculture.’ (loc. cit. p. 64, 65.)
‘According to Varro, the slave an _instrumentum vocale,_ the animal
_instrumentum semi-mutum,_ the plough _instrumentum mutum.’_ (loc. cit.
p. 253, 254.) (A Roman city-dweller’s daily consumption somewhat more
than 2 French _livres;_ of a countryman, more than 3 _livres._ A
Parisian eats 0.93 of bread; a countryman in the 20 departments where
wheat the chief staple, 1.70. (loc. cit.) In Italy (today) 1 lb. 8
ounces, where wheat the main food. Why did the Romans eat relatively
more? Originally they ate wheat raw or just softened in water;
afterwards they decided to roast it … Later they discovered the art of
milling, and at first the paste made with this flour was eaten raw. To
mill the grain, they used a pestle, or two stones beaten and turned
against one another … The Roman soldier prepared a several days’ supply
of this raw paste, _puls._ Then they invented the winnowing-basket, to
clean the grain, and a means was found to separate the bran from the
flour; finally they added yeast, and at first they ate the bread raw,
until an accident taught them that, by cooking it, one could prevent it
from going sour and one could store it much longer. Only after the war
against Perseus, 580, did Rome have bakers. (p. 279 loc. cit.) ‘In
pre-Christian times, the Romans were unacquainted with windmills.’ (280
loc. cit.)) ‘Parmentier has demonstrated that the art of milling has
made great progress in France since Louis XIV, and that the difference
between the old and the new millage amounts to 1/2 the bread supplied by
the same grain. At first 4, then 3, then 2, then finally 1 1/3 _setiers_
of wheat were allotted for the annual consumption of an inhabitant of
Paris … Thus the enormous disproportion between the daily consumption of
wheat among the Romans and among us is easily explained by the
imperfections of the processes of milling and baking.’ (p. 281 loc.
cit.) ‘The agrarian law was a limitation of landed property among active
citizens. The limitation of property formed the foundation of the
existence and prosperity of the old republics.’ (loc. cit. p. 256, 257.)
‘The state’s revenue consisted of the estates, of contributions in kind,
of forced labour, and of some taxes in silver payable at the entry and
exit of merchandise, or levied on the sale of certain goods. This mode …
still exists almost without change in the Ottoman Empire … At the time
of Sulla’s dictatorship and even at the end of the seventh century
A.U.C., the Roman Republic took in only 40 million francs annually,
_anno_ 697 … In 1780, the revenue of the Turkish Sultan, in coined
piastres, only 35,000,000 piastres or 70 million francs … The Romans and
the Turks levied the bulk of their revenue in kind. Among the Romans …
1/10 of the grain, 1/5 of the fruit, among the Turks, varying from 1/2
to 1/10 of the product … Since the Roman Empire was only an immense
agglomeration of independent municipalities, the greater part of the
costs and expenditures remained communal.’ (pp. 402–7.) (The Rome of
Augustus and Nero, without the suburbs, only 266,684 inhabitants.
Assumes that in the fourth century of the Christian era the suburbs had
120,000 inhabitants, the Aurelian belt 382,695, altogether 502,695,
30,000 soldiers, 30,000 aliens; altogether 562,000 heads, in round
numbers. _Madrid,_ during a period of 1 1/2 centuries after Charles V,
capital of a part of Europe and of half the new world, many resemblances
to Rome. Its population also did not grow in proportion to its political
importance. (405, 406, loc. cit.)) ‘The social condition of the Romans
at the time resembled much more that of Russia or of the Ottoman Empire
than that of France or of England: little commerce or industry; immense
fortunes side by side with extreme misery.’ (p. 214, loc. cit.) (Luxury
only in the capital and in the residences of the Roman satraps.) ‘From
the destruction of Carthage to the foundation of Constantinople, Roman
Italy had existed in the same condition, _vis-à-vis_ Greece and the
Orient, as was Spain during the eighteenth century _vis-à-vis_ the rest
of Europe. Alberoni said: “Spain is to Europe what the mouth is to the
body: everything enters, nothing stays”.’ (loc. cit. p. 385 seq.)

* _as_ or _libra =_ 12 ounces; 1 ounce = 24 _scrupula;_ 288 _scrupula_
per pound.

Usury originally unrestricted in Rome. The law of the 12 tables (303
A.U.C.) had fixed the interest on money at 1% per year (Niebuhr says
10). [68] These laws promptly violated. Duilius (398 A.U.C.) again
reduced the interest on money to 1%, _unciario faenore._ [69] Reduced to
1/2% in 408; in 413, lending at interest was absolutely forbidden by a
plebiscite engineered by the tribune, Genucius. It is not surprising
that, in a republic where industry, where commerce either wholesale or
retail were prohibited to citizens, there was also a prohibition against
_commerce in money._ (p. 260, 261 Vol. II, loc. cit.) This situation
lasted 3 years, until the capture of Carthage. 12%, then: 6% the average
annual rate of interest. (261 loc. cit.) Justinian fixed interest at 4%;
… _usura quincunx_ [70] under Trajan the legal interest is 5%.
Commercial interest in Egypt, 146 years B.C., was 12%. (loc. cit. p.
263.)

The involuntary alienation of feudal landed property develops with usury
and with money: ‘The introduction of money which buys all things, and
hence the advantage for the creditor, who lends money to the land owner,
brings in the necessity of legal alienation for the advance.’ (124. John
Dalrymple, _An Essay towards a General History of Feudal Property in
Great Britain,_ 4th ed., Lond., 1759.)

_In medieval Europe:_ ‘Payments in gold customary with only a few
articles of commerce, mostly with precious goods. Most prevalent outside
the mercantile sphere, with gifts by the great, certain high
obligations, heavy fines, purchase of landed estates. _Unminted_ gold
was not infrequently measured to suit in pounds or marks (half pounds) …
8 ounces = 1 mark; one [ounce] hence = 2 pennyweight or 3 carats. Of
_minted gold_ until the Crusades, familiar only with the Byzantine
_solidus,_ the Italian _Tari_ and the Arabian _maurabotini_’ (afterwards
_maravedi_). (Hüllmann, _Städtewesen des Mittelalters,_ 1st Part, Bonn,
1826.) (p. 402–4.) ‘In Frankish laws, the _solidus_ also as _mere money
of account,_ in which the value of agricultural products to be paid as
fines was expressed. E.g. among the Saxons, a _solidus_ a yearling ox in
usual autumn condition … In Ripuarian law, a healthy cow represented one
_solidus …_ 12 _denars =_ 1 gold _solidus_.’ (405, 406.) 4 _Tari =_ 1
Byzantine _solidus …_ Since the thirteenth century, various gold coins
minted in Europe. _Augustales_ (of the emperor _Frederick II_ in Sicily:
Brundisium and Messina); _florentini_ or _floreni_ (Florence 1252); …
_ducats_ or _zecchini_ (Venice since 1285). (409–11, loc. cit.) ‘Larger
gold coins minted also in Hungary, Germany and the Netherlands since the
fourteenth century; in Germany, were simply called _Gulden_.’ (loc. cit.
413.) ‘_With payments in silver,_ the prevailing custom in all larger
payments was weighing, usually in marks … Even minted silver weighed for
such payments, since the coin still of almost wholly pure silver, hence
weight the only question. Hence the name _pound (livre, lire) *_ and
mark, partly the name of imaginary or accounting coins, partly passed
over to real silver coins. _Silver coins: denari_ or _kreuzer …_ In
Germany these denari were called _Pfennige_ (Penig, Penning, Phennig) …
since as early as the ninth century. Originally Pending, Penthing,
Pfentini … from pfündig, in the old form pfünding … the same as
full-weighted: hence pfündige denari, abbreviated pfündinge … Another
name for the denari, from the beginning of the twelfth century in
France, Germany, Netherlands, England, from the star pictured on them in
place of the cross: _sternlinge, sterlinge,_ _starlinge …_ Denari
sterlings = pfennig sterlings … In the fourteenth century, 320 of the
Netherlands sterlings made a pound, 20 to the ounce … _In the earlier
Middle Ages, silver solidi not real coins, but rather inclusive name for
12 denari_ … 1 gold solidus = 12 sterling denari, for this was the
median relation of gold and silver … Oboli, half pfennigs, having
circulated as _small change …_ With the increasing spread of petty
trade, more and more of the small commercial cities and petty princes
obtained the right to strike their own local coin, thus for the most
part small change. Alloyed it with copper, in increasing proportions …
Thick pennies, gros deniers, grossi, groschen, groten, first minted in
Tours before the middle of the thirteenth century. These groschen
originally double pfennigs.’ (415–33.)

* _Notabene_: In Mexico we found money but no weights; in Peru weights
but no money.

‘The ecclesiastical assessments levied by the popes on nearly all
Catholic countries contributed in no small measure, firstly, to the
development of the entire money system in commercially active Europe,
and then, as a consequence, to the rise of a variety of efforts to
circumvent the ecclesiastical prohibition (of interest). The pope made
use of the Lombards in the collection of official dues and other
obligations from the archbishoprics. These, the chief usurers and
pawnbrokers, under papal protection. Already generally known since the
middle of the twelfth century. Especially from Siena. “Public
_usurarii_.” In England they called themselves “Roman Pontifical
Money-Dealers”. Some bishops in Basle and elsewhere pawned the episcopal
ring, silken robes, all the ecclesiastical vessels at low rates with
Jews, and paid interest. But bishops, abbots, priests themselves also
practised usury with the church vessels by lending them for a share of
the gain to Tuscan money dealers from Florence, Siena and other cities.’
etc. (see loc. cit. Notebook, p. 39.) [71]

Because money is the _general equivalent, the general power of
purchasing,_ everything can be bought, everything may be transformed
into money. But it can be transformed into money only by being alienated
[_alieniert_], by its owner divesting himself of it. Everything is
therefore alienable, or indifferent for the individual, external to him.
Thus the so-called _inalienable, eternal_ possessions, and the
immovable, solid property relations corresponding to them, break down in
the face of money. Furthermore, since money itself exists only in
circulation, and exchanges in turn for articles of consumption etc. –
for values which may all ultimately be reduced to purely individual
pleasures, it follows that everything is valuable only in so far as it
exists for the individual. With that, the independent value of things,
except in so far as it consists in their mere being for others, in their
relativity, exchangeability, the absolute value of all things and
relations, is dissolved. Everything sacrificed to egotistic pleasure.
For, just as everything is alienable for money, everything is also
obtainable by money. Everything is to be had for ‘hard cash’, which, as
itself something existing external to the individual, is to be catched
[sic] by fraud, violence etc. Thus everything is appropriable by
everyone, and it depends on chance what the individual can appropriate
and what not, since it depends on the money in his possession. With
that, the individual is posited, as such, as lord of all things. There
are no absolute values, since, for money, value as such is relative.
There is nothing inalienable, since everything alienable for money.
There is no higher or holier, since everything appropriable by money.
The _‘res sacrae’_ and _‘religiosae’,_ which may be _‘in nullius bonis’,
‘nec aestimationem recipere, nec obligari alienarique posse’,_ which are
exempt from the ‘_commercio hominum’,_ [72] do not exist for money –
just as all men are equal before God. Beautiful that the Roman church in
the Middle Ages itself the chief propagandist of money.

‘Since the ecclesiastical law against usury had long lost all
significance, in 1425 Martin formally annulled it.’ (Hüllmann, part II,
loc. cit. Bonn, 1827, p. 55.) ‘No country in the Middle Ages a general
rate of interest. Firstly, the priests strict. Uncertainty of the
juridical arrangements for securing the loan. Accordingly higher rates
in individual cases. The small circulation of money, the necessity to
make most payments in cash, since the brokerage business still
undeveloped. Hence great variety of views about interest and concepts of
usury. In Charlemagne’s time it was considered usurious only when 100%
was taken. At Lindau on Lake Constance, in 1344, local citizens took 216
2/3%. In Zurich the Council fixed the legal interest at 43 1/3% … In
Italy, 40% had to be paid during some periods, although from the twelfth
to the fourteenth century the usual rate does not exceed 20% … Frederick
II in his decree … 10%, but this only for Jews. He did not wish to speak
for the Christians … 10% was already usual in the thirteenth century in
the Rhineland of Germany.’ (55–7 loc. cit.)

Productive consumption. Newman. – Transformations of capital. Economic cycle. (_Newman_)

_‘Productive consumption,_ where the consumption of a commodity is _a
part of the process of production.’_ (Newman etc. Notebook XVII, 10.)
[73] ‘It will be noticed, that in these instances _there is no
consumption of value,_ the same value existing under a new form.’ (loc.
cit.) ‘Further _consumption …_ the appropriation of individual revenue
to its different uses.’ (p. 297.) (loc. cit.)

_‘To sell for money_ shall at all times be made so easy as it is now _to
buy with money,_ and production would become the uniform and never
failing cause of demand.’ (John Gray, _The Social System_ etc.,
Edinburgh, 1831.) (p. 16.) ‘After land, capital, labour, the fourth
necessary condition of production is: _instant power of exchanging.’_
(loc. cit. 18.) ‘To be able to _exchange_ is’ for the man in society ‘as
important as it was to Robinson Crusoe to be able to _produce.’_ (loc.
cit. 21.)

‘According to Say, credit only transfers capital, but does not create
any. This true only in the one case of a loan to an industrialist by a
capitalist … but not of credit between producers in their mutual
advances. What one producer advances to another is not capital; it is
products, commodities. These products, these commodities, can and
undoubtedly will become active capital in the hands of the borrower,
i.e. instruments of labour, but at the time they are nothing but
products for sale in the hands of their owner, and everywhere inactive …
One must distinguish … between product and commodity … and instrument of
labour and productive capital … As long as a product remains in the
hands of its producer, it is only a commodity, or, if you like,
inactive, inert capital. Far from being of benefit for the industrialist
who holds it, it is a burden for him, a ceaseless cause of trouble, of
_faux frais_ and of losses: storage costs, maintenance costs, protection
costs, interest on capital etc., without counting the waste and spoiling
which nearly all commodities suffer when they are inactive for long …
Thus, if he sells this, his commodity, on credit, to another
industrialist who can use the commodities for the kind of work for which
they are fit, then, from having been inert commodities, they have
become, for the latter, active capital. In this case, therefore, there
will be an increase of productive capital on one side without any
diminution on the other. Even more: if one takes note that the seller,
while furnishing his commodity on credit, has received in exchange a
bill which he has the right to negotiate on the spot, is it not clear
that by that very fact he too has obtained the means to renew his raw
materials and his instruments of labour so as to begin work again? Thus
there is here a double growth of productive capital, in other words, a
power acquired on both sides.’ (Charles Coquelin, ‘Du Crédit et des
Banques dans l’Industrie’, _Revue des deux mondes,_ Vol. 31, 1842, p.
799 _seq.) ‘_Let the whole mass of commodities for sale pass rapidly
from the state of inert product into that of active capital, without
delays and obstacles: the country will be filled with so much new
activity! … this rapid transformation is precisely the advantage which
credit allows to be realized … This is the _activity of circulation …_
Thus credit may increase the industrialists’ business tenfold … In a
given period of time, the dealer or producer renews his materials and
his products ten times instead of once … Credit brings this about by
increasing everyone’s purchasing power. Instead of reserving this power
to those who presently have the ability to pay, it gives it to all those
people … whose position and whose morality provide the guarantee of a
future payment; it gives it to any person who is capable of utilizing
these products through labour … Hence the first benefit of credit is to
increase, if not the sum of values a country possesses, yet at least the
sum of active values. This is the immediate effect. Flowing out of it …
is the increase of the productive powers, hence also of the sum of
values etc.’ (loc. cit.)

_Letting_ is a conditional sale, or sale of the use of a thing for a
limited time. (Corbet, Th., _‘An Inquiry into the Causes and Modes of
the Wealth of Individuals’_ etc., Lond., 1841, p. 81.)

‘Transformations to which capital is subjected in the work of
production. Capital, to become productive, must be consumed.’ (p. 80. S.
P. Newman, _Elements of Political Economy,_ Andover and New York, 1835.)
_‘Economic cycle …_ the whole course of production, from the time that
outlays are made, till returns are received. In agriculture, seed time
is its commencement, and harvesting its ending’. (81). _The basis of the
difference between fixed and circulating_ capital is that during every
economic cycle, a part is partially, and another part totally consumed.
(loc. cit.) _Capital as directed to different employments._ (loc. cit.)
Belongs in the doctrine of competition. _‘A Medium of Exchange:_ In
undeveloped nations, whatever commodity constitutes the larger share of
the wealth of the community, or from any cause becomes more frequently
than others an object of exchange, is wont to be used as a circulating
medium. So cattle a medium of exchange among pastoral tribes, dried fish
in Newfoundland, sugar in the West Indies, tobacco in Virginia.
_Precious metals …_ advantage … : (a) sameness of quality in all parts
of the world … (b) admit of minute division and exact apportionment; (c)
rarity and difficulty of attainment, (d) they admit of coinage.’ (100
loc. cit.)

Dr Price. _Innate power of capital_

The notion of capital as a self-reproducing being – as a value
perenniating and increasing by virtue of an innate quality – has led to
the marvellous inventions of Dr Price, which leaves the fantasies of the
alchemists far behind, and which Pitt earnestly believed and made into
the pillars of his financial sagacity in his sinking fund laws (see
Lauderdale). [74] The following, a few striking excerpts from the man:

‘Money bearing compound interest increases at first slowly. But, the
rate of increase being continually accelerated, it becomes in some time
so rapid, as to mock all the powers of the imagination. One penny, put
out at our Saviour’s birth to 5% compound interest, would, before this
time, have increased to a greater sum than would be obtained in a 150
millions of Earths, all solid gold. But if put out to simple interest,
it would, in the same time, have amounted to no more than 7 shillings 4
1/2d. Our government has hitherto chosen to improve money in the _last,_
rather than the first of these ways.’ (18, 19. Price, Richard, _An
Appeal to the Public on the Subject of the National Debt,_ London, 1772,
2nd ed.) (His secret: the government should borrow at simple interest,
and lend out the borrowed money at compound interest.) In his
_Observations on Reversionary Payments_ etc., London, 1772, he flies
even higher: ‘A shilling put out to 6% compound interest at our
Saviour’s birth would … have increased to a greater sum than the whole
solar system could hold, supposing it a sphere equal in diameter to the
diameter of Saturn’s orbit.’ (loc. cit. XIII, note.) ‘A state need
never, therefore, be under any difficulties; for, with the _smallest_
savings, it may, in as little time as its interest can require, pay off
the largest debts.’ (p. xiv.) The good Price was simply dazzled by the
enormous quantities resulting from geometrical progression of numbers.
Since he regards capital as a self-acting thing, without any regard to
the conditions of reproduction of labour, as a mere self-increasing
number, he was able to believe that he had found the laws of its growth
in that formula (see below). Pitt, 1792, in a speech where he proposed
to increase the sum devoted to the sinking fund, takes Dr Price’s
mystification quite seriously. (_S = C_ (1 + _i_)^(_n_).)

McCulloch, in his _Dictionary of Commerce,_ 1847, cites, as properties
of metallic money: ‘The material must be: (1) divisible into the
smallest portions; (2) capable of being stored for an indefinite period
without deterioration; (3) easily transportable from place to place
owing to great value in small bulk; (4) a piece of money, of a certain
denomination, always equal in size and quality to every other piece of
the same denomination; (5) its value comparatively steady.’ (581.) [75]

Proudhon. Capital and simple exchange. Surplus. – _Necessity of workers’ propertylessness. Townsend. Galiani. – The_ infinito _in process._ Galiani

In the whole polemic by Mr Proudhon against Bastiat in _Gratuité du
crédit. Discussion entre M. Fr. Bastiat et M. Proudhon,_ Paris, 1850,
Proudhon’s argument revolves around the fact that lending appears as
something quite different to him from selling. To lend at interest ‘is
the ability of selling the same object again and again, and always
receiving its price anew, without ever giving up ownership of what one
sells’. (9, in the first letter [to] Chevé, one of the editors of _La
Voix du Peuple._) [76] The different form in which the reproduction of
capital appears here deceives him into thinking that this constant
reproduction of the capital – whose price is always obtained back again,
and which is always exchanged anew for labour at a profit, a profit
which is realized again and again in purchase and sale – constitutes its
concept. What leads him astray is that the ‘object’ does not change
owners, as with purchase and sale; thus basically only the form of
capital lent at interest with the form of reproduction peculiar to fixed
capital. With house rent, about which Chevé speaks, it is directly the
form of fixed capital. If the circulating capital is regarded in its
whole process, then it may be seen that, although _the same object_
(this specific pound of sugar, e.g.) is not always sold anew, the same
value does always reproduce itself anew, and the sale concerns only the
form, not the substance. People who are capable of making such
objections are obviously still unclear about the first elementary
concepts of political economy. Proudhon grasps neither how profit, nor,
therefore, how interest, arises from the laws of the exchange of values.
‘House’, money etc. should therefore not be exchanged as ‘capital’, but
rather as ‘commodity … at cost price’. (44.) (The good fellow does not
understand that the whole point is that value is exchanged for labour,
according to the law of values; that, hence, to abolish interest, he
would have to abolish _capital_ itself, the mode of production founded
on exchange value, hence wage labour as well. Mr Proudhon’s inability to
find even one difference between loan and sale: ‘In effect, the hatter
who sells hats … obtains their value in return, neither more nor less.
But the lending capitalist … not only gets back the whole of his
capital; he receives more than the capital, more than he brings into the
exchange; he receives an interest above the capital.’ (69.) Thus Mr
Proudhon’s hatters reckon neither profit nor interest as part of their
cost price. He does not grasp that, precisely by receiving the _value_
of their hats, they obtain more than these cost them, because a part of
this value is appropriated in the exchange, without equivalent, with
labour. Here also his great thesis mentioned above: ‘Since in commerce,
the interest on capital is added to the worker’s wages to make up the
price of the commodity, it is impossible for the worker to buy back what
he has himself produced. To live by working is a principle which, under
the reign of interest, implies a contradiction.’ (105.) In letter IX (p.
144–52), the good Proudhon confuses money as medium of circulation with
capital, and therefore concludes that the ‘capital’ existing in France
bears 160% (namely 1,600 millions annual interest in the state debt,
mortgage etc. for a capital of a thousand millions, … the sum of
currency … circulating in France). How little he understands about
capital in general and its continual reproduction [is shown by] the
following, which he imputes as specific to money-capital, i.e. to money
lent out as capital: ‘Since, with the accumulation of interest,
money-capital, exchange after exchange, always comes back to its source,
it follows that this re-lending, always done by the same hand, always
profits the same person.’ (154.) _‘All labour must leave a surplus.’_
(Everything ought to be _sold,_ nothing _lent._ This the simple secret.
Inability to see how the exchange of commodities rests on the exchange
between capital and labour, and profit and interest in the latter.
Proudhon wants to cling to the simplest, most abstract form of
exchange.)

The following pretty demonstration by Mr Proudhon: ‘Since value is
nothing more than a proportion, and since all products are necessarily
proportional to one another, it follows that from the social viewpoint
products are always values and produced values: for society, the
difference between capital and product does not exist. This difference
is entirely subjective to individuals.’ (250.)

The antithetical nature of capital, and the necessity for it of the
propertyless worker, is naïvely expressed in some earlier English
economists, e.g. the Reverend Mr J. Townsend, [77] the father of
population theory, by the fraudulent appropriation of which Malthus (a
shameless plagiarist generally; thus e.g. his theory of rent is borrowed
from the farmer, Anderson) made himself into a great man. Townsend says:
‘It seems to be a _law of nature_ that the poor should be to a certain
degree improvident, that there may be always some to fulfil the most
servile, the most sordid, and the most ignoble offices in the community.
The stock of human happiness is thereby much increased. The more
delicate ones are thereby freed from drudgery, and can pursue higher
callings etc. undisturbed.’ (A _Dissertation on the Poor-laws,_ edition
of 1817, p. 39.) ‘Legal constraint to labour is attended with too much
trouble, violence, and noise, creates ill will etc., whereas hunger is
not only a peaceable, silent, unremitted pressure, but, as the most
natural motive to industry and labour, it calls forth the most powerful
exertions.’ (15.) (This the answer to what labour is in fact more
productive, the slave’s or the free worker’s. A. Smith could not raise
the question, since the mode of production of capital presupposes free
labour. On the other side, the developed relation of capital and labour
confirms A. Smith in his distinction between productive and unproductive
labours. Lord Brougham’s stale jokes against it, and the objections,
supposed to be serious, by Say, Storch, MacCulloch and _tutti quanti_ do
not make any impact on it. A. Smith misses the mark only by somewhat too
crudely conceiving the objectification of labour as labour which fixates
itself in a tangible [_handgreiflich_] object. But this is a secondary
thing with him, a clumsiness in expression.)

With Galiani, too, the workmen are supplied by a law of nature. Galiani
published the book in 1750. ‘God makes sure that the men who exercise
occupations of primary utility are born in abundant numbers.’ (78.
_Della Moneta,_ Vol. III, Scrittori Classici Italiani di Economia
Politica. Parte Moderna. Milano, 1803.) But he already has the correct
concept of value: ‘It is only toil which gives value to things.’ (74.)
Of course, labour is distinct qualitatively as well, not only in so far
as it [is performed] in different branches of production, but also more
or less intensive etc. The way in which the equalization of these
differences takes place, and all labour is reduced to unskilled simple
labour, cannot of course be examined yet at this point. Suffice it that
this reduction is in fact _accomplished_ with the positing of products
of all kinds of labour as values. As values, they are equivalents in
certain proportions; the higher kinds of labour are themselves appraised
in simple labour. This becomes clear at once if one considers that e.g.
Californian gold is a product of simple labour. Nevertheless, every sort
of labour is paid with it. Hence the qualitative difference is
suspended, and the product of a higher sort of labour is in fact reduced
to an amount of simple labour. Hence these computations of the different
qualities of labour are completely a matter of indifference here, and do
not violate the principle. ‘Metals … are used for money because they are
valuable, … they are not valuable because they are used for money.’
(loc. cit. 95.) ‘It is the velocity of circulation of money, and not the
quantity of metal, which makes more or less money appear.’ (99.) ‘Money
is of two kinds, _ideal and real;_ and is adapted to two uses, to
_evaluate_ things and to _purchase_ them. Ideal money is as good as,
sometimes better than, real money for evaluating things … the other use
of money is to buy those things to which its value may be equal … prices
and contracts are valued in ideal money and executed in real.’ (p. 112
seq.) _‘The metals have the peculiar and singular quality that in them
alone all relations reduce themselves to one only, which is their
quantity; nature did not endow them with a varying quality either in
their internal constitution or in their external form and shape.’_ (126,
127.) This is very important observation. Value supposes a common
substance, and all differences, proportions etc. reduced to merely
quantitative ones. This the case with precious metals, which thus appear
as the natural substance of value. ‘Money … like a law which reduces all
things to their necessary proportions is that which articulates all
things in a single voice: _price.’_ (152.) ‘Only this same ideal money
is _of account,_ which is to say, all things are stipulated, contracted
and evaluated in it; which came about for the same reason that the
moneys which are ideal today are the most ancient moneys of a nation,
and all of them were once real, and, because they were real, they were
used in accounting.’ (152.) (This also the formal clarification of
Urquhart’s ideal money etc. For the blacks etc. the iron bar was
originally real money, then changed into ideal; but they tried at the
same time to hold onto its previous value. Now, since the value of iron,
as becomes apparent to them in commerce, fluctuates relative to gold
etc., therefore the ideal bar, so as to preserve its original value,
expresses varying proportions of real amounts of iron, a laborious
calculation which does honour to these gentlemen’s power of
abstraction.) (In the debates caused by the Bullion Committee 1810,
Castlereagh advanced similar confused notions.) A beautiful statement by
Galiani: ‘The infinity which’ (things) ‘lack in progression, they find
in circulation.’ (156.)

About use value, Galiani nicely says: ‘Price is a relation … the price
of things is their proportion relative to our need, which has as yet no
fixed measure. But this will be found. I myself believe it to be _man
himself.’_ ([159,] 162.) ‘Spain, during the same period when it was the
greatest as well as the richest power, counted in reales and in the
tiniest maravedis.’ (172, 173.) ‘It is, rather, he’ (man) ‘who is the
sole and true wealth.’ (188.) _‘Wealth is a relation between two
persons.’_ (221.) ‘When the price of a thing, or rather its proportion
relative to others, changes proportionately to all of them, it is a
clear sign that it is its value alone, and not that of all the others,
which has changed.’ (154.) (The costs of preserving the capital, of
repairing it, also have to be taken into account.)

‘The _positive limitation of quantity in paper_ money would accomplish
the only useful purpose that cost of production does in the other.’
(Opdyke.) [78] The merely quantitative difference in the material of
money: ‘Money is returned _in kind only’_ (with loans); ‘which fact
distinguishes this agent from all other machinery … indicates the nature
of its service … clearly proves the singleness of its office.’ (267.)
‘With money in possession, we have but one exchange to make in order to
secure the object of desire, while with other surplus products we have
two, the first of which (securing the money) is infinitely more
difficult than the second.’ (287, 288.)

_‘Banker …_ differs from the old _usurer …_ that he lends to the rich
and seldom or never to the poor. Hence he lends with less risk, and can
afford to do it on cheaper terms; and for both reasons, he avoids the
popular odium which attended the usurer.’ (44.) (Newman, F. W.,
_Lectures on Political Economy,_ London, 1851.)

Advances. _Storch._ – Theory of savings. _Storch._ – MacCulloch. _Surplus. – Profit._ – Periodical destruction of capital. _Fullarton._ – Arnd. _Natural interest_

Everyone hides and buries his money quite secretly and deeply, but
especially the _Gentiles,_ who are the almost exclusive masters of
commerce and of money, and who are infatuated with this belief that the
gold and silver they hide during their lifetime will be of use to them
after death. (314.) (François Bernier, Vol. I, _Voyages contenant la
description des états du Grand Mogol_ etc., Paris, 1830.)

Matter in its natural state … is always _without value …_ Only through
labour does it obtain exchange value, become element of wealth.
(MacCulloch, _Discours sur l’origine de l’économie politique_ etc.
transl. by Prévost. Geneva and Paris, 1825. p. 57.)

Commodities in exchange are each other’s _measure._ (Storch. _Cours
d’Économie Politique_ avec des notes etc. par J. B. Say, Paris, 1823,
Vol. I, p. 81.) ‘In the trade between Russia and China, silver is used
to evaluate all commodities; nevertheless, this commerce is carried on
by barter.’ (p. 88.) ‘Just as labour is not the _source …_ of wealth, so
is it not its _measure.’_ (p. 123 loc. cit.) ‘Smith … let himself be
misled into the opinion that the same cause which made material things
_exist_ was also the source and the measure of value.’ (p. 124.)
‘Interest the price one pays for the use of a capital.’ (p. 336.)
Currency must have a direct value, but be founded on an artificial need.
Its material must not be indispensable for human existence; because the
whole amount of it which is used for currency cannot be used
individually, and must always circulate. (Vol. II, p. 113, 114.) ‘Money
takes the place of anything.’ (p. 133.) T.V. [79] _Considérations sur la
nature du revenu national,_ Paris, 1824: ‘Reproductive consumption is
not properly an expense, but only an _advance,_ because it is reimbursed
to him who makes it.’ (p. 54.) ‘Is there not a manifest contradiction in
this proposition that a people grows wealthy by its savings, or its
_privations,_ that is to say, by voluntarily condemning itself to
poverty?’ (p. 176.) ‘At the time when hides and pelts served as money in
Russia, the inconvenience involved in circulating so voluminous and
perishable a currency gave rise to the idea of replacing them by small
pieces of stamped leather, which thereby became symbols payable in hides
and pelts … They kept up this usage until 1700’ (namely, later, of
representing the fractions of silver kopecks), ‘at least in the city of
Kaluga and its environs, until Peter I’ (1700) ‘ordered them to be
turned in and exchanged for small copper coins.’ (Vol. IV, p. 79.)

An indication of the marvels of compound interest is already found in
the great seventeenth-century champion of the fight against usury: in
Jos. Child. _Traités sur le commerce_ etc. trad. de l’anglois (English
publication 1669, Amsterdam and Berlin, 1754.) (pp. 115–17.)

‘In point of fact a commodity will always exchange for more labour than
has produced it; _and it is this excess that constitutes profits.’_ (p.
221. McCulloch, _The Principles of Political Economy,_ London, 1830.)
Shows how well Mr McCulloch has understood the Ricardian principle. He
distinguishes between _exchange value_ and _real value;_ the former (1)
quantity of labour expended in its appropriation or production; (2) the
second, _buying power_ of certain quantities of labour of the other
commodities. (p. 211.) Man is as much the _produce of labour_ as any
[of] the machines constructed by his agency; and it appears to us that
in all economical investigations he ought to be considered in precisely
the same point of view. (115 loc. cit.) Wages … really consist of a part
of the produce of the industry of the labourer. (p. 295.) The profits of
capital are only another name for the wages of accumulated labour. (p.
291.)

‘A periodical destruction of capital has become a necessary condition of
any market rate of interest at all, and, considered in that point of
view, these awful visitations, to which we are accustomed to look
forward with so much disquiet and apprehension and which we are so
anxious to avert, may be nothing more than the natural and necessary
corrective of an overgrown and bloated opulence, the _vis medicatrix_ by
which our social system, as at present constituted, is enabled to
relieve itself from time to time of an ever-recurring plethora which
menaces its existence, and to regain a sound and wholesome state.’ (p.
165. Fullarton (John): _On the Regulation of Currency_ etc. Lond.,
1844.)

Money – _General Power of Purchasing._ (Chalmers.) [80]

_‘Capital …_ services and commodities used in production. _Money:_ the
measure of value, the medium of exchange, and the universal equivalent;
more practically: the _means of obtaining capital; the only means of
paying for capital_ previously obtained for credit; virtually – security
for obtaining its equivalent value in capital: _Commerce_ is the
exchange of capital for capital through the medium of money, and the
contract being for the medium, money alone can satisfy the contract and
discharge the debt. In selling, one kind of capital is disposed for
money for obtaining its equivalent value in any kind of capital.
_Interest –_ the consideration given for the loan of money. If the money
is borrowed for the purpose of _procuring capital,_ then the
consideration given is a remuneration for the use of capital (raw
materials, labour, merchandise etc.), which it obtains. If borrowed for
the purpose of discharging a debt, for paying for capital previously
obtained and used (contracted to be paid for in money), then the
consideration given is for the use of money itself, and in this respect
interest and discount are similar. _Discount_ solely the remuneration
for money itself, for converting credit money into real money. A good
bill gives the same command over capital as bank notes, minus the charge
for discount; and bills are discounted for the purpose of obtaining
money of a more convenient denomination for wages and small cash
payments, or to meet larger engagements falling due; and also for the
advantage to be gained when ready money can be had by discounting at a
lower rate than 5%, the usual allowance made for cash. The main object,
however, in discounting depends fundamentally upon the supply and demand
of legal tender money … The rate of interest depends mainly on the
demand and supply of capital, and the rate of discount entirely on the
supply and demand of money.’ (13 March ’58, _Economist,_ letter to the
editor.)

Mr K. Arnd, quite in his proper place where he reasons about the ‘dog
tax’, [81] has made the following interesting discovery:

‘In the natural course of the production of goods, there is only _one_
phenomenon, which – in wholly settled and cultivated countries – seems
destined to regulate the rate of interest to some extent; – this is the
rate at which the amount of timber in the European forests increases
with their annual new growth – this growth proceeds, quite independently
of its exchange value, at the rate of 3 to 4 per cent.’ (p. 124, 125.
_Die naturgemässe Volkswirtschaft_ etc., Hanau, 1845.) This deserves to
be called the forest-primeval [_waldursprüngliche_] rate of interest.

 

Interest and profit. – Carey. _Pawning in England_

‘The remaining value or overplus will in each trade be in proportion to
the value of the capital employed.’ (Ricardo.) [82]

In regard to _interest,_ two things are to be examined: _Firstly,_ the
division of _profit_ into interest and profit. (As the unity of both of
these the English call it _gross profit_.) The difference becomes
perceptible, tangible as soon as a class of monied capitalists comes to
confront a class of industrial capitalists. _Secondly: Capital_ itself
becomes a commodity, or the commodity (money) is sold as capital. Thus
it is said e.g. that capital, like any other commodity, varies in price
according to demand and supply. These then determine the rate of
interest. Thus here capital as such enters into circulation.

Monied capitalists and industrial capitalists can form two particular
classes only because profit is capable of separating off into two
branches of revenue. The two kinds of capitalists only express this
fact; but the split has to be there, the separation of profit into two
particular forms of revenue, for two particular classes of capitalists
to be able to grow up on it.

The form of interest is older than that of profit. The level of interest
in India for communal agriculturists in no way indicates the level of
profit. But rather that profit as well as part of wages itself is
appropriated in the form of interest by the usurer. It requires a sense
of history like that of Mr Carey to compare this interest with that
prevailing on the English money market, which the English capitalist
pays, and to conclude therefrom how much higher the ‘labour share’ (the
share of labour in the product) is in England than in India. He ought to
have compared the interest which English handloom-weavers, e.g. in
Derbyshire, pay, whose material and instrument is advanced (lent) by the
capitalist. He would have found that the interest is here so high that,
after settlement of all items, the worker ends up being the debtor,
after not only having made restitution of the capitalist’s advance, but
also having added his own labour to it free of charge. Historically, the
form of industrial profit arises only after capital no longer appears
alongside the independent worker. Profit thus appears originally
determined by interest. But in the bourgeois economy, interest
determined by profit, and only one of the latter’s parts. Hence profit
must be large enough to allow of a part of it branching off as interest.
Historically, the inverse. Interest must have become so depressed that a
part of the surplus gain could achieve independence as profit. There is
a natural relation between wages and profit – necessary labour and
surplus labour; but is there any between profit and interest, same [as]
that which is determined by the competition between these two classes
arranged under these different forms of revenues? But in order that this
competition exist, the [existence of the] two classes, the division of
the surplus value into profits and interest, is already presupposed. To
examine capital in general is not a mere abstraction. If I regard the
total capital of e.g. a nation as distinct from total wage labour (or,
as distinct from landed property), or if I regard capital as the general
economic basis of a class as distinct from another class, then I regard
it in general. Just as if I regard man e.g. as physiologically distinct
from the animals. The real difference between profit and interest exists
as the difference between a moneyed class of capitalists and an
industrial class of capitalists. But in order that two such classes may
come to confront one another, their double existence presupposes a
divergence within the surplus value posited by capital.

(Political economy has to do with the specific social forms of wealth or
rather of the production of wealth. The material of wealth, whether
subjective, like labour, or objective, like objects for the satisfaction
of natural or historical needs, initially appears as common to all
epochs of production. This material therefore appears initially as mere
presupposition, lying quite outside the scope of political economy, and
falls within its purview only when it is modified by the formal
relations, or appears as modifying them. What it is customary to say
about this in general terms is restricted to abstractions which had a
historic value in the first tentative steps of political economy, when
the forms still had to be laboriously peeled out of the material, and
were, at the cost of great effort, fixed upon as a proper object of
study. Later, they become leathery commonplaces, the more nauseating,
the more they parade their scientific pretensions. This holds for
everything which the German economists are in the habit of rattling off
under the category ‘goods’.)

The important thing is that both interest and profit express relations
of _capital._ As a particular form, interest-bearing capital stands
opposite, not labour, but rather opposite profit-bearing capital. The
relation in which on one side the worker still appears as independent,
i.e. not as wage labourer, but on the other side his objective
conditions already possess an independent existence alongside him,
forming the property of a particular class of usurers, this relation
necessarily develops in all modes of production resting more or less on
exchange – with the development of merchant wealth or money wealth in
antithesis to the particular and restricted forms of agricultural or
handicraft wealth. The development of this mercantile wealth may itself
be regarded as the development of exchange value and hence of
circulation and of money relations in the former spheres. Of course,
this relation shows us, on one side, the growing independence, the
unbinding of the conditions of labour – which more and more come out of
circulation and depend on it – from the worker’s economic being. On the
other side, the latter is not yet subsumed into the process of capital.
The mode of production therefore does not yet undergo essential change.
Where this relation repeats itself within the bourgeois economy, it does
so in the backward branches of industry, or in such branches as still
struggle against their extinction and absorption into the modern mode of
production. The most odious exploitation of labour still takes place in
them, without the relation of capital and labour here carrying within
itself any basis whatever for the development of new forces of
production, and the germ of newer historic forms. In the mode of
production itself, capital still here appears materially subsumed under
the individual workers or the family of workers – whether in a
handicraft business or in small-scale agriculture. What takes place is
exploitation by capital without the mode of production of capital. The
rate of interest appears very high, because it includes profit and even
a part of wages. This form of usury, in which capital does not seize
possession of production, hence is capital only formally, presupposes
the predominance of pre-bourgeois forms of production; but reproduces
itself again in subordinate spheres within the bourgeois economy itself.

Second historic form of interest: Lending of capital to wealth which is
engaged in consumption. Appears historically important here as itself a
moment in the original rise of capital, in that the income (and often
the land, too) of the landed proprietors accumulates and becomes
capitalized in the pockets of the usurer. This is one of the processes
by which circulating capital or capital in the form of money comes to be
concentrated in a class independent of the landed proprietors.

The form of realized capital as well as of its realized surplus value is
money. Profit (not only interest) thus expresses itself in money;
because in that value is realized and measured.

The necessity of payments in money – not only of money for the purchase
of commodities etc. – develops wherever exchange relations and money
circulation take place. It is by no means necessary that exchange should
be simultaneous. With money, the possibility is present that one party
cedes his commodity and the other makes his payment only later. The need
for money for this purpose (later developed in loans and discounts) a
chief historic source of interest. This source does not concern us at
all yet at this point; is to be looked at only along with credit
relations.

Difference between _buying_ (M–C) and _selling_ (C–M): ‘when I sell, I
have (1) added the profit to the commodity and obtained it; (2) an
article universally representative or convertible, money, for which,
money being always saleable, I can always command every other commodity;
the superior saleableness of money being the exact effect or natural
consequence of the less saleableness of commodities … With buying,
different. If he buys to sell again or supply customers, whatever may be
the probability, there is no absolute certainty of his selling at a
remunerative price … But not all buy so as to sell again, but rather for
their own use or consumption’ etc. (p. 117 seq. Corbet, Th. _An Inquiry
into the Causes and Modes of the Wealth of Individuals,_ London, 1841.)

_Economist,_ 10 April [1858]: ‘A parliamentary return moved for by Mr
James Wilson, shows that the mint coined in 1857 gold to the value of
£4,859,000, of which £364,000 was in half sovereigns. The silver coinage
of the year amounted to £373,000, the cost of the metal used being
£363,000 … The total amount coined in the ten years ending the 31st of
December, 1857, was £55,239,000 in gold, and 2,434,000 in silver … The
copper coinage last year amounted in value to £6,720 – the value of the
copper being £3,492; of this 3,163 was in pence, 2,464 in half-pence,
and 1,120 in farthings … The total value of the copper coinage of the
last ten years was £141,477, the copper of which it was composed being
purchased for £73,503.’

‘According to Thomas Culpeper (1641), Josiah Child (1670), Paterson
(1694), Locke (1700), wealth depends on the self-enforced reduction of
the interest rate of gold and silver. Accepted in England during nearly
two centuries.’ (Ganilh.) [83] When Hume, in antithesis to Locke,
developed the determination of the interest rate by the rate of profit,
he already had before his eyes a far greater development of capital;
even more so Bentham when, towards the end of the eighteenth century, he
wrote his defence of usury. (From Henry VIII to Anne, statutory
reduction of interest.)

‘In every country: (1) a producing class and (2) a monied class, which
lives from the interest on its capital.’ (p. 110.) (J. St. Mill, _Some
Unsettled Questions of Political Economy,_ London, 1844.)

‘It is by frequent fluctuation in a month, and by pawning one article to
relieve another, where a small sum is obtained, that the premium for
money becomes so excessive. 240 licensed pawn-brokers in London and
about 1450 in the country … The capital employed is estimated at about 1
million. Turned over at least three times annually … Each time on the
average for 33 1/3% profit; so that the inferior orders of England pay 1
million annually for a temporary loan of one million, exclusive of what
they lose by goods being forfeited.’ (p. 114.) (Vol. I. J. D. Tuckett,
_A History of the Past and Present State of the Labouring Population_
etc., London, 1846.)

_How merchant takes the place of master_

‘Some works cannot be operated on other than a large scale, e.g.
porcelain making, glass making etc. Hence are never handicrafts. Already
in the thirteenth and fourteenth centuries, some works, like weaving,
were carried on on a large scale.’ (Poppe, p. 32.)

‘In earlier times all factories belonged to the crafts, and the
_merchant_ remained merely the distributor and promoter of the
handicrafts. This was still most strictly observed in the manufacture of
cloth and textiles. But, by and by, in many localities the merchants
began to set themselves up as masters’ (of course without the old
masters’ guild prejudices, traditions, relations to the journeymen),
‘and to take journeymen into their employ for day-wages.’ (Poppe. p. 92,
Vol. 1. _Geschichte der Technologie,_ Göttingen, 1807–11.) This was a
chief reason why, in England, industry proper struck root and arose in
non-incorporated cities.

Merchant wealth

Mercantile capital, or money as it presents itself as merchant wealth,
is the first form of capital, i.e. of value which comes exclusively from
circulation (from exchange), maintains, reproduces and increases itself
within it, and thus the exclusive aim of this movement and activity is
exchange value. There are two movements, to buy so as to sell, and to
sell so as to buy; but the form M–C–C–M predominates. Money and its
increase appear as the exclusive purpose of the operation. The merchant
neither buys the commodity for his own needs, for the sake of its use
value, nor does he sell it so as to e.g. pay off contracts written in
money, or so as to obtain another commodity for his own needs. His
direct aim is increase of value, and namely in its direct form as money.
Mercantile wealth is, firstly, money as medium of exchange; money as the
mediating movement of circulation; it exchanges commodity for money,
money for commodity and vice versa. Money likewise appears here as an
end-in-itself, but without therefore existing in its metallic existence.
It is here the living transformation of value into the two forms of
commodity and money: the indifference of value towards the particular
form of use value which it assumes, and at the same time its
metamorphosis into all of these forms, which appear, however, merely as
disguises. Thus, while the action of commerce concentrates the movements
of circulation, hence money as merchant wealth is in one respect the
first existence of capital, still appears as such historically, this
form appears on the other side as directly contradictory to the _concept
of value._ To buy cheap and sell dear is the law of trade. _Hence not
the exchange of equivalents, with which trade, rather, would be
impossible as a particular way of gaining wealth._

Nevertheless, money as trading wealth – as it appears in the most
various forms of society and at the most various stages of the
development of the forces of social production – is merely the mediating
movement between two extremes, which it does not dominate, and
presuppositions which it does not create.

A. Smith, Vol. II (ed. Garnier): ‘The great _trade_ of every civilized
society is that which is established between the inhabitants of the town
and those of the countryside … it consists in the _exchange of the raw
product_ for the _manufactured product …_ either directly, or by the
intervention of money.’ (p. 403.) Trade always concentrates; production
originally on a small scale. ‘The town is a continual fair or
marketplace where the inhabitants of the countryside go to exchange
their raw product for manufactured products. It is this trade which
supplies the inhabitants of the town both with the material of their
labour and with the means of their subsistence. The quantity of
_manufactured goods_ which they sell to the inhabitants of the
countryside necessarily determines the quantity of materials and
subsistence they buy.’ (p. 408 [409].)

So long as ‘means of subsistence and of pleasure’ the chief aim, use
value predominates.

It is part of the concept of value that it maintains itself and
increases only through exchange. But the existing value, initially,
money.

‘This industry, whose aim was something beyond absolute necessity,
established itself in the towns long before it could be commonly
practised by the cultivators of the countryside.’ (p. 452.)

‘Although the inhabitants of a town ultimately draw their subsistence
and all the means and materials of their industry from the countryside,
yet those of a town lying near the shores of the sea or of a navigable
river may draw them also from the farthest corners of the world, either
in exchange for the manufactured product of their own industry, or by
performing the service of carriers alternately between distant countries
and exchanging the products of these countries among them. Thus a city
may become very wealthy, while not only the land in its immediate
environs, but also all lands where it trades, are poor. Each of these
countries, taken separately, can offer it only a very small part of
subsistence and for business; but all of these countries, taken
collectively, can supply it with a great quantity of subsistence and a
great variety of employment.’ (p. [452,] 453.) (Italian cities were the
first in Europe to rise by trade; during the crusades – Venice, Genoa,
Pisa – partly by the transport of people and always by that of the
supplies which had to be delivered to them. These republics were, in a
manner of speaking, the supply commissaries of these armies.) (loc.
cit.)

Merchant wealth, as constantly engaged in exchange and exchanging for
the sake of exchange value, is in fact living money.

‘The inhabitants of mercantile towns imported refined objects and luxury
articles from wealthier countries at a high price, thus furnishing new
food for the vanity of the great landed proprietors, who bought them
with alacrity, by paying great quantities of the raw produce of their
estates for them. Thus the commerce of a great part of Europe at this
time consisted in exchange of the raw produce of one country for the
manufactured produce of a country more advanced in industry.’ (p. [454,]
455.) ‘When this taste had become sufficiently general to create a
considerable demand, the merchants sought, so as to save the costs of
transport, to establish similar manufactures in their own country. This
the origin of the first manufactures for distant markets.’ Luxury
manufactures, arisen out of foreign commerce, established by merchants
(p. [456–] 458) (worked up foreign materials). Ad. Smith speaks of a
second sort, which ‘arose naturally and by itself through successive
refinement of the crude and domestic employments’. Worked up home-grown
materials. (p. 459.)

The trading peoples of antiquity like the gods of Epicurus in the spaces
between the worlds, or rather like the Jews in the pores of Polish
society. Most of the independent trading peoples or cities attained the
magnificent development of their independence through the _carrying
trade,_ which rested on the barbarity of the producing peoples, between
whom they played the role of money (the mediators).

In the preliminary stages of bourgeois society, trade dominates
industry; in modern society, the opposite.

Trade will naturally react back to varying degrees upon the communities
between which it is carried on. It will subjugate production more and
more to exchange value; push direct use value more and more into the
background; in that it makes subsistence more dependent on the sale than
on the immediate use of the product. Dissolves the old relations.
Thereby increases money circulation. First seizes hold of the overflow
of production; little by little lays hands on the latter itself.
However, the dissolving effect depends very much on the nature of the
producing communities between which it operates. For example, hardly
shook the old Indian communities and Asiatic relations generally. Fraud
in exchange is the basis of trade such as it appears independently.

But capital arises only where trade has seized possession of production
itself, and where the merchant becomes producer, or the producer mere
merchant. Opposed to this, the medieval guild system, the caste system
etc. But the rise of capital in its adequate form presupposes it as
commercial capital, so that production is no longer for use, more or
less mediated by money, but for wholesale trade.

Commercial wealth as an independent economic form and as the foundation
of commercial cities and commercial peoples exists and has existed
between peoples on the most diverse stages of economic development, and
within the commercial city itself (e.g. the old Asian, the Greek, and
the Italian etc. of the Middle Ages) production can continue on in the
form of guilds etc.

Steuart. ‘Trade is an operation, by which the wealth, or work, either of
individuals, or of societies, may be exchanged by a set of men called
merchants, for an equivalent, proper for supplying every want, without
any interruption to industry, or any check to consumption. _Industry_ is
the application to ingenious labour in a free man, in order to procure,
by the _means of trade,_ an equivalent, fit for supplying every want.’
(Vol. I, p. 166.)

‘While wants continue simple and few, a workman finds time enough to
distribute all his work; when wants become more multiplied, men must
work harder; _time becomes precious;_ hence trade is introduced … The
merchant as mediator between workmen and consumers.’ (p. 171.)

The collection (of products) into a few hands is the introduction of
trade. (loc. cit.) The consumer does not buy so as to sell again. If the
merchant buys and sells solely with a view to a gain (p. 174) (i.e. for
value). ‘The simplest of all trades is that which is executed by
_bartering of the most necessary means of subsistence’_ (between the
surplus food of the farmers and the free hands). ‘Progress chiefly to be
ascribed to the introduction of money.’ (p. 176.) As long as mutual
needs are supplied by barter, there is not the least occasion for money.
This the simplest combination. When needs have multiplied, bartering
becomes more difficult: upon this, _money_ is introduced. This is the
common price of all things. A proper equivalent in the hands of those
who want. This operation of buying and selling is somewhat more complex
than the first. Thus (1) _barter;_ (2) _sale;_ (3) _commerce._ The
merchant must intervene. What was earlier called wants is now
represented by the consumer; industry by the manufacturer, money by the
merchant. The merchant represents money by substituting credit in its
place; and as money invented for the facilitation of barter, so the
merchant, with credit, a new refinement upon the use of money. This
operation of buying and selling is now trade; it relieves both parts of
the whole trouble of transportation and adjusting wants to needs, or
wants to money; the merchant represents by turns the consumer, the
manufacturer, and money. Towards the consumer he represents the totality
of manufacturers, to the latter the totality of consumers, and to both
classes his credit supplies the use of money. (p. 177, 178.) _Merchants
are supposed to buy and sell not out of necessity, but rather with a
view to profit._ (p. 203.)

‘First the industrialist produces for others’ not for his own use; these
goods begin to be of use to him only from the moment he exchanges them
away. They thus make trade and the art of exchange necessary. They are
only appraised by their exchangeable value.’ (p. 161.) (Sismondi,
_Études sur l’économie politique,_ Vol. II, Brussels, 1837.) Trade has
robbed things, pieces of wealth, of their primitive character of
usefulness: _it is the antithesis between their use value and their
exchangeable value to which commerce has reduced all things._ (p. 162.)
At the beginning, utility is the true measure of values; … trade exists
then, in the patriarchal state of society; but it has not entirely
absorbed the society; it is practised only upon the surplus of each
one’s production, and not on what constitutes its existence. (p. 162,
163.) By contrast, the character of our economic progress is that
_trade_ has taken on the burden of the _distribution_ of the totality of
the annually produced wealth and it has consequently suppressed
absolutely its character of use value, letting only that of exchangeable
value remain. (163.) Before the introduction of trade … the increase in
the quantity of the product was a direct increase of wealth. Less
significant at that time was the quantity of labour by means of which
this useful thing was obtained … And really, the thing demanded loses
none of its usefulness even if no labour at all were needed to obtain
it; grain and linen would not be less necessary to their owners … even
if they fell to them from heaven. This is without a doubt the true
estimate of wealth, enjoyment, and usefulness. But from the moment when
men … made their subsistence dependent on the exchanges they could make,
or on commerce, they were forced to adhere to a different estimation, to
exchange value, to value which results not from usefulness but rather
from _the relation between the needs of the whole society and the
quantity of labour which was sufficient to satisfy this need,_ or as
well the quantity of labour which might satisfy it in the future. (p.
266, loc. cit.) In the estimation of values, which people endeavoured to
measure with the introduction of currency, the concept of usefulness is
quite displaced. It is _labour,_ the exertion necessary to procure
oneself the two things exchanged for one another, which has alone been
regarded. (p. 267.)

Gilbart (J. W.): _The History and Principles of Banking,_ London, 1834,
has this to say about interest:

‘That a man who borrows money with _the intention of making a profit on
it,_ should give a portion of the profit to the lender, is a
self-evident principle of natural justice. A man makes a profit usually
by means of traffic. But in the Middle Ages the population purely
agricultural. And there, like under the feudal government, there can be
only little traffic and hence little profit … Hence the usury laws in
the Middle Ages justified … Furthermore: in an agricultural country a
person seldom wants to borrow money except he be reduced to poverty or
distress by misery.’ (p. 163.) Henry VIII limited interest to 10%, James
I to 8, Charles II to 6, Anne to 5. (164, 165.) In those days, the
lenders were, if not legal, still actual monopolists, and thus it was
necessary to place them under restraint like other monopolists. (p.
165.) In our time the rate of profit governs the rate of interest; in
those days the rate of interest governed the rate of profit. If the
money-lender burdened the merchant with a higher rate of interest, then
the merchant had to put a higher rate of profit on his goods, hence a
greater sum of money taken out of the pockets of the buyers so as to
bring it into the pockets of the money-lenders. This additional price
put on the goods made capital less able and less inclined to buy them.
(p. 165.) (loc. cit.)

_Commerce with equivalents impossible._ Opdyke

‘Under the rule of invariable equivalents _commerce_ etc. would be
impossible.’ (G. Opdyke, _A Treatise on Political Economy,_ New York,
1851, p. 67.)

‘The positive limitation of quantity on this instrument’ (i.e. paper
money) ‘would accomplish the only useful purpose that cost of production
does in the other’ (metal money). (loc. cit. 300.)

_Principal and interest_

_Interest._ ‘If a fixed sum of precious metal falls, then this no reason
that a smaller quantity of money should be taken for its use, for if the
principal worth less for the borrower, so the interest in the same
measure less difficult for him to pay … In California 3% per month, 36%
per annum because of the unsettled state … In Hindustan, where borrowing
by Indian princes for _unproductive expenses,_ in order to balance the
losses of capital on the average, very high interest, 30%, _having no
relation to profit_ which might be gained in industrial operations.’
(_Economist,_ 22 January 1853.) (The lender ‘here charges interest so
high as to be sufficient to replace the principal in a short time, or at
least as on the average of all his lending transactions, might serve to
counterbalance his losses in particular instances, by the apparently
exorbitant gains acquired in others.’ (loc. cit.))

The rate of interest depends: (1) on the rate of profit; (2) on the
proportion in which the entire profit divided between lender and
borrower. (loc. cit.)

Abundance or scarcity of the precious metals, the high or low scale of
general prices prevailing, determines only whether a greater or less
amount of money will be required in effecting the exchanges between
borrowers and lenders, as well as every other species of exchange …
Difference only, that a greater sum of money would be needed to
represent and transfer capital lent … the relation between the sum paid
for the use of capital and the capital expresses the rate of interest as
measured in money. (loc. cit.)

_Double Standard._ Previously, in countries where gold and silver legal
standard, silver circulated almost exclusively, because from 1800 to
1850 the tendency was for gold to become dearer than silver … The gold
was somewhat risen against silver, bore a premium in France on its
relation to silver as fixed in 1802 … so in the United States; … in
India. (In the latter now silver standard, as in Holland etc.) … The
circulation of the United States the first affected. Great import of
gold from California, premium on silver in Europe … extensive shipment
of silver coins and replacement by gold. The United States government
struck silver coins as low as 1 dollar … Substitution of silver for gold
in France. (_Economist,_ 15 November 1851.) Let the ‘standard of value’
be what it will, ‘and let the current money represent _any_ fixed
portion of that standard, that may be determined upon, the two can only
have a fixed and permanent value in relation to each other, by being
convertible at the will of the holder.’ (_Economist._) [84]

The only way in which any class of coins can command a premium is that
no one is obliged to pay them, while every one is obliged to take them
as a legal tender. (_Economist._) [85]

No country may consequently have more than one standard (more than _one_
standard of the measure of value); for this standard must be uniform and
unchanging. No article has a uniform, unchanging value relative to
another; it only has such with itself. A gold piece is always of the
same value as another, of exactly the same fineness, the same weight,
and the same value in the same place; but this cannot be said of gold
_and_ any other article, e.g. silver. (_Economist,_ 1844.) [86]

The English £ somewhat less than 1/3 of its original value, the German
florin = 1/6, Scotland before the union [reduced] its pound 1/36, to the
French _livre_ 1/74, the Spanish _maravedi =_ less than 1/1,000, the
Portuguese _re_ still lower. (p. 13, Morrison.) [87]

Before the law of 1819, causes in existence in determinating the bullion
price apart from the circulation of bank notes: (1) the more or less
perfect condition of the coin. If the circulating metallic coin is
debased below its standard weight, then the slightest turn of exchange
causing a demand for exportation must raise the price of the uncoined
bullion by at least the degradation of the coin. (2) penal laws which
forbade the melting and exporting of coin, and permitted the traffic in
bullion. With intensive demand for export, this gave latitude for
variation of bullion price against coin even at times when paper
completely convertible. In 1783, 1792, 1795, 1796 … 1816, the bullion
price rose above the mint price, because the bank-creditors, in their
anxiety to prepare for the resumption of cash payment, accepted gold
considerably above the mint price. (Fullarton.) [88]

The standard may be for gold, without one ounce of gold circulating.
(_Economist._)

Under George III (1774) silver legal tender only for £25. And the bank,
by statute, now paid only in gold. (Morrison.) Lord Liverpool (beginning
of the nineteenth century) made silver and copper into purely
representative coins. (loc. cit.) [89]

Dissolving effect of money. _Money a means of cutting up property_

_Urquhart’s nonsense about the standard of money: ‘The value of gold_ is
to be measured by itself; how can any substance be the measure of its
own worth in other things? The worth of gold is to be established by its
own _weight,_ under a false denomination of that weight – and an _ounce_
is to be worth so many _pounds_ and fractions of pounds. This is –
falsifying a _measure,_ not establishing a _standard_!’ (_Familiar
Words._) [90]

Ad. Smith calls labour the _real_ and money the _nominal measure of
value;_ presents the former as the original. [91]

_Value of money._ J. St. Mill. ‘If the quantity of goods sold is given,
and the number of sales and resales of these goods, then the value of
money depends on its quantity, together with the number of times that
each piece of money changes hands in this process.’ ‘The quantity of
money in circulation = the money value of all commodities sold, divided
by the number which expresses the velocity of circulation.’ ‘If the
amount of commodities and transactions be given, then the value of money
is the inverse of its quantity multiplied by its velocity of
circulation.’ But all these statements to be understood only in the
sense ‘that we speak only of the quantity of money which really
circulates and is factually exchanged for commodities’. ‘The necessary
quantity of money determined partly by its production costs, partly by
the velocity of its circulation. If the velocity of circulation is
given, then the costs of production are determinant; if the production
costs are given, then the quantity of money depends on the velocity of
circulation.’ [92]

Money has no equivalent other than itself or commodities. Hence degrades
everything. At the beginning of the fifteenth century in France even the
sacred vessels of the church (chalices) etc. pawned to the Jews.
(Augier.) [93]

_Money not a direct object of consumption:_ the currency never becomes
an object of consumption, always remains a commodity, never becomes a
good. Has a direct intrinsic value only for society; an exchangeable one
for each individual. Its material must therefore have value, but founded
on an artificial need, must not be indispensable for human existence;
for the whole quantity of it which is used as currency can never be
employed individually; it must always circulate. (Storch.) [94]

John Gray: _The Social System. A Treatise on the Principle of Exchange,_
Edinburgh, 1831.

‘To sell for money ought at all times to be made as easy as to buy with
money; production would then become the uniform and never failing cause
of demand.’ (16.) It is the quantity that can be sold at a profit, not
the quantity that can be made, that is the present limit to production.
(59.)

Money should be merely a _receipt,_ an evidence that the holder of it
has either contributed a certain value to the national stock of wealth,
or that he has acquired a right to the said value from some one who has
contributed to it … Money should be nothing more or less than portable,
transferable, divisible, and inimitable evidences of the existence of
wealth in store. (63, 64.) _An estimated value being previously put upon
produce,_ let it be lodged in a bank, and drawn out again whenever it is
required; merely stipulating, by common consent, that he who lodges any
kind of property in the proposed National Bank may take out of it an
equal value of whatever it may contain, instead of being obliged to draw
out the selfsame thing that he put in … The proposed national banker
should receive and take charge of _every_ description of valuable, and
give back _any_ description of valuable again. (loc. cit. 68.)

‘If money,’ says Gray, ‘be of _equal value_ with that which it
represents, it ceases to be a _representative_ at all. It is one of the
chief desideratums in money, that the holder of it should be compelled
at one time or other to present it for payment at the place ‘from whence
he received it. But if money be of the same _intrinsic value_ as that
which is given for it, no such necessity exists.’ (74.)

_‘Depreciation of stock …_ should form an item of national charge.’ (p.
[115,] 116.) ‘The business of every country is to be conducted … on a
national capital.’ (171.) ‘All land to be transformed into national
property.’ (298.)

Gray (John), _Lectures on the nature and use of Money_ (Edinburgh,
1848): ‘Man collectively _should_ know no limit to his physical means of
enjoyment, save those of the exhaustion either of _his industry or_ [of]
_his productive powers:_ whilst we, by the adoption of a monetary
system, false in principle, and destructive in practice, have consented
to restrict the amount of our physical means of _enjoyment to that
precise quantity which can be profitably exchanged for a commodity, one
of the least capable of multiplication by the exercise of human
industry_ of any upon the face of the earth.’ (29.) What will be
required for a good system, is (1) a bank system through whose
operations the _national_ relationship of supply and demand would be
restored; (2) a _true_ standard of value, instead of the existing
fiction. (108.) (In this book the idea of the exchange-bank developed in
still more detail and with preservation of the present mode of
production.) ‘There must be a minimum price of labour payable in
standard money.’ (p. 160.) Let us call e.g. the lowest rate of wages per
week for 60–72 hours that may by law be given, 20s. or £1 standard.
(161.) ‘Shall we retain our _fictitious_ standard of value, _gold,_ and
thus keep the productive resources of the country in bondage, or shall
we resort to the _natural_ standard of value, _labour,_ and thereby set
our productive resources free?’ (p. 169.) The amount of this minimum
wage being once fixed … it should remain the same for ever. (174.)
‘Merely let gold and silver take their proper place in the market beside
butter and eggs and cloth and calico, and then the value of the precious
metals will interest us no more than that of the diamond’ etc. (182 [,
183].) No objection to make to gold and silver used _as instruments of
exchange, …_ but only as _measures of value …_ In a short time one would
see how many ounces of gold or silver were obtainable in London,
Edinburgh or Dublin in exchange for a hundred pound standard note. (p.
188.)

_Interest._ As the class of rentiers increases, so also does that of
lenders of capital, for they are one and the same. From this cause
alone, interest must have had a tendency to fall in old countries. (201,
202 Ramsay.) ‘It is probable that in all ages the precious metals cost
more in their production than their value ever repaid.’ (101, II. Jacob,
W. _An Historical Enquiry into the Production and Consumption of
Precious Metals,_ London, 1831.)

_Value of money._ The value of all things, divided by the number of
transactions of which they were the object, from product[ion] to the
produc[er], = the value of the _écus_ used to buy them, divided by the
number of times that these thalers have been transferred in the same
space of time. (Sismondi, _Nouveaux Principes d’Économie Politique,_
etc.)

The most formal development of the false theory of prices is by James
Mill (quoted from the translation by J. T. Parisot, Paris, 1823.
_Éléments d’Économie Politique_).

The chief passages in Mill are:

_‘Value_ of money = the proportion in which one exchanges it for other
articles, or the quantity of money which one gives in exchange for a
specific quantity of other things.’ (p. 128.) This relation is
determined by the _total quantity_ of money existing in a country. If
one supposes all the commodities of a country brought together on one
side, and all the money on the other, then it is evident that in the
exchange between both sides, the value of money, i.e. the quantity of
the commodities for which it has been exchanged, entirely depends on its
own quantity. (loc. cit.) The case is wholly the same in the actual
state of things. The total mass of the commodities of a country is _not_
exchanged _at once_ for the total mass of the money, but rather the
commodities are exchanged in portions, and often very small portions, at
various periods in the course of the year. The same piece of money which
has served today for one exchange may serve tomorrow for another. A part
of the money is used for a very great number of exchanges, another part
for a very small number, a third is stockpiled and serves for no
exchange. Among these variations there will be a median rate, based on
the number of exchanges for which each piece of money would be used if
all had effected an equal number of exchanges. Let this rate be fixed at
some convenient number, e.g. 10. If every piece of money in the country
has served for 10 purchases, then it is the same as if the total number
of pieces of money had increased tenfold, and each had served for only a
single exchange. In this case the value of all commodities is equal to
10 times the value of the money etc. (p. 129, 130.) If, instead of each
coin serving for 10 purchases a year, the total mass of money had
increased tenfold, and the coin served for only one exchange, then it is
evident that every increase of this mass would cause a relative
diminution in the value of each of these coins taken separately. Since
_it is supposed_ that the mass of all commodities for which the money
may exchange remains _the same,_ therefore the value of the total mass
of the money has become no greater after the increase of its quantity
than before. If _one supposes_ an increase of one-tenth, then the value
of each of its parts, e.g. an ounce, must have diminished by one-tenth.
(p. 130, 131.) ‘Thus, whatever may be the degree of the increase or
decrease of the total mass of money, if the quantity of the other things
remains the same, then this total mass and each of its parts experiences
inversely a relative diminution or increase. It is clear that this
thesis is of absolute truth. Whenever the _value of money_ has
experienced a rise or fall, and whenever the quantity of the commodities
for which it could be exchanged, and the movement of circulation,
remained the same, this change must have had as cause a relative
increase or diminution of money, and can be ascribed to no other cause.
If the mass of commodities decreases while the quantity of money remains
the same, then it is as if the totality of money had increased, and vice
versa. Similar changes are the result of every alteration in the
_movement of circulation._ Every increase of the number of purchases
produces the same effect as a total increase of money; a decrease of
this number produces directly the _opposite_ effect.’ (p. 131, 132.) If
a portion of the annual product has not been exchanged at all, like that
which the producers consume, or is not exchanged for money, then this
portion must not be put on the account, because whatever does not
exchange for money is in the same situation relative to money as if it
did not exist. (p. 131, 132.) Whenever the increase or diminution of
money can proceed freely, this quantity is governed by the value of the
metal … Gold and silver, however, are commodities, products … The _costs
of production_ govern the value of gold and silver, like that of all
other products. (p. 136.)

The insipidness of this reasoning is quite evident.

(1) _If one supposes_ that the mass of commodities remains the same, and
the velocity of circulation as well, but that nevertheless a great mass
of gold or silver exchanges for this same mass of commodities (without
the value, i.e. the amount of labour contained in gold and silver,
having changed), then one supposes exactly what one wanted to prove,
namely that the prices of commodities are determined by the quantity of
the circulating medium and not vice versa.

(2) Mill concedes that the commodities not thrown into circulation do
not exist for money. It is equally clear that the money not thrown into
circulation does not exist for the commodities. Thereby there exists no
fixed relation between the value of money generally and the mass of it
which enters into circulation. That the mass actually in circulation,
divided by the number of its turnovers, is equal to the value of money
is merely a tautological circumlocution for saying that the value of the
commodity expressed in money is its price; since the money in
circulation expresses the value of the commodities it circulates – it
follows that the value of these commodities is determined by the _mass_
of the circulating money.

(3) The confusion of Mill’s view is clearly shown in his thesis that the
value of money diminishes or increases with ‘every alteration in the
movement of circulation’. Whether one pound sterling circulates 1 time
or 10 times a day, in each exchange it expresses an equivalent for the
commodity, exchanges for the same value in commodities. Its own value
remains the same in every exchange, and is hence altered neither by
slower nor by rapid circulation. The mass of the circulating money is
altered; but neither the value of the commodity, nor the value of the
money. ‘If it is said: a piece of cloth is worth £5, then it means: it
possesses the value of 616,370 grains of standard gold. The reason
assigned above may be paraphrased thus: “prices must fall because
commodities are estimated as being worth so many ounces of gold; and the
amount of gold in this country is diminished”.’ (Hubbard, J. G., _The
Currency and the Country,_ London, 1843, p. 44.)

(4) Mill at first supposes, in theory, that the whole mass of the money
in a country is exchanged _at once_ for the whole mass of the
commodities which are to be found in it. Says, then, that this is so in
reality, namely for the main reason that in practice just the opposite
takes place, and only portions of money are exchanged for portions of
commodities, the fewest payments arranged by payment on the spot – time
bargains. Follows, therefore, that the total amount of transactions or
purchases, made in a day, is entirely independent of the money
circulating on this day, and that the mass of money circulating on any
given day is not the cause but the effect of a mass of previous
transactions, each of them wholly independent of the money supply at the
time.

(5) Finally, Mill himself admits that with free circulation of money,
and this is our only concern, the value of money is determined by its
cost of production, i.e., according to his own admission, by the labour
time contained in it.

_Monetary affairs._ In Ricardo’s pamphlet: _Proposals for an Economical
and Secure Currency with Observations on the Profits of the Bank of
England,_ London, 1816, there is a passage where he makes a shambles of
his whole viewpoint. It says, namely: ‘The amount of notes in
circulation depends … on the amount required for the circulation of the
country, and this is governed by the _value_ of the standard, the amount
of payments, and the economy applied to accomplish them’. (p. 8 loc.
cit.)

Under Louis XIV, XV, XVI France still had, for its state taxes, taxes in
kind levied on the rural people. (Augier.) [95]

_Prices and mass of the circulating medium._ Mere rise of prices not
sufficient to create demand for additional currency. This only the case
if production and consumption rise simultaneously. E.g. the price of
grain rises, but its supply declines. Can thus be governed with the same
quantity of currency … but if rise of prices due to rising demand, new
markets, enlarged scale of production, in a word, _rise of prices and of
the general sum of transactions,_ then it is necessary for the
intervention of money to be multiplied in number and enlarged in
magnitude. (Fullarton.) [96]

Trade governs money, not money trade. The servant of trade must follow
the variations (in the prices) of the other commodities. (D’Avenant.)
[97]

(Under the feudal kings, the few articles bought in mass quantities by
the people fell so much that no gold or silver coin small enough to
correspond to the daily requirement of the labourer … current money thus
like in ancient Rome only the inferior metals, copper, tin, iron.)
(Jacob.) [98]

Jacob assumes that in this century, 2/3 of the gold and silver in Europe
in other articles, utensils and ornament, not in coin. (In another
passage he calculates the precious metal so used in Europe and America
at £400 million.) [99]

_Prices and mass of the circulating medium._ Locke, _Spectator_ (19 Oct.
1711), Hume, Montesquieu – their doctrine rests on three theses:

(1) Prices of commodities proportionate to the mass of money in the
country; (2) the coin and current money of a country representative of
all its labour and commodities, so that the more or less representation,
the more or less quantity of the thing represented goes to the same
quantity of it; (3) increase commodities, they become cheaper; increase
money, they rise in their value. (Steuart.)

_Markers_ (small copper money or silver money, _counters_) in antithesis
to money of intrinsic worth. (loc. cit.)

_Dissolving effect of money._ Money a means of cutting up property
(houses, other capital) into countless fragments and consuming it piece
by piece through exchange. (Bray.) [100] (Without money, a mass of
inexchangeable, inalienable objects.) ‘As immobile and immutable things
came into human commerce just as well as movable things made for
exchange, money came into use as rule and measure (square), by which
these things obtained appraisal and value.’ (_Free Trade,_ London,
1622.) [101]

_Coin_. The silver and copper markers are _representatives_ of
fractional parts of the pound sterling. (_Thus in a recent answer of the
Lord of the Treasury_.)

 _Exchange value._ F. Vidal says (likewise, Lauderdale) (and in certain
respects Ricardo): ‘The true social value is use or consumption value;
exchangeable value serves only to characterize the _relative wealth_ of
each of the members of a society in comparison to the others.’ (70. _De
la Répartition des Richesses_ etc., Paris, 1846.) On the other side,
exchange value expresses the _social form_ of value, while use value no
economic form of it whatever, rather, merely the being of the product,
etc. for mankind generally.

_Two nations may exchange according to the law of profit in such a way that both gain, but one is always defrauded_

<From the possibility that profit may be _less than_ surplus value,
hence that capital [may] exchange profitably without realizing itself in
the strict sense, it follows that not only individual capitalists, but
also nations may continually exchange with one another, may even
continually repeat the exchange on an ever-expanding scale, without for
that reason necessarily gaining in equal degrees. One of the nations may
continually appropriate for itself a part of the surplus labour of the
other, giving back nothing for it in the exchange, except that the
measure here [is] not as in the exchange between capitalist and worker.>

_Money in the third role, as money._ (Value for-itself, equivalent etc.)
How important a role money still plays in this role – even in its
immediate form – is revealed in time of crises, harvest failures etc.,
in short, whenever one nation must _suddenly_ liquidate its account with
another. Money in its immediate, metallic form then appears as the sole
absolute _means of payment,_ i.e. as the sole _counter-value,_
acceptable equivalent. And consequently it pursues a moving course which
directly contradicts that of all other commodities. Commodities are
transported as means of payment etc. from the country where they are
cheapest to the country where they are most expensive. Money, the
opposite; in all periods where it brings out its specific inner nature,
where, hence, money is called for, in antithesis to all other
commodities, as value for-itself, as absolute equivalent, as general
form of wealth, in the specific form of gold and silver – and such
moments are always more or less moments of crisis, whether a general
one, or a grain crisis – then gold and silver are always transmitted
from the country where they are most expensive – i.e. where all
commodity prices have fallen by the relatively greatest amount – to the
country where they are cheapest, i.e. where the prices of commodities
are relatively higher. ‘It is a singular anomaly in the economy of the
exchanges, and one particularly deserving of remark, that … the course
of transit (of gold between two nations equally employing gold as a
circulating medium) is always _from_ the country where for the moment
the metal is _dearest,_ to the country where it is _cheapest,_ a rise of
the market price of the metal to its highest limit in the home market,
and a fall of the premium in the foreign market, being the certain
results of that tendency to an efflux of gold which follows a depression
of the exchanges.’ (J. Fullarton, _On the Regulation of Currencies_ etc.
2nd ed., London, 1845, p. 119.)

Just as exchange as such begins where the communities end, and as money,
as the measure, medium of exchange and general equivalent created by
exchange itself, arose not in internal traffic but rather in that
between different communities, peoples, etc., and there obtains its
specific importance, so it was also ϰατ᾽ ἐξοχήν as medium of
international payments – for the liquidation of international debts –
that money cast its spell, in the sixteenth century, the period of
bourgeois society’s infancy, holding the exclusive interest of states
and of incipient political economy. The important role which money (gold
and silver) in this third form still plays in international traffic has
only become fully clear and been again recognized by the economists
since the regular succession of money crises in 1825, 1839, 1847 and
1857. The economists try to extricate themselves by pointing out that
money is called for here not as medium of circulation, but as _capital._
This is correct. Only it should not be forgotten that capital is being
called for in the specific form of gold and silver, and not in that of
any other commodity. Gold and silver appear in the role of absolute
medium of international payments, because they are money as
value-for-itself, as independent equivalent. ‘This, in fact, is not a
question of _currency_ but of _capital_.’ (It is rather a question of
money, not of currency, nor of capital, because it is not _capital_
which is indifferent to the special form in which it exists, but value
in the specific form of money which is requested) ‘… all those various
causes which, in the existing condition of monetary affairs, are capable
… of directing the stream of bullion from one country to another’ (i.e.
giving origin to a _drain of bullion),_ ‘resolve themselves under a
single head, namely the state of the balance of foreign payments, and
the continually recurring necessity of transferring _capital’_ (but
_notabene!_ capital in the form of money) ‘from one country to another
to discharge it. For example failure of crops … Whether that capital is
_transmitted in merchandise or in specie_ is a point which in no way
affects the nature of the transaction’ _(affects it very materially!)._
Further, war-expenditure. (The case of transmission of capital in order
to place it out to greater advantage at interest does not concern us
here; nor does that of a surplus quantity of foreign goods imported,
which Mr Fullarton cites, although this case certainly belongs here if
this surplus importation coincides with crises.) (Fullarton, loc. cit.
130, 131.) ‘Gold is preferred for this transmission of capital’ (but in
cases of violent drains of bullion it is absolutely not a question of
preference) ‘only in those cases where it is likely to effect the
payment more conveniently, promptly, or profitably, _than any other
description of stock or capital.’_ (Mr Fullarton falsely treats the
transmission of gold or another form of capital as a matter of
preference, whereas the question is precisely those cases when _gold_
must be transmitted in the international trade, just as at the same time
bills in the domestic trade must be acquitted in the legal money, and
not in any substitute.) ‘Gold and silver … can always be conveyed to the
spot where it is wanted with precision and celerity, and may be counted
upon to realize on its arrival nearly the exact sum required to be
provided, rather than incur the hazard of sending it in tea, coffee,
sugar, or indigo. _Gold and silver possess an infinite advantage over
all other descriptions of merchandise for such occasions,_ from the
circumstance of their being universally in use as money. It is not in
tea, coffee, sugar, or indigo that debts, whether foreign or domestic,
are _usually contracted to be paid, but in coin;_ and a remittance,
therefore, either in the identical coin designated, or in bullion which
can be promptly turned into that coin through the Mint or Market of the
country to which it is sent, must always afford to the remitter the most
certain, immediate, and accurate means of effecting this object, without
risk of disappointment from the failure of demand or fluctuation of
price.’ (132, 133.) Thus he cites precisely its property of being money,
general commodity of contracts, standard of values, and with the
possibility of being immediately converted at liberty in medium of
circulation. The English have the apt expression _currency_ for money as
medium of circulation (_Münze,_ coin, does not correspond to this,
because it is itself the medium of circulation in a particular form
again) and _money_ for it in its third attribute. But since they have
not particularly developed the latter, they declare this money to be
_capital,_ although they are then in practice forced to distinguish
again between this particular form of capital, and capital generally.

‘Ricardo appears to have entertained very peculiar and extreme opinions
as to the limited extent of the offices performed by gold and silver in
the adjustment of foreign balances. Mr Ricardo had passed his life amid
the controversies which grew out of the Restriction Act,’ [102] and had
accustomed himself so long to consider all the great fluctuations of
exchange and of the price of gold as the result of the excessive issues
of the Bank of England, that at one time he seemed scarcely willing to
allow that such a thing could exist as an adverse balance of commercial
payments … And so slight an account did he set on the functions
performed by gold in such adjustments, as to have even anticipated that
_drains_ for _exportation_ would cease altogether so soon as cash
payments should be resumed, and the currency restored to the metallic
level … (See _Ricardo’s Evidence before the Lords’ Committee of 1819 on
the Bank of England,_ p. 186.) … But since 1800, when paper quite
displaced gold in England, our merchants did not really want it; for,
owing to the unsettled state of continental Europe, and the increased
consumption there of imported manufactures, in consequence of the
interruption given to industry and to all domestic improvement by the
incessant movement of invading armies, together with the complete
monopoly of the colonial trade which England had obtained through her
naval superiority, the export of commodities from Great Britain to the
Continent continued greatly to exceed her imports from thence, so long
as the intercourse remained open; and after that intercourse was
interrupted by the Berlin and Milan decrees, the transactions of trade
became much too insignificant to affect exchanges in one way or the
other. It was the foreign military expenditures and the subsidies, and
not the necessities of commerce, that contributed in so extraordinary a
manner to derange the exchanges and enhance the price of bullion in the
latter years of the war. The distinguished economists of that period,
therefore, had few or no real opportunities of practically estimating
the range of which foreign _commercial_ balances are susceptible.’
(Believed that with war and over-issue, the international transmission
of bullion would cease.) ‘Had Mr Ricardo lived to witness the drains of
1825 and 1839, he would no doubt have seen reason to alter his views.’
(loc. cit. 133–6.)

_Price_ is the _money value_ of commodities. (Hubbard.) [103] Money has
the quality of being always exchangeable for what it measures, and the
quantity required for the purposes of exchange must vary, of course,
according to the quantity of property to be exchanged. (100. J. W.
Bosanquet. _Metallic, Paper, and Credit Currency_ etc., London, 1842.)
‘I am ready to admit that gold is a commodity in such general demand
that it may always command a market, that it can always buy [all] other
commodities; whereas, other commodities cannot always buy gold. The
markets of the world are open to it as merchandise at less sacrifice
upon an emergency than would attend an export of any other article,
which might in quantity or kind be beyond the usual demand in the
country to which it is sent.’ (Th. Tooke. _An Enquiry into the Currency
Principle_ etc., 2nd ed., London, 1844, p. 10.) ‘There must be a very
considerable amount of the precious metals applicable and applied as the
most convenient mode of adjustment of international balances, being a
commodity more generally in demand, and less liable to fluctuations in
market value than any other.’ (p. 12, 13.)

(Causes, according to Fullarton, of the rise of bullion price above the
mint price: ‘Coin debased by wear to the extent of 3 or 4% below its
standard weight; … penal laws which prohibited the melting and
exportation of the coin, while the traffic in the metal of which that
coin was composed remained perfectly free. These causes themselves,
however, acted only during periods of unfavourable rate of exchange …
[The market price of money] fell, however, from 1816 to 1821 always to
the _bank price_ of bullion, when the exchange in favour of England;
never rose higher, when the exchange unfavourable, than to such a rate
as would indemnify the melters of the coin for its degradation by wear
and for the penal consequences of melting it, but rose no higher.’
(Fullarton, see his book, p. 8, 9.) ‘From 1819 to the present time, amid
all the vicissitudes which the money has undergone during that eventful
period, the market-price of gold has on no occasion risen above 78s. per
oz., nor fallen below 77s. 6d., an extreme range of only 6 in the ounce.
Nor would even that extent of fluctuation be now possible; for it was
solely owing to the renewed deterioration of the coin that even so
trivial a rise occurred as 1 1/2d. in the ounce, or about 1/6% above the
Mint-price; and the fall to 77s. 6d. is entirely accounted for by the
circumstance of the Bank having at one time thought proper to establish
that rate as the limit for its purchases. Those circumstances, however,
exist no longer. For many years the Bank has been in the practice of
allowing 77s. 9d. for all the gold brought to it for coinage’ (i.e. the
bank pockets 1 1/2d. mintage, which the coin gives it free of charge);
‘and as soon as the recoinage of sovereigns now in progress shall be
completed, there will be an effectual bar, until the coin shall again
become deteriorated, to any future fluctuation of the price of gold
bullion in our market beyond the small fractional difference between
77s. 9d. allowed by the Bank, and the Mint-price of 77s. 10 1/2d.’ (loc.
cit. p. 9, 10.)

_Contradiction between money as measure and equivalent on one side and
as medium of circulation._ In the latter, abrasion, loss of metallic
weight. Garnier already remarks that ‘if a somewhat worn _écu_ were
taken as being worth somewhat less than a quite new one, then
circulation would be constantly hampered, and every payment would give
rise to disputes.’ [104]

(The material designed for accumulation naturally sought for and chosen
from the realm of _minerals._ Garnier.) [105]

‘It being obvious that the coinage, in the very nature of things, must
be forever, unit by unit, falling under depreciation by the mere action
of ordinary and unavoidable abrasion (to say nothing of the inducement
which a very restoration of the coinage holds out to the whole legion of
‘players’ and ‘sweaters’), it is a physical impossibility at any time,
even for a single day, utterly to exterminate light coins from
circulation.’ (_The Currency Theory reviewed_ etc. By a Banker in
England. Edinburgh, 1845, p. 69.) This written December 1844 commenting
upon the operation of the then recent proclamations respecting the light
gold in circulation in a letter to _The Times._ (Hence difficulty: If
the light money is refused, then all standards insecure. If it is
accepted, then door is opened to fraud and the same result.) That is why
he says, in regard to the above-cited proclamations: ‘The effect … has
virtually been to denounce the whole of the current gold coin as an
unsafe and illegal medium for monetary transactions.’ (p. 68, 69, loc.
cit.) ‘In English law, when a gold sovereign is more than 0.774 grains
deficient in weight, it may no longer pass as current. No such law for
silver money.’ (54. Wm H. Morrison, _Observations on the System of
Metallic Currency Adopted in this Country,_ London, 1837.)

_Assertion by the currency people that the value of a currency depends
on its quantity._ (Fullarton, p. 13.) If the value of the currency is
given, and prices and the mass of transactions likewise (as well as the
velocity of circulation), then of course only a _specific quantity_ can
circulate. Given prices and the mass of transactions as well as the
velocity of circulation, then this quantity depends exclusively on the
_value_ of the currency. Given this value and the velocity of
circulation, it depends exclusively on prices and on the mass of
transactions. In this way is the quantity determined. If, however, the
money in circulation is representative money – mere value-symbols – then
it depends on the standard they represent what quantity of them can
circulate. From this it has been wrongly concluded that quantity alone
determines its value. For example, paper chits representing pounds
cannot circulate in the same quantity as those which represent
shillings.

Profit-bearing capital is the real capital, value posited as
simultaneously self-reproducing and multiplying, and as constantly
self-equivalent presupposition, distinguished from itself as surplus
value posited by itself. Interest-bearing capital is in turn the purely
abstract form of profit-bearing capital.

Since capital is posited as profit-bearing, in accordance with its value
(presupposing a specific stage of the force of production), the
commodity – or the commodity posited in its form as money (in its
corresponding form as independent value, or, as we may now say, as
realized capital) – may enter into circulation as _capital;_ it may
become a commodity, _as capital._ In this case, it is capital lent out
at interest. The form of its circulation – or of the exchange it
undergoes – then appears as specifically distinct from that examined
hitherto. We have seen that capital posits itself both in the role of
the commodity and in the role of money; but this happens only in so far
as both appear as moments of the circulation of capital, in which it
alternately realizes itself. These are only its vanishing and constantly
re-created modes of existence, moments of its life’s process. But
capital as capital, capital itself as commodity, has not itself become a
moment of circulation. The commodity has not been sold as capital; nor
money as capital. In a word, neither commodity nor money – and we need
actually regard only the latter as the adequate form – have entered into
circulation as _profit-bearing values._

Maclaren says:

‘ “Mr Tooke, Mr Fullarton, and Mr Wilson consider money as possessing
intrinsic value as a commodity, and exchanging with goods according to
that value, and not merely in accordance with the supply of pieces at
the time; and they suppose with Dr Smith that exports of bullion are
made quite irrespective of the state of the currency, to discharge
balances of international debt, and to pay for commodities such as corn,
for which there is a sudden demand, and that they are taken from a fund
which forms no part of the internal circulation, nor affects prices, but
is set apart for these purposes … Difficulty in explaining in what
manner the bullion they say is set apart for this purpose, and has no
effect on prices, can escape the laws of supply and demand, and though
existing in the shape of money lying unemployed and known for the making
of purchases, is neither applied for that purpose nor affects prices by
the possibility of its being so applied.” The reply to this is, that the
stock of bullion in question represents surplus-capital, not
surplus-income, and is not available, therefore, merely to increase the
demand for commodities, except on condition of increasing also the
supply. Capital in search of employment is not a pure addition to the
demanding power of the community. It cannot be lost in the currency. If
it tends to raise prices by a demand, it tends to lower them by a
corresponding supply. Money, as the security for capital, is not a mere
purchasing power – it purchases only in order to sell, and finally goes
abroad in exchange for foreign commodities rather than disburse itself
in merely adding to the currency at home. Money, as the security for
capital, never comes into the market so as to be set off against
commodities, because its purpose is to produce commodities; it is only
the money which represents _consumption_ that can finally affect
prices.’ (_Economist,_ 15 May ’58.) [106]

‘Mr Ricardo maintained that prices depend on the relative amount of the
circulating medium and of commodities respectively, and that prices rise
only through a depreciation of the currency, that is, from a too great
abundance of it in proportion to commodities, that they fall either from
a reduction in the amount of the currency, or from a relative increase
in the stock of general commodities which it circulates. _All_ the
bullion and gold coin in the country is, according to Mr Ricardo, to be
reckoned currency, and if this increases without a corresponding
increase in commodities, the currency is depreciated, and it becomes
profitable to export bullion rather than commodities. On the other hand,
if a bad harvest or any other calamity cause a great destruction of
commodities, without any corresponding change in the amount of the
circulation, the currency, whose amount was proportioned to the
estimated rather than to the suddenly reduced market of commodities,
again becomes redundant or ‘depreciated’, and must be diminished by
exportation before its value can be restored. According to this view of
the circulation, which is at the root of Lord Overstone’s theory, the
supply of circulating medium or currency is always capable of being
indefinitely increased in amount, and diminishes in value according to
that increase; and can be restored to its proper value only by
exportation of the superabundant portion. Any issue, therefore, of paper
money which might supply the gap caused by the exportation of the
bullion, and so prevent the ‘natural’ fall of prices otherwise certain
to ensue, is held by Mr Ricardo’s school to be an interference with the
economical laws of price, and a departure from the principles which
would necessarily regulate a purely metallic currency.’ (loc. cit.)

(1) Value

This section to be brought forward.

The first category in which bourgeois wealth presents itself is that of
the _commodity._ The commodity itself appears as unity of two aspects.
It is _use value,_ i.e. object of the satisfaction of any system
whatever of human needs. This is its material side, which the most
disparate epochs of production may have in common, and whose examination
therefore lies beyond political economy. Use value falls within the
realm of political economy as soon as it becomes modified by the modern
relations of production, or as it, in turn, intervenes to modify them.
What it is customary to say about it in general terms, for the sake of
good form, is confined to commonplaces which had a historic value in the
first beginnings of the science, when the social forms of bourgeois
production had still laboriously to be peeled out of the material, and,
at great effort, to be established as independent objects of study. In
fact, however, the use value of the commodity is a given presupposition
– the material basis in which a specific economic relation presents
itself. It is only this specific relation which stamps the use value as
a commodity. Wheat, e.g., possesses the same use value, whether
cultivated by slaves, serfs or free labourers. It would not lose its use
value if it fell from the sky like snow. Now how does use value become
transformed into commodity? Vehicle of _exchange value._ Although
directly united in the commodity, use value and exchange value just as
directly split apart. Not only does the exchange value not appear as
determined by the use value, but rather, furthermore, the commodity only
becomes a commodity, only realizes itself as exchange value, in so far
as its owner does not relate to it as use value. He appropriates use
values only through their sale [_Entäusserung_], their exchange for
other commodities. Appropriation through sale is the fundamental form of
the social system of production, of which exchange value appears as the
simplest, most abstract expression. The use value of the commodity is
presupposed, not for its owner, but rather for the society generally.
(Just as a Manchester family of factory workers, where the children
stand in the exchange relation towards their parents and pay them room
and board, does not represent the traditional economic organization of
the family, so is the system of modern private exchange not the
spontaneous economy of societies. Exchange begins not between the
individuals within a community, but rather at the point where the
communities end – at their boundary, at the point of contact between
different communities. Communal property has recently been rediscovered
as a special Slavonic curiosity. But, in fact, India offers us a sample
chart of the most diverse forms of such economic communities, more or
less dissolved, but still completely recognizable; and a more thorough
research into history uncovers it as the point of departure of all
cultured peoples. The system of production founded on private exchange
is, to begin with, the historic dissolution of this naturally arisen
communism. However, a whole series of economic systems lies in turn
between the modern world, where exchange value dominates production to
its whole depth and extent, and the social formations whose foundation
is already formed by the dissolution of communal property, without

[Here the manuscript breaks off.]



[BASTIAT AND CAREY]^([107])


_Bastiat._ Harmonies économiques. _2 édition Paris, 1851_

_Foreword_

The history of modern political economy ends with Ricardo and Sismondi:
antitheses, one speaking English, the other French – just as it begins
at the end of the seventeenth century with Petty and Boisguillebert.
Subsequent political-economic literature loses its way, moving either
towards eclectic, syncretistic compendia, such as e.g. the work of J.
St. Mill, or into deeper elaboration of individual branches, such as
e.g. Tooke’s _History of Prices_ and, in general, the newer English
writings about circulation – the only branch in which real new
discoveries have been made, since the works about colonization, landed
property (in its various forms), population etc. actually differ from
the older ones only in the greater completeness of their material – or
the reproduction of old economic disputes for a wider public, and the
practical solution of questions of the day, such as the writings on free
trade and protection – or, finally, into tendentious exaggerations of
the classical tendencies, a relation which e.g. Chalmers occupies toward
Malthus and Gülich to Sismondi, as well as in certain respects the older
writings of MacCulloch and Senior to Ricardo. It is altogether a
literature of epigones; reproduction, greater elaboration of form, wider
appropriation of material, exaggeration, popularization, synopsis,
elaboration of details; lack of decisive leaps in the phases of
development, incorporation of the inventory on one side, new growth at
individual points on the other. The only exceptions seem to be the
writings of Carey, the Yankee, and Bastiat, the Frenchman, the latter of
whom confesses that he leans on the former. [108] Both grasp that the
antithesis to political economy – namely socialism and communism – finds
its theoretical presupposition in the works of classical political
economy itself, especially in Ricardo, who must be regarded as its
complete and final expression. Both of them therefore find it necessary
to attack, as a misunderstanding, the theoretical expression which the
bourgeois economy has achieved historically in modern economics, and to
demonstrate the harmony of the relations of production at the points
where the classical economists naïvely described this antagonism.
Notwithstanding the altogether different, even contradictory national
environment from within which each of them writes, they are driven to
identical endeavours. Carey is the only original economist among the
North Americans. Belongs to a country where bourgeois society did not
develop on the foundation of the feudal system, but developed rather
from itself; where this society appears not as the surviving result of a
centuries-old movement, but rather as the starting-point of a new
movement; where the state, in contrast to all earlier national
formations, was from the beginning subordinate to bourgeois society, to
its production, and never could make the pretence of being an
end-in-itself; where, finally, bourgeois society itself, linking up the
productive forces of an old world with the enormous natural terrain of a
new one, has developed to hitherto unheard-of dimensions and with
unheard-of freedom of movement, has far outstripped all previous work in
the conquest of the forces of nature, and where, finally, even the
antitheses of bourgeois society itself appear only as vanishing moments.
That the relations of production within which this enormous new world
has developed so quickly, so surprisingly and so happily should be
regarded by Carey as the eternal, normal relations of social production
and intercourse, that these should seem to him as hampered and damaged
by the inherited barriers of the feudal period, in Europe, especially
England, which actually represents Europe to him, and that the English
economists should appear to him to give a distorted, falsified
reflection, generalization of these relations, that they should seem to
him to confuse accidental distortions of the latter with their intrinsic
character – what could be more natural? American relations against
English ones: to this his critique of the English theory of landed
property, wages, population, class antitheses etc. may be reduced. In
England, bourgeois society does not exist in pure form, not
corresponding to its concept, not adequate to itself. How then could the
English economists’ concepts of bourgeois society be the true, undimmed
expression of a reality, since that reality was unknown to them? In the
last analysis, the disturbing effect which traditional influences,
influences not arising from the womb of bourgeois society itself,
exercise upon its _natural_ relations reduces itself for Carey to the
influence, to the excesses and interferences of the state in bourgeois
society. It is in the nature of wages, e.g., to rise with the
productivity of labour. If we find that reality contradicts this law,
then, whether in Hindustan or in England, we have only to abstract from
the influence of the government, taxes, monopolies etc. If the bourgeois
relations are regarded in themselves, i.e. after deduction of state
influences, they will indeed always confirm the harmonic laws of the
bourgeois economy. The question to what extent these state influences,
public debt, taxes etc., grow out of the bourgeois relations themselves
– and hence, e.g. in England, in no way appear as results of feudalism,
but rather as results of its dissolution and defeat, and in North
America itself the power of the central government grows with the
centralization of capital – is one which Carey naturally does not raise.
While Carey thus brings the higher power to which bourgeois society is
developed in North America to bear against the English economists,
Bastiat brings to bear the lower power of bourgeois society in France,
against the French socialists. You believe yourselves to be rebelling
against the laws of bourgeois society, in a land where these laws were
never allowed to realize themselves! You only know them in the stunted
French form, and regard as their inherent form what is merely its French
national distortion. Look across, at England. Here, in our own country,
the task is to free bourgeois society from the fetters which the state
imposes on it. You want to multiply these fetters. First work out the
bourgeois relations in their pure form, and then we may talk again.
(Bastiat has a point, in so far as in France, owing to its peculiar
social formation, many a thing is considered socialism that counts in
England as political economy.)

Carey, however, whose point of departure is the American emancipation of
bourgeois society from the state, ends with the call for state
intervention, so that the pure development of bourgeois relations is not
disturbed by external forces, as in fact happened in America. He is a
protectionist, while Bastiat is a freetrader. All over the world, the
harmony of economic laws appears as disharmony, and even Carey himself
is struck by the beginnings of this disharmony in the United States.
What is the source of this strange phenomenon? Carey explains it with
the destructive influence of England, with its striving for industrial
monopoly, upon the world market. Originally, the English relations were
distorted by the false theories of her economists, internally. Now,
externally, as the commanding power of the world market, England
distorts the harmony of economic relations in all the countries of the
world. This disharmony is a real one, not one merely based on the
subjective conceptions of the economists. What Russia is, politically,
for Urquhart, England is, economically, for Carey. The harmony of
economic relations rests, according to Carey, on the harmonious
cooperation of town and countryside, industry and agriculture. Having
dissolved this fundamental harmony in its own interior, England, by its
competition, proceeds to destroy it throughout the world market, and is
thus the destructive element of the general harmony. The only defence
lies in protective tariffs – the forcible, national barricade against
the destructive power of large-scale English industry. Hence, the state,
which was at first branded the sole disturber of these _‘harmonies
économiques’,_ is now these harmonies’ last refuge. On the one side,
Carey here again articulates the specific national development of the
United States, their antithesis to and competition with England. This
takes place in the naïve form of suggesting to the United States that
they destroy the industrialism propagated by England, so as, by
protective tariffs, to develop the same more rapidly themselves. This
naïveté apart, with Carey the harmony of the bourgeois relations of
production ends with the most complete disharmony of these relations on
the grandest terrain where they appear, the world market, and in their
grandest development, as the relations of producing nations. All the
relations which appear harmonious to him within specific national
boundaries or, in addition, in the abstract form of general relations of
bourgeois society – e.g. concentration of capital, division of labour,
wage labour etc. – appear as disharmonious to him where they appear in
their most developed form – in their world market form – as the internal
relations which produce English domination on the world market, and
which, as destructive influences, are the consequence of this
domination. If patriarchal gives way to industrial production within a
country, this is harmonious, and the process of dissolution which
accompanies this development is conceived in its positive aspect alone.
But it becomes disharmonious when large-scale English industry dissolves
the patriarchal or petty-bourgeois or other lower stages of production
in a foreign country. The concentration of capital within a country and
the dissolving effect of this concentration present nothing but positive
sides to him. But the monopoly of concentrated English capital and its
dissolving effect on the smaller national capitals of other countries is
disharmonious. What Carey has not grasped is that these world-market
disharmonies are merely the ultimate adequate expressions of the
disharmonies which have become fixed as abstract relations within the
economic categories or which have a local existence on the smallest
scale. No wonder, then, that he in turn forgets the positive content of
these processes of dissolution – the only side he recognizes in the
economic categories in their abstract form, or in the real relations
within the specific countries from which they are abstracted – when he
comes to their full appearance, the world market. Hence, where the
economic relations confront him in their truth, i.e. in their universal
reality, his principled optimism turns into a denunciatory, irritated
pessimism. This contradiction forms the originality of his writings and
gives them their significance. He is equally an American in his
assertion of the harmony within bourgeois society, as in his assertion
of the disharmony of the same relations in their world-market form. In
Bastiat, none of this. The harmony of these relations is a world beyond,
which begins just at the point where the boundaries of France end; which
exists in England and America. This is merely the imaginary, ideal form
of the un-French, the Anglo-American relations, not the real form such
as he confronts it on his own land and soil. Hence, as with him the
harmony in no way arises out of the abundance of living observation, but
is rather the _flat_, stilted product of a thin, drawn, antithetical
reflection, hence the only moment of reality with him is the demand that
the French state should give up its economic boundaries. Carey sees the
contradictions in the economic relations as soon as they appear on the
world market as _English_ relations. Bastiat, who merely imagines the
harmony, begins to see its realization only at the point where France
ceases, and where all nationally separate component parts of bourgeois
society compete among one another liberated from the supervision of the
state. This ultimate among his harmonies – and the presupposition of all
his earlier, imaginary ones – is however itself in turn merely a
postulate, which is supposed to be realized through free-trade
legislation. Thus, while Carey, quite apart from the scientific value of
his researches, has at least the merit of articulating in abstract form
the large-scale American relations, and, what is more, of doing so in
antithesis to the old world, the only real background in Bastiat would
be the small scale of the French relations, which everywhere poke their
long ears through his harmonies. Still, this meritorious contribution is
superfluous, because the relations of so old a country are sufficiently
known and least of all require to become known by so negative a detour.
Carey is rich, therefore, in, so to speak, _bonafide_ research in
economic science, such as about credit, rent, etc. Bastiat is
preoccupied merely with pacifying paraphrases of researches ending in
contrasts; hypocrisy of contentment. Carey’s generality is Yankee
universality. France and China are equally close to him. Always the man
who lives on the Pacific and the Atlantic. Bastiat’s generality is to
ignore all countries. As a genuine Yankee, Carey absorbs from all
directions the massive material furnished him by the old world, not so
as to recognize the inherent soul of this material, and thus to concede
to it the right to its peculiar life, but rather so as to work it up for
his purposes, as indifferent raw material, as inanimate documentation
for his theses, abstracted from his Yankee standpoint. Hence his
strayings and wanderings through all countries, massive and uncritical
use of statistics, a catalogue-like erudition. Bastiat, by contrast,
presents fantasy history, his abstractions sometimes in the form of
arguments, another time in the form of supposed events, which however
have never and nowhere happened, just as a theologian treats sin
sometimes as the law of human existence, then at other times as the
story of the fall from grace. Hence both are equally unhistorical and
anti-historical. But the unhistoric moment in Carey is the contemporary
historic principle of North America, while the unhistoric element in
Bastiat is a mere reminiscence of the French eighteenth-century manner
of generalizing. Hence Carey is formless and diffuse, Bastiat affected
and formally-logical. The most he achieves is commonplaces, expressed
paradoxically, ground and polished into facets. With Carey, a couple of
general theses, advanced in schoolmasterly form. Following them, a
shapeless material, compendium, as documentation – the substance of his
theses in no way digested. With Bastiat, the only material – abstracting
from a few local examples, or whimsically refashioned English trivia –
consists in the general theses of the economists. Carey’s chief
antithesis, Ricardo, in short, the modern English economists; Bastiat’s,
the French socialists.

_XIV. On Wages_

The following are Bastiat’s main theses: All men strive for constancy of
income, _fixed revenue._ <Truly French example: (1) All men want to be
civil servants or make their sons civil servants. (p. 371.)> Wages are a
fixed form of remuneration (p. 376) and hence a very perfect form of
association, in whose original form ‘the aleatory’ predominates, in so
far as ‘all the associated’ are subject to ‘all the risks of the
enterprise’. <If capital takes the risk on its own account, the
remuneration of labour becomes established under the name _wages._ If
labour wants to take the consequences, good and bad, then the
remuneration of capital splits off and establishes itself under the name
_interest_ (382).> (On this juxtaposition, see further p. 382, 383.)
However, while the aleatory originally predominates in the worker’s
condition, the stability of wage labour is not yet sufficiently secured.
There is an ‘intermediate degree which separates the aleatory from
stability’. This last stage is reached by ‘saving, during days of work,
the means to provide for the needs of days of old age and illness’. (p.
388.) The final stage develops by means of ‘mutual aid societies’ (loc.
cit.) and in the final instance by means of the ‘workers’ _retirement
fund’._ (p. 393.) (As man began with the need to become a civil servant,
so he ends with the satisfaction of drawing a pension.)

As to 1. Suppose everything Bastiat says about the fixity of wages to be
correct. Then we would still not know the _proper character_ of wages,
its characteristic specificity, simply because wages are subsumed under
the fixed revenues. One of its relations – which it has in common with
other sources of income – would be emphasized. Nothing more. This would
already be something, admittedly, for the advocate who wishes to plead
the advantages of wage labour. It would still be nothing for the
economist who wishes to understand the peculiarity of this relation in
its entire scope. A one-sided characterization of a relation, of an
economic form, so as to make it the object of panegyrics in contrast to
the opposite form; this cheap practice of lawyers and apologists is what
distinguishes the logician, Bastiat. Thus, in place of wages, put: fixed
income. Is a fixed income not a good thing? Does not everyone love to
count on a sure thing? Especially every petty-bourgeois, narrow-minded
Frenchman? the ‘ever-needy’ man? Human bondage has been defended in the
same way, perhaps on better grounds. The opposite could also be
asserted, and has been asserted. Equate wages to non-fixedness, i.e.
progression past a certain point. Who does not love to get ahead,
instead of standing still? Can a relation be bad which makes possible an
infinite bourgeois progress? Naturally, Bastiat himself in another
passage asserts wages as non-fixedness. How else, apart from
non-fixedness, would it be possible for the worker to stop working, to
become a capitalist, as Bastiat wishes? Thus wage labour is good because
it is fixedness; it is good because it is non-fixedness; it is good
because it is neither one nor the other, but both at the same time. What
relation is not good, if it is reduced to a one-sided characterization
and the latter is regarded as position, not as negation? All opportunist
chattering, all apologetics, all philistine sophistry rests on this sort
of abstraction.

After this general preface, we come to Bastiat’s actual construction.
Only, be it noted in passing that his rural sharecropper, [109] this
type who combines in himself the misfortune of the wage labourer with
the bad luck of the small capitalist, might indeed consider himself
fortunate if he were put on fixed wages. Proudhon’s ‘descriptive and
philosophical history’ hardly holds a candle to that of his opponent
Bastiat. The original form of association, wherein all the associates
share all the risks of chance, is followed, as a higher stage of
association entered into voluntarily by both sides, by a form in which
the worker’s remuneration is fixed. We will not call attention here to
the genius of a procedure which begins by presupposing a capitalist on
one side and a worker on the other, so as then, afterwards, to let the
relation of capital and wage labour arise between them by their mutual
agreement.

The form of association in which the worker is exposed to all the chance
risks of the business – in which all producers are equally exposed to
these risks – and which immediately precedes the form of wages, where
the remuneration of labour gains fixity, becomes stable, as thesis
precedes antithesis – is, as Bastiat tells us, the state in which
fishing, hunting and herding form the dominant forms of production and
society. First the wandering fisherman, hunter, herdsman – and then the
wage labourer. Where and when has this _historic_ transition from the
semi-savage state into the modern taken place? If at all, then only in
the burlesque. In real history, wage labour arises out of the
dissolution of slavery and serfdom – or of the decay of communal
property, as with oriental and Slavonic peoples – and, in its adequate,
epoch-making form, the form which takes possession of the entire social
being of labour, out of the decline and fall of the guild economy, of
the system of Estates, of labour and income in kind, of industry carried
on as rural subsidiary occupation, of small-scale feudal agriculture
etc. In all these real historic transitions, wage labour appears as the
dissolution, the annihilation of relations in which labour was fixed on
all sides, in its income, its content, its location, its scope etc.
_Hence as negation of the stability of labour and of its remuneration._
The direct transition from the African’s fetish to Voltaire’s supreme
being, or from the hunting gear of a North American savage to the
capital of the Bank of England, is not so absurdly contrary to history
as is the transition from Bastiat’s fisherman to the wage labourer.
(Furthermore, in all these developments there is no sign of voluntary
changes arising from mutual agreement.) This construction – in which
Bastiat dishonestly conjures up his flat abstraction in the form of a
historic event – is quite of the same rank as the synthesis in which the
English friendly societies and the savings banks appear as the last word
of wage labour and as the suspension of all social antinomies.

Thus the historic character of wage labour is non-fixity: the opposite
of Bastiat’s construction. But how did he come at all to construe fixity
as the all-compensating aspect of wage labour? What led him to the wish
to present wage labour in this form historically in other forms of
society and of association, as a higher form of the remuneration of
labour?

All economists, when they come to discuss the prevailing relation of
capital and wage labour, of profit and wages, and when they demonstrate
to the worker that he has no legitimate claim to share in the risks of
gain, when they wish to pacify him generally about his subordinate role
_vis-à-vis_ the capitalist, lay stress on pointing out to him that, in
contrast to the capitalist, he possesses a certain fixity of income more
or less independent of the great adventures of capital. Just as Don
Quixote consoles Sancho Panza with the thought that, although of course
he takes all the beatings, at least he is not required to be brave. Thus
an attribute which the economists attach to wage labour in antithesis to
profit is transformed by Bastiat into an attribute of wage labour in
antithesis to earlier forms of labour, and as progress relative to the
remuneration of labour in these earlier relationships. A commonplace
which takes up the standpoint of the prevailing relation, which consoles
one of its sides towards the other, is taken out of this relation by Mr
Bastiat and turned into the historic foundation of this relation’s
origin. In the relation of wages to profit, wage labour to capital, say
the economists, wages have the advantage of fixity. Mr Bastiat says this
fixity, i.e. one of the aspects of the relation of wages to profit, is
the historical foundation on which wage labour arose (or, is an
attribute of wages in antithesis not to profit, but rather to the
earlier forms of the remuneration of labour), hence on which profit,
hence the whole relation arose likewise. Thus a truism about one facet
of the relation of wages and profit is surreptitiously transformed for
him into the historic basis of this whole relation. This happens because
he is constantly preoccupied by reflections upon socialism, which latter
is then dreamed to be everywhere the first form of association. This an
example of the importance assumed in Bastiat’s hands by the apologetic
commonplaces which accompany the course of development in the
economists’ writings.

To return to the economists. Of what does this fixity of wages consist?
Are wages immutably fixed? This would altogether contradict the law of
demand and supply, the basis of the determination of wages. No economist
denies the fluctuations, the rise and fall of wages. Or are wages
independent of crises? Or of machines which make wage labour redundant?
Or of divisions of labour, which displace it? To assert any of this
would be heterodox, and it is not asserted. What is meant is that in a
certain average, wages realize a fair average level, i.e. the minimum
wage for the whole class, a concept so hateful to Bastiat, and that a
certain average continuity of labour takes place, e.g. that wages may
continue on even in cases where profit falls or momentarily disappears
entirely. Now, what does this mean other than that, if wage labour is
presupposed as the dominant form of labour, as the foundation of
production, then the working class exists from wages, and that labour
individually possesses, on the average, the fixity of working for wages?
In other words, a tautology. Where capital and wage labour is the
dominant relation of production, there exists an average continuity of
wage labour, and, to that extent, a fixity of wages for the worker.
Where wage labour exists, it exists. And this is regarded by Bastiat as
its all-compensating attribute. Furthermore, that in the state of
society where capital is developed, social production as a whole is more
regular, continuous, all-sided – hence, also, the income of the elements
employed in it ‘more fixed’ – than where capital, i.e. production, is
not yet developed to this stage, is yet another tautology which is given
with the concept of capital itself and of production resting on it. In
other words: that the general presence of wage labour presupposes a
higher development of the productive forces than in the stages preceding
wage labour, who denies this? And what would lead the socialists to the
idea of raising higher demands if they did not presuppose this higher
development of the forces of social production, brought about by wage
labour? The latter is rather the presupposition of their demands.

_Note._ The first form in which wages make their general appearance –
military pay [_Sold_], which arises with the decline and fall of
national armies and of citizens’ militias. First, the citizens
themselves are paid as soldiers. Soon after that, their place is taken
by mercenaries who have ceased to be citizens.

(2) _(It is impossible to pursue this nonsense any further. We,
therefore, drop Mr Bastiat.)_

 

Editorial Notes

Page numbers in these notes refer to the printed edition of this
translation. ‘MELI’ refers to the German edition edited by the
Marx-Engels-Lenin Institute.

Introduction

1. Utopias on the lines of Defoe’s _Robinson Crusoe_.

2. Sir James Steuart (1712–80), ‘the rational exponent of the Monetary
and Mercantile System’ (Marx), an adherent of the Stuart cause who went
into exile in 1745 and pursued economic studies on the Continent. Author
of _An Inquiry into the Principles of Political Economy,_ London, 1767
(2 vols), Dublin, 1770 (3 vols – the edition used by Marx).

3. _A political animal._

4. Frédéric Bastiat (1801–50), French economist, and ‘modern bagman of
Free Trade’ (Marx). A believer in _laissez-faire_ and the natural
harmony of interests between labour and capital; a fierce opponent of
socialism in theory and in practice (as deputy in the Constituent and
Legislative Assemblies of 1848 to 1851).

5. Henry Charles Carey (1793–1879), American economist, opponent of
Ricardian pessimism (‘Carey, who does not understand Ricardo’ – Marx),
believed in state intervention to establish harmony between the
interests of labour and of capital, and in the tendency of real wages to
rise.

6. Of a commonplace (mind). Marx refers here to Bastiat’s _Harmonies
économiques,_ Paris, 1851, pp. 16–19, and Carey’s _Principles of
Political Economy,_ Pt I, Philadelphia, 1837, pp. 7–8.

7. John Stuart Mill (1806–73), English political theorist and economist;
radical in politics, confusedly and eclectically Ricardian in economics.
His _Principles of Political Economy,_ London, 1848, begin in Bk I, Ch.
1, with the analysis of production.

8. _MEW_ XIII omits ‘more’.

9. _MEW_ XIII substitutes ‘in consumption’.

10. _MEW_ XIII substitutes ‘products’.

11. ‘Determination is negation’, i.e., given the undifferentiated
self-identity of the universal world substance, to attempt to introduce
particular determinations is to negate this self-identity. (Spinoza,
_Letters_, No. 50, to J. Jelles, 2 June 1674.)

12. [Translator advised this note should be removed.]

13. ‘Potentially’. Cf. Aristotle, _Metaphysics_ Bk VIII, Ch. 6, 2.

14. The manuscript has: ‘for the product is production not only as … ‘.
_MEW_ XIII substitutes: ‘for the product is a product not as … ‘.

15. The manuscript has ‘for production’.

16. Jean-Baptiste Say (1767–1832), ‘the inane Say’, who ‘superficially
condensed political economy into a textbook’ (Marx), a businessman who
popularized and vulgarized the doctrines of Adam Smith in his _Traité
d’économie politique_, Paris, 1803.

17. Heinrich Friedrich Storch (1766–1835), Professor of Political
Economy in the Russian Academy of Sciences at St Petersburg. Say issued
Storch’s work _Cours d’économie politique_ with critical notes in 1823;
he attacked Say’s interpretation of his views in _Considérations sur la
nature du revenu national_, Paris, 1824, pp. 144–59.

18. David Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy and
Taxation_, 3rd edn, London, 1821, preface, p.v.

19. Marx considered that the Monetary System, as defined here, covered
economists from the sixteenth century to the Physiocrats. However,
within the Monetary System there arose what he calls here the
‘commercial, or manufacture system’ but elsewhere the Mercantile System
(known to economics textbooks as Mercantilism). He distinguishes between
the two systems on pp. 327–8, but his normal practice is to link them
together, since ‘the Mercantile System is merely a variant of the
Monetary System’ (A _Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy,_
London, 1971, p. 158).

20. ‘Potentially’. Cf. Aristotle, _Metaphysics_ Bk VIII, Ch. 6, 2.

21. Pierre Joseph Proudhon, _Système des contradictions économiques ou
philosophie de la misère,_ Paris, 1846, Vol. I, p. 146.

22. _Capital_ III (International Publishers edn), p. 110.

 

NOTEBOOK I: The Chapter on Money

 1. Alfred Darimon (1819–1902), a follower of Proudhon. He edited
Proudhonist newspapers in 1848, wrote on financial questions in the
1850s and was a democratic opponent of Napoleon III until 1864 when he
went over to the Bonapartists.

 2. In French in the original. Throughout this edition, passages in
French, Italian and Spanish have been translated in the main body of the
text; English has been left; Greek and Latin have been left in the text
and translated in the notes.

 3. Should read: ‘ … while the amount of securities decreases by
12,159,388; i.e. the decline of securities exceeds the decline of metal
… ’. The correction of these and similar errors would in no way touch
the substance of Marx’s conclusions concerning Darimon’s statistical
ideas.

 4. Isaac Péreire (1806–80), French banker and railway king who,
together with his brother Émile, founded the Crédit Mobilier in 1852. A
close associate of Napoleon III.

 5. Michel Chevalier (1806–79), follower of Saint-Simon up to 1833;
later Bonapartist. From 1850 he was Professor of Political Economy at
the Collège de France, and a supporter in the 1850s of Bonaparte’s move
towards free trade.

 6. Ricardo’s pamphlet, _Proposals for an Economical and Secure
Currency,_ London, 1816.

 7. A reference to the period during which the Bank Restriction Act was
in operation (1797–1819).

 8. A play on the two meanings of the French word _‘espèces’_: (1)
sorts; (2) specie.

 9. The Currency Act of 1844, which stringently limited the number of
banknotes the country banks could issue, and also limited the fiduciary
issue of the Bank of England to £14,000,000; any further issue had to be
backed by coin or bullion.

 10. Émile de Girardin (1806–81), French journalist, who edited _La
Presse_ from 1830 to 1857 and wrote the introduction to Darimon’s book.
A politician entirely lacking in scruples, he was a moderate republican
in 1848, a Montagnard deputy to the Legislative Assembly in 1850 and a
Bonapartist in 1852.

 11. Potentially. Cf. Aristotle, _Metaphysics,_ Bk VIII, Ch. 6, 2.

 12. John Francis Bray (1809–95), economic pamphleteer and political
activist in the England of the 1830s. In 1837 he became treasurer of the
Leeds Working Men’s Association. He advocated utopian socialist ideas in
the pamphlet _Labour’s Wrongs and Labour’s Remedy,_ Leeds, 1839, and was
described by Marx as an ‘English Communist’ (_The Poverty of
Philosophy,_ Moscow, 1966, p. 60).

 13. John Gray (1799–1850), economic pamphleteer and utopian socialist,
author of _The Social System,_ Edinburgh, 1831, and _Lectures on the
Nature and Use of Money,_ Edinburgh, 1848.

 14. See below, pp. 153–60.

 15. Hegel, _Science of Logic,_ tr. A. V. Miller, London, 1969, p. 416.

 16. Cf. Marx, _The Poverty of Philosophy,_ pp. 52–68.

 17. _Kaufmannsstand:_ This refers above all to the merchants of the
sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, who formed an ‘estate’ rather than
a ‘class’.

 

 18. The following two paragraphs are directed specifically against the
scheme outlined by John Gray in _The Social System,_ pp. 62–86.

19. This note refers to an unknown manuscript by Marx, which must be
older than his work of 1851 on ‘The Completed Money System’. Possibly it
refers to one of the missing parts of the manuscript of 1845–7 on the
‘Critique of Politics and Political Economy’, fragments of which are
reprinted in _Marx-Engels Gesamtausgabe_ (MEGA) 1/3, pp. 33–172, 437–583
and 592–6. The 1851 manuscript,’The Completed Money System’, is not
extant in full, and remains unpublished. [MELI note.]

20. This note refers to an unknown manuscript by Marx, which must be
older than his work of 1851 on ‘The Completed Money System’. Possibly it
refers to one of the missing parts of the manuscript of 1845–7 on the
‘Critique of Politics and Political Economy’, fragments of which are
reprinted in _Marx-Engels Gesamtausgabe_ (MEGA) 1/3, pp. 33–172, 437–583
and 592–6. The 1851 manuscript,’The Completed Money System’, is not
extant in full, and remains unpublished. [MELI note.]

21. Atistotle, _Nicomachean Ethics,_ Bk V, Ch. 5, para. 14.

 22. This is directed against the doctrines of the Romantic reaction, as
put forward by such people as Adam Müller (_Die Elemente der
Staatskunst,_ Berlin, 1809) and Thomas Carlyle (_Chartism,_ London,
1840).

 23. Menenius Agrippa (c. 530–493 B.C.) was a Roman patrician who is
said to have persuaded the plebeians to return to Rome by comparing the
patricians to the stomach and the plebeians to the limbs without which
the stomach could not survive.

24. ‘ … Thou visible God! / That solder’st close impossibilities, / And
mak’st them kiss! … ’ (_Timon of Athens,_ Act 4, Scene 3).

 25. ‘that accursed hunger for gold’ (Virgil, _Aeneid,_ Bk 3, line 57).

26. _par excellence._

27. Adam Smith, _An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of
Nations,_ new edition, London, 1843, Vol. I, pp. 100–101.

28. Steuart, _An Inquiry,_ Vol. I, p. 88.

 29. The discovery of gold in California and Australia in the 1850s.

30. Sir William Petty (1623–87), the ‘founder of political economy’
(Marx, _Theories of Surplus Value,_ p. 1) and an advocate of the labour
theory of value. Author of _A Treatise of Taxes,_ London, 1667, and
_Several Essays in Political Arithmetick,_ London, 1699.

 31. ‘And the pre-eminence of the land (Attica) is not only in the
things that bloom and wither annually: she has other good things that
last for ever. Nature has put in her abundance of stone etc. … Again,
there is land that yields no fruit if sown, and yet, when quarried,
feeds many times the number it could support if it grew corn’ (Xenophon,
_On Revenues,_ Ch. 1, printed in Xenophon, _Scripta minora,_ London,
1925, pp. 193–4).

32. See pp. 171–87.

33. See pp. 187–95.

34. ‘The inhabitants of this country are unusually handsome and large.
And they are frank in their dealings and not mercenary; for they do not
in general use coined money nor do they know any number greater than one
hundred, but carry on business by means of barter … They are also
unacquainted with accurate measures and weights’ (Strabo, _Geography_,
Bk XI, Ch. 4, section 4, London, 1917; Loeb edn, Vol. V, pp. 226–7).

35. There is no heading (1) in the original text.

36. _par excellence._

37. Hegel, _Philosophy of Nature,_ Glockner edn, Vol. IX, pp. 413–24.

38. See _Government School of Mines and Science Applied to the Arts.
Lectures on Gold for the Instruction of Emigrants about to Proceed to
Australia._  Delivered at the Museum of Practical Geology, London, 1852.
Marx’s page reference is incorrect. The last sentence comes from p. 12,
but the rest of the paragraph is from p. 10. The two preceding
paragraphs come from pp. 171–2 and p. 8 of this work, and the two
following ones from pp. 93–5 and 95–7 respectively.

39. Jacob Grimm, _Geschichte der deutschen Sprache,_ Vol. I, Leipzig,
1848, pp. 13–14.

40. A reference to Marx’s own excerpt-book, No. XIV (1851), p. 2 of
which contains the excerpt mentioned, from pp. 48–9 of Dureau de la
Malle, _Économie politique des Romains,_ Paris, 1840, Vol. I. In general
pp. 180–84 are based on excerpts from Dureau de la Malle’s work.

41. J.-A. Letronne, _Considérations générales sur l’évaluation des
monnaies grecques et romaines, et sur la valeur de l’or et de l’argent
avant la découverte de l’Amérique,_ Paris, 1817; W. Jacob, _An
Historical Inquiry into the Production and Consumption of the Precious
Metals,_ London, 1831; A. Böckh, _The Public Economy of Athens,_ London,
1842.

42. ‘Sandy desert rich in gold’.

43. ‘Of bronze were their implements; there was no black iron’ (Hesiod,
_Works and Days,_ line 151; Leob edn, London, 1914, p. 12).

44. ‘The use of bronze was known before iron’ (Lucretius, _De rerum
natura_, Bk V, line 1,287).

45. ‘Mining is prohibited by an old resolution of the Senate forbidding
the exploitation of Italy’ (Pliny, _Historia naturalis,_ Bk III, Ch. 20,
section 138).

 46. G. Garnier, _Histoire de la monnaie depuis les temps de la plus
haute antiquité jusqu’au règne de Charlemagne,_ Paris, 1819, Vol. I, p.
7.

 47. J. F. Reitemeier, _Geschichte des Bergbaues und Hüttenwesens bey
den alten Völkern,_ Göttingen, 1785, pp. 14, 15–16, 32.

48. Jacob, _An Historical Inquiry,_ Vol. I, p. 142.

 49. Dureau de la Malle, _Économie politique des Romains,_ Vol. I, pp.
62–3.

 50. The treasury.

51. Nassau Senior, _Three Lectures on the Cost of Obtaining Money,_
London, 1830, p. 15.

52. Garnier, _Histoire de la monnaie_, Vol. I, pp. 72, 73, 77, 78.

53. Marx discusses James Mill’s theory more fully later on.

54. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique_, Vol. I, pp. 81, 83, 84, 87,
88.

55. J.C-L. Simonde de Sismondi (1773–1842), Swiss political economist
and historian, who held that the value of a product was determined by
the quantity of labour needed to produce it, not by its cost. He was the
father of the romantic-reactionary opposition to capitalism. The
reference here is to _Études sur l’économie politique,_ Vol. II,
Brussels, 1838, pp. 264–5.

56. Jacob, _An Historical Inquiry,_ Vol. I, pp. 109, 351.

57. Steuart, _An Inquiry,_ Vol. I, pp. 395–6.

58. J. G. Hubbard (1805–89), English financier, a director of the Bank
of England in 1838, later a Conservative M.P. _The Currency and the
Country,_ London, 1843, pp. 44–6. Marx’s reference (VIII, 45) is to his
own excerpt-book.

59. Jacob, _An Historical Inquiry,_ Vol. II, p. 326.

60. Steuart, _An Inquiry,_ Vol. II, p. 389.

61. Marx may also be alluding to Hegel’s concept of _schlechte
Unendlichkeit_ (‘bad’ or ‘spurious’ infinity), an infinity of
connections merely piled on top of one another (_Science of Logic,_
Glockner edn, Vol IV, pp. 165–83).

62. Pierre le Pesant Boisguillebert (1646–1714). French judge and
precursor of the Physiocrats who opposed Mercantilism, upheld free
competition, and denounced the misery of the French agricultural
population, which, under Louis XIV, earned him exile to the Auvergne.

63. Boisguillebert, _Dissertation sur la nature des richesses, de
l’argent, et des tributs,_ printed in _Éonomistes Financiers du XVIIIe
siècle,_ ed. E. Daire, Paris, 1843, pp. 395 and 417.

64. _Kaufmannsstand:_ This refers above all to the merchants of the
sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, who formed an ‘estate’ rather than
a ‘class’.

 

65. See above, p. 146; money is ‘(3) representative of commodities
(hence object of contracts)’, and see below section c, ‘money as
material representative of wealth’, p. 203.

66. Steuart, _An Inquiry,_ Vol. I, pp. 395–6.

67. F.-L.-A. Ferrier, _Du gouvernement considéré dans ses rapports avec
le commerce_, Paris, 1805, p. 35. Ferrier (1777–1861) was a high French
customs official who both operated and wrote in favour of Napoleon I’s
protective system.

68. Louis Say (1774–1840), brother of Jean-Baptiste Say, issued a number
of economic pamphlets criticizing the latter’s opinions. The reference
here is to _Principales Causes de la richesse ou de la misère des
peuples et des particuliers,_ Paris, 1818, pp. 31–2.

69. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. II, Bk 2, pp. 270–77.

70. Edward Solly, _The Present Distress in Relation to the Theory of
Money,_ London, 1830, p. 5.

71. James Maitland, Earl of Lauderdale (1759–1839), Whig, then Tory,
politician, author of economic works attacking Smith’s distinction
between productive and unproductive labour. Marx refers here to the
French translation of one of his books, entitled _Recherches sur la
nature et l’origine de la richesse publique, et sur les moyens et les
causes qui concourent à son accroissement,_ Paris, 1808, p. 140.

72. James Taylor, _A View to the Money System of England, from the
Conquest; with Proposals for Establishing a Secure and Equitable Credit
Currency,_ London, 1828, pp. 18–19.

73. Sismondi, _Études,_ Vol. II, p. 278.

74. ibid., p. 300.

75. ‘The epitome of all things’ (Boisguillebert, _Dissertation,_ p.
399).

NOTEBOOK II: The Chapter on Money (continuation)

1. ‘that accursed hunger for gold’ (Virgil, _Aeneid,_ Bk 3, line 57).

2. The term _Gemeinwesen_ also carries the nuances ‘common essence’,
‘common system’ and ‘common being’.

3. Steuart, _An Inquiry,_ Vol. I, p. 327.

4. T. R. Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy,_ London, 1836, p.
391.

5. Edward Misselden (seventeenth-century Mercantilist writer, active in
the Merchant Adventurers’ Company, d. 1654), _Free Trade, or the Meanes
to Make Trade Flourish,_ London, 1622, pp. 19–24.

6. German: _Akkumulation._ But Marx presumably intended this word to
have the sense _Anhäufung_ (piling-up), as on the previous page, rather
than the more technical economic sense he usually gives to the word.

7. Jacob, _An Historical Inquiry,_ Vol. II, pp. 271–323.

8. Petty, _Political Arithmetick,_ pp. 178–9.

9. Misselden, _Free Trade,_ pp. 7, 12–13.

10. The notes on Boisguillebert are in an unnumbered excerpt-book
compiled in June and July 1845 and printed in _MEGA_, 1/3, pp. 568–79.
Marx discussed Boisguillebert’s polemic against the power of money in _A
Contribution to the Critique of Political Economy_, London, 1971, pp.
54–5 and 124–6.

11. Nassau Senior, _Principes fondamentaux de l’économie politique,
tirés de leçons édites et inédites,_ Paris, 1836, pp. 116–17. (This is
the translation by J. Arrivabene of Senior’s _Outline of the Science of
Political Economy,_ London, 1836). Senior himself (1790–1864) was an
English political economist, a member of numerous mid-nineteenth-century
government commissions, Professor of Political Economy in Oxford from
1847 to 1852, and noted for his two theories, that the profit of capital
is the product of the last hour of the working day, and that the
accumulation of capital results from the abstinence of the capitalist
from consumption.

12. Samuel Bailey (1791–1870, successful Sheffield businessman, ‘coarse
practical bourgeois’ (Marx), and author of several economic pamphlets
against Ricardo’s theory of value), _Money and its Vicissitudes in
Value; as They Affect National Industry and Pecuniary Contracts; with a
Postscript on Joint-Stock Banks,_ published anonymously, London, 1837,
p. 3.

13. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique,_ Vol. II, p. 135.

14. Bailey, _Money and its Vicissitudes,_ pp. 9–11.

15. Piercy Ravenstone, _Thoughts on the Funding System and its Effects_
London, 1824, p. 20.

16. ‘These have one mind, and shall give their power and strength unto
the beast’ (Revelation xvii, 13); ‘And that no man might buy or sell,
save that he had the mark, or the name of the beast, or the number of
his name’ (Revelation xiii, 17).

17. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique_, Vol. I, pp. 72–3.

 

NOTEBOOK II: The Chapter on Capital

 18. The first few pages of the Chapter on Capital (pp. 239–50) were
entitled by Marx ‘Chapter on Money as Capital’.

 19. Charles Ganilh (1758–1836, French neo-Mercantilist economist, an
advocate of the Napoleonic Continental System), _Des systèmes d’économie
politique, de leurs inconvéniences, de leurs avantages, et de la
doctrine la plus favorable aux progrès de la richesse des nations,_
Paris, 1809. Vol. II. pp. 64–5.

 20. Say, _Traité d’économie politique_, Vol. II, pp. 480–82.

 21. _Sein für andres_ is a basic concept of Hegel’s logic, described in
the _Science of Logic_ (p. 119 of the translation by A. V. Miller,
London, 1969) as ‘a negation of the simple relation of being to itself
which is supposed to be determinate being’. However, it is paired, not
with _Sein für sich_, but with _Sein in sich_ (being in itself,
described as ‘something returned into itself out of the being for
other’). In any case, it is difficult to detect any relation between
Marx’s use of _Sein für andres_ and Hegel’s use. The situation is
different with the concept of _Sein für sich_, since Hegel described
being for self in the _Lesser Logic_ (p. 179 of the translation by W.
Wallace, Oxford, 1892) in the following way: ‘Being for self is a
self-subsistent, the One’, and added ‘The readiest instance of being for
self is found in the “I”.’ This comes close to Marx’s ‘each individual …
as an end in himself’.

22. _Institutes_, Bk II, Title IX, para. 3 ‘A slave, who is in the power
of another person, can have nothing of his own’ (_The Institutes of
Justinian_, tr. J. B. Moyle, Oxford, 1906, p. 58).

 23. See Marx’s critique of Proudhon’s doctrine of exchange value in
_Poverty of Philosophy_, pp. 37–8.

24. The socialist opponents of Bastiat, in particular Proudhon. This
passage is in fact a critique of the discussion between Bastiat and
Proudhon, printed as F. Bastiat et P.-J. Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit_,
Paris, 1850, pp. 1–20, 32–47 and 285–6.

25. Say, _Traité d’économie politique_, Vol. II, pp. 428–30 and 478–80.

26. The German text has here ‘the other’, but since the reference back
is to ‘landed property itself’ this has been replaced with ‘the latter’.

27. The German reads ‘as’, the sense seems to require ‘the’.

28. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_ (tr. A. V. Miller), p. 71: ‘That into
which the movement returns as into its _ground_ is (also) _result._’

29. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations_, Vol. II, pp. 355–6.

 30. The reference is to Marx’s own excerpt-book; the quotation is from
Ganilh, _Des systèmes d’économie politique_, Vol. II, pp. 11–12.

31. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, pp. 106–8, 129–31.

32. The reference is to Marx’s own excerpt-book; the quotation is from
Say, _Traité d’économie politique,_ Vol. II, p. 185.

33. Sismondi, _Nouveaux Principes d’économie politique_, Paris, 1827,
Vol. I, p. 89.

34. Marx used brackets (shown here by < and >) to indicate a digression.

35. Bastiat et Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit_, p. 250.

36. ibid., pp. 177–80.

37. Constituted value is ‘_valeur faite_’; most perfect value is ‘valeur
la plus parfaite’, ibid., p. 183.

38. For Ricardo’s discussion of the effects of difficulties of
cultivation on rent, see _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ pp
55–75.

39. Say, _Traité d’économie politique_, Vol. I, pp.2–6.

40. The ‘Misère’: Proudhon’s _Système des contradictions économiques, ou
philosophie de la misère._ His doctrine of exchange value is put forward
in Vol. I, pp 39–50.

41. See above, pp. 260–61.

42. ‘The epitome of all things’ (Boisguillebert, _Dissertation,_ p.
399).

43. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique_, Vol. I, p. 154.

44. As in Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations_, Vol. I, pp. 131–2.

45. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations_, Vol. II, pp. 355–85.

46. Storch’s views in _Considérations_, pp. 38–50; Senior’s in
_Principes fondamentaux_, pp. 284–308.

47. Steuart, _An Inquiry_, Vol. I, p. 45.

48. Edward Gibbon Wakefield (1796–1862) was an English diplomat and
economist, who put forward his views on the colonies in _A View of the
Art of Colonization, with Present Reference to the British Empire,_
London, 1849. He proposed that the government should reserve land in the
colonies and put a higher price on it than prevailed in the open market.

 49. Cf. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations_, Vol. I, pp. 104–5.

 50. A reference to the abstinence theory advanced by Nassau Senior
(_Principes fondamentaux_, pp. 307–8).

51. As in Charles Babbage, _Traité sur l’économie des machines et des
manufactures._ Traduit de l’anglais sur la troisième édition, Paris,
1833, pp. 329–51.

 52. Simon Linguet, (1736–94) was a French lawyer and historian, a
conservative critic of the Enlightenment and of the economics of the
Physiocrats, an opponent of the French Revolution. He was guillotined
during the Terror. The reference here is to his book _Théorie des lois
civiles, ou principes fondamentaux de la société_, published anonymously
in London, 1767, Vol. II, pp. 462–8.

53. The manuscript breaks off here, and the following page (page 29) is
missing. Marx noted its contents as follows: ‘Capital a merely objective
power _vis-à-vis_ the worker. Without personal value. Distinction from
the performance of service. Purpose of the worker in the exchange with
capital – consumption. Must always begin anew. _Labour_ as the _capital_
of the _worker_’ (_Grundrisse_ (MELI), p. 953).

 

NOTEBOOK III: The Chapter on Capital (continuation)

1. This is the continuation from the missing final page of the previous
notebook. The first seven pages of the present (third) notebook are
taken up by the section ‘Bastiat and Carey’ (see pp. 883–93), which was
written in July 1857. The present text begins, then, on the eighth page
of the third notebook, which carries the date _‘29th, 30th November,
December’_ in Marx’s hand. See _Grundrisse_ (MELI), pp. 200 n., 842 n.

2. Cf. Hegel, _Philosophy of Right_, para. 67: ‘I can give to someone
else the use of my abilities for a restricted period … but by alienating
the whole of my time I would be making the substance of my being into
another’s property.’

3. As in P. Gaskell, _Artisans and Machinery,_ London, 1836, pp. 261–2.

4. Potentially.

5. Antoine Cherbuliez (1797–1869, Swiss lawyer and economist, follower
of Sismondi, although he added some elements of Ricardian theory),
_Richesse ou pauvreté: Exposition des causes et des effets de la
distribution actuelle des richesses sociales_, Paris, 1841, p. 16.

6. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, p. 753: ‘The third relation, mechanism
… is a sublating (_aufheben_) of the means, of the object already
posited as sublated, and is therefore a second sublating and a
reflection-into-self.’

7. For example John Gray, _The Social System_, p. 36, and J. F. Bray,
_Labour’s Wrongs_, pp. 157–76.

8. See below, pp. 316–18 and pp. 461–71.

 9. See below, pp. 310–12.

10. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations_, Vol. II, pp. 355–85.

11. Senior, _Principes fondamentaux_, pp. 197–206.

12. Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy_, p. 47, footnote by the
editor, William Otter, Bp of Chichester.

13. Sismondi, _Nouveaux Principes_, Vol. I, p. 90.

14. ibid., p. 105.

15. Cherbuliez, _Richesse ou pauvreté_, pp. 58, 64.

16. For example John Gray, _The Social System_, p. 36, and J. F. Bray,
_Labour’s Wrongs_, pp. 157–76.

17. In Ricardo: _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 320–37. In
Sismondi: _Études_, Vol. I, p. 22.

18. The MELI edition gives _lassen_ (let, leave) rather than _fassen_
(grasp, conceive, formulate); this is almost certainly either a misprint
(the first of two on that page) or a misreading.

19. Say, _Traité d’économie politique_, Vol. II, p. 429 n.

 20. Sismondi, _Études_, Vol. II, p. 273.

21. This is Adam Smith’s phrase, not Ricardo’s (Smith, _Wealth of
Nations,_ Vol. II, p. 355).

22. Say, _Traité d’économie politique_, Vol II, p. 425.

23. ‘Capital has value, labour produces.’ Proudhon, _Système des
contradictions économiques,_ Vol. I, p. 61.

24. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, p. 633: ‘In the judgement the subject
is determined by the predicate … the predicate is determined in the
subject.’

25. ‘The act of producing’.

26. Incidental ‘false’ expenses of production: the category into which
the political economists from Adam Smith onwards relegated the cost of
maintaining necessary but unproductive workers, e.g. soldiers, doctors
etc.

27. Bastiat et Proudhon, _Gratuité du credit_, p. 180.

28. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, pp. 717–18; ‘The action passes over
into _rest_. It shows itself to be a merely _superficial_, transient
alteration in the self-enclosed indifferent totality of the object. This
return constitutes the _product_ of the mechanical process.’

29. Sir George Ramsay (1800–1871, philosopher and political economist,
the first to distinguish between constant and variable capital), _An
Essay on the Distribution of Wealth_, Edinburgh, 1836, p. 184.

30. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, p. 131.

31. Incidental ‘false’ expenses of production: the category into which
the political economists from Adam Smith onwards relegated the cost of
maintaining necessary but unproductive workers, e.g. soldiers, doctors
etc.

32. As in Carey, _Principles of Political Economy_, Pt I, p. 338.

33. Bastiat et Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit_, pp. 65–74. For Marx’s
later discussions of the polemic between Bastiat and Proudhon, see pp.
640–41, 754–8, 843–5.

34. ‘A distinction is to be drawn between this, on one side, and the
accumulation of capitals, on the other; the latter presupposes its
relations to labour, prices (fixed capital and circulating capital),
interest and profit.’ Our reconstruction is based on a comparison with
the passage on p. 310 where a distinction is drawn between ‘capital in
the process of its becoming’ and ‘the later relations’ or ‘the specific
form in which capital is posited at a _certain_ point’. Marx is
repeating this distinction here, but in a different manner.

35. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 1–3.

36. See above, pp. 297–303.

37. The expression in full is _‘travailler pour le roi de Prusse’_ (‘to
work for the king of Prussia’), i.e. to work for the purposes of another
without recompense.

38. See below, pp. 883–5.

39. _The Times_, London, Saturday, 21 November 1857, No. 22,844, p. 9.
‘Negroes and the Slave Trade. To the Editor of _The Times._ By
Expertus.’ Marx’s English in this sentence has been changed to conform
to modern usage.

40. See below, pp. 419–20, 464–9, 471–514, 547–8.

41. This is a generalized reference to Malthus’s numerous discussions of
value, e.g. in _Principles of Political Economy_, London, 1836, pp.
50–135, _The Measure of Value_, London, 1823, and _Definitions in
Political Economy,_ London, 1827, pp. 23–36.

42. Ricardo’s polemic against Smith, in _On the Principles of Political
Economy_, pp. 4–12; Ricardo on the effect on value of difficulties of
production, pp. 60–67; the essential difference between value and
wealth, p. 320; the theory of ground rent, pp. 53–75; the theory of
international trade, pp. 131–61.

43. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations_, Vol. II, p. 356.

44. Victor, Marquis de Mirabeau (1715–89), was an eccentric French
aristocrat converted by Quesnay to the cause of Physiocracy in the
1750s, who subsequently wrote two of the main Physiocratic works, the
_Théorie de l’impôt_ (1760) and the _Philosophie rurale_ (1763).

 

45. A reference back to the brief discussion of Ricardo on pp. 326–7.

46. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 120–25.

47. pp. 326–7.

48. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, pp. 131–7, especially p. 132:
‘Something’s own boundary posited by it as a negative which is at the
same time essential, is not merely boundary as such but barrier.’ Also,
p. 135: ‘The sentient creature, in the limitation of hunger, thirst,
etc., is the drive to go beyond its limiting barrier, and it does
overcome it.’

49. Leonard Horner (1785–1864) was originally a geologist, and from 1833
to 1860 Chief Factory Inspector in Lancashire. His many reports on
factory conditions there were an important source for Marx in the
writing of _Capital_; the reference here would be to one of Horner’s
reports on the breaches of the Ten Hours’ Act committed by manufacturers
during the 1850s.

50. This is a slip of the pen on Marx’s part. The ‘previous relation’
was 6/8 = 12/16, not 5/8 = 10/16. Therefore the total surplus value was
higher by 3/16 not 5/16.

51. This should read 999/1,000,000 = 1/(1,001 + 1/999).

52. In English in the original.

 53. This seems to refer back to the value of the capital rather than
the material production (the latter would still be 26s.).

54. Babbage, _Traité sur l’économie des machines et des manufactures_,
pp. 218–19.

 55. The ‘perceptive’ publisher was the editor of Eugène Daire
(1798–1847), who issued the works of the Physiocrats during the 1840s.
The comments on Boisguillebert are in _Économistes financiers du XVIIIe
siècle,_ Paris, 1843, p. 419, notes 1 and 2.

56. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 88–92.

57. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 327–8.

58. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 29–35

 59. This refers to Marx’s notebooks of excerpts from the works of
Ricardo, with Marx’s critical commentary. A section of one of the
excerpt-books in this series is published in _Grundrisse_ (MELI), pp.
787–839. Marx wrote these notebooks, which contain, additionally,
excerpts from ten works by other authors, as well as from various
volumes of _The Economist_, in early 1851. See _Grundrisse_ (MELI), p.
782 n.

 60. The following sentence appears in the upper margin of this page of
the manuscript, without indication of the place in the text where it
might be inserted: ‘(_Money_ for itself has to be termed neither use
value nor exchange value, but _value_.)’

 61. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 327–8.

62. A reference to Marx’s own excerpt-book VIII. Ricardo’s doctrine of
foreign trade (_On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 131–8) is
covered in _Grundrisse_ (MELI), pp. 808–11.

63. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 416–17.

64. See above, n. 41.

65. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, pp. 450–56, e.g. p. 451: ‘Matter is
that which is indifferent to form.’

66. This should be 32, not 16, since 2/5 of 40 is itself already 16.

67. This should be 40%. In these passages, the use of the term
‘interest’ (_Zins_) is, strictly speaking, incorrect; it should read
‘surplus value’. Similarly, in some passages further on, the terminology
does not correspond in every case with Marx’s later usage.

NOTEBOOK IV: The Chapter on Capital (continuation)

1. Carey, _Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 15–16, 27–48.

2. Dr Richard Price (1723–91; Nonconformist minister and writer on
political and financial subjects), _An Appeal to the Public on the
Subject of the National Debt_, London, 1772, p. 19. See below, pp.
842–3.

3. In 1786 William Pitt the Younger established a sinking fund of
£1,000,000 in accordance with Dr Price’s proposals.

4. 50: material of labour; 10: instrument of labour; 40: wages of
labour.

5. The numerical examples above and below contained occasional, always
trivial, errors of arithmetic. The corrections, as indicated by MELI,
have been implicitly substituted here, unless noted.

6. In the following table the quantity of value is always expressed in
thalers.

7. C. Babbage, _Traité sur l’économie des machines et des manufactures_,
p. 29.

 8. Bastiat et Proudhon,  _Gratuité du crédit,_  pp. 127–32, 135–7, 288.

 9. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 117–19.

10. This is a continuation of the critique of Ricardo, broken off on p.
353.

11. See below, pp. 765–71.

12. Lauderdale, _Recherches sur la nature et l’origine de la richesse
publique_, p. 137.

13. See above, pp. 373–8.

14. Quotations taken from pp. 4–6 of an anonymous pamphlet published in
London in 1821 and entitled _The Source and Remedy of the National
Difficulties, deduced from principles of political economy in a letter
to Lord John Russell._

15. Ravenstone, _Thoughts on the Funding System and its Effects,_ pp.
11, 13, 45–6.

16. The original text has ‘more productive’ here.

17. See below, pp. 459–515.

18. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, pp. 546–7.

 

19. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_ (tr. A. V. Miller), p. 71: ‘That into
which the movement returns as into its _ground_ is (also) _result._’

20. See above, p. 401.

21. Marx wrote this sentence in English. The word ‘spurred’ is a
suggested emendation in place of the word ‘occurred’ which appears in
the original text.

22. J. R. MacCulloch (1789–1864), statistician and economist, editor of
the _Scotsman_ from 1818 to 1828, Professor of Political Economy in
London from 1828 to 1832, ‘past master in pretentious cretinism’, ‘at
once the vulgarizer of Ricardian economics and the most pitiful image of
its dissolution’ (Marx).

23. MacCulloch, The _Principles of Political Economy,_ Edinburgh, 1825,
pp. 166–90.

24. James Mill, _Éléments d’économie politique,_ Paris, 1823, pp.
250–60.

25. Bastiat et Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit_, pp. 65–74. For Marx’s
later discussions of the polemic between Bastiat and Proudhon, see pp.
640–41, 754–8, 843–5.

26. A reference to the pamphlet _The Currency Question. The Gemini
Letters,_ London, 1844, written by two upholders of the currency
doctrines of the Birmingham banker Thomas Attwood, T. B. Wright and J.
Harlow. See below, pp. 804–5.

27. Heinrich Friedrich Storch (1766–1835), Professor of Political
Economy in the Russian Academy of Sciences at St Petersburg. Say issued
Storch’s work _Cours d’économie politique_ with critical notes in 1823;
he attacked Say’s interpretation of his views in _Considérations sur la
nature du revenu national_, Paris, 1824, pp. 144–59.

28. Malthus, _Principles,_ p. 405; _Definitions,_ pp. 258–9. Sismondi,
_Études,_ Vol. I, p. 61 n.

29. _‘Socialistically’:_ in the manner of the early utopian socialists,
in particular John Gray; see above, pp. 153–6.

30. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 80–85.

31. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ pp. 244–6.

32. Thomas Hodgskin (1787–1869) was a socialist journalist and agitator
active in the 1820s. In his economic works he developed the socialist
implications in Ricardo’s theory of value, in particular in _Labour
Defended against the Claims of Capital_ (1825) and _Popular Political
Economy_ (1827).

33. Hodgskin, _Popular Political Economy,_ pp. 245–6.

34. _The Source and Remedy of the National Difficulties,_ London, 1821,
pp. 17–18.

35. _An Inquiry into those Principles Respecting the Nature of Demand
and the Necessity of Consumption Lately Advocated by Mr Malthus,_
anonymous pamphlet, London, 1821, p. 59.

36. Hodgskin, _Popular Political Economy,_ p. 238.

37. ibid., p. 246.

38. Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 266, 301, 302, 315,
372–82, in part paraphrased by Marx.

39. ibid., p. 405, note by the editor, William Otter.

40. ibid., p. 414, note by Malthus.

41. See above, p. 411, and note 24.

42. Say, _Traité d’économie politique,_ pp. 142–56.

43. Marx wrote ‘not else’ in English here.

44. Bastiat et Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit,_ pp. 207–8.

45. For Bastiat’s view, see _Gratuité du_ crédit, pp. 127–32.

46. Marx wrote 4 9/20 thalers when he meant to write 4 10/20 thalers.
This naturally affects the subsequent calculations, which should be
amended as follows: 80 lb. at 4 10/20 thalers a pound = 360 thalers. 360
thalers + 90 = 270. 270 − 216 = 54. 360 − 54 = 306. 54 represents 15%
profit on 360 thalers.

47. The substitution of ‘wheat’ for ‘grain’ here and at subsequent
points has no bearing on Marx’s argument. He uses the two words
interchangeably.

48. Samuel Jones Loyd (1796–1883, banker and economist, expert witness
before the Parliamentary Commissions of 1833, 1840, 1848, and 1857,
author of numerous pamphlets on money and banking, leading theorist of
the Currency School in the controversy over Peel’s Act of 1844, created
Baron Overstone in 1860). The source of this quotation has not been
found; it is most probably from the _Evidence Presented to the House of
Commons Select Committee of 1857,_ ed. J. R. MacCulloch, London, 1858.

49. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic,_ pp. 344–7.

50. This sentence is in English in the original.

51. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ p. 139.

52. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic,_ p. 600: ‘This universal Notion
contains the three moments: universality, particularity, and
individuality.’

 

53. The original text has ‘personifications’, evidently referring back
to ‘conditions’.

54. _Sein für andres_ is a basic concept of Hegel’s logic, described in
the _Science of Logic_ (p. 119 of the translation by A. V. Miller,
London, 1969) as ‘a negation of the simple relation of being to itself
which is supposed to be determinate being’. However, it is paired, not
with _Sein für sich_, but with _Sein in sich_ (being in itself,
described as ‘something returned into itself out of the being for
other’). In any case, it is difficult to detect any relation between
Marx’s use of _Sein für andres_ and Hegel’s use. The situation is
different with the concept of _Sein für sich_, since Hegel described
being for self in the _Lesser Logic_ (p. 179 of the translation by W.
Wallace, Oxford, 1892) in the following way: ‘Being for self is a
self-subsistent, the One’, and added ‘The readiest instance of being for
self is found in the “I”.’ This comes close to Marx’s ‘each individual …
as an end in himself’.

55. Having themselves become = having themselves undergone the process
of becoming, as indicated on pp. 459–60.

56. On 22 February 1858, Marx wrote to Lassalle that he was planning
three works: (1) a critique of the economic categories or the system of
bourgeois economy critically presented, (2) a critique and history of
political economy and socialism, and (3) a short historical sketch of
the development of economic relations or categories (_Marx-Engels
Selected Correspondence,_ Moscow n.d., p. 125). Marx referred here to
the third work, which he never produced in a completed form. Pages
459–514 of the present edition would no doubt have formed part of it.

57. _Do ut facias:_ I give that you may do; _facio ut des:_ I do that
you may give; _do ut des:_ I give that you may give. (Roman law.)

58. That is, with the free workers in manufactures (hand crafts).

59. Steuart, _An Inquiry,_ Vol. I, p. 40.

60. Marx did not in fact mention this in the Chapter on Money but rather
on pp. 272–3, in the Chapter on Capital.

61. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. I, pp. 104–5.

62. State property.

63. The word _Stamm_ here refers broadly to any extended kinship
grouping; e.g. clan, tribe, _gens,_ etc.

64. _Geschlechter_ may also refer to the sexes, linguistic groups,
generations, etc. It is not entirely certain which of these distinctions
Marx had foremost in mind here.

65. This is one possible reconstruction of the sentence beginning ‘The
commune’, which has a number of grammatical loose ends in the original.
Two other possible variants are presented in _Pre-Capitalist Economic
Formations,_ tr. J. Cohen, London, 1964, p. 73.

66. Craftsmen, workers.

67. Georg Niebuhr, _Römische Geschichte. Erster Theil. Zweyte, völlig
umgearbeitete, Ausgabe,_ Berlin, 1827, p. 245.

68. The property of the _quirites,_ i.e. the Romans.

69. ‘No Roman citizen was permitted to earn a livelihood as a tradesman
or artisan’ (Dionysius of Halicarnassus. _Roman Antiquities_, Bk IV, Ch.
25).

70. The passages in pointed brackets, on pp. 477–8, are taken from
Niebuhr’s _Römische Geschichte. Erster Theil,_ and in this order: (1) p.
148; (2) pp. 435–6; (3) pp. 614–15 and footnotes 1224 and 1225; (4) pp.
317–18; (5) pp. 326–35.

NOTEBOOK V: The Chapter on Capital (continuation)

1. Cicero, _Letters to Atticus,_ Vol. V, 21, lines 10–13; Vol. VI, 1,
lines 3–7; Vol. VI, 2, lines 7–10.

2. P.-J. Proudhon, _Système des contradictions économiques,_ Vol. II, p.
265.

3. Latin plural of _iugerum,_ a Roman measure of land.

4. Political animal; literally, city-dweller.

5. The term _Gemeinwesen_ also carries the nuances ‘common essence’,
‘common system’ and ‘common being’.

 

6. Aliens who resided in Athens but were not classed as citizens.

7. According to Roman tradition, Numa Pompilius was the second king of
Rome.

8. Citizens of one Greek city-state who were granted full citizenship in
another.

9. Antoine Cherbuliez (1797–1869, Swiss lawyer and economist, follower
of Sismondi, although he added some elements of Ricardian theory),
_Richesse ou pauvreté: Exposition des causes et des effets de la
distribution actuelle des richesses sociales_, Paris, 1841, p. 16.

10. Bastiat et Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit_, pp. 65–74. For Marx’s
later discussions of the polemic between Bastiat and Proudhon, see pp.
640–41, 754–8, 843–5.

11. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. III, Bk III, Ch. 4.

12. ‘This’ refers back to ‘manufacture’. See the definition of ‘factory’
given by Ure, cited by Marx on p. 690.

13. This statement is taken directly from Du Cange, _Glossarium mediae
et infimae Latinitatis,_ ed. G. A. L. Henschel, Paris, 1842, Vol. 2, p.
139, article entitled ‘2. Capitale’. However, Du Cange was wrong. The
word ἀρχεῖα means ‘government buildings’, never ‘loan’ or ‘principal sum
of money owed’ as suggested there; the Greek word for loan, which Du
Cange probably had in mind, is χρέοϛ.

14. _métairie:_ share-cropping, the modern _métayage. Bail de bestes à
cheptel:_ lease with livestock as capital. Cf. Du Cange, _Glossarium,_
Vol. 2, p. 139.

15. ‘Those who have to pay a head tax’.

16. Adam H. Müller (1774–1829, leading advocate of the Romantic reaction
in history and economics during the early nineteenth century; Austrian
state official under Metternich, ennobled for his propagandistic
activities), _Die Elemente der Staatskunst, Erster Theil,_ Berlin, 1809,
pp. 226–41.

17. ‘I shall grant a tenth part of my own to God both in livestock and
in dead fruits of the earth’, quoted by Du Cange, _Glossarium_, p. 140,
from Athelstan’s Ordinance of 925 on tithes.

18. See above, pp. 457–8.

19. ‘(false!)’ was inserted afterwards, above the line. [MELI note]

20. In English in the original.

21. Marx’s distinction between _Rohstoff_ and _Rohmaterial_ has no
English equivalent. _Rohstoff_ is the raw material in its pristine
state, before being subjected to human labour; _Rohmaterial_ is the raw
material which has been formed by human labour but has yet to enter into
the final product. Cf. _Capital,_ Vol. I, Moscow, 1954, pp. 178–82.

22. See above, p. 402.

23. See above, pp. 256–7.

24. _par excellence._

25. Cf. Hegel, _System of Philosophy,_ I, _Logic,_ para. 161: ‘The
concept remains at home with itself in its process; no new content is
posited by the process, only an alteration of form is produced.’

26. Sismondi, _Nouveaux Principes d’économie politique,_ Vol. I, p. 89.
See above, p. 261.

27. ibid., Vol. I, pp. 91–2.

28. Cherbuliez, _Richesse ou pauvreté,_ p. 64.

29. In Cherbuliez; raw material, instrument of labour, and supply of
articles of consumption. See above, p. 299.

30. Cherbuliez, _Richesse ou pauvreté,_ pp. 25–6.

31. William Thompson (1783–1833) was an Irish landowner who embraced
Owenism, and criticized political economy from a utopian socialist
position, but on the basis of Ricardo’s doctrines.

32. ‘That’, i.e. ‘that situation’.

33. ‘Of the same’ (_desselben_) probably refers back to ‘recognition of
nature ([and] practical power over nature)’. The contraction is
ambiguous.

34. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique,_ Vol. I, pp. 411–12.

35. Malthus, _The Measure of Value Stated and Illustrated, with an
Application of it to the Alterations in the Value of the English
Currency since 1790,_ London, 1823, p. 17.

36. William Thompson, _An Inquiry into the Principles of the
Distribution of Wealth, Most Conducive to Human Happiness, Applied to
the Newly Proposed System of Voluntary Equality of Wealth,_ London,
1824, p. 176.

37. Ramsay, _An Essay on the Distribution of Wealth,_ p. 55.

38. Incidental ‘false’ expenses of production: the category into which
the political economists from Adam Smith onwards relegated the cost of
maintaining necessary but unproductive workers, e.g. soldiers, doctors
etc.

39. Thomas de Quincey (1785–1859), the essayist, author of _Confessions
of an Opium Eater,_ was also a writer on political economy, and a
follower of Ricardo.

40. Ramsay, _An Essay on the Distribution of Wealth,_ p. 43. The
references are to the page numbers of Ramsay’s book. The quotations
themselves are as usual in a mixture of English and German.

41. ibid., p. 55.

 

42. Misunderstandings on _Ramsay’s_ part (cf. Ramsay, _An Essay,_ p. 22
n.) in which he followed Ricardo’s own misunderstandings (cf. Ricardo,
_On the Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 5, 7–8, 9).

43. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. I, pp. 101–2, 131–4.

44. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 338–9.

45. ibid., p. 3: ‘In speaking of commodities … we mean commodities … on
the production of which competition operates without restraint.’

46. ibid., p. 86.

47. De Quincey, _The Logic of Political Economy,_ Edinburgh, 1844, p.
204.

48. De Quincey, _Logic of Political Economy,_ p. 204.

NOTEBOOK VI: The Chapter on Capital (continuation)

1. Carey, _Principles of Political Economy,_ Part I, p. 99.

2. J. R. MacCulloch, _The Principles of Political Economy,_ London,
1825, pp. 313–18.

3. The extracts from Ricardo appear in a ‘Notebook VIII’ of an earlier
series of notebooks dated 1851. Excerpts are printed in _Grundrisse_
(MELI) as an appendix, omitted in the present edition.

4. R.5: Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ p. 5 (in fact
p. 3).

5. The page numbers in Ricardo refer to the third edition (1821).

6. Bray, _Labour’s Wrongs,_ p. 48.

7. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. I, pp. 100–102, 130–31.

8. Marx, here as elsewhere, quotes in his own abbreviated German. The
text therefore differs slightly from Ricardo’s original. Compare
Ricardo, _Principles,_ p. 5.

9. Wakefield, _A View of the Art of Colonization,_ p. 169.

10. Should read 4.7%, but the error has been taken over from Malthus
himself. Cf. Malthus, _Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 269–70. Two
other petty errors of arithmetic in these passages have been corrected
as indicated by the MELI editors.

11. Ravenstone, _Thoughts on the Funding System,_ p. 11.

12. Malthus, _The Measure of Value,_ p. 33.

13. ibid.

14. Malthus, The _Measure of Value,_ p. 29.

15. Carey, _Principles of Political Economy,_ Part I, pp. 76–8.

16. ibid., p. 99.

17. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. I, pp. 230–31, note by
Wakefield the editor.

18. Albert Gallatin (1761–1849; American public figure of Swiss origin,
academic, diplomat, and banker, author of many books on financial
questions), _Considerations on the Currency and Banking System of the
United States,_ Philadelphia, 1831, p. 68.

19. John Wade (1788–1875) was a journalist and historian, and
parliamentary reformer, who worked for a long time with the _Spectator,_
and whose _History of the Middle and Working Classes_ was described by
Marx as ‘theoretically … original in some parts … historically … a
shameless plagiarism from Sir F. M. Eden’.

20. Gaskell, _Artisans and Machinery,_ pp. 111–14.

21. Babbage, _Traité sur l’économie,_ p. 485.

22. Pellegrino Rossi (1787–1848; Italian political economist, supporter
of Napoleon I, in exile from 1815, first in Geneva then in France,
professor of political economy at the Collège de France 1833–40, created
a peer in 1844, returned to Italy as French ambassador, became prime
minister of the Pope’s government in 1848, finally assassinated in the
course of a speech in favour of moderation), _Cours d’économie
politique,_ Brussels, 1843.

23. R. Torrens, _An Essay on the Production of Wealth,_ London, 1821,
pp. 70–71.

24. Labour in being, not in potency.

25. Cf. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 31–2,
‘There can be no rise in the value of labour without a fall of profits …
If cloth … be divided between the workman and his employer, the larger
the proportion given to the former, the less remains for the latter.’

26. H. C. Carey, _The Past, the Present, and the Future,_ Philadelphia,
1848, pp. 74–5.

27. The Reverend Thomas Chalmers (1780–1847) was a Scottish Presbyterian
minister who taught moral philosophy and divinity, as well as political
economy; ‘one of the most fanatical Malthusians’ (Marx).

28. F.-L.-A. Ferrier, _Du gouvernement considéré dans ses rapports avec
le commerce_, Paris, 1805, p. 35. Ferrier (1777–1861) was a high French
customs official who both operated and wrote in favour of Napoleon I’s
protective system.

 

29. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. II, p. 10.

30. Hodgskin, _Popular Political Economy,_ p. 140.

31. T. R. Malthus, _An Inquiry into the Nature and Progress of Rent,_
London, 1815, p. 7.

32. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ p. 493.

33. _Recherches sur la nature et les causes de la richesse des nations;_
traduction nouvelle, avec des notes et observations; par Germain
Garnier, Paris, 1802, 2 volumes. The French edition of Adam Smith,
excerpted by Marx already in 1844; see _MEGA._ 1/3, pp. 457–93.

34. Genesis iii, 19.

35. _grisette:_ young shop-girl.

36. Fourier, _Le Nouveau Monde industriel et sociétaire,_ in _OEuvres
complets,_ Paris, 1848, Vol. VI, pp. 245–52.

37. Nassau Senior, _Principes fondamentaux,_ pp. 309–35.

38. Bastiat et Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit,_ p. 200.

39. Malthus, _Definitions in Political Economy,_ pp. 69–70.

40. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. II, Bk II, Ch. 2, pp. 270–77.

41. ‘Subjects of exchange’ should clearly read ‘objects of exchange’.
[MELI note]

42. See above, p. 617.

43. See above, p. 585.

44. Bastiat and Proudhon, _Gratuité du crédit_, p. 200.

45. ibid., p. 288.

46. A. Anderson (Scottish chemical manufacturer, not to be confused with
James Anderson, Scottish farmer, and eighteenth-century originator of
the theory of ground rent), _The Recent Commercial Distress; or, the
Panic, Analysed: Showing the Cause and Cure,_ London, 1847.

47. Say, _Traité d’économie politique_, Vol. II, p. 430.

48. Ramsay, _An Essay on the Distribution of Wealth._

49. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy_, pp. 26–7. The
passage is sometimes compressed, sometimes expanded, in the quoting, in
line with Marx’s usual method in the notebooks.

50. Petty, _Political Arithmetic,_ pp. 178–9.

51. ‘Assert’ is a suggested emendation for ‘overlook’ as found in the
original text.

52. Sismondi, _Nouveaux Principes d’économie politique_, Vol. I, pp.
94–8.

53. Cherbuliez, _Richesse ou pauvreté_, pp. 16–19.

54. The number 29 refers to Notebook V, p. 29. See above, p. 543, and
Storch, _Cours d’économie politique,_ Vol. I, pp. 411–12.

55. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique_, Vol. I, p. 246. The number 26a
refers to an excerpt-book.

56. Storch, _Considérations sur la nature du revenu national_, Paris,
1824.

 

57. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ p. 3.

58. ‘Middle-class’: in English in the original text.

59. A reference to the pamphlet _The Currency Question. The Gemini
Letters,_ London, 1844, written by two upholders of the currency
doctrines of the Birmingham banker Thomas Attwood, T. B. Wright and J.
Harlow. See below, pp. 804–5.

60. Ramsay, _An Essay on the Distribution of Wealth,_ p. 43.

61. The quotation from Storch is on p. 637.

62. By de Quincey and Ramsay; see above, pp. 642–3.

63. See above, p. 592, and Rossi, _Cours d’économie politique,_ p. 370.

64. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique,_ Vol. I, p. 405.

65. Malthus, _Definitions in Political Economy,_ pp. 237–8.

66. Adam Smith, _Recherches sur la nature et les causes de la richesse
des nations,_ Vol. II, pp. 197–8.

67. _‘partir de son possesseur’._ Storch, _Cours d’économie politique,_
Vol. I, p. 405.

68. ‘Use value’: this ought to read ‘exchange value’.

69. Cherbuliez, _Richesse au pauvreté,_ pp. 14–15.

70. Malthus, _Definitions in Political Economy,_ pp. 237–8.

71. See above, p. 574, and Malthus, _The_ _Measure of Value,_ p. 33.

72. See above, pp. 644–5.

73. MacCulloch, _The Principles of Political Economy,_ p. 300.

74. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ p. 26.

75. J.-B. Say, _Traité d’économie politique,_ Vol. II, p. 430.

76. Sismondi, _Nouveaux Principes d’économie politique,_ Vol. I, pp.
94–8.

77. _The Economist,_ Vol. V, No. 219, 6 November 1847, p. 1271.

78. Ravenstone, _Thoughts on the Funding System,_ p. 45.

79. Babbage, _Traité_ _sur l’économie des machines et des manufactures,_
pp. 20–21.

80. Andrew Ure (1778–1857; Scottish doctor, chemist, astronomer,
apologist for the factory system of the early nineteenth century and
opponent of the Factory Acts), _Philosophie des manufactures,_ Brussels,
1836 (French translation of the 2nd edition, London, 1835), Vol. I, pp.
18–19.

 

NOTEBOOK VII: The Chapter on Capital (continuation)

1. The manuscript has: ‘… now appears as circulating capital (the first
two) and fixed capital’.

2. Hodgskin, _Labour Defended,_ p. 16.

3. _‘als hätt es Lieb im Leibe’,_ Goethe, _Faust,_ Pt I, Act 5,
Auerbach’s Cellar in Leipzig.

4. See p. 688, n. 77.

5. Fourier, _Le Nouveau Monde industriel et sociétaire,_ Vol. VI, pp.
242–52.

6. The author referred to here may be J. F. Hodges, who wrote _Lessons
on Agricultural Chemistry_ (1849), and _First Steps to Practical
Chemistry for Agricultural Students_ (1857); or Marx may have intended
to write ‘Hodgskin’.

7. De Quincey, _The Logic of Political Economy,_ p. 114.

8. Babbage, _Traité sur l’économie des machines et des manufactures,_
pp. 375–6.

9. See below pp. 843–5.

10. _The Economist,_ Vol. V, No. 219, 6 November 1847, p.1271.

11. _The Economist,_ Vol. V, No. 219, 6 November 1847, p. 1271.

12. ibid

13. The first part of this quotation is taken over by Storch from the
French edition of Adam Smith, Vol. II, p. 207 (see above, p. 728); the
whole quotation, with the addition of Storch’s remark about revenue, is
to be found in Storch, _Cours d’économie politique,_ Vol. I, p. 246.

14. Cf. Hegel, _Science of Logic_, p. 746: ‘The relation of the activity
of the end through the means to the external object is … an immediate
relation of the middle term to the other extreme. It is immediate
because the middle term has an external object in it and the other
extreme is another such object.’

15. Sir Frederick Morton Eden, Bt (1766–1809) was inspired by the high
prices of 1794 and 1795 to make the first ever investigation into
working-class history. ‘The only disciple of Adam Smith throughout the
eighteenth century who produced anything of importance’ (Marx).

16. The passages from Eden’s book (Vol. I, Bk 1) are as follows,
beginning with the passage on p. 735 of the present edition: pp. 1–2;
pp. 57–61; pp. 75–6; p. 100; p. 101.

17. Adam Smith, _Recherches sur la nature et les causes de la richesse
des nations,_ Vol. II, p. 226.

18. Adam Smith, _Recherches sur la nature et les causes de la richesse
des nations,_ Vol. II, pp. 197–8.

19. Say, _Traité d’économie politique,_ Vol. II, p. 185.

20. See above, pp. 333–53.

21. The sentence preceding this one was inserted by Marx, above the
line, in English; thus the apparent virtual repetition. (The sentence
following also appears in English in the original.)

 

22. Adam Smith, _Recherches sur la nature et les causes de la richesse
des nations,_ Vol. I, p. 193.

23. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ pp. 338–9.

24. Ramsay, _An Essay,_ pp. 179–80.

25. Marx made extracts from these works on organic chemistry: J. von
Liebig, _Die organische Chemie,_ 4th edn, Brunswick, 1842; J. F. W.
Johnston, _Lectures on Agricultural Chemistry and Geology,_ 2nd edn,
London, 1847; and J. F. W. Johnston, _Catechism of Agricultural
Chemistry and Geology,_ Edinburgh, 1849.

26. See the section on Bastiat and Carey, pp. 883–93.

27. In fact, see below pp. 889–90.

28. See p. 86, n. 7.

29. Sismondi, _Nouveaux Principes,_ Vol. I, p. 90.

30. op. cit., Vol. I, p. 82.

31. op. cit., Vol. I, p. 89.

32. Torrens, _An Essay on the Production of Wealth,_ p. 52.

33. _s_/_(c_ + _v_) < _s_/_v_ is the correct expression; but the
manuscript has: (_c_ + _v_)/_s_ < _v_/_s_, struck out but not replaced
by anything else. [MELI note]

34. Robert Owen, _Six Lectures Delivered in Manchester,_ Manchester,
1837, p. 58; see above, pp. 712–14.

35. Benjamin Thompson (1753–1814), American adventurer, who entered the
service of George III, was created Count of Rumford in 1784, issued
_Essays, Political, Economical, and Philosophical,_ in London,
1796–1802, in which he recommended various inferior forms of food for
labourers; discussed by Marx in _Capital,_ Vol I, Moscow 1954, p. 601.

36. The MELI edition gives _aufgelöst_ (dissolved) rather than
_ausgelöst_ (triggered, released). This is in all probability a
misreading of the handwritten manuscript. (The _f_ and one form of the
_s_ are virtually indistinguishable in the old-style German script Marx
used at that time.)

37. Wakefield’s note on p. 64 of Vol. I of his edition of Adam Smith
(London, 1835–9).

38. Steuart, _An Inquiry into the Principles of Political Economy,_ Vol.
I, p. 399.

39. ibid., pp. 403–5.

40. Geminiano Montanari, _Della moneta, trattato mercantile,_ in Custodi
(ed.), Scrittori Classici Italiani di Economia Politica, Parte Antica,
Tomo III, Milan, 1804.

41. Tuckett, _A History,_ Vol. I, p. 157 n.

42. ibid., p. 204.

43. Eden, _The State of the Poor,_ Vol. I., pp. 119–20.

44. Marx collected and annotated an immense amount of material on the
various theories of the exchange rate: he included this in a draft of
1854–5 entitled ‘Money System, Credit System, and Crises’. This
manuscript remains unpublished.

45. _The Economist,_ Vol. XVI, No. 759, 13 March 1858, p. 290, article
entitled ‘Will the Low Rate of Interest Last?’.

46. David Urquhart, _Familiar Words as Affecting England and the
English_ London, 1856, p. 112.

47. See above, p. 782, quotation from Steuart.

 48. ‘Sterlings’ in the original text.

49. Marx’s English in the above sentence has been altered to conform to
modern usage. His use, in these and other passages, of terms which today
have an offensive ring (e.g. ‘semi-civilized’, ‘uncivilized’, ‘savage’,
‘semi-savage’, where what is meant is simply ‘pre-capitalist’) reflects
the general blindness of European scholarship towards non-European
civilizations, and indicates the relative weakness of anti-colonial
political movements at the time. This did not prevent Marx from being an
enemy of colonialism and of great-power chauvinism in every form.

50. The wars of the Revolutionary and Napoleonic periods, 1793–1815.

 

51. Cobbett, _Paper against Gold,_ London, 1828, p. 2.

52. Literally, ‘toads’. A French term of abuse.

53. Garnier, _Histoire de la monnaie,_ Vol. II, p. 11.

54. ‘King Servius first stamped money with the image of sheep and oxen.’

55. ‘Unwrought gold, unwrought silver’.

56. _The Economist,_ Vol. I, No. 37, 11 May 1844, p. 771, article
entitled ‘The First Step in the Currency Question – Sir Robert Peel’.

57. _The Economist,_ Vol. I, No. 42, 15 June 1844, p. 890, article
entitled ‘The Action of Money on Prices’.

58. _The Economist,_ Vol. I, No. 58, 5 October 1844, p. 1,275.

59. H. Thornton, _An Enquiry into the Nature and Effects of the Paper
Credit of Great Britain,_ London, 1802, p. 48.

60. Say, _Cours complet d’économie politique pratique,_ Vol. I, p. 510.

61. _sic._

62. Jelinger Cookson Symons (1809–60) was a lawyer who was appointed in
1835 by the government to draw up a report on the situation of the
hand-loom weavers; later he reported on the miners, and the educational
system in Wales; author of many books on economic and educational
questions.

63. W. H. Prescott, _History of the Conquest of Peru,_ 4th edn, London,
1850, Vol. I. p. 127.

64. ‘O blessed money, which furnishes mankind with a sweet and
nutritious beverage, and protects its innocent possessors from the
infernal disease of avarice, because it cannot be long hoarded, nor
hidden underground!’, quoted in ibid., p. 123 n.

65. H. A. M. Merivale, _Lectures on Colonization,_ London, 1841, Vol. I,
p. 52 n.

66. J. Sempéré y Guarinos, _Considérations sur les causes de la grandeur
et de la décadence de la monarchie espagnole,_ Paris, 1826, Vol. I, pp.
275–6.

67. This heading, though taken from Marx’s own index to his notebooks
(_Grundrisse_ (MELI), p. 966), seems to be out of place here.

68. Niebuhr, _Römische Geschichte, Erster Theil,_ p. 608.

69. At an interest of one-twelfth.

70. At an interest of five-twelfths.

71. Hüllmann, op. cit., Teil II, pp. 36–45.

72. ‘Things sacred and religious, which cannot be in the possession of
anyone, and cannot either receive a valuation or be mortgaged or
alienated, which are exempt from the commerce of men’ (Justinian,
_Institutes,_ II, 1).

73. S. P. Newman, _Elements of Political Economy,_ Andover and New York,
1835, p. 296.

74. Lauderdale, _Recherches,_ pp. 173–82.

75. J. R. MacCulloch, _A Dictionary, Practical, Theoretical, and
Historical, of Commerce and Commercial Navigation,_ London, 1847, p.
836.

76. C.-F. Chevé (1813–75) was a Catholic socialist, who supported
Proudhon between 1848 and 1850, and edited the Proudhonist journal _La
Voix du Peuple,_ in which the discussion between Bastiat and Proudhon
first appeared (1849).

77. The Reverend Joseph Townsend (1739–1816) was a Methodist clergyman
who originally studied medicine; he opposed the Poor Law legislation,
and (among others) invented the theory of population later taken over by
Malthus; he issued the pamphlet _A Dissertation on the Poor Laws, By a
Well-Wisher to Mankind_ anonymously in 1786.

78. G. Opdyke, _A Treatise on Political Economy,_ New York, 1851, p.
300.

79. Volume 5, which Storch issued separately, under the title mentioned,
as a counter-blast to the four-volume edition of his _Cours d’économie
politique,_ produced and annotated by J.-B. Say.

80. See above pp. 600–602.

81. Karl Arnd (1788–1877) was a state official in the small German
principality of Electoral Hesse, as well as a prolific compiler of
economics textbooks; hence his familiarity with the dog tax.

 

82. Ricardo, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ p. 84.

83. Charles Ganilh, _Des systèmes d’économie politique,_ Paris, 1809,
Vol. I, pp. 76–7.

84. _The Economist,_ Vol. V, No. 215, 9 October 1847, p. 1158.

85. _The Economist,_ Vol. IX, No. 386, 18 January 1851, p. 59.

86. _The Economist,_ Vol. I, No. 37, 11 May 1844, p. 771.

87. William Hampson Morrison, _Observations on the System of Metallic
Currency Accepted in this Country,_ London, 1837, p. 13.

88. John Fullarton, _On the Regulation of Currencies,_ 2nd edn, London,
1845, pp. 7–10.

89. Morrison, _Observations,_ pp. 21–5.

90. Urquhart, _Familiar Words,_ pp. 104–5.

91. Adam Smith, _Wealth of Nations,_ Vol. I, pp. 100–101.

92. J. S. Mill, _On the Principles of Political Economy,_ London, 1848,
Vol. II, pp. 17–30.

93. M. Augier, _Du crédit public,_ Paris, 1842, pp. 95, 101.

94. Storch, _Cours d’économie politique,_ Vol. II, pp. 109–14.

95. Augier, _Du crédit public,_ p. 128.

96. Fullarton, _On the Regulation of Currencies,_ pp. 102–4.

97. D’Avenant, _Discourses on the Publick Revenues, and on the Trade of
England,_ Pt II, London, 1698, p. 16.

98. Jacob, _An Historical Inquiry,_ Vol. I., p.302

99. ibid., Vol. II, pp. 214–15.

100. Bray, _Labour’s Wrongs,_ pp. 140–41.

101. _Free Trade, or the Meanes to Make Trade Flourish,_ anonymously
published in London (1622) by Edward Misselden, p. 21.

102. The Bank Restriction Act of 1797, under which the Bank of England
was allowed to suspend cash payments.

103. J. G. Hubbard, _The Currency and the Country,_ London, 1843, p. 33.

104. Garnier, _Histoire de la monnaie,_ Vol. I, p. 24.

105. ibid., p. 7.

106. _The Economist,_ Vol. XVI, No. 768, 15 May 1858, pp. 536–7, article
by James Maclaren, entitled ‘Literature. A Sketch of the _History of the
Currency, comprising a Brief Review of the Opinions of the Most Eminent
Writers on the Subject’._

107. This is the earliest part of the manuscript of 1857–8; it was
written in July 1857. It occupies the first seven pages of a notebook
which, when it became part of the _Grundrisse_ manuscript, obtained the
designation ‘Notebook III’.

108. Bastiat, _Harmonies économiques,_ p. 364 n.

109. Bastiat, _Harmonies économiques,_ p. 388.

 
